havoc_unit [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety before and have already gotten treatment for it, which works pretty well. This feels more like I need to learn coping mechanisms for this type of situation. I'll certainly bring it up to my doctor again. [info] INTJ [info] 1454837615
Mei_me [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety and depersonalization/derealization (emotional numbness, brain fog, detached from reality, very bad memory to name a few).Apart from that: being unable to make friends, depressed, very litle trust in people, afraid that everyone hates me. [info] None [info] 1530807410
FindingAmberMae [info] I literally admitted to being emotionally weak and suffering from debilitating mental illnesses. Fun Personal fact about me, I was diagnosed with anxiety, and panic disorders after I had suffered severe bullying in elementary school by students AND teachers for the sole reasons beinf 1, I refused to show an illustrated explanation of how I would come to a conclusion with critical thinkinng (Id always just know the math questions, numbers just made sense to me... They corrected the fuck out of this so I wasn't "picked on for being ahead and bored", and sure as shit my mental illnesses grew worse and worse the longer that had to deal with school, up until dropping out junior year.You see, simply because someone expresses their own personal experience with mental disorders or recognized medical conditions, doesn't mean that they are weak.If said person allows themselves to be the roll model we all need, and stay visible through all that torture and misdirected hate, I'd say we are pretty fucking strongly rooted, and will hold out much longer than your "need to be right" "need to be cookie cutter normie" to be important or lack of respect for people that come from backgrounds that you havenMt experienced firsthand. [info] None [info] 1486309420
lemaxx [info] Hi there. It's my first time posting in this subreddit. I was diagnosed with anxiety about 5 years ago (when I was 21). I was relatively high-functioning for the past 5 years, up until about 6 months ago. I'm finally addressing and acknowledging the severity of my issue. I'm going to my first psyche assessment tomorrow. I'm excited, and nervous, because this really "makes it real". I haven't played video games in quite a while. But I used to love The Sims!  [info] None [info] 1464119519
TheWallTheVeil [info] In 2012 I was diagnosed with anxiety. I was a heavy pot smoker back then and because of the anxiety I started having horrible panic attacks when I smoked it. My friend suggested synthetic to help me quit. I tried one and it was ok, went to buy more from another shop and all they had was something a little more harsh than what I was getting used to. I got home and smoked it while cooking dinner and when I stepped back into the house when I turned my head it was like my mind took a picture each time. My heart rate was through the roof and I was sure I was about to die. My son, who was 7 at the time, was the only one there while I quickly called 911,then called my mom to come over. They sent the cops because they thought I was doing hard drugs and then when they realized it was synthetic weed they all laughed at me. The ambulance bill was 500 dollars to take a trip to emergency and it probably took them less than a minute to drive down the street, because that's how far the hospital was. It was all a huge nightmare. Later I started to hear people were actually dying because they were smoking it. The paramedic read the bag and he's like "it literally says not for human consumption on the bag" apparently that includes smoking it. [info] None [info] 1510987519
frcrobert [info] I'm really starting to feel that, especially since 2 years ago when I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1552240947
meagicano [info] Yes - definitely! Time estimation is one of the big areas where I struggle, especially because I know what I can get done on a tight deadline. I'll reply to the OP first, then add some details.I also want to say that it's important that people realize they don't have to take on the battle of reducing the stigma of ADHD. It's a noble intention, but sometimes you have to look out for #1. This is something I've only learned through experience - I influence what I can directly, and I've had to let some things lie because I can't keep fighting. It takes up a lot of energy."Patience" isn't really an accommodation for work because there are often reasons why things need to be done on a certain timeline. Deadlines are often set for a reason - you could need to get something to a client, you could be part of a process and someone is depending on you to do your part so the next can go, you might need to have the response in time for payment processing, etc etc. It's hard to tell without knowing what the OP's job is, but an accommodation should be something that can help you get things out by an agreed upon deadline.If the deadline is completely arbitrary - that's hard from a mental perspective. I always try to figure out WHY a deadline has been set if I'm struggling with it. I don't ask my boss, but I look to the bigger picture. Like "ok, it has to be done by Tuesday noon so that X person can review it, then they can turn it around to me by the end of the day, so when I come in on Wednesday morning I can work on their comments..." An accommodation for "patience," based on how the OP described things, could be flex hours where the OP works for her agreed-upon eight hours a day, but with more flexibility. Instead of 8-5, she could work 8:15-5:15pm or something similar, depending on when she gets in each morning. I used to work for a company that had a "core hours" policy of 9:30-3, but outside of that you could work however you wanted.If the five minutes thing is for meetings, etc., OP should take a look at that. Why are they late? Are there Outlook reminders? I have Outlook reminders at 15 minutes, then I snooze until 5 minutes before, and then I snooze that until the meeting itself starts, which is when I join. I make those alerts pop up right in front of me. Anytime I leave my desk, I check my calendar. I live and die by my Outlook calendar and usually I've been really lucky. I'll set other reminders and timers as necessary.Taking on new projects - are you putting your hand up to volunteer? Is this at work or in your outside life? An accommodation associated with this would be that you're not overscheduled. You could ask to put any new projects on hold for the time being. Part of the challenge in this is the ADHDer's quest for novelty... doing the same thing over and over again, or being stuck on a project for a long time can be the worst. Depending on the work you do, you could ask to just be support on projects, so that you're not doing it from start to finish, or seek one project (instead of three) that lets you challenge yourself so that you're constantly learning from that instead of jumping from thing to thing.As for me....I was diagnosed at 33, in 2017. My aunt suspected I had ADHD when I was in my early 20s, since her kids had been diagnosed, but there wasn't a lot of information out there about women and ADHD and I just always kept it tucked in the back of my head. Babysitters would call me "hyper" and teachers always told me to be more ladylike, since the boys would be able to run in the mud, etc. and apparently it was the wrong way for girls to burn off energy. I never paid attention in class... I had years upon years of teachers complaining to my parents that I was reading books under the desk. I never really put a lot of time into homework, and while there are some massive gaps in my education, I was smart enough at the time to slide by without having to put in the work. I struggled with Calculus in high school, but dropped the class with 30+ people and took it in summer school instead with five others and got an A.The fact I got good marks was enough. I struggled in my jobs, especially when things became repetitive and boring, but never put 2 and 2 together. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was leaving the military, and the psychologist said that all of my past experience was likely due to anxiety, but a social worker I saw said she didn't think that was a fair assessment. I did fine in my MBA program, and at work, until things started to get overwhelming. During my MBA I had randomly read about women and ADHD, and how the symptoms are different for women than men. I went into a research rabbit hole and tried to get diagnosed, but my only option was paying out of pocket or spending years on a waitlist. I pushed it aside until things at work were really challenging for me. It all came to a head after something happened at work and I was thrown off my groove, and I just couldn't focus or get anything done that I wanted to do. I was in a different financial position with difference insurance, so I did a multiday assessment that ended with the psychiatrist being like "yeah... you definitely have ADHD and you've gotten where you are because you're smart".SO. Long backstory, but the overview is important (I think).Time estimation is HARD and it's something that I really struggle with. I have a VP I work with who makes promises to clients and I've started having to disagree with him in front of the clients to come up with a reasonable timeline.If I've done the work before, or something very similar, the time estimates are a bit easier. I always add in ADHD time - a buffer in case I can't focus, or in case something else comes up - that gives me a bit of breathing room. We've also updated our branding guidelines, so I've been adding in a buffer to account for updating to the current standards. If I don't have time, I'll send very plain content out so that I can get feedback on the "meat" of what's been presented. The challenge is that sometimes I don't know just how much work will go into something. I developed a two hour workshop for a client over the weekend - I had thought I'd be able to get it done in a few hours, but I didn't realize how much research and tweaking I would have to do. I ended up cancelling a ski day to get it done. I should have started working on it first thing in the morning on the Saturday instead of around lunchtime... but even that might not have been enough time. The partner saw it and thought I put in about 30-36 hours of work - which is definitely more than I did - but it shows how experience can help with time estimation.When I come up with a workplan, I try to break things down into details so I can better estimate my time. I don't always share this with leadership because I don't want to be held to it. But it lets me plan my time and I'll know that if I have an hour or two I can knock off something with a shorter time frame than deciding to tackle a bigger piece.I also struggle with things like, taking a shower and getting ready and knowing how much time it takes. Or how long it takes to get to work (our office location changed and it has doubled my commute - and made it so much harder for me). I have the timing estimates down perfectly on some things, like my commute to the airport, but the day to day stuff is a lot harder. I add buffers to almost everything. I also set alarms at weird times to everything. Like, 8:28am instead of 8:30, since it makes me think a bit when the alarm goes off in the morning. If I think something will take me two hours to turn around, I tell whoever is waiting I'll have to them in three. I've been trying to overestimate, especially if it's a deadline negotiation, because it's better for me to under-promise.OH and I use trello all the time (for me). I have colour coding for current projects, upcoming, personal things to do, other work things to do, etc. and I use that to set priorities. Traditional to-do lists don't work for me.Did that help? [info] None [info] 1563303346
thirtytwoeleven [info] I have I have been diagnosed with anxiety and gagging is one of my symptoms. It’s real fun  /s [info] None [info] 1563617075
coffeeandpaper [info] Oh, I am certainly not downplaying their role as a legitimate medicine for those in need. I actually keep some on me in case I get serious panic attacks; I have been diagnosed with anxiety since I was a young teenager. It's the reliance, as you mentioned, that I am staying away from. Particularly a daily basis. Perhaps it's because I haven't done a lot of them at once, but I don't get any feelings of euphoria or "not giving a shit," like booze does. Really, if I take them during an anxious episode, I feel "normal," whatever that means. Kratom, meditation, better exercise and healthier eating has allowed me to avoid taking benzos all these years. [info] None [info] 1484454061
MonsterMash1987 [info] My head is always full of thoughts and im constantly overthinking stuff. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, my issue with it is talking to people in real life. People tell me everyone has nerves when talking to people but they dont panic like I do.. it sucks to think i will always struggle to make friends and get to know anyone. Dont apogise for the wall of text, its good you were able to talk about it. Its such a difficult topic to talk about because everyones anxiety is their own personal demon. I dont judge you for feeling the way you do. I actually think you should be proud of yourself for getting through the days feeling like that. It must be tough. [info]  [info] 1556491919
kjm7 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety but I infrequently have panic attacks. When I do have one though it's generally right when I wake up. Pretty shitty way to start the day.  [info] None [info] 1423861688
lowsodiumcrackers [info] I guess I read that as minor children acting out, but maybe Therapist doesn't see any difference between little kids and grown adult children. I've seen two other therapists, one for several months, within the past few years. Neither of them mentioned PTSD to me, but I was diagnosed with anxiety. I can't think of any reason why if they thought I had PTSD, they wouldn't have told me.  [info] None [info] 1514180455
Rhaski [info] I hope I can help you a little here. Your experience sounds almost identical to my first year, and even now in my second year those feelings have come and gone. I discovered that the issue is not the career, or my ability to do the job, rather, it was more to do with how I deal with stress and my unrealistic expectations of myself. I ended seeing a therapist. I was diagnosed with anxiety, which is something I am now working on and making a lot of progress with managing stress. I would recommend is seeing a therapist about what you're feeling. Stress is part of the job, but it isn't normal to feel dread, fear and panic. This doesn't necessarily mean you also have anxiety, but it's clear that something is not right in the way you handle stress. You have worked hard to academically and professionally prepare yourself for this career so don't pull the trigger on leaving it behind too readily, give yourself a real chance first. Seek advice and tips from colleagues, mentors, etc as much as you can. Learn from them, find out how they deal with everything (I guarantee it doesn't involve them getting through every bit of work all the time). But seriously, book yourself in too see someone about how to handle your stress levels, and give yourself some credit. This is not an easy job,   it if you stick with it, it WILL get easier as you learn the tricks and everything stops being so new. In the meantime, acknowledge the progress that you HAVE made, and stop being so hard on yourself for not being a veteran in your first year [info] None [info] 1512435908
OneBadKid [info] I have had two attacks. Both hit without warning while I was driving. I suddenly had an overwhelming feeling of impending death. I was able to pull over and get out of the car. I felt like I had to keep walking/running or else I would immediately die. The first time, my wife was with me and she called an ambulance even though I was asking her not to. I found it very hard to sit still while the paramedics were examining me. They shot me with something to relax me and eventually I was diagnosed with anxiety attack. The second attack happened while I was driving alone a hundred miles from civilization. I just had to pull over and wait it out, pacing constantly for about 90 minutes. It is scary. Fortunately, it has not happened for 5 years.  [info] None [info] 1427477395
MoKix [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety. AMA. [info] None [info] 1402289312
tiny_venus [info] Do you perhaps have anxiety? I used to get freaked out in the same way and then I’d get more freaked out wondering if it was normal. I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year and a half ago and talked this over with my counsellor who said it was a totally normal trait of anxiety. I’d just suggest to try not to get too wrapped up into it- you don’t want to start feeling paranoid and wrapped up thinking ‘oh he acted like this maybe he’s going to break up with me!’ Because that might strain the relationship. Things sound pretty good between you, so just ride it out and enjoy life with him. [info] None [info] 1524436136
LitteWing93 [info] She called me and I apologized because of using the word seriously. I agree I should have thought about it longer I felt I didnt have much time because i wanted her to get the message a.s.a.p before Kelly had the chance to see it. I was diagnosed with anxiety which Is why I'm seeking to see if maybe i over reacted. Thank you for your input. [info] None [info] 1574628066
Lowbacca1977 [info] Heck, I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and it still crosses my mind every time that it's a made up excuse. [info] None [info] 1390559148
SurturOfMuspelheim [info] Man, I get angry so easily.  I used to just be prone to it, went to counseling for it as a kid.  Ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety... it's even worse.  I never take it out on others, I mostly just wanna beat the shit out of soft objects and scream, maybe throw something (like a plastic water bottle) but never anything more.  My moms BF used to literally punch shit, break shit and throw stuff at my mom when he was mad, so that made me control mine a lot better. [info] None [info] 1509171800
StuckInBed4Ever [info] I had my Gall Bladder removed when I was 12 after two or so years of chest pains. A few months later I had the same pains.I was diagnosed with anxiety 3 years after my surgery. [info] None [info] 1571428483
KissMyAsthma321 [info] I am on 30mg of propranolol daily, I was diagnosed with anxiety as well. I might have helped a bit, I'd say about 20-30%. But I still sweat so I guess it's a lie of antiperspirant and iontophoresis for me. [info] None [info] 1392581791
waffleshuffler [info] Yea, I'm going through the same thing. Shortly after college, I started getting anxious in situations that wouldn't even bother me at all before. It was so strange and confusing at first and I was worried that I had contracted an illness. Turns out I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder. Its very common apparently when you face the real world after you leave your parents home or graduate college. I just can't believe I can't get my confidence back at all. It's incredible how hard it can get back to the way I used to be. [info] None [info] 1524244429
mooseisfat [info] I went to the emergency room because i was feeling the left side of my face tingly after a big argument with my boss. I thought it was a stroke. I was diagnosed with anxiety a month later. Im sure anxiety was the cause. [info] None [info] 1572500818
PatchRat [info] Of course there are, but not all mentally ill people are a danger with firearms. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and at one time had suicidal thoughts.  I own almost 30 firearms and enjoy hunting and target shooting. As far as I'm concerned, the two things are completely unrelated.  [info] None [info] 1443992769
lethargic_cat [info] I did :/ went through multiple medications and therapists and tried to make it work but they're useless where I live. Told me I was depressed because of abandonment issues with my father even though I speak to him almost daily and have a tattoo dedicated to him. I tried to explain this and was told  I'm wrong as if I don't know my own life.  Gave up on medication because I felt more depressed and suicidal after trying it, and was given no professional support in my choice to do so.  I was forced to take it into my own hands to stop because after three attempts of telling my doctor/therapist (she was both) that I would like to stop and her refusing to help me. I was given a child's pamphlet on how to stay calm (marked with for children) when I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I got told that death threats sent to me by a person who has attempted a murder before were not serious threats and the worry was unnecessary and all in my head. I am disgusted with the way I was treated for my mental health and I have given up on professional care because I felt belittled and brushed over.  [info] None [info] 1508959421
TheSoundOutside [info] You're absolutely right. And I have been diagnosed with anxiety, many years ago as a teen. I guess it's hard to reconcile the pervasiveness of anxiety in my everyday life and the panic attacks I seem to have very rarely now. Therapy is a ways off, at least until I get insurance.  [info] None [info] 1378998665
elleeemo [info] Thanks for the link. And yes, I am aware of the phenomenon... and may even have it myself. My doubt is more to the point that it's a subset of anxiety disorder rather than being it's own specific thing.I've been diagnosed with anxiety. So I just assume a lot of my nagging (often irrational) thoughts are due to my brain miss/over-interperating cues. However, my current post is about feelings arising from an actual poor quality of work rather than some imagined state. Or at least that's what I think it is. [info] None [info] 1538957243
Artisticbutanxious [info] I always felt that the reason I been feeling tense on my throat is because I'm the type of person who stays quiet and doesn't express how I feel ( I been receiving therapy for this issue). And maybe my throat chakra is unbalanced as well. I seen a video about Theresa Caputo discussing her anxiety during her 20's. In my early 20's I was diagnosed with anxiety and IBS, I guess things happen for a reason?Yes, I would like to book a reading with you, I seen your videos before! Please give me the info on now to book it. [info] None [info] 1438979106
RoseBladeX [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder at 10 so.. [info] 19 [info] 1575059646
nightoracle [info] Definitely talk to a professional. I was diagnosed with anxiety first a couple of years ago and I fully attributed all my symptoms to that even though it really wasn’t all due to anxiety (e.g. not being able to sleep wasn’t because i was anxious but because i was so excited and ready to just go go go). But my anxiety got better and the problems were still there so once I looked more into ADHD and remembered how I was still this way before anxiety it led to me getting assessed for ADHD  [info] None [info] 1551642539
TyphoidTerry [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety from a young age, but I never did anything about it. I figured awareness of it was the key, and that worked for the most part. I was able to keep myself from freaking out, because mine usually manifested in anger. I'm pretty chill, as a result.Then a few weeks ago I had an actual attack at work. I noticed my breathing was weird, and I felt panicky. My heart seemed to be going faster, so I timed my pulse for a full minute and got a rate of about 125. It didn't come down for almost two hours.A few days ago, I was on the borderline, and I knew it. I was twitching and snapping at the littlest of things. Had to apologize profusely to my girlfriend a couple times for kneejerk reactions. I yelled at my dog who just wanted to go out, and I felt my head tingle (physically, like on the top) when I did it - that used to only happen when I got into fights with my mom and I said something I knew I'd regret.I'm hoping that it was just a fluke that this last episode was circumstantial and not related at all to the stress of NoFap. It'll pass, I'm sure, but man does it suck. [info] 2 days [info] 1423515169
crazynekosama [info] Never to both. I will, on very rare occasions have the odd drink but I think it's been well over a year since my last one. I used to drink all the time and then I was diagnosed with anxiety and I started taking meds and I found drinking on my meds wasn't the same (it just made me feel tired) and my doctor warned me that because alcohol is a depressent it can effect my anxiety. So I decided to not bother and I honestly don't miss it.   [info] ♀ [info] 1522463089
Ukiyo-Ikigai [info] I quit my job.I worked at an education dept at the time so I had a job where I was looking after a team of 9 senior peoples diaries, booking meetings and organising 40 different courses all at once. I was dubbed as the 'headless chicken' by my department because I was running around everywhere. Obviously I was stressed being the only person doing this for my team. When I asked for support my team especially my manager became vindictive and started micromanaging me (to the point I had to tell them when I was going to the toilet - no joke). It was the straw that broke the camel's back. I quit my job and went to my doctor for some support because I didn't wanna go to work anymore, was crying every day and then some - I was diagnosed with anxiety and low mood and went to therapy for a period of time. Eventually I found a part time job that was less stressful and was luckily in a team that was so supportive, they were the best team I've had to date. However, I still deal with anxiety over how I was treated in my previous role but learnt coping techniques from therapy which helps me be calm and put things into perspective. Lesson learned: never will I bend over backwards and stress myself out over work, it's not worth it. [info] None [info] 1569661466
poppy1996 [info] I was just diagnosed with anxiety disorder. I finally felt comfortable talking about it with my doctor and since starting medication, I feel amazing. But for a long time I just had so much anxiety because I expected everyone to act like my nmother. Now I’ve realized that’s the minority, and most people I come in contact with are great. Just know it does get better ❤️ [info] None [info] 1568463668
lets_talk_aboutsplet [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety (not on Reddit) without any of those symptoms. [info] None [info] 1551927158
jeremyfirth [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADD. My doctor prescribed wellbutrin to see if it would help with both. It helped a lot with the anxiety, but not so much with the ADD. after a month of that, I talked to my doctor about it and he kept me on wellbutrin, but added methylphenidate ER for the ADD. i think I've lucked out and found a really effective treatment on our first try. My life is considerably less frenetic and overwhelming. I feel so much better, and I feel so much more control over myself. It's very empowering. [info] None [info] 1410625435
mariel_j [info] At 15 I was diagnosed with anxiety and dysthymia. Worked very well with Prozac and Ativan for about 15 more years. CBT therapy is still very helpful. Don't get discouraged! [info] None [info] 1484146566
the_gift_of_g2j [info] Nothing too crazy compared to some of the other responses, but how many times I've written something relating to my anxiety and fear of dating again.   I wrote about how I gave a girl my number and I was embarrassed and stressed for the day and a half it took for her to respond.  I'm still a bit nervous and anxiety is trying to make me think she's still not interested or I'm not good enough.  To my family and friends, they think that even though I'm diagnosed with anxiety, I am very composed and happy.   [info] None [info] 1504552638
siggidima [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and before I began taking medication I had very disturbing and intrusive thoughts. Mine were more about me worrying about my family getting killed/hurt or killing myself (even though I didn't want to I still thought about it.)I do recommend speaking to someone. I doubt that you will actually hurt someone but I think it would help YOU and your peace of mind. I knew that I wasn't going to kill myself and I knew my family probably would not be murdered by meth dealers or an invading army but I was SO WORRIED AND TORN UP ABOUT IT! Medication has changed (and probably saved) my life.  [info] None [info] 1490721087
Bob4856 [info] Thanks sometimes I feel like I'm a failure and I'm gonna go to hell and there is no hope and I just worry but that could be because I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder [info] None [info] 1554382341
FrequentEphedrine [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder back in 2002, and mindfulness wasn’t a “thing yet”. Cognitive therapy is talk therapy that uses a ton of mindfulness techniques -  the anchoring method, Tibetan singing bowls, etc. Back then, I was told to just think of a phrase or a song that I could repeat to myself; my husband knows when I’m starting to freak out because I don’t even notice when I start humming it now. [info] None [info] 1562544805
remorse2 [info] You have quoted the verse.   That is good advice.  I was constantly anxious until I was diagnosed with anxiety by my doctor.   I am now taking antianxiety medications.  I expect to be off the medication in a year.   So go see your doctor is my advice. [info] None [info] 1572831818
Mispict [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1524468204
squamuglia [info] Not a metaphysical distinction, a causative one. When I was in college, I was diagnosed with anxiety mediated reflux. My GI Doctor basically told me there was nothing he could do for me and to seek out therapy. That was a very really somatic pain I was experiencing (vomiting daily for a year) and the correct intervention was psychological. I think this debate is a partially based out of a misunderstanding because you're referring to chronic pain like fibromyalgia, but there are lots of instances where perceptual pain should not be treated with narcotics because it would be treating the symptoms with a very real cost to the patient. As in the case of my hypochondriac friend who needs CBT for her anxiety, not an analgesic. [info] None [info] 1463335825
helpagirlout223 [info] No, I’ve never experienced any trauma, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety and when I’m overloaded with stress, my medical health is usually my target. Like I’ll immediately think there’s something wrong with me (whether it be related to my downstairs or not) and it will take over my thoughts for a while until I get over/through what I’m stressed about. I guess that’s not too healthy either.  [info] None [info] 1547559579
BittersweetTea [info] Ugh. My MIL said something very similar when I was diagnosed with anxiety years ago (hadn't even started TTC back then). And she wonders why I stopped talking to her... [info] None [info] 1457405537
funessen [info] Disclaimer: I'm really really tired, and English isn't my native language, so I appologize for my poor spelling and grammar, but I'm too tired to think clearly, and to read this through and check for errors. I'm sorry :)When I was diagnosed with anxiety and social-anxiety more than 10 years ago, the first shrink I spoke to said something, that at the time wasn't something I liked hearing, but turned out to be true. What he said was "You'll never be cured, but you'll learn to live with it." At the time, I took this as "Im going to feel like this forever, and how can I live my life like that?".But "you'll earn to live with it", didn't mean that I would never get better, and just adapt to feeling like I did. I ment that you learn to accept it, and stop trying to fight it like a disease.Eventually, I learned to ignore my anxiety almost completely. When I was diagnosed I was afraid of riding the bus, or any other public transportation, I didn't speak up during classes, or any social gatherings if there was just one person there I didnt know, I feared calling people on the phone, even my good friends, and the list goes on.At some point along the way, I decided that my anxiety could go f&amp;"% itself. I learned to tell myself that these things weren't scary, and I could convince my brain of this after a while, but my body to this day, still reacts sometimes, by shivering when speaking to people I dont know, or my heart races if I do something I once were scared of. But now I do things, and instead of being scared of doing so, I kinda look forward to doing them, to be able to give my anxiety the middlefinger over and over again, and show it that I'm in charge, and making my body shake, or giving me nousia, isn't enough to let the anxiety win. I even manged to convert the feeling I got when my anxiety starts kicking in, to a "positive" feeling. I kinda feels like an adrenaline rush, so when I get I, I just play pretend that I just got a free trip on a rollercoaster, and I didnt even have to pay for it, or go to the themepark to get it.When you get to a point where you can actually do some of the things you're scared of doing, even tiny things, the feeling afterwards is amazing. You feel proud, even though you think it's silly to feel proud of things like taking the bus, or other "normal" things. But allow yourself to be proud of every little thing, and it will help you in the long run.I'm still not cured, but like my shrink told me, I learned to live with it, so it rarely bothers me at all. I can do all the things I didn't use to, like using public transportation, making phonecalls to anyone, be it friends or the buscompany to file a complaint, you name it.2 years ago I decided to give my social anxiety the definitive f&amp;#-finger. I started researching, studying and preparing, and a year later, which now is about a year ago, I went to an open mic in the capital of my country, and preformed stand-up for 5 minutes, in a room with 70+ people (which went well btw), and I felt on top of the world. Now I don't feel theres anything I can't do, cause I can't think of anything more scary, than stading infront of so many people, and trying to be funny, and I already did that. So when I get nervous, I just think of that, and suddenly, nothing seems that scary anymore :) [info] None [info] 1433630346
Daniaximehc [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety a couple of days ago. What now? [info] None [info] 1548195120
Benzroller [info] Anxiety, and a lot of bad habits during college.I've always been super stressed out throughout my life. Tenfold more than most people that are diagnosed with anxiety.I remember as a kid, way before I even started smoking, I'd get worried sick about the smallest things. I'd be over at my friends house, playing on his dad's computer with him(windows 95 era), and we'd accidentally change the monitor resolution.We didn't know how to fix it, and I started crying. I was worried sick, even though I knew I wouldn't be the one to get in trouble. Just irrational fear over small things like that over the years have caused the muscles in my heart to deteriorate slowly.After eating like shit in college(fast food 5x a week), drinking a lot, and smoking cigs every day, I woke up one night and just started vomiting blood.I left college during the middle of the semester, and came home to live with my parents. I was bedridden for a month; I couldn't keep ANYTHING down, I'd wake up and take a sip of water and immediately throw it up. I had more procedures done on my body than anyone my age should ever have. 2 endoscopies, 2 colonoscopies, ultrasound on my gallbladder and many other areas of my body, and a plethora of blood tests(they probably took a liter of blood from me combined from all the tests).Turns out I have celiac disease, crohn's disease, GERD, gastritis, they found ulcers in my stomach, polips in my intestines, and over the past few years(this happened in 2011), I've lost 40lbs.I went from being 5'11, 170 in great athletic shape, to weighing 130. The doctors at one point told me that if I don't gain weight, my other organs would start to fail and I'd ultimately die.Well, it's finally starting to happen. I eat as much as I can; smoking always helped alleviate the symptoms of my stomach problems, but I still couldn't/can't gain weight for the life of me. I'll stuff myself every day and eat as much as I can, as unhealthy as I can, and I wont gain a pound. I can't even have sex now; after I have sex, I experience the same symptoms that I do after I smoke. Most recently over the past few months, every time I'd smoke, my heart would start racing at 170 bpm or so, I'd start sweating profusely, and if I took a few steps, it felt like I was going to collapse and either have a heart attack or seizure. I remember smoking at my friend's house one time a few months ago, one of the last times I smoked, and I honestly thought I was going to die. My heart hurt so bad, every area in my chest hurt, it was incredibly hard to breathe; yet, I didn't tell anyone. I went to the bathroom and looked at myself in the mirror and thought, "this is the end...this is the last time you're ever going to see yourself in the mirror." I was 100% convinced I was going to die -- it's hard to describe that feeling, knowing death is coming and just waiting for it, it's almost surreal.I've seen a cardiologist, and he did an EKG and basically told me the events of my past(my stomach problems and what not) have caught up to me; that my heart is in terrible condition, and any more stress on it could be fatal.There's hope that if I miraculously gain weight over the next few years, exercise(I don't exercise much though because it causes me to lose weight, when I really need to gain weight), and improve some other aspects of my life, my heart can slowly recover.Most will attribute my symptoms to a panic attack, however, I've been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 16. I've had panic attacks, I know how they feel. When I smoke, it doesn't cause a panic attack; my body is weak, and it jolts my heart to the point where it feels like I'm about to fall into cardiac arrest, and very well may.Sorry for the long post, it's 4am and there's a lot of rambling in it, but that's a little insight into my situation. Feel free to ask me any questions, I've had these problems for a while now, if I could be of any assistance to anyone I'd be more than happy to help. [info] None [info] 1425203467
svkadm253 [info] I notice this too. Especially at work. I'm in IT and outages are no fun - not life threatening danger but people get pretty mad and $$ gets lost. Everyone panics but I'm like OK let's do this. I recently explained to my boss that I was diagnosed with anxiety and he was like 'what, but you're so calm'. Meanwhile 3 hours earlier I had to shut my office door and hide under my desk for a few minutes to try and calm down and nothing actually bad happened. [info] None [info] 1560667245
gotskott [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and migraines, so it's hard to get taken seriously sometimes ("Oh, that's just you're anxiety causing that.")  I have a weird pain that seems to come from near where I had a root canal or close to my sinus cavity.  Dentist said it's probably a sinus infection.  Doctor said it's probably a dental issue.  Eventually, was given antibiotics, and the pain has gone, but I have no energy and my knees hurt like the bugger.  I feel like an old man walking around the house.Going to see my primary again today, as he said my symptoms show that something else is at work here.  But it's Kaiser, so I'm not holding my breath. [info] None [info] 1443467865
StevieKnickers [info] After the fall of a ten year (on and off) 'relationship' with my high school sweetheart, I had a nervous breakdown and sought a psychiatrist. I was diagnosed with anxiety and an eating disorder. I am also codependent and a perfectionist...being the daughter of addicts/alcoholics, I've known this for quite awhile. Low dose ntidepressants have really helped me get over the hump, but I also do bi-weekly therapy and nutrition counseling. I'm learning how to obtain balance and use healthy coping skills when I feel out of control.  This has been mostly journaling, exercising, and positive self-talk. It's still hard every single day, but I feel myself thinking/acting more mindfully. The next step is hopefully moving away from my family, which is a huge trigger of mine. I love them more than anything, but we tend to enable each other's unhealthy behaviors. I also want to explore my own interests and abilities as a young woman since I've always relied on my family and ex for emotional support and to occupy the time when I would be learning about myself. It's a slow journey, but I just remember that I need to get better so I can love myself and appreciate a healthy man. Good luck on your own journey! :) [info] None [info] 1363326029
itstheamandashow [info] First I wanna say thank you for sharing. It’s okay to admit you have Aspergers. It’s okay to feel like a fraud at first. When I was diagnosed with anxiety I was like “oh great another college girl with anxiety I’m such a cliche” but after a while I came to terms with it and advocate for anyone who suffers like we do. It’ll take time, but you were strong enough to seek help, so you’re definitely strong enough to continue on with your new outlook. Remember= mental illness doesn’t define us, it refines us.  [info] None [info] 1552036486
FAM0USL0SER [info] I just found this subreddit. I am diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks. I’ve bitten and picked since I was a kid. Why do we do it? [info] None [info] 1562703546
innistradi [info] &gt; Can a man be both mentally ill and smart at a same time anyway? Or it sounds so ridiculous?I'm pretty seriously mentally ill (I'm diagnosed with anxiety, personality disorder not otherwise specified, mood disorder not otherwise specified, and post-traumatic stress disorder) and I'm "smart." I can learn, I can run my own homebrewed dungeons and dragons campaigns, I was in college for a while. I'm disabled-- meaning I can't function in society at large the same way many people can, especially off my meds, but I'm smart.However:I do have brain fog, obsessive thoughts, memory gaps, etc. If your character is severely traumatized (which any significant amount of time in total isolation), it is going to change the way her brain functions, and how *well* it functions. I would look into famous cases of neglect and abuse, such as feral children, as well as isolation experiments and cases of prisoners of war. Those should give you a good ideas as to what timeframe you would want. 800 years is excessive.Is your idea offensive? It depends on how you write it. [info] None [info] 1463273569
sample_post [info] Hello,I'm extremely interested in joining the RCMP and meet the requirements. However, I have a mental health record from when I was a teenager.I grew up in a bad home and my Mom put me in therapy in highschool, and I was diagnosed with anxiety. After trying trial periods of SSRI's and SNRI's until about the age of 20 and not finding them helpful, I now no longer take medications and function completely fine. I don't experience anxiety attacks (I don't even think I was experiencing actual anxiety attacks previously either).A lot of my issues stemmed from family issues and were entirely situational.I haven't been on any of these medications or accessing anything mental health related for nearly four years.Will the RCMP or even municipal police forces take note of these records and dismiss me as a candidate? I know that RCMP is reconsidering their standards due to low staffing and are looking for women (I'm a woman) to join for diversity hiring.I'm confident I would pass their psychological test during the application process.Please let me know your thoughts. Thanks for your time. [info] Not a(n) LEO / Unverified User [info] 1557018220
address-unknown [info] I’m so sorry you’re going through this. This isn’t really advice, just an anecdote. I was diagnosed with anxiety as a very young teenager and took various benzodiazepines pretty regularly (never more or more frequently than prescribed) until I was in my early 20s. I went off of them due to headaches that gradually developed after taking them for several years. My dosage hadn’t increased, and it was consistent between Xanax, Ativan, and Klonopin. Without fail, as soon as the effect of the benzo ended, I would get a CRUSHING headache. My GP and psychiatrist both insisted it wasn’t the benzos but were happy to help me get off of them. Immediate relief. I still get migraines but after that medication change and identifying a few triggers they’ve dropped from 1-3 per week to once a month. I still have an Ativan prescription because sometimes the beastly headache is better than the panic attack but I take it extremely sparingly.  [info] None [info] 1554311432
firespitter [info] I have very similar tics, but also all over my body. When I was diagnosed with anxiety my psychiatrist just assumed that the tics were a manifestation of it, should I look into tourettes as well? [info] None [info] 1471396354
michbelles [info] Haha yeah I was diagnosed with anxiety and I was mildly offended by this 20 secs statement [info] None [info] 1513546969
XANAXandDABZ [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety, I'd definitely recommend just getting a benzo script, at the end of the day it's better for your liver. Plus if you have health care it winds to being cheaper for higher quality drugs  [info] None [info] 1427084150
Trueidentity08 [info] Me? I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. That’s it lmao [info] None [info] 1559883446
exposeyourself2art [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, minor OCD, PTSD, and hypothyroidism. Whenever I go on thyroid medication, I get depressed. I tell my doctor this, and I'm always told that the thyroid medication is supposed to do the opposite. Well, it's a very obvious trigger for me, and it makes me not want to be on any medication at all. [info] None [info] 1397736852
DanceOfTheSiren [info] Alright, there are a few!1. I'm a Masochist2. I like getting my hair brushed because it excites me when other people do it.3. I have always wanted to have sex in the shower.4. I am ALL about dirty talk.5. I want to have my partner tease me in public even though I have been diagnosed with anxiety.And that's about it...probably.Edit: Nope that's not it! I forgot that I want to have a threesome with two guys. [info] None [info] 1564028828
Blue45 [info] I've had those situations where I'm thinking I'm having a heart attack, or on the verge of death, but it's just the anxiety. I've also been to the emergency room for all the tests they did on you and same results, clear. That's when I was diagnosed with anxiety. And I know what you're going through with the diazepam. I usually take them the night after drinking (and it's common knowledge to not mix benzos and alcohol) and I still wait a large amount of time but the thoughts inside my head are "what if I didn't wait long enough" or "what if the diazepam is going to do more harm than help". The meds finally kick in and I feel much calmer. It sounds like it is just your anxiety, and 2mg of diazepam isn't a large amount (I take 10-20mg) Avoid drinking, take it for your flight and you should be fine. [info] GAD [info] 1378161243
RepressedThot [info] A lot of my childhood I can't remember either. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and persistent depressive disorder also known as dysthymia. I grew up with my father in and out of my life but always in a very toxic way. I've thought I had PTSD but am not sure. I was seeing a therapist for a few months but then moved and haven't gotten insurance back. I remember a lot of verbal abuse and traumatic stuff like spending Christmas visiting my dad in prison but it's hard to think there is worse stuff that is repressed. I think it's messed up how the environment we grow up in can follow us for so long. My and my bf don't want kids ever due to our childhood, we don't think we'd be good parents.  Im sorry what you have gone through I hope you can find ways to cope and improve yourself. [info] None [info] 1556037211
hollywoodshowbox [info] Believe it or not I was diagnosed as being in a depressive state three weeks ago. I suffered from disordered eating habits (reading: anorexia &amp; bulimia, not at the same time) for four years (recovered now for a little over a year). I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder... last year? My motivation is to be the best possible version of myself (BPVoM), whatever that is. Sitting on my ass crying because life didn't work out the way I thought it would is *not* something the BPVoM would do. Moping about in an eternal grey is *not* something the BPVoM would do. It's really, really hard to develop this attitude and has taken a while to turn it into a habit -- but now that I've locked it in... it's just easier to cope with shit, you know? Find whatever works for you and go off of that. I was never a believer in the "one size/rule/belief fits all" thing. Discover a philosophy, mission, whathaveyou -- and make it your own. Good luck! You can do this.  [info] Female [info] 1398840183
didi1995 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety but I've been taking xanax a lot recently but it takes me around one bar to feel it. maybe 1mg? [info] None [info] 1567168724
PM_ME_UR_TANNED_BUTT [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety **and** insomnia. Racing thoughts about an exam or a long shift is **anxiety**. When I just can’t sleep just because that’s **insomnia**.I know the difference and can explain both because I’ve experienced both.Could be, like I said. [info] None [info] 1537061806
Whynotsohot [info] Thank you for your reply. I feel that, yes, I can't change him. I wish he was as attentive as he was while I was pregnant. He is a good person deep down, but too focused on money and financial well being to focus on everything else. He is awesome with the kid (when he takes 5-15 minutes of his day, he dedicates them to his son). Not so much to me. I tried to get over our differences and bad communication (I'm at fault here too, it's a chore talking to him now), but I am not sure how long before I get close to depressed again. Lately I've been feeling very unmotivated to do anything (why go to work? Wake up?) and it is started to worry me. I was diagnosed with anxiety about 10 years ago, I am not sure if it still "sticks"? I can get child support, yes! I think it would be enough for food and some basic bills while I wait for kindergarden for the kid and a job. Again, thank you for your kind words. I will need to think everything over. Maybe write it all down and see where I am at.  [info] None [info] 1428690922
Mephistophellatio [info] Man, I can relate to this so well.  I'm at the very beginning steps of trying to build a reputation for myself in the art community.  As I eventually would like to be able to support myself with artwork.  No plans for anything extravagant, just want to pay the bills with it.  I'd like to think that having three bachelors degrees in various fine-art related subjects shows that I'm not a slacker, and that I'm both talented enough and capable enough to use my art to achieve something.  Even if that's just being able to pay my bills with it.The issue is that I have a full time job now.  And I love it.  Been with the company for almost three years, wonderful benefits, love the people I work with.  But it's like 50-60 hours of my week most of the time, accounting for commute and everything.  And the job itself is really fun, but I've found that I think it's fun because it uses the same...energy? that I use when I'm being creative.  But I don't get the same reward/satisfaction mentally from working as I do from finishing a piece.  So when I get home each night, or on a rare day off, I'm just mentally exhausted, and given that I average 6-8 miles of movement every day also pretty tired physically.  So there's so much desire to work on something productive.  To draw or paint or render something.  I want to do it so badly.  But when the time comes, I just feel like my brain is recharging from work and I have zero motivation or inspiration to complete anything useful.  So I do spend the sparse free time I have getting high and watching Netflix or playing video games.  It's frustrating.  Because ostensibly the answer is "Just stop doing what you're doing and do the other thing" but it isn't that simple.I don't know, maybe it's because I've been diagnosed with anxiety and depressive disorders so my wiring just isn't up to spec or something.  But even with medications, I haven't noticed much of a difference in how exhausted I am after work, or how much spare creative energy I have.And I would love to even just take fewer hours at work and have the spare time to work on personal stuff.  But I can barely make ends meet as is, so making less money and losing part of my benefits isn't an option, at least not until I'm making enough money from art to supplement the lost hours.  But you have to build that kind of clout.  And since for much of the past three years I've been producing a whopping 0 pieces a month, I'm obviously not going anywhere with that just yet.So I feel like it's a weird catch-22.  Like I can either lose the money for a while and not be able to pay my bills until I start making more money on my own.  Or I can give up on the dream that I've had since I was 8 and take a more lucrative, but entirely inflexible, position at my current employer.I don't know.  I'm sure that a comment on a 5 hour old r/quotesporn isn't the best place for me to vent about this, but whatever, it just struck me.If you've read this much, [here's a treat for you](https://www.instagram.com/snoopybabe/?hl=en) [info] None [info] 1471809696
barcelonatimes [info] In high school I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.  I was prescribed .5 MG of xanax, twice a day.  Once i graduated and went to college, I decided "I don't need this shit anymore!"  Well, for about two weeks I would constantly catch something moving out of the corner of my eye, catch a flash of light from the side.I thought I was losing my fucking mind, and I had no idea that just taking one of those pink pills would make it stop(luckily.)  That shit is completely normal.  Anytime you are imbibing a GABA inhibitor, you will experience things like this during withdrawals.  Just keep trucking...you're the exterminator, and the varmints are decreasing by the day! [info] None [info] 1394513301
PandoraCdn [info] There actually are varying levels of OCD.  You can also be either more obsessive or more compulsive.  And.  In fact.  It can get better in some cases.  I was diagnosed with anxiety, mild OCD (compulsive side), and trichotillimania (can't remember spelling).  My compulsive habits have faded over the years, aside from the eyelash pulling, and I haven't taken regular meds for any in years.   Still trying to figure out dealing with anxiety and the trichotillimania.   [info] None [info] 1404401035
skz-paige [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety previously when I was younger, but my ocd compulsions are checking locked doors, I have to check them at least 4 times (can go up to 12 times) before I can sleep and I have to push curtains back against the window after I check the doors, the whole process causes me to lose a lot of sleep and does heighten my anxiety.I also have some minor counting related ones but they don’t have major consequences like losing sleep. [info] None [info] 1569069676
lechoro [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in my teens. I've gone off medication a couple times (with doctor's supervision) and been miserable each time. I had to go off the medication I was on once I became pregnant. I was not happy, I was panicking all the time and just had that awful gnawing feeling of anxiety in my stomach all the time. I'm now on a low dose of Zoloft and while things aren't perfect, I can at least function. I'm in a better place mentally and physically, which to me is worth it. I want to be as emotionally healthy as possible for the baby. So from personal experience medication hasn't been a cure but it's helped immensely.  [info] Team Blue! 3/11/17 [info] 1477446373
olioster [info] Thank you for the reply. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so this makes sense. Research time! [info] None [info] 1528914014
ieffinghatemayo [info] Wish that when I was diagnosed with anxiety they would have understood it better. Not coddled me per-say, but maybe understand how  scared I always was and maybe been more compassionate. [info] None [info] 1562995191
Chirikyat [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders, and telling close friends this has managed to drive some away. Many people do not understand how it works, therefore do not know how to sympathise.As we cannot explain it, they cannit understand it. [info] None [info] 1386412316
hiwaomiyazaki [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ADD, but I never talked to my psychiatrist about these episodes because I honestly thought they were normal. Growing up, my mom would have days where she seemed like she was disconnected and on another planet that had delayed reception. I just assumed it was a personality thing. I recently have read some descriptions of people's experiences with depersonalization/dissociating and suddenly, I realized that it's npt a eun of the mill thing!Thank you for responding, I'm definitely going to find out what's going on with my ole noggin. Maybe this is it? If you don't mind my asking, how do you deal with it? [info] None [info] 1480405755
Azcardsfan26 [info] Me!I was diagnosed with anxiety at least five years ago, and fibro a couple of years maybe? I definitely understand where you are coming from about doctors not believing you and blaming in on something else. I begged my doctor for help and she flat out told she wouldn’t do anything for me cause there was no physical proof of my pain. It’s rough, but know that you aren’t alone. There are so many others like this as well. [info] None [info] 1517787654
orangemochafrap17 [info] Like I said, I don't think the two are exclusive, but anxiety should be treated with therapy, it's not a personality trait, it's an illness that holds you back. Not wanting to interact is far different to being **afraid** to interact.As much as introverts like alone time, humans are social animals, we need it to SOME extent, no matter how slight. You're talking about a minority of introverts who actually need that much alone time, compared to a large number of people with anxiety, that again, gets mixed up with introversion on this sub a lot.I don't think it's perfectly understandable for **anyone** to have no friends at all, it's in our nature to want human contact to SOME extent. Very few people are that introverted that they can't have friends, I'm going off the majority here.It's not that they shouldn't be in this community, it's that they mightnt actually be introverted, if they are solely fearing social interactions, they might very well be extraverted but have anxiety.I thought I was very introverted for years, but then I was diagnosed with anxiety, as I learned to manage it I realised I actually enjoyed social events sometimes, but I did still need to be alone most of the time. A lot of people mix the two up, or conflate them together like they come hand in hand, they don't, you're not stuck with anxiety, thats why I tell people if I think they actually have it, because I don't want to think of them going they're whole lives misattributing anxiety as some uncontrollable part of their personality. [info] None [info] 1551136932
meevis_kahuna [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD.  For a while I was taking benzos and Ritalin simultaneously.  It works OK but I ended up becoming extremely reliant on the cycle of meds in order to sleep properly (uppers in the morning, downers at night).  The ADD meds definitely exacerbate the anxiety issues and come with their own problems.   The anxiety meds also make it harder to concentrate.I agree with your doctors -- DEFINITELY explore the alternative diagnoses before you start mixing meds. [info] None [info] 1383064640
dancing-jukebox [info] hello :c im rlly sorry that u have to go thru all this and i just wna let uk that im taking up a lot of courage to speak up abt this as wellI've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder since sec two and I've been struggling with mental health since then.first off I wna rlly say that I'm proud of u for even taking a step in seeking help even if it was through an online platform bc that takes a lot of strength to take a step even if it's small to youi may not fully comprehend whatever you are going through but I hope these words can at least make u smile or pull through that few bits of time in a daya lot of ppl will tell you to suck it up and deal with it but im not gonna do that. for me bc im surrounded by a lot of realistic friends who give me pep talks, ive been accepting of this alr. but I think I'll try to empathize with you &lt;3I know it's rlly hard to cope and sometimes life can be a b*tch but uk what? ure a badder and tougher b*tch okay 😤😤😤 life will be tough but you know who's tougher? you!! whatever it is, I think that u shld prioritize ur health first but give urself small little goals to achieve every day to push urself and strengthen ur abilities.but trust me ik it's easier said than done. sometimes I can't get out of bed and I have to cancel plans. Sometimes I get anxiety attacks while studying. sometimes I don't even eat. but all these are part of the process and progress where YOU are gg to be better. it takes steps. even small ones, even if u end up taking a step back. it's okay. bc it's still progress. try to perhaps read up a chapter a day that's at least better than not trying. and ik u are trying very very hard and ik it's not easy. but sometimes when life hits u, u gotta hit it back. how so? by thinking-no. by knowing that YOU ARE BETTER AND YOU ARE STRONGER THAN YOU THINK YOU ARE. you are something. you are worth it. you can. and you will.i know this might sound stupid, but I used to talk to myself like that. and repeat "I can do this" every morning. anxiety still tackles me back nowadays and I do get relapses but uk what? I tell it to f*** off bc I'm gonna do whatever I want no matter how it tries to stop me.and I know u can do it too. I believe in you even if there are times u don't believe in yourself.I'm not the best motivator or the best person to seek comfort but I do care :') either way, no matter the results, u did what u can. and that's more commendable than getting straight As.just tryna spread love here, hope ure feeling a bit better after this ❤️ [info] Secondary [info] 1572116742
disillusionwander [info] This might be drifting off a bit, because it doesn't answer why advil doesn't work for mental pain, but I think it is interesting. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I think the difference comes down to being able to relate. If I break my leg, you have a leg, too (probably). You can probably relate (in some way) the amount of pain that breaking it could result it. It's much different for mental diseases. I can't really explain, as well as I'd like, why leaving shampoo/conditioner/body wash bottles on the floor of the shower bothers me to the point where it makes me deeply upset and uncomfortable. [info] None [info] 1448670231
WayfaringWarrior [info] No feedback but I scrolled back because I love ludovico. Fun fact, I was diagnosed with anxiety and I stumbled across drawing as a way to cope. Whenever I’m really stressed out, I’ll pair ludovico’s Divenire album and my sketch book to create some space or take a mental break. I think it’s helped me more than most things [info] None [info] 1551269154
Trusty_Sidekick [info] Some people are born blind, or with heart defects, or with any other of the slew of biological short-comings out there. Do many of those people still survive? Absolutely. But do we at least recognize that their abnormal condition is exactly that? Yes. If you had to send two human beings to another ELP to propagate the human race, would you send two homosexual men, or one heterosexual woman and one heterosexual man? There's a biological reason for that. Do I have a problem with non-heterosexual people in society? Absolutely not! I have a handful of gay friends, my fiance is bi-sexual, and a cousin of mine is transgender. I am totally accepting of all of them. But to argue that heterosexuality should not be classified as "normal biological function" is stupid. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD and am on medication for those. Should I be offended if people tell me that those aren't "normal" functions of the brain? Nope, and I don't. I embrace it as a part of who I am. [info] None [info] 1424901227
IPickedTheWrongMajor [info] Love your observation.  I just often wish I had picked a totally different path in life. I have had a successful career, but I find my work often very stressful, and I found something else I love to do later in life. But I was quite successful after freshman year, and I was actually quite passionate about my chosen field.  Without that, I don't know how I would have succeeded. I was diagnosed at age 50, and I wonder how my life would have been different if I had been diagnosed with ADHD as a young person and prescribed the appropriate treatment.  Instead, when I was an emotional wreck, and thinking I had to drop out of college, I was diagnosed with anxiety and prescribed anti-anxiety meds.  That helped me calm down enough to get my act together. Then, I was fortunate enough to have a short, helpful course of psychotherapy.  That treatment helped me with my lack of confidence.  For the problems with focus, concentration and concentration?  I am pretty sure that's why I used tobacco. I found places to study with no distractions. My friends were good students, so we probably supported each other in doing well. I was physically very active. I guess I was just smart enough to figure out strategies that worked.   [info] None [info] 1452439972
HideInTheHouse [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well. I would go to the silent kitchen and make me something to eat when I got home from school, or the silence of the bathroom to refresh my brain. Bask in the nothingness.  [info] None [info] 1553819034
bby8bit [info] This is literally me right now. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I'm having a little panic attack right now. I have GERD but unfortunately to symptoms enhance anxiety symptoms and it's way of manifesting... Chest pain, very slight numbing to left arm and hand, gassy as fuck through both ways lol. These are typical symptoms for gerd but my anxiety is saying it's not. Fml. Why anxiety, why. Especially at 3:30am. Curse anxiety  [info] None [info] 1491031504
kaupa_lupa [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks just 2 weeks ago; and 2 days ago I found out I have a 1 inch tumor in my breast. [info] None [info] 1552233921
PowerOfYouth [info] Great guide. I didn't have this issue until I was diagnosed with anxiety recently and have been looking for fighting game tips specifically to no end [info] None [info] 1546469541
collegestruggle [info] I just wanted to say that you are not alone. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was in high school and then my father died suddenly when I was away in college. After that my anxiety attacks turned from impending doom to death by (insert disease here). My side will hurt and I'll think my spleen ruptured or I'll get a headache and I am convinced I have a brain tumor. Anyways, I'm better now but it does stress me out at night sometimes. [info] None [info] 1407127716
sizillyd [info] Did you see a nurse practitioner or something? You should have seen a psychiatrist. A physician. Not a nurse. The same thing happened to me my first time. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I went and saw a primary care physician. However, my issue was my concentration. So I made an appointment with a psychiatrist and told them what my concerns were. I was tested for ADHD and was prescribed medication. [info] None [info] 1474136976
istayzooted [info] So 200 UG is a good dose for next you guys think ? Gonna wait a while obviously.. I like this headspace it's chill.. and I'm diagnosed with anxiety haha if that's saying something  [info] None [info] 1521511999
xprincessmuffin [info] I don't know if you can offer any insight... but I'm frustrated beyond explanation with my dreams.I lucid dream naturally, always have, as does my twin sister. When we were very young, we shared reoccurring nightmares... but it passed, and we always assumed it was just a phase little kids go through - the constant nightmares. It happened again at around 8, and passed again... But in case it happened again, together, she and I devised ways to control our dreams, and we both engage in these practices to this day. Certain things are walled off, never to be dreamed of. I don't know how to explain what we're doing... but they're locked away. The locks fail sometimes, always during periods of high stress, and once they're broken, they have to be rebuilt -bc it's always a horrible nightmare when they make it into dreams.This process lead me to believe our lucidity is a sort of defense mechanism.It is my default to dream negatively. It's not always a nightmare... but my dreams aren't "safe." Part of my dreaming brain actively twists good things into bad, so when it goes too far, being lucid allows me to quit the dream (everything goes black or white), change it, or just wake myself up. My lucidity takes a form of simply being aware I'm dreaming, and I often state so aloud, knowing none of the events or people are real... and yet, I obey "rules" in the dream. So... I can for instance change a thing, but only so long as I comply with rules A,B, but not C -none of which make sense. It's not full consciousness...Fast forward to now.I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder 6 months ago and began taking medication to help. They're ok... but my dreams changed. I am still lucid, but everything is bright, vivid, happy, and yet, it's also a multitude of nightmares. Lucid and carefree, I quit nightmare after nightmare after nightmare, every night. I eventually wake up, that dreaded feeling of having been in a horrible situation, but I never cared in the dreams. I'm more bothered by the lingering mood of the nightmares themselves after waking, despite having been happy through them. And the more I try to remember the lucid nightmares, the more I forget. I can only remember my non-lucid nightmares. I barely know how to explain these lucid happy nightmares, and I have no understanding of how or why they're happening.So, I guess... my TLDR is my questions: 1. Have you ever found that lucid dreaming is a defensive reaction?? And if so, 2. Could the fact that Im lucid in my dreams be the reason for the nightmares? Like, have you ever found the brain to attempt to basically reject the consciousness when it shouldn't be present?Im not afraid to sleep. I know im dreaming as they happen, after all. Im just pissed when I wake up that I can't figure it out or seem to stop it, and it's been months. This is my first time to not be able to control them. [info] None [info] 1557461940
laurandisorder [info] I used to get this so badly as a child - starting very young and it lasted well into adulthood. As an adult I was diagnosed with anxiety, but this was a different sensation. An overwhelming urge to be with my cat (sorry parents), my things (books)’and in my room. It was a physical, gut wrenching pull for the familiar. I could only overcome it through distraction. Boy, did my folks get sick of picking me up early from sleepovers and camps! [info] None [info] 1514373802
xLockdown [info] Anxiety and panic attack 100%. You are experiencing irrational fear caused by anxiety. Trust me , I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder 5 years ago and I know what is feels like when you thinking about stuffs like that . I remeber , few months ago I almost had frontal  car crash accident at speed of 100 km/h and thanks to God I avoided it somehow , I still dont know how but weeks later , I had question in my head -" what if Im really dead now and I didnt avoid that car crash" . Don't let to those thoughts to control your life . When you are in car , play your favorite music, concentrate to road , think positive and enjoy the ride . You'll be fine ;) [info] None [info] 1484998512
thealbinoemo [info] Thanks...I was diagnosed with anxiety and I'm still trying to get through that, but it's tough.  This helped though, thanks again  [info] None [info] 1469567078
JinxedAndFading [info] I think I understand a bit where you're coming from, I've been diagnosed with anxiety as well, and although praying and listening to Heavenly Father's and our Savior's words do not make this worry go away, it can definately help relax you and realize that there is always someone on your side :) [info] None [info] 1551303259
skimask7 [info] I first did acid when I was 15, and I will tell you that although for the first 2 years I had no regrets, once I actually grew up I regretted everything.  Not so much actual regret, but I just know that my mind was not ready to make proper sense out of all of my experiences.Just like I did, she's probably doing it because it's hype.  I honestly would have shamed her and the people giving it to her, because we all know "hey drugs are bad" doesn't work.  The ONLY thing that has worked for me to stay out of certain drugs as a teenager was being socially shamed for it, then again, idk what works for other people.  And by shame, I don't mean talk to them like a coach, I mean going "lol that's gay asf bro".  Once you grow up, you don't care what people think.  When you're a teenager however, 75% of your motives are to impress other people.  I wouldn't be surprised if she took it because everyone hyped her up.  "AYY THE LIL 14 YEAR OLD WANTS A TAB HOW COOL IS THAT SHE CRAZYYY".Now I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I know that tripping played a part in the equation bc the root of all of my anxiety is my impending death, something I didn't care about before tripping.14 year olds should NOT be trippingEdit:  also, no diss towards you, but your friends are weird for hanging around teenagers when they're 23, let alone a 14 year old girl.  Not jumping to conclusions but are you sure they're not one of those people that hangs out with highschool girls when they're in their 20's?  Weird, possibly rapey.  I'd re-evaluate who your friends are, and who you take drugs around.  Again, I'm probably jumping to major conclusions here based off of the people I've met, but be careful regardless. [info] None [info] 1543537679
hlangley1996 [info] I can't say for sure because I'm not licensed. But I would say you are probably starting to show some signs. I know this because I have been diagnosed with anxiety and those are some of the things that I do.  [info] None [info] 1513949191
k12314 [info] Oh yeah, I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and antisocial personality disorder. Mental illness is a definite factor for me. [info] None [info] 1402685684
TogaMcrightousFace [info] It was motivation. But I didn't feel the urgency until closer to time. Believe me, I understand that it was irresponsible.Yes, I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders, including PTSD.  [info] None [info] 1529617726
futuregovworker [info] You can easily ask for it though. When I was having anxiety issues I just asked for Xanax. Got one prescription, didn’t like it. So I never got it again. I have never seen a commercial either, but if you ask for a specific prescription, it’s actually not hard to get. Especially if a parent was prescribed  to it first. I said my mom got this for this issue. I want it as well. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd but still, I don’t think I should be able to ask for specific drugs from a doctor [info] None [info] 1542631201
JoyfulStingray [info] Yes.  I had one and found a different workplace.For 3 years, I had a job in a very high paced environment with a bunch of military guys.  If they told you that they needed that product in 3 hours, you had better have it done in 2.5 and NOT BE LATE.That kind of anxiety to give a worthwhile product in such short amount of time was crippling.  I went to the bathroom and just cried or tried to calm down from a panic attack.I started medication when my SO said that I wasn't like myself and I was diagnosed with anxiety.  Medication helped, but finding a slower paced work environment worked wonders.  I started at my new job in January where instead of creating a product in 3 hours, I am given an entire month...or longer. [info] ♀ [info] 1445000173
kittychanboo [info] Best I can do is tell you that you aren't alone. I went to get checked for ADD when I was diagnosed with anxiety. Unfortunately I haven't overcome the distraction issues. [info] None [info] 1441367311
lillyccs [info] Nothing wrong! I’m the same exact way. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, however. I do find it easier to talk to people online rather than in person, so you may just have slight social anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1535062550
alexandria94 [info] First time I tried amphetamines, I was 13 y.o. Occasionally I took amphetamines, sometimes coke. I stopped when I was 17 y.o.When I turned 21, I started doing coke once in a while, but recently I've been abusing all kinds of drugs.I used to have great memory, but now my short-term memory has worsen, I have trouble remembering simple stuff. I'm also depressed and need stimulants to feel something close to happiness. I'm also paranoid and a year ago I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. I'm not saying it's all because of the drugs, but I'm pretty sure they've contributed a lot. [info] None [info] 1490526820
MercuryBitt [info] This was a dream I had a few week ago, and it honestly fucked me up for a solid 2 weeks. It's in bits in pieces, but the first scene was a bunch of "people" in a foyer. Their bodies were decaying and exploding, blood pooling in the foyer up to about their ankles. Then they became like decayed skeletons. The next part I remember is a man putting bits and pieces of other bodies onto his own, to a point where he looked more like a walking mass of skin and tumors. He was standing down a hallway, gargling "I am hope" over and over again. It was almost like a flashback, cause then I would see a young boy running around this hallway saying the same thing. In my mind, I assumed the man was actually the boy at one point, but then he became my nightmare. I forced myself awake after that. Every night after that, I thought the man was standing in my room, saying the same thing and licking the back of my neck and stuff. I'm blaming it on the fact I'm in a Forensic Bio class, and I see a lot of dead  body pictures, and the fact I've been diagnosed with anxiety which gets worse at night. I love forensic bio and it doesn't bother me too much, except when it gets in my subconsciousness. tl;dr I am hope.  [info] None [info] 1456697500
dinngoe [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety for 15 years.  I need Benzos to function.  Panic attacks are worse than death.  Only people who have had them can understand.  There is normal anxiety but then there is something else.. [info] None [info] 1534717563
thelibrarina [info] For about a year after I was diagnosed with anxiety, I slept on the sofa in the family room. I think it was because the bedroom felt too "closed off," and the family room was open to the rest of the house (it had a broad doorway instead of a door). It didn't do me any harm, and after a while I went back to sleeping in a bed.I talked with my counselor about it, and she basically said--sleep wherever you feel comfortable. It's much better than no sleep at all. :) [info] None [info] 1469062344
AbrahamLure [info] Okay, this makes so much sense. I've been diagnosed with anxiety every doc I've been to, with off the chart scores of anxiety and have never understood why, I never "feel" anxiety and I have an unusually low BPM (45-55)One of my doctors theorised it's because I've spent so long in a highly volatile environment growing up that having constant anxiety in the background has been essential for survival, but boyyyy is it useless when working in an office. [info] None [info] 1565207623
rdmelo [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder this week. I started taking meds that actually make my crises more frequent and more intense (but shorter, at least). I had my first mid-run crisis yesterday (6 weeks after I started). I don't know about your symptoms, but mine included blurred sight, lethargy, difficult breathing and knee pain. I started jogging anyway, cranked up the volume, and everything went away around the 400-800m mark (I don't know for sure because of the blurred sight). The last 4km were a breeze after it, and I ran on a track instead of a treadmill.My experience might not relate to yours, however. Still, the first thing you should do is setting an adequate mindset for you. Mine is "find a way, not excuses" (I also like the "don't get lazy, get the upper hand"), it helps me keeping motivated. Second of all, think thoroughly about your safety: are you comfortable, have you stretched, are you hydrated, does your phone has enough battery left, do you have a reliable person that knows where you are and what you are doing that you can call if needed, is this person's phone on speed dial. Third, think about who and why are you doing it for. I'm doing it for myself, because I love myself, because I want to be the best I can. I'm not doing it because someone asked me to do it. I'm not doing it for the people around me. I'm not doing it to look cool or sexy in my fitness clothes. And guess what, people around you are doing the same. They don't care about what you're doing, they're just there to do their own thing and enjoy themselves. The first time was hard but it got better by the minute, because I was in control. I knew what I wanted to do, I knew how to do it, I could stop anytime I wanted. Still, check with your psychiatrist if it's ok to exercise. If you control your anxiety without medical assistance, then you can start running, it's a very safe exercise. About your nutrients, download MyFitnessPal (it's an app for smartphones) and it can take care of the calculations. In order to lose weight, you can aim for a 500 calorie deficit, just make sure you eat at least 1200 calories every day. You don't have to eat anything before running, just make sure you're very well hydrated. I like a banana (potassium to avoids cramps) and a whole liter (1/4 gallon) of water about 15-30 minutes before leaving home. After it, it's good to pump in some protein to help your body heal and build muscle. That's it overall. Use the search box and you'll find some more resources. My main advice is to avoid postponing your first run as much as possible. As you progress, your focus will naturally shift from your anxiety to how can you run longer, faster, better.  [info] W9D1 [info] 1433440276
thesweetbabyg [info] That I was diagnosed with anxiety several months ago [info] None [info] 1561491219
dancingfruit [info] PCOS requires 3 things according to the Rotterdam criteria for the diagnosis:1. A/Oligomenorrhea - Minsan lang o walang regla (2 years ako nawalan)2. Hyperandrogenism - Mga symptomas na nagmumukhang 'lalaki' o pagninipis or pagkakalbo ng buhok sa ulo pero nag kaka bigote at pag kapal ng buhok sa mga bahagi ng katawan na di dapat sa babae - chest, belly, back, legs3. Confirmation sa ultrasound (Transv or anal, as previously discussed).What's included in PCOS is insulin resistance. Your body produces more insulin than normal as a result of the increase in testosterone. The consequence is rapid weight gain. I was able to control my PCOS from 180lb to 106lb pero I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder this year. Bumalik lahat ng symptoms ko. Ang laki uli ng tinaba ko ng 3 months (30+ pounds).If kukuha ka ng Ultrasound, dapat OB yung taga gawa hindi yung random radiologist. May training kasi na OB-Sonologist. Meron sa Hi-Precision at sa New World. Sure meron sa mga ospital. :)You can PM for other info regarding PCOS. I've had since I was 12. I'm 28 now.Edit: I haven't heard of 3rd cycle. Anong context conversation nun baka we can decipher that. :) [info] 27 | Oily-Combo+ Allergies | Chinese takeout [info] 1573707025
TheOtherCatboy [info] Hey there. Thought I'd peek in after lurking.I was diagnosed with anxiety and told I was HSP (highly sensitive person) at age 20 after what felt like a lifetime of having a dysfunctional mind. After an entire school time of bullying and tons of family pressure in regards to grades, I quit my education. I tried to get help from a psychologist, but after just 3 sessions all contact just stopped. After that I fought my way through legal cases to be able to keep my drivers licence after crashing my car after falling asleep behind the wheel - something that was later attributed to severe B12 deficiency.Now, three years later, I am finally trying to get my life back together, although I still live at home. After having some talks with my new psychologist (a great guy btw) and my parents as well, I've figured out that I've been anxious since age 1-2 where I would refuse to leave the house and fall sick with a fever if we went anywhere (and the suddenly being fine when we got home). At age 5, I had recurring nightmares about nuclear meltdowns after reading the newspapers at the time.Anyone else here have experience on growing up with anxiety and not really remembering a time where you were not constantly anxious? I would love to talk to someone with similar experiences! [info] None [info] 1498683242
12KMMRPRO [info] I used to read books before I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder; but ever since I went to university I stopped. I thought going back to reading would help but the brain fog I am in makes it impossible to understand atleast 50% of what I’m readong [info] None [info] 1544541717
yaen [info] Exactly. I used it for anxiety pre-preg, but I quit when I got pregnant. When people hear 'I used it for anxiety,' I wonder if they think I got a little anxious now and then and used it as an excuse. No. I'm diagnosed with anxiety, and panic disorder. It's terrifying and dibilitating when it's bad.Fortunately, I'm a lucky person for whom pregnancy hormones have helped me feel the least anxiety I've felt in years. But I fear for what will happen after the birth, with my hormones going crazy. It's still my goal to manage my anxiety with no drugs of any kind, but when it comes down to it, if I need something, I'd 100% choose smoking a tiny bit a couple times a week rather than starting a crazy SSRI regimen and having to quit breast feeding. That sounds both worse for me and the baby. I've been on almost every anti-depressant out there over my lifetime, and I'm never happy on them. I don't just feel numb with cannabis, I feel happy. That is to say, during the periods when Im not actually high, I find myself happier and more calm. I'm grateful for it. [info] Mama to Ev, 14 month, and pregnant with Baby September, 32 weeks [info] 1328624582
somegrump [info] I haven't. I don't actually know all that much about ADHD, to be honest. My older sister has been diagnosed with it, but we didn't grow up much in the same house. My house has always been very "its a flesh wound, walk it off," so I have never actually wondered for reasons as to why my memory is crap and I require checklists to survive, haha. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ocd (which was the least surprising thing in the world, after a lifetime of trying to ignore it) recently, but I didn't bring up adhd and neither did my doc.  [info] None [info] 1473902733
BassinForever [info] I understand that so much! Paranoia and anxiety are the only downfalls to smoking for me. I get very worried at times, but I'm diagnosed with anxiety, it's not caused by cannabis  [info]  [info] 1359145819
NotAnyOrdinaryPsycho [info] Huh. That makes me wonder if there’s an offshoot where you don’t pass out, but you do get really dizzy. A long time ago, I went to an interview for a college scholarship program. Those assholes put me through the ringer over a paper I wrote. I broke down crying there in front of the tribunal, but before I started crying, my head was swimming and I couldn’t figure out how to hold it upright. I felt like I was sitting sideways, and I couldn’t get back to normal. It was terrible. Maybe I was having an anxiety attack. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years later. But maybe the two diagnoses are linked, or have a common thread. [info] Teach me with your special eyes.  [info] 1568647012
brokenmind12345 [info] All the time. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago and I'm always scared others see me the way I see myself. And I don't have a very high opinion of myself so you can imagine how that affects me.  [info] None [info] 1481442716
cas18khash [info] I used to go a lot but usually a psychiatrist. I was diagnosed with anxiety issues and late adhd and the medication I took completely changed my life. If it wasn't for that psychiatrist, I would be living very differently now! I always encourage people to visit a psychologist or a psychiatrist and talk about their problems. Sometimes they're easily dealt with using some professional guidance.  [info] 19 [info] 1362989462
handwritten_emojis [info] Yes, I was diagnosed with anxiety in 6th grade (age 11) [info] None [info] 1557002149
flozza89 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety so I guess it's not completely unfeasible. [info] None [info] 1492286101
floodimoo123 [info] I developed early and when I was 12, I had 18-20 year old guys screaming and yelling at me every time I was out. It wasn't funny then and it's even less funny now. I've been diagnosed with anxiety since then with loud and/or sudden noises as my trigger. Rude guys acting like animals isn't funny, has never been funny, and will never be funny. I feel you, OP. These people need to learn how to act like decent human beings. [info] None [info] 1405976252
Guitarguy0393 [info] You're right! I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Problem is, the main thing I overanalyze is what she is saying or doing; not necessarily what I am doing. For example a girl said something to me and the whole weekend I was trying to figure out whether it secretly meant something else, and if she was giving me subtle cues. [info] None [info] 1443799047
TheySayImZack [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, correct.  Yeah it did take some time for me.  I started to feel, well, different about 5 or 6 days in, but I couldn't put a finger on it.  I just rolled with it, kept going with the daily doses, and where I am at now definitely feels like a ramp upwards toward something so much better than where I was at a month ago.I'm glad to hear it's helped you.  It gave me a clarity that I didn't know I was struggling to achieve. [info] None [info] 1537136455
Atypical-life [info] That's 90% of my interactions with the public every day &amp; the reason I'm diagnosed with anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1425619599
phoenix464 [info] This. I was diagnosed with anxiety after about 7 years into my active duty time. I was required to go to appointments at mental health, and prescribed Zoloft. Aside from getting the help you need, it's important to get it in your medical records for disability claims with the VA after you separate. [info] None [info] 1433077890
MrSwanson2UMN [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and apparently I've had it for a very long time. I go to therapy and have both a psychologist and a psychiatrist working for me to dose medications and work on long lasting methods. Honestly, the second I started taking Zoloft in combination with therapy and meditation I just don't care about what people think as long as I think I am doing the right thing and being a decent person.   [info] None [info] 1431504343
AwareAerie [info] Yes, just a few seconds, it's gotten a little better today- I was diagnosed with anxiety in December and given a prescription of ten lorazepam tablets, they helped a bit, but made me feel really depressed and out of my head. but haven't gotten any help farther than that, my dad doesn't believe that anxiety is a real thing, and it's made me shy away from seeing a doctor or therapist out of fear that they won't believe me either. [info] None [info] 1562165717
Jynx620 [info] The first one I remember having I was pretty young, some time in middle school. I had to give an oral report to my class of about 40 people. When I got up there I felt faint, clammy, dizzy, sweaty, shaky, etc. I felt like they were all talking shit about me in their heads and when one person giggled at their friend I was certain it was about me. I felt suffocated. I was diagnosed with anxiety later on. [info] None [info] 1404457264
twx37o [info] Thanks for posting OP, I had the same question.  This July will be exactly one year since I was diagnosed with anxiety so I’m hoping that’s all I need to get into the new program. Good luck to you, and I hope you feel better soon. [info] None [info] 1559750187
mizzuus [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but I am making a fast recovery, actually! I really need to say, once you find a good friend it really lightens your emotional weight.Knowing to be that kind of person to someone as well, is 50% of the joy. [info] None [info] 1556196505
Glitter_Cunt [info] Wow that sounds like an amazing experience--but very concerning that you don't have access to the mental health resources you want and need! When I studied abroad in undergrad I remember my doctor was able to write a prescription for my medications that let me pick up many months at once--I wonder why your psychiatrist wasn't able to arrange something for you? Although I guess at this point you probably have a routine that's working. Maybe if you visit home you could pick up a year's supply or something? I was just diagnosed with anxiety (like literally just a couple of months ago) and still kind of wrapping my head around the fact that not everyone is so stressed out all the time. It must be so frustrating being surrounded by people who don't take it seriously :/ Like I can tell when my reaction to something is disproportionate and caused by my anxiety, but that's different from the anxiety being made up and that doesn't mean that I can just control it... Gosh that makes me so angry on your behalf! Congrats on losing 20--that's awesome!! A food scale can be such a game changer :)I know--my doctor is kind of awful. I got those odd iron results and she had literally no idea what it could be and just said to monitor my iron and retest in three months. Didn't even say how much iron I should aim for--just said I should track it. I told her I track my food consumption anyway and would be happy to total up my iron consumption over the previous three months--nope wasn't interested. Whatever lol. I have an appointment with a specialist to get my thyroid sorted and that's at a top ranked teaching hospital so I plan to ask for a referral to a GP in their network and just stop seeing my old doctor who I don't really trust anyway (idk if you can tell a lot of my anxiety is medical anxiety? Haha)Thanks so much you're so sweet! Same goes for you of course :) and gosh I feel like such an old person--I don't even know what kik is haha [info] 5'6" | 90 | 14.5 | -25 | F [info] 1464913890
shelzmike [info] OK. For starters, I do know exactly the type of experience you had and described. In fact, before my anxiety become a "disorder" I partied...A LOT. And I don't mean drinking bc I never really did that. I mean everything else. I had my first "breakdown", knock down, drug out panic attack and the only time I have ever been rushed to the hospital in an ambulance. That was almost half my life ago, am now 38. I am what one would consider a highly experienced anxiety having person :)Looking back, I have remembered different points where I had panic attacks or anxiety and didn't put 2 and 2 together. I always just chalked it up to being really messed up on [insert drug name here]. I believe my very first ever panic attack was when I was 19 and tripping on DXM. Had done it many times previously, but this time I was just sitting watching some cartoon, like you were, and suddenly became aware of my breathing and then got really hot and had to run outside and felt really crazy. Again, I was able to sort of brush it off as part of the effects of what I was on.Another one I did a lot of was LSD and there were plenty of times where I was just gone and never really had a "bad" trip (except one time after I was diagnosed which was the last time). Here is the thing...what you felt...SO MANY people feel when on LSD, so much so that it is quite normal. What isn't usually as normal is the anxiety continuing on afterward so intensely as you have described. Here are some facts that may help you better understand anxiety and panic attacks. For starters, every single person ever born and lived has had anxiety experiences and a lot have even had panic attacks (more have had panic attacks than have panic *disorder* if that makes sense). The reason why? It is because it is this is a very primal, inherently biological process our bodies go through - animals have these same processes as well and for very good reason...for survival. Problem is, as humans we do not need anxiety and adrenaline in this manner much any longer. We are not running from animals that are trying to kill us for lunch any longer, but we still have it. (Don't get me wrong, adrenaline is still a VERY good thing to have in many life situations).Many people can have anxiety symptoms and even panic attacks and move on from it and not really give it any further thought. There are some people, however, that have a propensity to develop a problem in their lifetime with anxiety. It usually develops in late teens and early 20s and most think they never had problems with it in the past.When you say that you have problems with roller coasters, small rooms, etc. those are signs of anxiety issues honestly. And it boils down to this and the story will come full circle...it comes down to control. Now, I don't mean we are control freaks, because that is not what I mean. What I do mean is that we do not like situations where there is a perception of being out of control of what happens which starts the "what if" thoughts. As anyone with anxiety what their triggers are and I guarantee it will center around things they don't feel in control of (and some of them we validly can't control). Examples are being stuck in traffic, health anxiety issues, elevators, being in the middle of a big crowd, etc. Most likely what caused your spiral is that when you were in the midst of your acid trip, you felt out of control. This starts the anxiety spiral and then panic attacks. Panic attacks suck, terribly. They never get "better", or rather I mean they are as intense when you first start having them  as they are 20 years later. Again, this is by design of our nervous system reactions. They would be less effective in that natural intended purpose if they were. They do, however, get a little easier to deal with since you have perspective. Here is where I see you at currently though. You are stuck in the "cycle" of fear (which is what anxiety really is). You had anxiety...that lead to a panic attack...which was frightening...you are scared of having another one..which causes anxiety...which causes, you guessed it, another panic attack. This constant cycle of fear is what keeps the fear and anxiety going! Whew...that was a lot to take in, I know. (And that is the short version!) Let me tell you this though, if it should help. Seeking knowledge on the subject is SO important. Additionally, seeking therapy, especially so early on in the problem, is very key. Thirdly, and this is just my experience and opinion...if you can possibly do it, refrain for jumping immediately on the SSRI train. They can be helpful for some, but most who have taken them and then stopped are very vocal about why. They are not a cure and should never be presented as such. They are merely a coping strategy that should be used only in conjunction with working with a therapist to learn to understand and cope with the anxiety. They certainly can dampen the feelings, but the side effects, again in my opinion, can make things unpleasant. The thought that you are going crazy? You are not (we all felt this was at one point or another and it simply is not true).Will you be like "this" forever. No, and sort of...what I mean is, this terrible impending doom fear cycle will not last forever. Having the propensity to deal with anxiety more than others...quite possible. I am not going to sugar coat that. Does that mean you will never amount to anything or live a terrible, shuttered, fearful life? Absolutely NOT! There is way more hope than that. My story is a long one, but I will fast forward to now. I am 28, been married for 13 years, raised 3 kids, (2 of whom are out on their own now, and my 9 year old daughter), own a home, three cars, worked my way up from a fast food restaurant job to where I am at now - 2 bachelors degrees later - as an IT Executive for a Global Fortune 500 company. Everything I ever have done meaningful to get to the point I am right now, I did AFTER I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic attacks/agoraphobia/health anxiety. It was not easy, but life is not easy in general. I am here...and I deal with anxiety on a daily basis. But that is just it, I deal with it. You learn as you go and again, the best thing you can do is get as knowledgeable as you can and try everything you can to learn to live WITH it not live in fear of it. It will happen.Bottom line, my experienced thoughts can be summed up like this - anxiety is imagination used the wrong way. Anxiety is a *thinking* disorder mainly. Keep following through with your plans for talking with someone and it sounds like you will be just fine :)  [info] None [info] 1479619371
thatlittleging [info] That's what I try and do. I was diagnosed with anxiety but the medicine makes me feel wrong so I don't take it. It's to the point where almost everyone around me reminds me that I'm doing it [info]  [info] 1564592386
lampion [info] Hi, I'm also 31 and for the past 9 years I've been with this wonderful girl... She also suffered from anxiety. Living with her was a bittersweet experience. Most of the times she was fine, we were laughing together and do stuff, but sometimes she would get depressed and she would cry. And boy... she could really cry. Oceans of tears :( The reasons were always the same: her family, my family, school, work, our relationship. I have to admit I was not happy with it. Years went by us and I didn't want to marry her. We were not right together but neither of us wanted to end it. We were both afraid.About 3 years ago, I convinced her to get her driving licence and that's when her anxiety got worse. She would come home from driving lessons and cry. And I was blind to her needs and I've kept pushing her to finish. In the end she quit and started going to therapy. And there was progress... But that was too late I think... In the end we split up (about 4 moths ago) :(I think I got here too deep into my own problems :) The thing that I want to say is that I understand your bf a bit. I did the same mistakes he is doing to you. The reasons that I've made them was because I was completely unaware of her condition. I simply could not understand her. In my mind she was irrational. I've tried to listen her, but I was not able to help her in the way she needed. Providing material support for her was good, but it was nothing compared with the moral support that I should have given (but for me was impossible to give).In the end, I ended up also in therapy :) I've been diagnosed with anxiety and fear of abandonment (surprise surprise). And that's why I couldn't leave her earlier. I was afraid for myself.So... because someone should support the "wolf" as well I say to you this: if you like him and he's a good person than maybe you should invest some time in helping him feel and see differently (not too much though. Life is preciously short) [info] None [info] 1419965521
Cumberblep [info] Just remember you're not alone and not to be ashamed to get help. I spent a lot of angst filled time in my teens and twenties feeling ashamed and helpless. I've posted some more information below. Everyone always thinks of binge purge or not eating at all as an eating disorder. Sometimes you just binge. There are also a lot of connections between eating disorders and OCD.https://iocdf.org/expert-opinions/expert-opinion-eating-disorders-and-ocd/https://www.nationaleatingdisorders.org/learn/by-eating-disorder/bedI've been diagnosed with anxiety by previous physicians but none of them tied it to OCD. So I have some OCD behaviors related to finishing things. For example, I would stay at work for 36 hours straight to finish basic work. I would not sleep during  finals week of college because I was so worried I wasn't ready because I didn't know every bit of everything. So like 4 days, no sleep. So lots of sleepless nights. Lots of worrying about things not being  done. So if started eating something I couldn't stop until it was finished. Sometimes to the point where it made me physically Ill. I would wait until I didn't feel bad and then eat some more.  It's hard to explain now. Especially now that the meds and counseling have me disconnected from those feelings. I also became emotionally connected to food. Like good times called for some crazy over eating and then bad times called for the same. Binge eating disorder (BED) is a severe, life-threatening, and treatable eating disorder characterized by recurrent episodes of eating large quantities of food (often very quickly and to the point of discomfort); a feeling of a loss of control during the binge; experiencing shame, distress or guilt afterwards; and not regularly using unhealthy compensatory measures (e.g., purging) to counter the binge eating. It is the most common eating disorder in the United States.Numerous studies have now shown that those with eating disorders have statistically higher rates of OCD (11% – 69%), and vice versa (10% – 17%). As recently as 2004, Kaye, et al., reported that 64% of individuals with eating disorders also possess at least one anxiety disorder, and 41% of these individuals have OCD in particular.   [info] None [info] 1551631741
atruehomie [info] I am a freshman in college. I was diagnosed with anxiety and potentially mild paranoia a few years ago. The paranoia was mostly as a child throughout grade school. [info] None [info] 1400275801
ToriBeth214 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I can confirm. My Aunt even asked me how I move my legs so fast, and didn't even realize I was doing it.  [info] None [info] 1511244250
biomech36 [info] My issue is/was I would bring up to people that I thought I had an issue and I always got "there's nothing wrong with you, mentally" and I would just write it off.  Maybe I was just being an asshole for no reason.  Maybe I was wrong about something.  I dunno.  But, I was diagnosed with anxiety by a physician last year.  And in true INTJ fashion, I decided to do something about it a year later. [info] None [info] 1509980760
Datchcole [info] I will look in advance at stats for sure for stat 50. I still have most of my notes and homework, so even though the professor is different, should still help.I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past by Kaiser, but I'm not sure extra exam time would be necessary, but I'll look into it. Thank you! [info] Computer Science [info] 1527306910
ouiserboudreauxxx [info] I hear you completely. I've been in therapy for awhile and realized how messed up my childhood was through that.  I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on anti-depressants, and they just made me apathetic. I was on them in college for about a year as well and that was my absolute worst year academically. I got a new therapist last year and she is the one who finally suggested ADHD and then referred me to a new doctor.I agree with you that I too think my problems are greater than just ADHD(even though honestly I don't think anyone really understands 'adhd' very well) but for me the ADHD meds help me so much that I don't really care what label they want to put on it. Definitely don't give up on yourself! You're more proactive than I was back then. Aside from being on meds in college for a bit, I didn't pursue therapy or other treatment until I was 29. [info] None [info] 1564796243
_null-entry [info] Real OCD is fucking awful and it's sometimes hard to cope. I have been diagnosed with anxiety induced OCD, so no I'm not another insecure moron who self diagnoses. It has ruined friendships and made simple things like working in class or cleaning the house real marathon challenges. [info] None [info] 1448691482
Your_God_Chewy [info] I was single all my life until a few months ago. I was diagnosed with anxiety about 2 years ago, which explained why high school was so brutal mentally. I met my girl at school, got her number by making some elaborate study group for anatomy/physiology for the sake of getting her number, and asked her to join, and stayed persistent and she said yes to a going out with me. It turned out my girlfriend has anxiety far worse than mine , even though she's chill as fuck, funny as hell, and drop dead gorgeous. Some girls out there who you would think would totally be out of your league are just as nervous as you are. Tl;dr, accept your nervous as hell, but she might as well, and know that every time you choke and don't go for it , there's one more possibility of missing out on the love of your life. Getting shot down is better than never knowing what she would have said if you tried.  [info] None [info] 1397236863
LolaFedExGirl [info] I used to suffer from panic attacks almost every day. They would come suddenly. I would feel like my heart was going to beat out of my chest. I would sweat like crazy(in the middle of winter). I couldn't eat out at restaurants for fear of getting sick, even though it never happened. Sometimes i would be at the grocery store when i would get an attack and i would have to leave right away. Just abandoning my groceries in an aisle. It got to a point where i had enough of it and went to see a doctor. I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on medication. I take Fluoxetine (Prozac) every day. I feel 100% better. Haven't had an attack since. It helped mellow me out too. So, that's my experience with it. I know others have had it far worse but i felt like sharing with Redditland :) [info] None [info] 1377402808
meepmedeeply [info] Well I was diagnosed with anxiety many years ago in my teens (not that many, like maybe five or so.) and tried Buspar. It did help, but I stopped taking it because you're not supposed to drink with it and my twenty-first birthday was close.I just found a therapist online and called him. He called me back right away and scheduled me for an appointment the next morning. I've had one session so far, but this is as close to getting help as I've ever felt, thus far. He was pretty clear that it is OCD as soon as I explained myself, and that was actually a huge relief and what I needed to hear to aid me in my recovery/management.It is scary, but I am actually really looking forward to seeing him again this weekend to sort out some panic I've dealt with just this week, and frustration in relation to it.I really suggest taking this route first. I wish I had done this long ago before the counting, lip picking, etc etc got so out of control.  [info] None [info] 1419956793
candiedbug [info] I have the monitor because I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I thought I'd better keep my eye on my bp and see if anxiety made it spike. I guess I have my answer. I've been taking phenibut and L Theanine for it. I wonder if stacking before playing would keep the bp numbers in check? [info] None [info] 1412960930
Irlydntknwwhyimhere [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety conditions and it’s extremely anxiety inducing for me. When I used to drink I’m sure I would have liked it more but I’ve quit drinking for many reasons. I’ve done most of the “common” recreational drugs, the only ones I enjoy now are THC, LSD, and DMT. I’m looking to try more psychedelics tho. Maybe ketamine. Stimulants just really aren’t my thing. [info] None [info] 1561945783
wheremybagobeans [info] Lol that’s crazy man. I was tripping balls a couple weeks ago with a couple friends. Probably around 300ug but I get drug tested every week so I can’t smoke. 3 of my friends were drinking. And 2 of my other friends were tripping with me. One of my friends who was drinking decided it would be a good idea to take 8mg of Xanax and drink half a bottle of Jose Cuervo while ripping a dab pen and smoking blunts non stop. As this was happening my friend who was also tripping started having a bad Trip and physically could not open his hands. When we would try to open his hands they were extremely tensed up and almost impossible to open. After giving my friend a Xanax he started to calm down and Started feeling better. Then I noticed my other friend who took the Xanax and Tequilla was completely overdosing. Long story short I took the alcohol away and sat next to my friend who was overdosed and made sure he was breathing for around 4 hours straight. After he threw up multiple times he started coming to his senses but was nowhere near sober.(I know I should have called a ambulance but I am trained in basic cpr and first aid so i felt comfortable enough to watch over him) Overall it was a crazy experience while tripping but somehow even though I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder I managed to keep my cool while completely tripping balls. This was a extremely scary experience and really opened my eyes to the dangers of things like that. Ever since then I trip either alone or with 1 other friend in a comfortable environment. [info] None [info] 1565075181
opal_ann [info] I've suffered stomach problems since I was in elementary school and in middle school I was diagnosed with anxiety. I attributed any issues I had to my anxiety. It wasn't until I was in university that I tried cutting out gluten and everything was better. I now think that I'd been suffereing from the same thing as a child but no one around me thought it might be because of food. [info] None [info] 1572890662
becausepuppies [info] When I was about 17 my anxiety got really bad seemingly out of nowhere and I struggled really bad, in pretty much the same type of way you described.  Here's the good piece of advice that my mom told me: if you have the capability to think that you're going crazy, you're not going crazy.  People who actually "go crazy" aren't mentally capable of differentiating the way they're acting and what's actually normal.   You thinking you're going crazy is scary, I know because I've thought the same thing many times, but rest assured that it's just anxiety, not something more severe. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety I saw about a zillion different doctors because I just felt "weird" and I knew something was wrong but I couldn't describe it, that was the scariest part.  Once I was finally diagnosed with anxiety, I was able to educate myself and find ways to help myself.I won't lie, I struggled for years, some worse than others.  But my best advice is to educate yourself on anxiety, it's symptoms, and treatments as much as humanly possible and keep advocating yourself.  Don't let people tell you you're being dramatic or it's all in your head, and  most importantly DO NOT BE ASHAMED. You will get better, you will learn to manage the anxiety, and hopefully along the way you'll learn what I did - that more people than you realize struggle with anxiety in some form, and most people are willing to help you out if you just ask. You may have to go through a few therapists who you don't get any help from, but you will eventually find one that works for you.  Also, don't be afraid of medication--it's what really helped me out.   [info] None [info] 1471628038
Leah8329 [info] There is a chance she isn't crazy and projecting and abusive, she might have a form of anxiety. I found myself convinced that my wonderful SO was cheating, along with various other incredibly paranoid things when I was diagnosed with anxiety. Either way, counselling and lots of it.Edit: wording [info] None [info] 1444837129
Taylor_Audrielle [info] If I'm diagnosed with anxiety, will that hurt me in two years when I apply? [info] None [info] 1528871336
666bich [info] Hey, this is long... Just to warn. But if you don't want to read the whole things... Shut gets better but you have to let it get better and work at it to make it better. 'It' being whatever it is that's tying you down. So, first of [TRIGGER WARNING] this involves my sexual abuse as a child and how it affected and still affects my life.I was a happy kid. I wasn't perfect, my family weren't perfect. We were kinda poor, always struggled for food and to pay the bills. I never went on school trips and I always had holes in my clothes. I was picked on for being weird, having glasses and all round just not fitting in. However, this never really bothered me. I had my own fun and my own friends who liked me and a family who, dispute their troubles, loved me. And this part come in handy later on. I was eight when I was sexually abused and almost raped. It was by a family friends son who was 17 at the time. I trusted him. And his brother. I don't want to go into details because it still hurts to talk about but I shouls have spoken about it when it happened. He touched me (a girl) and hurt me and made my whole life begin to spiral out of control. I didn't speak to the police. They came to my house but I couldn't speak to them. I was ashamed and embarrassed and scared. They sent two male officers and I didn't even want to sit next to them. I started self harming almost instantly. I started having panic attack that got worse and worse. I was diagnosed with anxiety at ten. I felt so disconnected. I was at an age where I needed to be able to talk and share my feelings but, I couldn't, I didn't know how. By 11 I was acting out daily. I needed a way to get these emotions out of me. I got into fights at school. I caught with my parents and my siblings. I even tried smoking because I thought it'd make me look cool and I thought people would like me. When I was 12 my parents broke up. And I had been suffering a lot of the arguments and lashouts they were having. My self harm was daily by this point and somehow, nobody knew. Nobody asked. The cuts didn't really leave scars because I was just using sharp plastic or wire, things I could easily access. So nobody could even tell I was hurting myself. Thirteen to 16 were really, really hard. By now I was constantly hurting myself. Skipping school. I was sexually harassed by a boy from school and then again, forced against my will do give him oral sex. At the age of 14. And then things started going around school. I was a slag, a white, I was asking for it. People even found out about what happened when I was a kid and it tore me apart. Home life was horrible. School life was horrible. I had no friends, nobody to talk to. So when I was 16 I tried to hang myself. Again the details are hard to talk about. My sister saved my life and she never told anyone but she forever me to go to therapy. I did for about six weeks, then I started lying to her. I wasn't going anymore. I fell into a bad crowd with some even worse people who showed me drugs and alcohol and that giving a fuck was for idiots and people who had reason to. They were not my friends but they took my mind off of things. I started sleeping around, stealing, fighting... Again. But I liked it. I was happy for a while. I started dating a 19 year old (I was 16) and I thought he was the love of my life. I think I was addicted to MDMA at this time. The way it made me feel was amazing and I didn't have a comedown the next day. Oddly I was actually going to school. In my final year. Constantly smoking weed or high on MD. In school... I was an idiot. But I got my GCSEs. All but my maths and history. I decided I was going to fail them anyway so I studied harder on everything else and got mostly B's and A's. I was proud of myself for once. That happiness and that pried was quickly torn away though. My dad wasn't overly upset when he found out about my grades but he was fuming when he found out about my boyfriend and what we had been doing together. And all of this happened on the day of my final exam. For some stupid reason, after like six months of not hurting myself. That night I cut myself. And I didn't even intend for this to happen but, it did. I bled for an hour straight, no stoppage. I was using my bed sheets as a bandage and the blood had soaked them through. I stumbled down stairs and fell into a bookshelf. My dad rushed over to me. Asked me where I had cut myself, called my mum, called an ambulance and that's all I remember. I woke up in hospital that night and I just cried and cried and apologized to everyone. Even my nurses. This now meant that I was gonna be forced to get better. And I was glad. I kinda had that attention that I needed now. And no this isn't attention seeking. Well it is. But not how you know it to be. I wasn't doing these things for attention. I was doing them for help. And this was the help I needed. The months after were horrible. My "boyfriend" left me and my "friends" didn't even text me a get well soon. I was alone again. And I was in and out of hospital constantly. If not for check ups it was because I had hurt myself. If not that it was because I was under weight. If not that then something else. My therapists were shit. But two of them were amazing. They actually cared. And it was one on them who made me realise something. And don't get me wrong I was 18 when I realised this. That was like two and a half years of therapy and constant eyes watching me. He reminded me of something I told him in the begining. Something I said at the begining of this story. When I was a kid I was strong. Things were tough and things were shitty but I knew that people around me loved me and cared about me. And for so many years I had forgotten that. I didn't realise that what I was doing was hurting my family. Well I did but I guess I didn't care. I realised that maybe I had been selfish all those years. And maybe my fear had turned me into this defensive horrible person that could never see the light at the end of the tunnel. He told me things might not get better but they will even out. And he was right. Things were and are still hard and I still think about killing myself when things have been too much to handle. I haven't hurt myself in almost a year. I've spoken about my problems and I've helped others who have felt the same. I've been into schools and spoken to young girls (and the boys who wanted to be there) about rape and sexual abuse and where to go and who to talk to. I know that what happened to me wasn't my fault and I know now that punishing myself will never stop the cycle. Just make it stronger and harder to break. I live with my fiancé, he knows everything and he loves me all the same. And I only present myself to people who love me for who I am... Warts and all! Oh and my parents went on a date last month... That made me real happy. They still aren't together but they changed as people, for the better, and anyone else who is struggling can also change for the better. Not to be cringe but recovery starts with you. You have to accept help, ask for help, help others, do what makes you feel good!!! [info] None [info] 1568723000
GhibliNut [info] Last summer me, my English teacher and a few girls from my class all flew to Europe to tour through Spain and Italy. The trip was fun, but the plane ride to and from was awful. It was my first time on a plane since I was 4. I barely remember my first time flying because I was asleep through most of it. Now, 15 years later, I was diagnosed with anxiety and flying did not help me in the least. I hated how loud the plane was, it made it seem like something was wrong. Then there was the fact that I felt sick to my stomach after ingesting a large mocha from Starbucks. Also, I could feel the plane turn and dip and it scared me. I had to close the shades on my window because it was too scary for me. I also didn't sleep, which I should have, but I was too scared. I was too scared to even eat. I think the only thing I had was that mocha, which I drank at about 7 in the morning, and a snack-sized pretzel bag for dinner. As soon as we got off the plane we had to start the tour, so it was a miserable first day. On the way back, I was sort of getting used to it. I sort of knew what to expect...until we flew through a thunderstorm on our way to a layover in Michigan. The plane would tip upwards, climbing for a bit, then just drop. Then it would climb again, then drop again. It was a violent drop, at least a hundred feet. I thought I was going to die. If it wasn't the plane crashing it would have been a panic attack. [info] None [info] 1393308625
anonbff [info] I went to therapy. I learned that behavior can be a symptom of anxiety, which I didn’t know I had. Therapy taught me a lot more about myself. Like how to spot when it’s just me having a moment and what to do. After I was diagnosed with anxiety I went to my doctor and started taking Zoloft which was the best thing I’ve ever done. The change started at the root of the problem, the relationship. Though we loved each other very much, I knew I had no. There was no way for me to move on and grow from my old habits. I needed a clean slate. My next relationship was leaps and bounds better. We are both in a good place of mind, which makes our relationship all the better.  [info] None [info] 1550927391
misspulkadot [info] You hit it right on the head: I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Unfortunately, I also have narcolepsy so anxiety meds make me sleepy, N meds make me anxious. I’m a mess! But I actually manage quite well if I do say so myself. I could use someone to talk to though, so a therapist may be in my future.  [info] None [info] 1515800509
Cebibimon [info]  This. I was writing a wall of text saying the same thing, but my english sucks so i'd rather support your point. I've been diagnosed with anxiety problems, so i know where the poster stands, i've felt the same way, that everything is black, that everything is going to end bad, and that i'm lonely and there's anyone i can trust (even though there's plenty of people willing to help).  So here's the thing, i don't want to sound harsh, but try to not get caught in this pity party. If you feel there's anyone you can trust , then get new friends! (it's actually easier than what it sounds), and i'm pretty sure you're not as unlovable as you think, and it's just this depressing part of you talking.   I've been where you stand, and i really understand you, so please, if you think you don't have anyone to talk to, msg me or something (i don't know if you can actually do that on reddit, i just made an account). It gets better. [info] None [info] 1445229222
iamaquietmess [info] I was to scared to ask about this too. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ocd and on worst episodes whenever i think back on something i bang my head and or punch myself just to try and get the thought put of my head.But on normal days i get this. [info] None [info] 1564976612
missrainbow12 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and the RAGE as it's know in my house has gone, I still have moments where I feel it building but now I can push it down as it's pointless energy that will only hurt me after its expelled. I tell myself blowing up just makes it worse so I try to calm down, often walking away from the situation and being on my own helps the most.  [info] None [info] 1499595777
Throw_IBS [info] I have IBS and your doctor is an idiot. I went to see my new doctor today and even she said that IBS is a diagnosis of exclusion,  meaning that they have to run tests to see if you're deficient in anything or if you have an autoimmune  problem. I'd suggest, if you can afford it, finding a new doctor. I had to do so because my doctor saw that I was diagnosed with anxiety and immediately assumed that my symptoms were in my head and didn't refer me to a hospital.  [info] None [info] 1476733882
outofthismoon [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder last year. Should I be eating shrooms? [info] None [info] 1458608748
katama96 [info] I'm right there with you. I've had such bad anxiety for the last two days after not drinking. I have been diagnosed with anxiety since I was a teenagers so about 7 years ago in the winter time. Lately it has been flaring up so bad after drinking, worse than normally and its to the point where I want to take a long break from drinking. [info] None [info] 1569885600
Scwarletto [info] Yes I was diagnosed with anxiety a while back. I do send a lot of time with them since they work at my school and it's a small school so I stay with them. And thank you for the reply x [info] None [info] 1572726706
idntworkinthisvan [info] I used to cut my hair every time I felt overwhelmed, joke was on me when I was diagnosed with anxiety 🙃 [info] None [info] 1565076141
sarahs7896 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety around March of last year, and my husband has been awesome. I know I get on his nerves when I start incessantly worrying about something, because I stew on it for awhile in my own head, and snap at him when I shouldn’t. He knows it helps me end the loop (for lack of a better term) if I can just voice what I’m worried about. Sometimes I have to talk it out a couple times for it to work, but he listens patiently and just lets me get things out at my own pace without pushing me.  And he doesn’t offer advice or tell me to just not worry about it. He just listens, which he knows is what I need.  [info] None [info] 1515351047
part_house_part_dog [info] I developed sleeping problems (I either don't sleep well or I don't sleep at all) right around the time I was diagnosed with anxiety. The only thing that got me to sleep was Xanax. And then I slept like the dead. ETA: Prior to anxiety I slept like the dead, too.  [info] None [info] 1475890194
sammij [info] Advice was given to me when I was diagnosed with anxiety: if it is impacting your life or others lives in a significant way, you should seek help. Is he seeing anyone about his mental health? He needs other tools to use when he feels anxious. [info] None [info] 1555314707
babisaurusREX [info] Yes anxiety can definitely mask symptoms. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 14, but not until 19 was I diagnosed with ADHD. I started to realize I was anxious BECAUSE I was forgetting things,  running late, procrastinating, unfocused and then trying to catch up in school after I zoned out for entire lectures. I also was a straight A student through high school because I had what I now know to be hyper focus (and a little OCD which I'm happy to say is 99% under control now) on my schoolwork. But that started to change junior year of college and I started barely passing in my major. it is always best to seek the guidance of a specialist, but keep in mind many people don't believe ADHD is real. They think it's that we live in a distracting time or that you want to get amphetamines or whatever. But if it is affecting your life in such a negative way that you can't enjoy most things or your work or school or hobbies or relationships are suffering, you need to do what's best for you! [info] None [info] 1439609708
Blue-Lynn [info] Started caring about my mental health. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 13 and had frequent panic attacks into adulthood. After really paying attention to my thought patterns I slowly learned to first accept my anxiety for what it was and how to be patient with coping and learning healthier patterns. I'm 23 now, don't have any attacks and know how to better deal with life. Trust me when I say you are worth taking care of  [info] None [info] 1495413499
BurntCalorie [info] I was diagnosed ADHD at the age of 25. But when I visited another psychiatrist,  she said she didnt think I had it. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder at 12.I know for sure I have anxiety issues. Not sure about the ADHD because some of the symptoms, I don't suffer from. And they do say anxiety can share similar traits to adhd [info] None [info] 1572789115
ksavage1986 [info] You are certainly not alone.  It's true though, there are people that make it all seem so easy, and it's frustrating.  Sort of like, "Damnit, why can't I just do it like they did?"My boss is someone like that.  I was diagnosed with anxiety after I had gone to the doctor with hamstring tendonitis and was convinced I had MS or ALS, only to have him say I showed no signs of either. (99% of my brian believes him, but I struggle to convert the other 1%).  So health anxiety has been my thing, but looking back, I realize all the times I was anxious and thought it was just normal (as I alluded to earlier, I would check the trash can in my bathroom for tampon wrappers when I knew it was my wife's time of the month--not normal behavior).  Anyways, back to my boss.  When he was around my age, a bit older, he decided to buy a boat.  He wound up sailing around the world for 17 years.  He said some nights during a storm, he would go beneath deck and just say, "I'm going to sleep now, hopefully I wake up tomorrow."  He was just able to look an uncertain situation in the face and have faith that it would work out.That's probably a pipe dream for people like you and I, but there's some real truth there.  Even if you have a kid, you'll be able to figure it out.  You are well-educated, and being an anxious person, you'll find the motivation to make your situation okay.  Again, I'm really sorry about your mom.  Did she have anxiety problems?  When I went to my parents and brother about my anxiety problems, I was comforted by the fact that they all had anxiety disorders at some point in their lives, and that I came by my feelings honestly. [info] None [info] 1424893752
ConstipatedUnicorn [info] Can confirm, only place I go to for preventative care is my eye doctor.  And that's just once a year for updated prescriptions.  Only time anyone goes to the doctor around here is if something is already bothering them.  Our healthcare system is a bullshit scam.  But god forbid you mention anything even close to healthcare for everyone and suddenly everyone gets all bent out of shape because "socialism".  It amazes me how thoroughly brainwashed people are to think that what we have is a good system....When I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder several years ago it was due to a 5min ride in an ambulance my college called for me because I nearly fainted from a panic attack.  That ended up costing me 2000k.  I was 20.  What 20yr old college student has that kind of money?  I sure as hell didn't.  It took me nearly 2 years to pay that off. [info] None [info] 1555977242
hrhashley [info] Thank you for posting - as you mentioned, I have been diagnosed with anxiety issues (hence the sertraline). I've definitely had anxiety/panic episodes before in the past that have stemmed from a health standpoint, but I've been taking my medication regularly and I don't necessarily feel like I'm having a long-winded anxiety episode, though I'm sure that could be a part of it. I've just never had chest discomfort and bouts of shortness of breath last this long since before my last heart surgery.I guess my biggest concern is that I've read one too many things on the internet about how people, especially women, go in and all of their tests look perfectly fine so they're sent home and then 2 weeks later they're having a full on heart attack, which again, I know sounds like anxiety, but it's more of me wondering 'what's the likelihood that this could actually happen' question.  [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1542059610
ChocolateFixesAll [info] \*hugs if you want them\* I can totally see how that image would set you off. A good mom wouldn't rely on a stupid meme to "apologize" for making mistakes. She'd be in front of you, doing it for real and trying to actively change to make things better. &amp;#x200B;Are moms going to make mistakes? Yup. Do real moms feel guilt for that and try to do better? AbsoFUCKinglutely. My kids are 8 and 12 and I apologize to them when I make mistakes or when I mess something up. I am diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks and it's been a rollercoaster. I hate that my kids are having to see me struggle with this and that my anxiety messes things up for them sometimes. Having your 12yr old daughter find you in the kitchen in the middle of a panic attack is probably the worst thing that has ever happened to me and yo know what she did? She put her arms around me and hugged me until the attack was over. That's not something I ever wanted my daughter to have to do,but she did and I apologized to her for it and I apologized for how messed up I've been and that I've been trying to do better. She told me she could tell.&amp;#x200B;If your mom had ever apologized and worked on fixing things, things would be different. But she didn't. So I am here to tell you that you are NOT worthless. You are a wonderful person who deserves to be happy. You are worthy of being cared and loved and I, an internet stranger, care about you. (not gonna say I love you cuz that would be creepy and weird. &gt;.&gt; ) [info] None [info] 1557724890
exhaustedwerewolf [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety I was privately super dubious about it, even though it was my second diagnosis, and I know I’ve always been a worrier and concerned, I still thought it was an exaggeration. My therapist recommended me ‘Overcoming Worry and Generalised Anxiety Disorder’ and Chapters 8 and 9  included some tests like the Intolerance of Uncertainty Scale (IUS) and some other identification tests. I scored very high for anxiety on everything. I hadn’t realised because my anxiety mostly results in a lot of successful avoidance on my part, so I am not actively anxious as often as a normal person with anxiety might be. But I am beginning to come to terms with the fact that yes, I am anxious. TLDR; yes, you can. maybe look into talking to a profesional or take some self led tests? [info] None [info] 1532389179
princesskeestrr [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2008 and now everything from acid reflux to asthma attacks are “probably due to my anxiety” and I have to push to get any actual tests. It took me a while to assert myself, but my specialist visit copay is $80 so it wasn’t hard to get pissed off that they weren’t wanting to help me and push back a bit. I’ve noticed that when I had a decent family doctor, who I saw regularly, everything was better. Then my insurance changed and now I see a different random moron every time I go in. I still have no idea what’s wrong with me beyond a vitamin d deficiency and probably an auto immune disease? [info] None [info] 1571360622
Chief_Tallbong [info] You sound like me. Worry is the word of my life. Worry. All I can seem to do is worry. I've been diagnosed with anxiety.My girlfriend was in town this past weekend so I'm feeling much, much better than usual. Haven't worried about anything in days. So in my moment of clarity, allow me to speak to you.The best advice I can offer is to just let it go. This is much easier said than done. It's taken months, but I'm getting there. Realize that worry does nothing for you. Literally nothing. There's helpful stress that will push you to do your best, but you and I both know this is not that kind of worry. This worry is intrusive, cold and dark. It's bullshit, put simply. Why do we have to deal with this shit?Because we let ourselves. We have to just... Let it go. Worrying about everything will not help you make everything better. It is not useful stress. Don't try to solve your entire life right now, no matter how old you are. Live in the present, and appreciate small things. Add them to your life one by one. Just think to yourself, when is the last time exhausting all possible scenarios actually helped me? Probably never.Just let it go.If you enjoy your days, your lifestyle (without comparing it to others'. What do YOU like to do?) then you're living it pretty well. Not every day will be perfect but if you still enjoy your routine and activities and the people you spend time with, you're doing great. If not, make changes and work toward your ideal lifestyle. It really is that simple, no matter how hard it sounds.TL;DR: Find your own standard of what living life to the fullest is. Let that be your guide. Otherwise, just let go of the pointless worrying. [info] None [info] 1444762647
thespookykids [info] Agreed, when I was starting in university and came out to my parents with the fact I have been diagnosed with anxiety they couldn't understand it and accused me of "wanting attention".Four years and a very rough family situation later my mom finally came back to me and admitted she didn't understand at the time but now experiencing anxiety symptoms can understand fully what I was and still am going through  [info] None [info] 1524771646
Guywholovesmonhun [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety before and I’ve been pretty sure it’s related for a while, but I’ve tried at least 7 or 8 medications at this point (lost count) and I only get the side effects. Not even a tiny benefit. However I’m considering trying meds again anyways because it sounds like the logical answer. Do you have any other recommendations? Maybe a weird med I wouldn’t have heard of before or some other thing? [info] None [info] 1568376887
mark983 [info] Yes I've been diagnosed with anxiety, with IBS and with migraine.Their not exactly hard things to identify.I will ask Doctor for IBS diagnosis.None of these supplements are bad anyway they will do more good than harm I think. [info] None [info] 1514766737
Godecapitator [info] It does help! I do know that but I value your response, thank u.  I *just* replied to a post in this sub advising to take their own time w telling a therapist their trauma. I realize now, maybe some background might help this post. I am also a victim of physical &amp; sexual abuse (not rape) I'm 38 &amp; a proud father of a 15 year old daughter &amp; 7 yr old son. I've been diagnosed with anxiety &amp; mood disorders. I've struggled w addiction most of my life but I've been sober for over a year :) I could not have done it w out the help of others, mostly my therapist &amp; now I hope to help others.  I realize now, the gist of my post, is that even though I've been victimized myself, I'm male &amp; want to be very sensitive to the female situation. Yes, I know men are raped also, but I know women are the majority of victims by male predators &amp; I'm hyper aware that I'm the same sex as most abusers. I don't want my sex to be a..trigger, so what can I do to neutralize that?..if that makes sense, any responses would be highly appreciated.Edit for clarity. [info] None [info] 1452372480
another30yovirgin [info] I've seen maybe 5 different therapists over the years, and yes, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and they were trying to work on that with me. I haven't been hitting on tons of girls over and over, because uh, yeah, anxiety. But I've asked women out before. I've been on some dates. Not recently. I'm definitely not trying now, and for a long time I haven't been able to bring myself to do it. It's just awful trying to date. So if you want to blame it on me, go ahead. So there you go. I'm hopeless. [info] None [info] 1508552979
roseweather [info] I made an account just for this, but it always makes me cry thinking of this. I'll start as to WHY I became a bully, and what made me change later on. When I was in elementary, I used to have friends who would always tease me. I had really bushy eyebrows and had the darkest skin in every class I was in. They'd call me a monkey, a boy, and just things that 7 year old me didn't like. At 8, I was at recess when I began to play with a group of boys, and they suddenly decided to restrain my arms and hold my legs apart. I thought we were playing, but one boy went under me and decided to "tickle" me. My teacher just told me that it was my fault for deciding to play with boys. I went through more shit in elementary, but that's another story for another time. &amp;#x200B;Now, let's flash through my years in middle school. &amp;#x200B;Mentally, I had put a wall around my mind so that I could be able to shut out every negative thing done to me. Soon, I made friends with someone, and I'll call her Dom for this. Dom and I were really inseparable, and she was truly the first friend that cared about me like a sister. But my mental conditioning to the things that was done to me in elementary made me feel as if something was bound to happen to our friendship. That one day she'd get tired of me, and I wasn't going to allow me to go through that. I pushed her away, called her names, and just made new friends to spite her. She was so confused, but it was my defense mechanism. Soon, those new friends went under the same thing. (I truly do not know why they didn't leave me sooner, but they ended up being my friends 'till now. Some of them, at least.) I fought with them, made sure they were vulnerable in our relationship, and ensured that they could be replaced any time I wanted.&amp;#x200B;My turning point was freshman year of high school. I just noticed that my friends... hated me. They truly could not stand me, but they were too afraid to speak up. I didn't realize I was becoming toxic, but I kept having my walls up and behaving like this cold-hearted bitch so that they couldn't hurt me any time soon. But, I began to act like this at home as well. My parents hadn't taught me this behavior, so they were also quite frustrated; they quickly landed me in a session with a therapist. My defense mechanism had gotten so bad that even ***I*** couldn't stand me sometimes. Sure enough, I was diagnosed with anxiety and had a 12 month plan to resolve my anger issues with the therapist.&amp;#x200B;I think I'm better now. That 12 month plan turned to 6 months due to the amazing improvement I was doing. See, I've been pushing people out of my life so that *they* couldn't hurt me. Ironically, having someone to talk to and explain myself seemed to be the thing I needed. I'm a senior now, and the friends I was horrible to saw the emotional improvements I was making. I cried so hard one day because it was the first time I ***physically*** felt my walls come down, and it was so scary without it. But I no longer make my friends cry, and I feel so comfortable around them. I hate the way I was, and I wish someone just could've noticed and said, "Hey, why are you acting this way. No really, *why?"* Honestly, it was a series of events that became my turning point. The therapy, the realization, and just finally removing that stupid mental wall. But I'm glad I did manage to have a turning point.  [info] None [info] 1551076738
ChristianityBot [info] Logged [comment](http://www.reddit.com/r/Christianity/comments/2q1s7i/struggling_with_my_anxiety_disorder/cn28fso) posted by /u/Inamullah-Mumtaz at 12/22/14 15:13:16:&gt; You have anxiety brother because you are confused inside your mind to follow Christianity... I invite you to talk to me and find your unsolved questions (q.d.c.i)... in response to submission [Struggling with my anxiety disorder](http://redd.it/2q1s7i) posted by /u/goldinkstar at 12/22/14 07:10:13:&gt; I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and have had it for near 8 years. I know that the gospel tells us to worry for nothing for God is our provider, which I whole heartedly believe in. But, sometimes I am wrought with fear and am flooded with so many "what if's" and that everything is going wrong and I wonder if I am really doing what God wants. After lots of crying I usually calm down, it's a typical panic attack for me. But I am embarrassed that as I christian, I suffer from anxiety. Of all people, wouldn't it be thought that christians would be the least likely to suffer from anxiety? And is my anxiety a product of me not trusting God enough or perhaps a product of sin?  And should I share the fact that I have anxiety with others? &gt; Thank you [info] None [info] 1419264002
catmomof4 [info] Reading this gave me some comfort. I was diagnosed with anxiety issues 3 years ago. It's been about that long that I've experienced an off-balance feeling. The best way I could describe it to my doctor was that I felt like I was walking on a boat, that it was like a floating sensation and I felt like I was constantly moving. So far I've had my hearing and inner ear checked, and of course everything is fine. They want me to see a neurologist now. But after reading your post I'd rather talk to my doctor about anxiety as the cause. I weaned myself off Lexapro last fall and have done great without it except for this balance issue. And it's incredibly difficult to push through it at work. I'm a service advisor so I'm constantly on my feet, running back to the shop, pulling cars around, etc. Some days I have to lock myself in a bathroom stall and just sit still for a moment to collect myself.  Until today I've never read where anyone else with anxiety has experienced this. [info] None [info] 1531357221
crciv [info] I have smoked weed longer than I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Since my diagnosis I began formal medications but continued to smoke. I  have to quit for work and the thought of quitting after so long is making me so anxious that I wish I hadn't let the habit develop so much. [info] None [info] 1392343293
Thealtruisticpoet [info] Pisces sun, Leo moon, Sag rising.I can cross my legs in a very difficult way that others can’t, and my feet don’t have any arches. i am pretty sure I’ll develop some kind of arthritis when I’m older. I think this is in due to my Pisces sun since Pisces rule the feet.I haven’t really felt anything going wrong in the aspect of body parts associated with Sagittarius. Leo rules over the heart and spine system... I have been diagnosed with anxiety and i tend to feel emotional pain as a physical pain. I’m anemic, so i guess my heart isn’t getting as much oxygen. My posture could definitely use some work. [info] Pisces Sun, Leo Moon, Sag Ascendent [info] 1564839877
exscapegoat [info] At most places, technically no.  You either lie or give a vague "not feeling well" reason for not coming in.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and mild to moderate PTSD.  A few times a year, I may need an unscheduled day off (have never used up all of my sick days, btw).  I just say I'm not feeling well usually.  I have disclosed to my recent and current bosses that I have anxiety.  But I didn't go into the details of why.  I wish things were different, but there's a good chance I'm going to be judged negatively if I go into the details of why I'm missing work.  This is a news story about a woman who had a pretty understanding boss who rewarded her honesty.  This is the way it should be, but it's often not that way.http://www.cnn.com/2017/07/12/health/mental-health-response-from-company-ceo-trnd/index.html [info] None [info] 1510335793
devp0ll [info] I’m with you. I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2006 and I will say avoiding it the WORST thing you can do for it. Embrace it and attack it head on, and know the facts. Uncovering as many truths, for ME, has been the best medicine for my anxiety. .02 [info] Series 4 | LTE | 44mm | Space Grey Aluminium [info] 1560694805
crazyisthenewnormal [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety.  Anxiety and insecurity are not the same thing.  And just because I have anxiety doesn't mean I have to let it stop me.  There's therapy, there's medication.  It's okay that you're anxious or scared or insecure, but you can still act anyway.  I've asked guys out even though my stomach was in knots and I was sweating through my clothes and almost threw up.  Some weren't interested and some were and I got less afraid to do it.  I am in control of my life, my anxiety is not. [info] None [info] 1513330652
swild89 [info] Maybe some perspective can help you with your anxiety. I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well as panic disorder with agoraphobia. Some days I cannot get past my front door. What do I do? I kick it in the ass. I go to therapy and I follow my medication plan. I have extremely healthy eating and sleeping habits. I have a dog to force me to leave the house twice a day for a walk. Your case of anxiety is not a bad case. Go see your gp to refer you to a general psychologist and look into some cognitive behavioural therapy. Good luck.  [info] None [info] 1372101322
randomassposting_ [info] &gt; I'm also paranoid and a year ago I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. I'm not saying it's all because of the drugs, but I'm pretty sure they've contributed a lot.Fuck. This worries me. The first time I truly felt the power of anxiety was on amphetamines. The anxiety and paranoia the comedown produced was something I dreaded during my high. Didn't know you could *develop* disorders. Good thing I'm cutting back on stim use soon. And the short-term memory thing seems to happen with most drugs, not just weed, like I originally thought. Makes it even more dangerous, shit. Gotta cut down even more because I don't like the way my memory feels now, imagine if I continue. Thank you for your comment and your advice, it was quite helpful. I hope things pick up for you man. Ever consider quitting stims? [info] None [info] 1490527104
SwampThing72 [info] A little late to the party on this, but writing helps me. Once I was diagnosed with anxiety and knew that it was a disorder and that I just didn't worry to worry, it helped identifying triggers.As I get older and more of life starts to happen, I've found that writing things down helps me manage what are actual problems to handle and what are just unnecessary worries. The notes app on my iPhone where I can make notes private helps out a lot. I will just start immediately listing what is on my mind as to "dump" everything out. From there, I look at the list and evaluate what are things I need to tackle and for a game plan for them and then eliminate the things that I absolutely have no control over. As I'm sure A LOT of people have said, you can't control everything. Once you shift your mindset and don't focus on the things you can't control and are able to identify when you begin to spiral over unimportant things, then you will notice the level of worry will start to decrease. Hope this helps!  [info] None [info] 1477426064
Chillie43 [info] Not true anxiety can be a diagnosisSource: I have been diagnosed with anxiety by a medical professional [info] None [info] 1574622344
Yer1blackfriend [info] I love my mom and I think that undiagnosed and untreated general anxiety disorder made her this way, but she’s incredibly negative. Every time I wanted to try something new as a kid or take up a new hobby, she’d always mention how it could go wrong/wouldn’t work. Want to try out for soccer? “Who will pick you up from practice?” Want to take up acting/drama? “You know that’s not a stable profession.” (I was like 10 btw). Want to try cheerleading? “You sure you can do all of those tricks?” Playing in a concert for your middle school band? “Ugh, now I have to sit during that long concert.” I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago and now have to check myself from being a negative Nancy all of the time that often makes me insecure about taking up something new. For instance, I love comedy and have really wanted to take up improv for the longest time but it takes a lot to move past the negative thoughts and just go for things. I know that when I have kids, I want to make sure that I always encourage them to go for their passions and at least try new and different things.  [info] None [info] 1528490369
veraloe [info] I’m still fighting this concept and I have been diagnosed with anxiety/OCD now for almost 10 years. I’ve gone to a psychologist but never stuck with it. I’m on medication/seek help from my doctor - but I just find it really hard to seek a psychologist.  This is for a few reasons:- I can’t really afford it at the moment - as soon as I feel slightly better, I feel I don’t need it anymore- I’m not willing to change my habits yet (I have strict compulsions that my psychologist tries to change, and I feel as if I’m just not ready)I know I need help and I know help would do wonders for me... but I recommend seeking help ASAP so you can get back on the right track :) [info] None [info] 1532312560
affablegiraffe [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety thanks to this video. [info]  [info] 1501882034
Wrathchild7 [info] I dealt with an almost identical experience my senior year of college recently. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, had frequent chest pains/ panics attacks/ insomnia was able to tough out to graduation. My advice would be to deal with it as best you can, get as much help you can, try not to put so much pressure on yourself! Just do the best you can! I graduated and am still having issues with the anxiety disorder and finding a good job. However i find peace I'm knowing I'm doing the best I can. Also I was prescribed Xanax which really helped with the anxiety/insomnia may want to talk to doctor about that. Hope this helps!!! [info]  [info] 1511234749
Kafke [info] I don't think I've experienced trauma, but I definitely get it. And I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I just wasn't aware there was a link. Interesting... [info] My toucan is also trans [info] 1478961937
MollyMittens [info] I'm always anxious 24/7. I was diagnosed with anxiety in elementary school and it's only gotten worse as I've gotten more responsibilities. &amp;#x200B;I recommend therapy and talking to your doctor about medications. Ideally before you start having panic attacks and ulcers. &amp;#x200B;Also find some good coping mechanisms to help you when you're getting super anxious. If I can feel a panic attack coming on I can sometimes prevent them by listening to calming music and drinking water.  Also naps really help reset your emotions. But obviously this type of coping mechanism is more of a band-aid than a long term solution so definitely look into longer term solutions (like therapy and meds). [info] Anxious Mess [info] 1538962177
givemecookies456996 [info] Got me braces sooner, had my wisdom teeth removed when the dr said to, Dad to not have drank so much, Mom to have gotten me a decent mattress when my orthopedist said to, took me to a real therapist when I was diagnosed with anxiety, took my animal allergies seriously instead of getting more dogs, offer me the same monetary help in high school and college they offered my other siblings. However I love my parents. So much about my childhood was amazing. I don’t blame them. Being a parent can be fucking tough.  [info] None [info] 1514235793
ackthisisamess [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety, however I also find it a bit difficult to understand where the line is between "normal" and not-"normal" anxiety.... I personally see it as a bit nuanced? [info] None [info] 1569980247
EllieOrion [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety too a few years back and then a couple of years later; aspergers syndrome. All as an adult.My dad started teaching me and my sister to drive at age 15. We refused to drive on the open roads because we were afraid to shift gears, so we practiced driving in parking lots for many months. Only shifting from first to second gear because straight down was easier. We went like this for months. Thankfully our dad was supportive of our slow process. It all comes down to "getting the feel" between the clutch and the gas. Practice in parking lots. You will get the hang of it! [info] None [info] 1559415177
The-Bunny [info] Like everyone else has said, it is possible and you are worthy of being loved. You aren't ruining his life and he is with you for a reason. I have been with my boyfriend for four years and I have been diagnosed with anxiety, I believe my boyfriend has anxiety as well but he hasn't been formerly diagnosed. We recently had a heart to heart and we both discovered that we have the same worry of being bad for each other- I actually giggled a little when he told me cause it was kind of funny we both had the same worry and could have talked it out and gotten support from each other. Communication, communication, communication. This is the key to making it work. Also, I learned it kind of helps me to joke about it in a way. For example, there are times when I realize I get irritated for no reason and make a big deal out of nothing cause of my anxiety but he realizes he handled the situation wrong and let it spiral into something worse. and after we make up, the fights become a weird inside joke between the two of us that is kind of like play fighting to make fun of ourselves. Talk to your significant other, I guarantee you aren't ruining but enhancingEdit: also know you aren't alone. Sometimes my anxieties get so bad I contemplate breaking up with my boyfriend to relieve him the trouble of being with me. However, once the anxiety passes I remind myself if I was truly a terrible person than he wouldn't be with me. Just keep reminding yourself it is your anxiety [info] None [info] 1435264841
nrrrdgrrl [info] You're not alone. I've had this for as long as I can remember, and when I was diagnosed with anxiety, I understood where it came from. Still not sure what brings it on, as it seems to be random, but I'll just absolutely not be able to get a deep, satisfying breath no matter how hard I try. I've found that thinking about it and being conscious of the issue does nothing to fix it, but simply ignoring it, and thinking about something else for 5-10 minutes, and then trying to take a deep breath again usually helps.  [info] GAD, Social Phobia [info] 1397589490
Fartingpenguinhole [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety, and this bent shelf gives me a problem. So I can't agree more, but anytime I say what you said I get 50 messages about how I'm  the problem with invisible diseases. This picture makes me want to cry. And itch. Very itchy.  [info] None [info] 1552731913
6irlsix [info] It's been almost 10 years since I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I work in a private cancer lab. I'm lucky because I have an independent position that requires me to speak with a limited number of people each day.  To be honest,  even when i'm having an anxious day,  work allows me to focus on something other than the things in my head. I love doing histology,  I love the relationships I've been able to cultivate.  However it solidifies my belief that just because you work with someone, doesn't mean you know them.  I don't socialize with my coworkers often so they know nothing about my anxiety. I try to work through my anxiety because I find my idle mind is a playground for negative thoughts. I would love to do sales but I have a feeling that my anxiety would cause a drop in company sales.  Of course thinking like that definitely indicates that I should stay away from sales. But I agree with the reddit user who said that they create a 'character'.   [info] None [info] 1529363346
noobpsych [info] I went through something similar several years ago, where out of the blue, I was paranoid about food and contamination.  I ate very little during the day and would not eat after about 3 pm, otherwise I would be in the bathroom with *various maladies* all night.  In my case, this problem was accompanied by other symptoms, such as inability to relax and enjoy life and panic attacks (though I didn't know them as such at the time).  Eventually, I was diagnosed with anxiety and prescribed an antidepressant and anti-anxiety medication.  The meds helped almost immediately and I stopped taking them a short time after.  Insight into this problem didn't come until much later.  I think the anxiety was a delayed reaction to uprooting my entire life (at age 18) about six months prior to the onset of symptoms.  During the initial transition period I had to hold my shit together (just married, moved cross-country, started college, a new job).  I think that all the stress/fear etc. that I could not afford to experience at the time, came out later and masked as the funky obsessions and fears.    So my questions to you are: 1) are you experiencing any other symptoms? and 2) have you recently gone through a stressful event? [info] None [info] 1430428719
tinywaves [info] I don't know if I can *help*, but I can definitely relate. When I was learning to drive it made me mad anxious yo. Having someone ride along and criticize my skills while performing a stressful &amp; dangerous task *sucked*. I started learning to drive before I was diagnosed with anxiety, and shortly before I got my license I was diagnosed. this made me aware of what was making things so difficult, and made driving much easier to handle. Now that I have been driving some time, I do find that anytime I don't know where I'm going or miss a turn or get lost or anything, I easily start to panic. I currently don't deal very healthily with panic attacks and tend to just internalize them(unless I'm in the car alone). Pulling over and stopping and then calling someone helps a lot. If I'm trying to get somewhere on time it adds a lot of excess stress and anxiety. As a release I swear while in the car, bigtime, because I can't pull over and get out and stop. But generally speaking, since driving was such a huge hurdle for me early into my time dealing with anxiety, it's the thing I've worked on most. I am generally pretty good at staying calm and then dealing with my anxiety when I feel it rising. acknowledging that I'm starting to feel that panic helps to stay calm and breathe and not endanger myself.  [info] GAD/Agoraphobia/Cleithrophobia [info] 1368816809
quoth_tthe_raven [info] Twenty-three years of life. There was no intervention when I was a child and then I was diagnosed with anxiety in middle school. I remained under the general "anxiety umbrella" until recently when I started seeing a new psychiatrist. All of a sudden everything made sense and although I have a long road ahead of me it feels better to have answers. Simply saying, "Oh, it's my anxiety making me feel this way," never really added up for me.  [info] None [info] 1447258866
studentofserapis [info] I was born muslim and the rest of my family is completely muslim. I started to doubt Islam when Inwas confronted with the verse that claimed that Maryam the mother of Jesus is the sister of Haroon. This Haroon in jewish tradition has a sister called Maryam but is not the same as Maryam the mother of Jesus. To me it seemed like the people who wrote the Quran mixed them up and it would be impossible that the Quran is a divine revelation. After that I discovered more and more errors in the Quran.This was about three years ago. After that I ignored this problem and became full on religious. Until last year when I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and suffered from severe panic attacks and health anxiety. I got therapy and meds and I got better. The world seemed more clear to me and I decided not to waste my time on bs anymore. I couldn’t even make myself to believe in islam anymore. I studied evolution and thought it made complete sense.No one around me knows I left islam. It’s not really necessary. My family is muslim but not conservative and not strict. I can do whatever I want and I have no problems keeping my apostacy to myself. [info] New User [info] 1530283415
TalkOfSexualPleasure [info] Personally I'm diagnosed with anxiety.  I'm very particular with who I tell that to (barring Reddit because of the anonymity) because if I feel like people are patronizing me it makes my anxiety worse.  There are some people who push the envelope for no other reason than attention, but grouping all of us into that category really hurts the ones of us who suffer silently to ourselves.  I personally have the fear of telling someone about my condition and being told they know better than my doctor's or told I'm out right lying, because my symptoms aren't visible, but personally my symptoms don't come out around anyone, they're clawing at the back of my mind, but in front of people my mind goes into go mode and decides no one can see how dysfunctional I am.  The muscles in my back will clench to the point of pain, my shoulders will cramp, and I can be all but having panic attack and yet I won't break.  The second I'm by myself, I can't breath, I can't think, I'm pacing, yanking at my hair, screaming, crying, and even praying to a god I don't believe in to make it stop.  And it never stops, it never goes away, it gets better, smaller, for at least a little while, but it never ever goes away. [info] None [info] 1552359370
georgialouisej [info] No, I wish he would have. I was very young and had (at the time) undiagnosed anxiety. Our relationship didn't start out terrible, at first he was lovely and all that but after a while he started to become controlling and manipulative which is awful anyway but worse for me at the time due to previously mentioned anxiety problems. After finding out he had cheated on me I tried to break up with him but he threatened to kill himself so I stayed. His behaviour then got worse by tenfold and he would openly do terrible things but I would stay because I thought that if I left and he killed himself it would be my fault. About 6 months before I broke up with him I was diagnosed with anxiety and started receiving treatment, we broke up after he did some extremely awful things and I finally realised that if he did kill himself, while that would be terrible, I am not responsible for his actions and it wouldn't be my fault.  [info] None [info] 1509194229
WildlingAnathema [info] Mine is a little different from most of the contributions I’ve read so far, so please let me know if this doesn’t belong.I have ventricular tachycardia, which I’ve had for as long as I can remember. When I was little, I would describe my funny “heart stopping” moments, which my family wrote off and we never really told my pediatrician about. When I was in my early teens, I started getting severe chest pains (sometimes a stabbing feeling, but usually like someone was reaching into my chest and squeezing something - my heart, turns out - very tightly). I told my doctor and my parents, and I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder.I brought up my chest pain to three other primary care physicians and lived in a state of near-constant fatigue until about three years ago, when I was twenty-seven. When doctors did look into anything, they mostly provided suggestions. It may be chronic fatigue or MS, no one knew. Mostly, they said I was depressed and anxious and needed to take my meds and practice breathing exercises. During a routine visit, my blood pressure was measured as so low that the nurse was amazed I was conscious (I now know that I often drop under 80/40 when my heart, for lack of medical knowledge on my part, flips its shit and forgets how to function). I told her that, yes, I had chest pain, but not usually above the normal, near-constant level. I only have the stabbing or squeezing pain sometimes. That’s the day I learned there isn’t such a thing as normal chest pain. Finally, testing was ordered, though my primary doctor at the time insisted “it’s just the anxiety, but we’ll do this just to make sure.” Every test after that was “it’s still probably nothing, but your results were... strange.” until I got to the cardiologist. After a few months, I was diagnosed and told I’ll need an implanted defibrillator by the time I’m 35. In the super sensitive cardiologist’s words, since it’s not a structural heart problem, but an electrical one, there isn’t much else they can do and there’s a chance my heart could just stop or go into v fib at any time. It’s basically a bomb in my chest until they put in a device that will zap it back to normalcy when it fucks up.I’ve had a few episodes, mostly fainting, one time when I ended up at the ER because my blood pressure plummeted and my heart was racing and almost stopping sporadically. Basically every day, I might die. Or not. Who knows?TL;DR: my heart is stupid and soon I’ll either be a cyborg or dead. Chest pain is not normal, get it checked immediately. [info] None [info] 1521742863
youtbuddcody [info] I actually did have my head examined a month ago. I was diagnosed with anxiety and somitazitaion disorder... [info] Oh my God... You can talk! [info] 1398866118
albob [info] It was something my psychiatrist told me back when I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.  A quick google search found this article with a link to the study at the bottom - https://adaa.org/living-with-anxiety/managing-anxiety/exercise-stress-and-anxiety [info] None [info] 1564863195
PhDOH [info] The emotional behavior bit is exactly what I thought. I asked my father once why he slapped me for crying after he ran over my foot, "you were such a whiny child!" Dude if you thought that I cried too much why the fuck didn't you do something more appropriate about it given I was diagnosed with anxiety attacks while still under 10?! I'm not sure how punishing a child for crying about being in pain by inflicting more pain is supposed to work.My nfather also got annoyed that I never told him anything. Why do you think? [info] NC Nfather NexstepM [info] 1493772021
Thannox [info] I understand what you mean. But in my case I feel incredibly sick throughout the day, as I was diagnosed with anxiety.Due to this I have missed substantial amount of high school due to feeling sick because of anxiety. [info] None [info] 1551628331
raislash [info] Casual player here. I don't post much on reddit but this topic hits pretty close to home, and I just thought I'd share my own thoughts on this.I have been diagnosed with anxiety, and do understand how the game can be rather nerve-wracking, given the amount of uncertainty over random outcomes. Nonetheless, I do enjoy the game a lot, and have managed to reach legend 3 times (mostly during periods when I'm not busy with work, and therefore have the mental resources to stave off game-related anxiety). My most recent legend finish was just last month.To start off, the existing posts here are really helpful for those looking to enjoy the game without worry. I found myself agreeing to most of what has been shared.In my case, there came a point in time where I just wanted to push myself further to see how far I could go. If you ever find yourself having such thoughts (i.e "I'd love to climb to legend some time!") then I'd be happy to share what has worked for me in the few times I've reached legend rank.First, it helps to figure out your triggers are in the game (note that there can be more than one). In no particular order, mine are:1. Bad-mannered opponents: I don't think I need to speak at length about this, or it will turn into an unrelated rant on decency. I basically just squelch the moment they emote, and never accept any friend requests whether I win or lose (after the first few unpleasant experiences, this is necessary for my mental health).  2. Unfavourable random outcomes: This comes in all forms - bad random card effects, bad draws, and even queueing against bad matchups. In these cases, I basically try to fully understand my odds before I play, and it has really helped both my      anxiety and my gameplay.   For example, if I went into a turn knowing that I had a 2/13 chance of drawing a card to win me the game, I would feel better about the outcome as I would have been mentally prepared for it. If I did not draw my winning cards, then I could just tell myself that the odds were not in my favour anyway. On the other hand, if I drew my winning cards, I would acknowledge that I got really lucky with my draw and remind myself that my luck isn't so bad after all. Doing this also helps my mental state when things do not go my way despite the odds being in my favour. Having this mindset also helps me with random card effects.  Regarding queueing into bad matchups, I find that it helps to read up extensively on the current meta and matchups before I even begin my ranked matches for the month (I have found meta-snapshot and data reaper to be 2 great resources for this). Once I have identified a deck that could have an above-average performance on ladder, I just stick to it. Note that this does not necessarily equate to simply picking the "most OP tier-1 deck", especially when opponents are likely to tech against those decks. Read up, and understand what cards you are likely to go up against - once again, it's all about prior mental preparation and understanding your odds. Once you understand your matchup win-rates, you'll be able to mentally prepare yourself for the outcomes of the match.Next, it helps to manage your tilt. There are a few things that I would suggest before you set out to climb the ladder.1. Building resilience to grinding. Prior to laddering more seriously, I played a lot of casual matches and practised a lot of the mental preparation that I was describing before I started taking ladder seriously. Each time I wanted to climb, I would give myself a few weeks of preparation to ease myself into the grinding process.  2. Knowing when to take a break from ladder. I usually do it when I am at zero stars for the rank, or when I find myself making multiple misplays based on the odds of particular turn. At this point, I’ll usually just find something else to do, or just play a random meme-deck that I’d created/found online.You can see though, that laddering as an anxious person takes a lot of mindfulness and mental preparation. I suggest only going into ranked matches when you can muster the mental resources for it. Otherwise, there are plenty of other fun aspects of the game, such as deck-building, playing meme decks, and just enjoying in-game animations, as mentioned in other posts on this thread.Hope you find this helpful at some point! But more importantly have fun! [info] None [info] 1548656282
lazy-beans [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety for 8 years before ADHD [info] ADHD-C [info] 1523076894
youdontknowmeyouknow [info] My last line manager in my current job. She was invested in me as a person first, always listened when I had ideas or questions. Her primary concern was my well-being, and she showed it. I was diagnosed with anxiety a while back, and she was so supportive, I really believe her presence played a huge part in my current frame of mind which is so much more positive. On top of all that, she's one of the most efficient people I've worked with and had an amazing can-do outlook. I'm sad that she left, but we're still good friends and she's incredibly happy in her new job. Couldn't be happier for her, she's an amazing person. [info] None [info] 1553180962
ebwinning [info] Hey, great follow up question. My onset was 2 small plaques on my torso and it has grown from there slowly at first up to now where I would say about 30% of my body is affected. Drinking age is 18 in new Zealand but we all drank from 16+ (not uncommon for NZ and Australia). My psoriasis has increased drastically in the last4-5 years but also I have been diagnosed with anxiety during this time too which could also be a triggering factor to the drastic increase. The only way I have found that keeps my skin from breaking, cracking, and bleeding is not drinking. But hey it may not work for everyone but it’s got me to a point I can live with it, and that all I can really ask for. [info] None [info] 1537173800
luckymama1990 [info] I get a little jittery after doing a inhaler, but I am not currently doing one. I have an emergency relief inhaler right now, but I don't really use it. I guess I should have also mentioned I have been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 16. I'll be 27 next month. Sometimes I can blame it on the anxiety, but other times, it truly comes out of nowhere.. Thank you for your input. [info] None [info] 1486758101
Marked2Test [info] Yes I’m a current employee. Why would they say that my team deserves more and then start asking me these questions. The context was not in a helpful tone. It started out in an attacking tone. I’m not convinced HR was trying to help me. It was with HR and my boss. Honestly, I’m not lonely and not depressed. I have been diagnosed with anxiety due to work and other personal events but my performance at work is still successful. [info] None [info] 1545486524
jbrinskele [info] I used to be agoraphobic when I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder. After finding the right medications that worked for me I no longer have the problems I did. [info] None [info] 1334166958
Unknown-girl7 [info] I do have to take medication for my anxiety. I was diagnosed with anxiety by a psychologist. I’m also very shy and get anxious when interacting with people. I feel like that fits in the category of social anxiety. [info] None [info] 1550804037
snowfarts [info] I had the exact same symptoms when I got diagnosed this year. I was honest with my doctor and told her I had tried adderall, and it worked well when I did. My therapist is also in the same office so it helped. I am diagnosed with anxiety as well, and we were all concerned it would worsen my anxiety. I told them that no matter what the outcome was, I didn’t want to try anxiety meds and I’m willing to risk my anxiety being worse. If I know what’s causing it, it’s typically not an issue anyway. My therapist also said it was worth a try because either my anxiety was caused by my ADD, or they were two different things. I’ve been on it for 3 or 4 months now and my life is completely changed for the better. My anxiety was 100% caused by my ADD. I don’t get overwhelmed with all of the shit I have to do, and I’m actually able to do it instead of procrastinate. My doctor keeps me on a low dose, and I no longer get the feeling you experience at first (at first I was sad but then realized I cannot want to feel that ‘high’ feeling). I just feel like a normal person, which is weird because I thought I felt like that before. Except before it felt like I was living life with clouds in my brain and eyes, making me sleepy and unable to care about anything. I also have insomnia and it hasn’t affected it, if it does your dose is too strong. For a while I could NOT sleep and surprise, it was because of my anxiety. My therapist told me I was so worried about my sleep I was making myself unable to do so. Now I just lay down and if I’m laying for a minute, I don’t care. I just lay there. I’ll take melatonin every once in a while.Sorry for this literal essay.. I still have add, its just managed. [info] None [info] 1566853854
Google24 [info] Full on grown-up style that I'm not ready for. I absolutely can't deal with stress because I was diagnosed with anxiety. It's frustrating because I would like to date someone. [info] None [info] 1386388631
throwaway-1101010010 [info] it’s been more than a month. i am diagnosed with anxiety so that doesn’t help lol. thanks for the input [info] None [info] 1566678664
Anonymouse290 [info] Ok, so how do you go about getting a service dog or a therapy dog? I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder,  runs in my family.  I didn't know about this before I joined the army.   Now my anxiety is so bad it's damn near debilitating.   I know ppl probably think it's dumb,  but I can't get up in the morning without getting sick.  I've gone from 136lb to 112lb.  I have been seeing a doctor,  I've asked about it,  but they just keep giving me pills.   Now,  you have to see a specialty psych dr and there's only one place here.   You also have to sign a consent form,  saying that no one else will treat you for mental issues if you are already being seen. (So nothing from your primary physician is allowed). So  I have one place to go and the only thing they say when I ask about a dog is,  "try grounding techniques. " I'm so sick of that.... obviously it doesn't work. [info] None [info] 1556036602
Whelpers__ [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety, But it was just social anxiety. I’ll tell someone this, thank you. [info] None [info] 1563149096
rabidhamster87 [info] I feel like a lot of people who suffer from anxiety think that they're the only ones who do.  I can't tell you how many people I've met who define themselves by their anxiety and act like I wouldn't understand... But I've been diagnosed with anxiety too... I just don't like to announce my diagnoses like that.  It's very annoying to encounter these people.   [info] None [info] 1479751332
Williusthegreat [info] Damn this resonates with me a lot. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I can relate to so many of those stories in there. Anxiety often gets overlooked when people discuss mental health. Thanks for sharing. It's great that these types of stories are being told.  [info] None [info] 1476346555
PapShmear [info] Getting semi-decent grades in college, living on my own with a fantastic job and apartment, two cats, 5 year long term relationship. I was a fuckup in high school and now I'm 23 and life is great (albeit stressful still 99% of the time). I was diagnosed with anxiety after HS graduation which gave me perspective on my inability to succeed in that environment.  [info] None [info] 1501573780
RetrogradeMe [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder so yes, I do.  [info] 2 days [info] 1519682168
Os07 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and ocdSucks! [info] None [info] 1472301497
boosegoose [info] For me autism is normality so it's hard to explain it. I have aspergers and I wasn't diagnosed until I was 29 so I am considered "high functioning".Basically I was diagnosed with anxiety and a high intelligence from a young age so people used to kind of put a "sensitive genius" label on me rather than autism because I was a girl and girls tend to get diagnosed later than boys if at all.What was interpreted as anxiety, which is generally a comorbidity with autism, was my trains of thought moving too quickly combined with my sensory issues. I have multiple trains of thought running at all times. They run fast like bullet trains and when I can get them all running in the right directions I will have a really amazing and productive day. Usually a couple will fuck up and go all over the place though and this is an average day. I'm either trying to ignore it or manage it. Both take energy. So with these trains of thought, I might be doing really well with them and then suddenly someone comes into the room wearing perfume, or maybe I'll walk into a room with a horrible colourful patterned carpet. Whatever it might be, it is so strong to me because of my sensory issues that I can't process anything else and it basically derails all the trains. When the trains derail I have what is known as a meltdown.For me my mind sort of shuts off and I lose my ability to speak. I become non verbal and need to shut myself away in a controlled environment to reset my mind. I also don't like people to see me like this as I tend to rock back and forth and tap my head with my hand, and tap my feet rapidly. I look odd to someone who doesn't understand. I used to run to the bathroom to engage in this behaviour at school. Probably another reason didn't pick up on me having autism until much later. I've always taken things too literally. Jokes have often gone over my head because I miss things. I need more time to process what people say because I take language very literally and take things at face value. You can't be passive aggressive with me. It won't work, I will not pick it up. If you tell me you are fine and you aren't too bad. Also as I take my context from your choice of words rather than tone because tone is harder for me to read I need you to choose them carefully. This also makes vagueness harder for me to stomach because I rely so much of the specifity of your words. For instance "Soon" is too ambiguous a word. Give me specifics. Ambiguity gives me intense anxiety. If things are ambiguous I can't put them in a list or schedule in my mind. Everything for me needs to be timed and categorised. I couldn't stop it if I wanted to. It just happens automatically.For instance when I meet someone new my mind pulls out a checklist from a file cabinet in my mind and tells me what I need to do. Smile. Make eye contact. Say hi and introduce yourself. Offer your hand to shake. It's not a choice I made to make a list and see a file cabinet, it's just always been that way. Relationships are difficult because of my tendency to take people at face value and struggle to read between the lines. People can also struggle with my frankness, and how chatty I can be if you get me on to a topic I consider a special interest. I don't always realise I'm not letting anyone else get a word in because my brain is moving so fast I feel like I've only said a tiny amount even though I've been rambling on and on. I also tend to be very black and white. There's a strong sense of right and wrong because I dislike ambiguity. I try very hard to process grey areas but they just sit so badly with me. I tend to cut people out of my life who disagree with me if they keep talking about it because it causes me physical distress to think about it. I have a checklist for peacefully resolving things like political disagreements now though where I take a deep breath, say we shouldn't discuss this subject any more, agree to disagree and either shake hands or hug it out depending on my bond with the person. I also find neurotypical people want a lot more from me than I am at times capable of giving. Like in a romantic relationship they can move very quickly and feel things in the early stages and want a lot of my time which I find intense and off putting. I need a reasonable amount of alone time each day. If I don't have that I get really distressed and have meltdowns. I find I spend a lot of my time managing the expectations of neurotypical people and it's very tiring. I also think there's a misconception that people with ASD don't have as much empathy or care as much but for me I feel like it's the opposite. Like externally I appear shut down or I might now show emotion but internally it's like a raging sea. When my cousin died I was a wreck inside but maybe externally people might think I didn't care much because I seem so stoic and unmoved. The reason I shut down is because I feel so much I can't process anything else. I guess in summary for me I guess the world just feels faster, louder, brighter, and smellier than it does to most people. It's more confusing because things for me are more black and white and I can't always tell if people are saying what they mean or how they really feel. I often feel like the world would be simpler if more people just said what they wanted instead of expecting people to guess.  [info] None [info] 1485437989
rationalomega [info] You're my fiancée! Well, I was her in senior year and my husband was you. I was/am pretty "Type A" and I would drag him to the library, make him get off slashdot, and put down the damn phone. He still barely graduated after failing a necessary class (somehow the prof passed him anyway after I wrote to her begging). I also made friends with the other people in his major.  Basically I was absurdly micromanaging his academic career. It was exhausting and after graduation I was diagnosed with anxiety. But he got through the major with almost a 3.0 If a court ever asks, I am absolutely entitled to half his earnings at least!  [info] None [info] 1446000837
do-you-like-darkness [info] I worry too much.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and it's been a part of my life for as long as I can remember.  It's exhausting and stops me from doing things I otherwise would.  I hate it.  [info] None [info] 1541041176
Seeeab [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety so whatever man. I put plenty of caveats and expanded in other posts to make clear I have no real advice. I also added caveats that there are many factors (including genetic and biologic).But fuck off lol. Anxiety can for sure be learned. If someone is raped as a child and it makes them anxious around certain dudes when they're an adult that's not a genetic issue. And sure enviornmental scenarios can trigger biologic changes too. So idk what you're doing except having upvote envy and trying to be the dude being a random sense of reason on a popular post Edit: happy cake day tho [info] None [info] 1498869495
Ralpharen [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder about 3 years ago, I used to have some pretty bad symptom both physical and psychological, both terapy and meds helped me a lot. However it is not a simple process you will get frustated, it will seem like you are going nowhere, the meds side effects are a bitch at the start, but with a little patience things will start to stabilize. The thing is we usually will fall into the same hole multiple times before we can start walking through another street. Seeing a psychiatrist and/or doing therapy is something hard to admit, people don't get how hard it is, therapy is very usefull but you must want to go, or else it does nothing. In the end it's a slow process you have to take very little steps to overcome the problems, but if you are willing to, things start to change. [info] None [info] 1407937446
I_think_I_forgot [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 21, and ADD when I was 26. It's a weird experience for sure.  [info] None [info] 1493880260
bananas_cake [info] I told my friend I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and they told me just not to think about it and I won’t be anxious anymore  [info] None [info] 1544765214
Giga-X [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety the moment I finished reading this. [info] ID: 68887019 [info] 1460815358
shibaewie [info] I didn't properly understand why I was hypersensitive until I was diagnosed with anxiety. As far as I and everybody else was concerned, I was just a crybaby who couldn't handle life. It's been quite the journey trying to come terms with such situations [info] None [info] 1548775954
Tictacjo [info] I hope your dog helps you! I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was younger, and it's actually grown to be getting a bit worse as I've gotten older. (I almost had a panic attack in the movie theater the other day.) But I recently adopted a cat, and she's been perfect. Good luck! [info] None [info] 1447095852
ThisIsNotAConspiracy [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety by a regular doctor and every psychiatrist accepted it as a real diagnosis.  [info] None [info] 1486604150
cassidyysagee [info] me too, I was diagnosed with anxiety on it. None of the ones I’ve been on have made any sort of difference and I’m kinda done with the whole thing at this point [info] None [info] 1561234136
iforkedthelaw [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety [info] None [info] 1568872507
DinosaurEggsBenny [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety as a teenager but after I was in my early 20's I luckily lived almost anxiety free without medications until my accident when I was 26. I'm 31 now and have issues with PTSD, but don't live in daily anxiety. This lyrica withdrawl feels like a whole new animal I'm not used to. Maybe you're right that my previous anxiety issues contribute to what I'm feeling now. I have a tens unit and some lidocaine patches for the muscle pain for now. I haven't tried taking magnesium but my doctor is testing to see if my body is low actually. I also haven't tried using oils or scents but that's a good idea. I'm currently doing some adaptive yoga in physical therapy as well as pool therapy which helps, although I was too anxious at my last appointment and had to leave unfortunately. Thank you for your advice and sharing your experience. [info] None [info] 1515767600
LameSaucey [info] My third, actually! The first two I had what I would call normal anxiety, now it’s just...awful. And has started pouring into every other aspect of my life. I can’t sleep at night because I’m worried my 7 month old will stop breathing, or that someone will break into the house, or that the doors aren’t locked.  I spend way too much time daily worrying about my husband while he’s at work (he’s a tattoo artist, there’s really not much to worry about, but I’m just always worried) Every time my two year old has a tantrum, I’m worried the neighbors are going to call the police (he’s like...way loud haha) It just sucks, I was diagnosed with anxiety as a teenager, but apparently it has been a part of me for longer than that, but it wasn’t until I had my youngest that it truly and severely started impacting my day-to-day life, and I just want to feel normal again. Starting EMDR therapy on Tuesday, and I’m so so hopeful that this will help! [info] None [info] 1562385161
Bobosanman [info] You need to talk about it. Once you open up you will find out that you are not alone. I had similar problems when I was in high school. Even I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. I take medication and see a counselor. It has done wonders for me. I am not trying to diagnose your problem but only trying to tell to talk about it and ask for some help. It will take some effort on your part but only can change things but help is available. [info] None [info] 1560639697
adhdmaybe [info] I have both. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. I wanted to be sure anxiety wasn't the reason for the ADHD symptoms. The second when I told her the problems I was having said I had a clear case of ADHD.  [info] None [info] 1451847944
SinOfMemesMeliodas [info] I can relate very much, while hospitalized for other reasons, I can relate to having a similar convo with my no (at the time she smoked weed in front of her three kids (I'm 17 now, PJ was 6 and Kaitlynn was 5 at the time). And lastly I can relate I was diagnosed with anxiety but I don't let it ever hold me back :) [info] None [info] 1551113956
prider90 [info] I' m in the same boat mate. :( I've been diagnosed with anxiety.  Tried lots of supplements/meditation and no improvement.  Somehow I always remember music lyrics or gaming competition tasks/challenges but I forget simple things and having a hard time to remember things people told me.&amp;#x200B; [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1538668641
sadlilzombie [info] Thanks for the response, I am diagnosed with anxiety so makes sense. I just hate to be something negative in anybody’s eyes, but it is sort of inevitable so I’ll just try my best to keep a positive image of myself. [info] None [info] 1564709714
mmoritz80 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety order and do take medication for it.  It's been a while since such a small conflict has bothered me this much.  I would guess that I felt defensive. [info] None [info] 1375908153
Psychedelic-wizard69 [info] Thanks man I have been diagnosed with anxiety so I like to think the worst sometimes and I can tell you lsd can be a very intense thing! The trip really scared me. My doctor thinks I might have PTSD so I’m going to try EMDR therapy to help put my mind at ease. I just over think a lot [info] None [info] 1565116892
ant105 [info] I know, it's just a damn bloody shame the system is so messed up. Like you say, the doctors and Parma are nicely tucked up in bed together. They don't really give two shits about us in the grand scheme of things. As long as they keep pushing the most profitable drugs, it's win win for them. I seriously think in a few hundred years, they'll look back on psych meds and the whole treatment of mental health issues with utter horror. I really do hope you get yourself sorted out, what I would do is try to go for Temazepam (not sure of its brand name in the US, halicon I think) as that is one they specifically prescribe for sleep. I don't fully understand the way your insurance system in the states works, but if you have the insurance and a good doctor, surely they can't turn you down? You know the really depressing thing, is that had no choice but to obtain them without a doctor/nhs. I have a real illness, I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago and there is so little help over here it makes me so angry. They push all their SSRIs on me which do absolutely nothing but give me awful side effects and turn me into an emotionless zombie. It hurts that I KNOW benzodiazepines work, plus with a medically supervised schedule, they would change my life and allow me to live like a normal person. But no. UK guidelines won't allow that, hence why I turn to other sources to self medicate myself since the doctors don't give a shit.Sorry, it makes me feel emotional taking about it.Listen, if you want to PM me, I might be able to help you. [info] None [info] 1505083034
triplexpac [info] It’s funny, I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on meds, which helped a lot. Now I have been diagnosed with severe sleep apnea as well. Very curious to see how things change as I get my CPAP [info] None [info] 1570638880
fancypattie [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in the past. I do have that pretty well under control. For example I would be afraid to be in public places., be afraid of an intruder, have panic attacks which required being medicated. So I don't know if it's just a branch off of that. I also didn't have this fear with my son's father. I feel like I loved my SO and my son so much that I'm always worrying about their safety. [info] None [info] 1556831759
TecumsehM [info] If all work is constant stress to you, you have no worked hard enough to find a career. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD but I work 10 hours a day, 6 days a week in a career I love. The hours aren't the problem, you are [info] None [info] 1545346099
violent_amethyst_13 [info] 1. i've cut my leg from my hip to my knee before 2. i'm diagnosed with anxiety 3. i haven't self-harmed in the past 4 months  [info] None [info] 1511457840
givemeaholler2 [info] Hmm maybe you’re right. I have no gotten a teeth cleaning in god knows how long (American health care amirite). I have been diagnosed with anxiety (emotional issues) and perhaps I over reacted. [info] None [info] 1568491597
Reddgsx [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well and went through the same cycle you have described. It stopped once I started to keep track of things and manage my existence. Writing things down, organizing things accordingly, planning appropriately, setting goals, tracking progress, reviewing or re-assessing "things" and reflecting weekly have really improved my quality of life and decreased anxiety.   [info] None [info] 1484700449
Soldat_of_the_race [info] What are you referring to that sounds bi-polar, I haven't looked into this, I was diagnosed with anxiety before  [info] None [info] 1511269214
Bananabreadfun [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety too. I understand how crippling it can be, but I promise you, you can do it... you are stronger than you think  [info] None [info] 1542311316
jtmac6 [info] Preface: I'm 23, almost 24.  I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was about 12.  This is how I would describe the experience of a panic attack and the process of calming down.Think about a time when you've experienced a fight or flight situation.  This may be something like a near death experience, or almost getting in a car accident, or being chased by something.  Most of the time in these situations you feel your muscles quickly tense up and short burst of this tingling feeling in your spine/neck.  This is adrenaline being pumped through your body.  This is what is happening when a person is experiencing a panic attack except it is usually more drawn out rather than a quick burst.  This response is usually initiated by fear, stress, or more likely, a combination of the two.  The fear doesn't necessarily have to be your standard-horror-movie-freddy-kruger-coming-to-get-you type fear.  For most people, it won't be. A more common fear is something like, "I'm afraid that if I don't do well on this final that my gpa is going to tank and I'll lose my scholarship."  Stress can also be thrown into the mix with fear.  If you have a lot of things that you need to get done and a lot of things to keep track of in your head, you can get overwhelmed.  Stress is cumulative and little things that stress you out throughout the day can creep up on you and help push you over the threshold where your body starts pumping adrenaline.  Once the adrenaline is in your system it doesn't just up and leave when someone tells you to calm down.  Every situation is different and the time it takes for a person to calm down and get back to normal depends on a lot of things.  Anxiety can breed more anxiety and if you let it, it can snowball into something much bigger than the original feelings that caused it in the first place.  I've found that the quicker you can recognize what it happening and why it is happening, the quicker you can attempt to resolve these issues in your head and calm down.  Also doing general things like deep breathing, laying down, keeping your body still, etc. helps a lot. Personally, with time and practice, I've gotten a lot better at calming myself down and can now do it fairly quickly in most situations. However, the real skill to master is living your life in a way in which your fears and stresses don't boil over and cause panic attacks in the first place.  This means doing things like eliminating, avoiding, or dealing with the things in your life that cause you to feel fear or stress.  This also means doing things to promote calmness such as meditation, exercise, healthy eating, or doing whatever helps you relax.I hope all that helps you understand things a bit better. [info] None [info] 1407085436
greffedufois [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, major depressive disorder and PTSD. I didn't really ask for help, when I got sick the hospital just starts giving you antidepressants. A lot of the procedures left emotional and mental scars along with the physical ones. That's where the PTSD stems from, but its on the milder side.  [info] None [info] 1393083761
HorrorSorbet [info] I was afraid I would swallow my tongue. That was my biggest fear. I had so many fears at a kid, but that was my biggest. Years later I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.  [info] None [info] 1550173235
kimininegaiwo [info] You've found the right place! I was diagnosed with anxiety recently as well. Welcome! [info] Health Anxiety, Emetophobia [info] 1467782597
ohnoxenio [info] I agree with you as well. People need to stop self-proclaiming themselves with these illnesses for attention/pity when they're not really ill. Thanks to these people, I used to think people would fake these things or that these illnesses weren't that big of a deal. They are a HUGE deal. I was just diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder about a month ago. It affects my quality of life and messes with me so much that I break down at times. I don't want attention or pity from my friends and family because it makes me feel like a burden to be around and less of a man. I also don't broadcast it to everyone. I try to keep people who don't need to know from finding out really. I would imagine people who actually DO suffer from these illnesses would feel the same. I just want my old quality of life back, not attention or pity.  [info] None [info] 1394669175
pressfastf0rward [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety along with other psych disorders when I was 16, but never believed that diagnosis. I smoke weed everyday typically which helps keep me even kilter but haven't been able to this week. Do you think this could've contributed? [info] None [info] 1411176475
frankg677 [info] I can get 8 walking miles in at work with pulling, pushing and lifting shit. I was diagnosed with anxiety and haven't taken my meds in months. Do you take anything for it? That shit has me worried a bit [info] None [info] 1553129535
Cabbage_Patch_Itch [info] NAH Is it possible to try the party for a few minutes? I was diagnosed with anxiety as well. I absolutely do not live in your skin, but for me there are outings that were not nearly as bad as the buildup to the event.  Having more time to panic and hype up the event makes me more anxious.  Do you use any coping skills? Your anxiety sound pretty debilitating and that does make you a non-Asshole! But whenever you are ready to look into some permanent solutions, I recommend you should. Groups and mindfulness work for me. Maybe you can find things that can help you too! I know what you are going through.  Sorry my reply got out of hand. [info] Partassipant [2] [info] 1558660373
allfatandsassy [info] Absolutely. Anxiety can cause crazy physical symptoms. The entire year of 2015 was literally painful. I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks. I felt constantly chest pain. Sometimes it was a strong pulse, sometimes just tightness. Always uncomfortable. I had a whole host of other physical manifestations of stress and I didn't believe it at first. I thought every pain was a sign that something major was wrong. Nope! I've just learned through dozens of doctors, MRIs, scans, and a few visits to the ER that I'm pretty much healthy and that I just have health-related anxiety. Now when I have a small pain, I have to tell myself I'm not going to die of a heart attack or anueyrsm in 30 seconds. :)  [info] 96 days [info] 1531847854
moonbby33 [info] Nooo I have a Lilith in Libra. I don’t really understand the Lilith? Can you explain it? And alssoooo this is where I think mental health plays into things because you may be more balanced because I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders since I was little and grew up in a very unhealthy/chaotic household. So you’re probably the more emotionally balanced version of me lol. Also i am sooo happy for you that your loved ones are proud of the impulsive Aries moon nature in you! Funny with the fool card - yep it stalks my readings! are you vocal with your emotions / feelings or do you hold those back? [info] ♑️☀️•♈️🌙•♋️⬆️ [info] 1565626479
FizBii [info] I have no real good advice but just letting you know I’m in the same sort of situation. I tried quitting last year and went through a tough month trying to push through and then had some bad things happen and straight back to smoking. Right now I’m on 9 days quit and had a couple of the hardest days Ive had in a while. Before I started smoking at 14 (I’m now 21), I was diagnosed with anxiety that came with depressive episodes and being the lost kid that I was I took up smoking to fit in and then became dependant on the smokes to ‘treat’ the anxiety. When I quit last year my mental health just went down hill almost instantly (I was also going through a stressful time of not knowing what career I wanted to pursue which is something anxiety didn’t help with) and my psychiatrist told me previously smoking was only masking the problem. I’m now going through the same head f*ck again and my psychiatrist has actually suggested going back to smoking and quitting at a ‘less stressful and eventful’ time in my life not realising that I also have asthma (I know I’m an idiot) and I only recently quit because it’s almost put me 6 foot under. Sorry for no good advice but it helps me a bit hearing other people’s stories so I hope this helps you out too and just know I can totally emphasise with you and you’re not alone. Keep pushing, I’m sure in the end it will be worth it and I have heard that ex-smokers are a lot less stressed than when they were smoking. [info] None [info] 1521375858
rplate81 [info] OK thanks for the information I haven't touched the baclofen yet and I hope I won't have to you I really don't want to touch any of these drugs to be honest everything has been going smoothly so far I'm just trying to go as low as I can then jump off. And I have been diagnosed with anxiety and P TSD for several years now I survived the paradise fire and that made my P TSD worse [info] None [info] 1574446233
frieswithketchup [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder by a psychiatrist.I tried telling my mom about it, and now she thinks that I was molested or something equally bad happened to me. But it didn't.I went on a date recently with a really great guy. And when he tried to hold my hand or lay his arm around my shoulders I was in total panic mode. Interestingly, I don't have a problem with crowds, when I know any touching is unintentional. [info] None [info] 1438605870
_cheerio [info] Recovering Amphetamine abuser here. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and panic disorder. When I first got clean, I couldn't sit through an NA meeting. I had to have styrofoam cups and would literally pull a trash can up to my chair during meetings so I could tear them apart because I was so  paralyzingly terrified. It was ridiculous, I was physically incapable of sitting still. I was so uncomfortable with myself. I've had to leave many meetings because of panic attacks. I've driven to more meetings than I can count and just not gone in because I couldn't force myself to get out of the car. During months 3-6, I would drive to this one meeting that was an hour away once a week, but I never once went because I was too busy having a panic attack in the parking lot to get out of the car. I get 8 months tomorrow and it's still a struggle sometimes. But it is SO much better than it was. No more styrofoam cups, I'm starting to build relationships in the fellowship, and my panic attacks have decreased by about 80 percent. All I did was two things: Didn't use, and kept going to meetings.It sounds like you plan on doing those two things, so you're in good shape. Just know that everyone has days where they think recovery/NA is dumb as fuck and not for them. We ALL think that way sometimes. The ones that succeed are the ones that go to meetings even when they're 100 percent sure they don't need to. Feel free to PM me if you ever need! [info] None [info] 1492264701
kylepierce11 [info] I was always just like "Okay Kyle, don't fuck it up. Don't let your voice crack. Just say 'here' in a nice, normal tone and we'll get out of this just fine."I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years later.  [info] None [info] 1458258596
CandyceCox [info] I, too, became a "maniacal bitch" and was even diagnosed bi-polar 6 or 7 years into our marriage. I was diagnosed with anxiety and was on meds when we met....I wonder if I'll be off the bi-polar once he's no longer a part of my life....I was/am/always have been "the problem". If it were not for my fits of rage that are "abusive" and "psychologically damaging" to him and our children, he would be more attracted to me and want to have sex with me....at first I thought he could be right. After all, psychological disorders run in my family on both sides...well, same for him. I did scratch the shit out of his neck that one time and his co-worker and ex commented on it......in response to him breaking my pinkie. But what about when I pushed him?...oh yeah, I was trying to keep him from peeing on me.....the whole in the wall? Wait! That was him! I ducked in time. ....... He trained me to react with rage because I expected physical abuse from him. However, now he's made me look like the narcissist because he will remain calm or finally yell back once I've verbally hit below the belt. I shared all of it with my therapist and she is the one who pointed out that I respond/react to him in this manner as a defense as I autopilot my offense at the hint that a defense is needed. It's just so sick and fucked up. Now I'm "crazy". I'm the "narc" yada yada...this ALL a planned and strategic part of the narc's "grand cycle scheme". Now that I recognize it, he is having to push even harder to elicit a response out of me.....ugh! And more often than I like to admit, I engage but it's getting easier and easier to let it roll off because his mask will be torn off in court. ... You're not a narcissist! He wants you to think you are so he can play the victim. You're not the only one. [info] None [info] 1550496224
CatNamedJava [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I can't stand people touching me. Do I get a free seat too? If a fat person sat next to me and thier body cross over to my seat I'll probably have a panic attack. Could I have a fat peoson kicked off the flight for my comfort?  [info] None [info] 1402901319
SubjectShape [info] So I started realizing there were issues and got diagnosed with IBS. I started by keeping a food journal to see if I could figure out what was setting it off, but there wasn't anything linking the IBS. Not to say it was useless coz I found out some other stuff, but it seemed like my IBS hit no matter what I was eating.I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but when I moved I left my therapist and lost my insurance so I can't afford to see a therapist anymore. But while reading about IBS I saw someone suggesting it might be an anxiety response, so I started keeping an anxiety journal instead. Basically whenever I recognized I was super anxious about something I'd write down when that happened and what I was anxious about. Sure enough my IBS symptoms were almost always right behind anything that majorly set off my anxiety.Since then I've had to be better about my anxiety and find ways to manage it without a therapist and meds. Edibles help since they're legal here, but they are also semi-expensive so not always accessible. Meditation has been a huge help, just spending a few minutes in the morning when I get up to sit and be mindful of my body and how I'm feeling that morning. I still get stressed, of course, but knowing that it's coming because I can feel that stress building up is also very helpful. Plus I just like....don't leave the house except once a week to do groceries and I always make sure to go early in the morning so I haven't eaten breakfast yet. I work from home, I have a dog to help with my anxiety, I keep on a pretty tight schedule in terms of waking up, going to bed, working, ect.The thing is like....everyone's anxiety is different, so how I control mine may not be what works for someone else. I control my environment to control my anxiety and do the best I can to cope when that's not possible, both with the anxiety and with the IBS. [info] None [info] 1567109327
ScreamYouFreak [info] No and no.The doctors will advise against taking any medication or eating anything before the surgery because it could cause issues during the surgery. You don’t want to choke on your own vomit because you got hungry before surgery. You don’t want to have a heart attack during the surgery because you had anxiety and decided to pop pills beforehand (I am diagnosed with anxiety too, so I know where you’re coming from). The doctors and nurses should make everything just fine for you, but make sure to listen to them.Furthermore, you can ride your bike to them, but won’t be able to drive it back. After going under anesthesia, they’re legally required to wheel you or borderline carry you to a vehicle that you will not and cannot operate. This is due to liability reasons and they will check that everything is in place beforehand.Get an uber/lift or a friend to take you. Don’t be dumb.  [info] None [info] 1540216467
premiumfeel [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder three years ago. I obsess over and become anxious about the most inane and obscure shit, and excuse you, I don't need coddling. A meme is not going to invalidate my issues, weirdo.I have no idea where the meme came from but I laugh at it when i see it and I don't know why. If it actually bothered me I could be an actual adult and take responsibility for myself and block the posts, but I guess personal responsibility is beyond their comprehension. [info] None [info] 1404215473
CalmPupper [info] You are right actually...I mean I expected something spiritual..I've been diagnosed with anxiety a year or so...and sometimes i overreact but today i believe its because of the things i've read - i have more things happening to me not voices doe more like when i see light it hurts my eyes - particularly red light don't know why and when i see pictures sometimes i imagine other things, once i laid on my desk and i thought i was gonna fall..i think i am just in a panic attaxk or something because i've never experienced this before and like it is like a pseudo-systom or some shit. My only concern is that sometimes when i see things i imagine other things because they look like other things but it is because of my vivid imagination.  [info] None [info] 1546872501
justdustandechoes [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety 2 weeks ago when I finally picked up the confidence to see a doctor after dealing with it all for ~2 years. I'm 20, I can't do therapy because talking about it makes it worse, I've been given pills (10mg Citalopram daily) and so far they've been okay, but I still get waves of painful thoughts and worrying multiple times a day. [info] None [info] 1445265824
Mattrockj [info] Really neither are any good for me, I was diagnosed with anxiety recently after I had a meltdown in class [info] 16 [info] 1558291911
MakeMammaProud [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety. My parents took me out of therapy really quick though because my therapist called child protective services on them once she asked me what was going on at home. I just learned to deal with it on my own. It’s been two years since, and I’m much better now. My religion really helped me get through this time, but that’s just from my own personal experience, so I’m not recommending relying on religion for mental health [info] 18 [info] 1555224411
srqnewbie [info] Agree!  My only documentation for my anxiety was the doctor visit recaps for the past 5 years (they pulled it up for me at the doc office, no appointment necessary) that basically just state your vitals and any meds you're on.  Nothing I gave DocMJ stated WHY or WHEN I was diagnosed with anxiety, just that my doc was continuing the anxiety med prescription I've been on forever.  I saw Dr. Glider at DocMJ in Bradenton and was in and out in 2 hot seconds.  Good luck and I agree that their refund policy is the only way to go on the off chance that you don't get approved. [info] None [info] 1568043503
Eeyoreandpiglet [info] For me, I have the life that most people would envy.  I had not a care in the world.  You know that feeling you get when someone runs out in front of your car and you just miss them by a hair?  I had this feeling all the time.  That's when I found out they were panic attacks.  They came out of nowhere and for no reason.  Then the digestive issues....for no reason.  Then the crushing chest pain, shoulder pain, and left sided tingling for no reason. I was at the hospital numerous times for heart attack symptoms. I had all the tests imaginable.  Nothing serious ever showed up.  I hated this!!!!  I was diagnosed with anxiety.  My body produces anxiety for no reason.  So yes, in most cases, it is after you get checked out for numerous other serious ailments that anxiety came to the forefront. So I take anti anxiety medication to keep it under control.  This has been a long struggle.  Thanks for venting. [info] None [info] 1516215417
bigcitylights1 [info] Thanks, I really appreciate that!How does GAD manifest itself for you with also having OCD? I've been diagnosed with anxiety as well (at the same time as ADHD) but I sometimes have trouble discerning what symptoms come from each and start to doubt the diagnosis.  [info] None [info] 1391410144
psychotic_girlfriend [info] i made a post earlier on my experience with the psychiatrist who did in fact straight up lie. And just to clarify I have been diagnosed with several mood disorders, but since my psychiatrist is a liar I know that these diagnoses aren't accurate. For example, I was diagnosed with anxiety when I have literally no problems with anxiety, and I don't need a doctor to confirm my own experiences that I know are true [info] None [info] 1541279084
yellowdayzzx [info] Saying Goodbye to my Therapy Dog as I’m off to Uni. I was diagnosed with anxiety this year and he has been there through every bad day and even worse night. I’m so grateful for Ollie and as a gift my parents got me a pillow with his face on!!!! As everyone knows I shall miss him more than anyone. [info] None [info] 1568239217
Slightlybrainy [info] I went through the exact same situation as you described and wrote a letter. I had to provide proof that I was diagnosed with anxiety, but within a few weeks of me sending it in they reinstated it. I highly reccomend appealing if you went through the same thing. They're a lot more understanding than most people think. [info] AAE 2020 [info] 1528817880
HyphMngo [info] Holy shit, this sounds like me. I find it incredibly difficult to focus for more than short bursts and must start assignments incredibly early or I'll never complete anything on time. I can literally start something and never actually get around to doing anything for 4-5 hours. I'm terrible at focusing for exam study. I'm not exactly hyperactive but I'm constantly fidgeting. I've been diagnosed with anxiety before, I wonder if its all related? [info] None [info] 1441886811
lustforwine [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and they said not adhd, but my testing showed adhd from neuropsychologist [info] None [info] 1567971670
lavender_photos [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder at 12. I had always been an anxious kid but I knew my brain wasn't working right when I, a very academically focused, somewhat popular kid, missed over 50 days of school in 7th grade from panic attacks. I would dread going to school and have such a severe panic attack that I made myself physically ill and had to stay home. Luckily I had amazing teachers, parents, and doctors and I was able to pass and get my shit somewhat together but it is still something that affects me. [info] None [info] 1572658804
thelostandthefound [info] Probably my smile. I still smile but my mum tells me that I used to have a beautiful smile as a kid but when I turned 12 it disappeared. It was also around the time I was diagnosed with anxiety and that year the endless school yard bullying caught up to me.  [info] None [info] 1502150258
wyldepixie [info] I've had a really hard time getting a diagnosis.  All my paperwork says, "Severe Anxiety Disorder".  I was diagnosed with ADHD very young but then it was overturned by the time I was seven.  Then I was diagnosed with anxiety and night terrors.  I would hide, constantly, in closets and cabinets, anywhere dark and quiet.  My psycho upbringing had my parents and church believing I was being targeted by demons.  (That reeeeaaaalllly helped).  Then I was told I had a "sensory processing disorder" but no treatments were offered.  I was sixteen or so by then.  I didn't seek any help from then into adulthood until a car accident.  I'd built up my own coping mechanisms and was mostly okay.  After that and multiple surgeries I got worse and couldn't cope.  My SO asked me to get help.  I tried.  I did rounds of doctors, therapists, and neurologists (but no neuropsychologists to my knowledge).  MRI show "structural abnormalities" but they said it didn't necessarily account for my migraines which is why they kept scanning me.  I was put on every SSRI in existence, which did nothing.  They couldn't diagnose a specific anxiety disorder because I have symptoms of each major anxiety disorder.  It's been trying to say the least. [info] None [info] 1482696344
Bad_Wulph [info] TL;DR I have the symptoms, I'm your age, and I've had an extensive cardiac workup. Every test came back well and I'm healthy. My symptoms are caused by a combination of scoliosis and anxiety. You're probably okay, but if you have any doubt, see a general practitioner.Hey man, I'm 22, male, 5'5", 120 lbs, white, with no known medical conditions. I have chest pains and dizziness very often. As I'm typing this, I feel discomfort in my chest and I'm a little dizzy. Take this with a grain of salt, as we may not be quite the same, but I was diagnosed with anxiety, and I've had an extensive cardiac workup. I've have bloodwork, xrays, multiple EKGs, two ultrasounds, a stress test, a 24 hour monitor, and a 30 day monitor. This has spanned across two different cardiologists, my family doctor, and a couple of ER visits. Everything came back perfect. They even went as far to say that my heart seems relatively fit, the complete opposite of unhealthy. The diagnosis I got was sinus tachycardia, which is not a problem with the heart itself, but my brain is telling my heart to speed up and act funny. They attributed that to me being a hypochondriac, which is indicative of anxiety. And they were right, I'm fine, but suffer from panic attacks frequently. If your cardiologists say your heart is healthy, they are probably right. Heart disease is usually decades in the making, and without a preexisting heart condition, it's almost impossible for you to have enough arterial plaque to cause a heart attack at your age, even if you did abuse your body as a teen. And as someone else said, if this has been going on a while and you aren't dead, it's probably not heart related.One reason for my chest pain is I have scoliosis (which was shown during one of my xrays), and it causes tension in my ribs, which pushes and pulls against the connective tissues holding my ribs to my sternum. That's why I have left-side chest pain, and it often causes me severe anxiety. Scoliosis and anxiety work in tandem to keep me worried about my health. I think you should see a general practitioner at this point, as they can likely determine if your pain is cardiac or musculoskeletal, and refer you to any needed specialists from there.  [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1544915129
batman1285 [info] That was really well worded. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd. I am wondering if you have any reading, podcasts or videos you'd recommend with more information like what you just shared. [info] None [info] 1558823836
turtlert [info] Oh my gosh we sound so similar! I’m turning 25 in 1 week, dating a 9w1, and I’m currently in part time ministry. I was pursuing social work and I realized I was not cut out for it, so now I’m pursuing my music. Also I am diagnosed with anxiety and I just went cold turkey off my pills last week because I’m sick of being medicated...so I get that. Anyways, so fantastic to learn about your life!! [info] 4w5 [info] 1554581915
notsoimportant1010 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 9 or so. This year I’ve noticed it’s been very bad. I’ve had just anxiousness all the time and I had my first BAD panic attack yesterday.  [info] None [info] 1543620696
TuloCantHitski [info] Lots of ppl will take "I am stressed and have work to do" as "welp, I guess I'm diagnosed with anxiety now" [info] There's money to be made in prolonging the problem [info] 1554782419
Sherlockiana [info] I have tons of loving family members and I struggle with anxiety every day. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder. Therapy helped a lot. So did medication. Anxiety is a treatable disease that can be helped through therapy. I encourage you to talk to a counselor and deal with it directly. Don't let it eat your life. [info] None [info] 1413488732
icantfindaun [info] Among other things I was diagnosed with anxiety a couple years back but I hated how the meds made me feel. Yes there's days where it's bad but overall I've learned to manage it. Exercise, eating right, trying to get at least 7 hours of sleep every night, and having a mentally and physically challenging job have been the keys for me but everyone is different. If you're having trouble please reach out. Even if it doesnt feel like it there's people around you who care. [info] None [info] 1531750031
syllu [info] Worked as an administrator at hotel. Told my direct boss that i had panic attacks while working and took what we call a "sick-leave" in Estonia for a couple of days since I was diagnosed with anxiety and started taking new medicine. He completely ignored my doctor's orders and wrote a really angry email to me.  [info] None [info] 1531605679
FinalBlackberry [info] Agreed. I was diagnosed with anxiety a long time ago, yet no one would know. I see that same thing with co-workers as well. [info] None [info] 1560524602
lnologram [info] I only interact with my sister when it’s unavoidable (like when I go home for Christmas). She’s older than me and made my childhood a fucking hell. It got to the point where I could barely be in the same room as her without her screaming at me for something innocuous (like sitting too close to the tv, or humming along to the radio). She’s a major reason I was diagnosed with anxiety and eventually PTSD.I don’t regret avoiding her, even now that we’re both adults, she’ll snap at me for the smallest things (I accidentally misgendered her cat, to which she misgendered me in response). Having her out of my life is one of the best things I’ve ever done for my stress levels lol [info] None [info] 1563254712
Fiyet [info] I would recommend it. I originally started stitching when I was 9 years old because my aunt would babysit me and she taught me how. I stopped stitching when I got a job when I was 16 and didn't take it back up until 2 years ago, when I was 30. I started stitching again after my brother-in-law died. He fell and it took 11 days for search and rescue to find his body. I was going crazy and my aunt, who I'm still very close to, overnighted me a kit. While I was still in a lot of pain keeping my hands and mind busy was very helpful. Cross stitching still helps me. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and PTSD. So having something to focus on that keeps me busy but not too busy has been amazing for me. And when I'm done with a project I have a sense of accomplishment that makes me feel better about my life and my situation. Also they make great gifts and seeing someone get one of my cross stitches as a gift feels amazing because I'm lucky and my family appreciates the work behind the craft. What has also helped me was discovering the cross stitch community online. It is amazing! I've made some great friends through Facebook groups and Instagram. In fact one of my friends that I met through cross stitch literally lives down the street from me. it's fun to have in jokes with people about cross stitch and have people understand how it can get frustrating sometimes. There are a lot of great fun people and it elevated my craft from being fun to being part of my life. [info] None [info] 1540927510
AlexamariaK [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety... and was taking a very low dosage of medication to help with it but I quit cold turkey because I felt like it wasn't really doing anything but making me a very forgetful person.  [info] Female [info] 1471026563
newaccount0707 [info] I'm a couple years older than your daughter, and she sounds a lot like me  (except I was never "strong" enough to move out of my hometown and attend a 4+ year college). I was diagnosed with anxiety as an preteen, and I struggle with my emotions, especially if it involves other people (relationships, communicating, etc). For lack of better words, I'm a huge cry baby. While therapy can help drastically with coping skills and managing these feelings, this is most likely always going to be a part of your daughters personality (to a certain degree- as she continues to mature this issue may lessen, at least that's what I was told by a therapist) . I've gotten good at "saving" my emotions, so to speak, when they happen to arise in a situation where it would be inappropriate to cry, but  when I'm home, I'll usually call my mom to cry it out and talk about what happened. It means more than I can put into words that I'm able to have my mom as a comfort person when I feel vulnerable.You should obviously continue to be a support person for your daughter, but if I were you I'd encourage her to seek therapy. If you're able to, I'd also meet with a therapist yourself to discuss what you can potential do/say to your daughter to help her better manage her emotions. [info] None [info] 1490559251
A_random_passenger [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety. Essentially, anxiety is nausea/fear of vomiting, for me. Nothing more.So yes, they are definitely bound together. [info] None [info] 1564085630
SuperHaunter [info] Every human being has mood swings now and then, it's completely normal. We all have a bad day or some stress that gets us and make us a mess. So please be gentle to yourself. You're awesome, laughs at yourself, you're out there to make friends and as an ENFP you might feel too much a lot of the time.Like you, I have mood swings as well. And I'm diagnosed with anxiety. Yes, anxiety can give you mood swings. But it's because you start building up your stress without letting it out becoming a constant state of fear and stress because of literally nothing. It's not being moody like a normal human being. It can even trigger a panic attack. It's the feeling something really terrible is about to happen even if everything is alright.Because I wanted to have better control of my panic attacks, I started to rationalize my feelings so I could understand whether I was feeling that emotion or I was absorbing it/building it up out of nowhere. That made me understand when it was my anxiety talking or me being a normal human being. Maybe that point of view helps you somehow.Now let's talk about your boyfriend. He needs to understand that, as a human being, it's normal to have mood swings. One moment we're ok and the next not so good. We have pet peeves. We get stressed. And he is supposed to support you even in your worst. I'm not saying anyone should support an abusive relationship (or that you're or him are abusive to each other), but he should be patient when you're not feeling that well. On the other hand, you also should be aware of your emotions and actions not to outburst at someone. Take your time out to chill and everything will be alright.What I mean is: don't beat yourself up on this but try to rationalize your feelings to identify what is actually going on. If it's something that triggered your anger or if it's just accumulated stress that you need to let go. And talk to your SO about it. You can't change who you are but you can understand yourself better to not use someone as an outlet to build up stress.You two can work things out perfectly if you both open up to understanding and no judgements, only love and support. And the best way to get this is talking to each other and being honest about your feelings even if your anger has no reason at all and you just need some time out. [info] ENFP [info] 1489586977
happyflowers26 [info] Yeah I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year ago but never experienced such uncomfortableness while trying to talk to someone [info] None [info] 1567273575
liftingthings7 [info] I was just diagnosed with anxiety. I'm on prozac right now. Small dosage to see what the effects are. I was also told to focus on the things that I love and to workout. Honestly though... it is still really hard to focus. I don't want to wake up anymore. I don't want to do anything. I'm forcing myself. I don't know which direction I'm heading. Sometimes I'm just on autopilot and try to find distractions. I consider work a distraction and I put all of the frustration, disappointment and anger that I have with myself into working out but it only helps for that period of time. So far, only working out helps but only for a short time. The medication makes me a little loopy and I can't control how I feel. I try to pretend that everything is ok, but it only fools some people. Sorry for the rant... I guess my answer is working out at this time.  [info] None [info] 1483496105
doom2286 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and adhd at 8 I am now 19 and no med for 8 years can I join the military? [info] None [info] 1492896629
Dango223 [info] Ty for writing this, it is very helpful but you got me so confused tho. I was learning about asexuality lately because I think I am somwhere on the spectrum. The think is I hate touch but I love hugs from people I trust. Yes, I am diagnosed with anxiety and I have trust issues. I have no need for any physical contact with others, more I need trust. Because of this I thought of me as a demisexual... I feel like I need to first be romantically attracted enough to somebody to be able to feel sexual attraction..So I would love to have second opinion on this. Do you think my case could be demisexuality or I am wrong? Or I have to first experience some serious relationship to know? [info] None [info] 1560029090
silver_soul [info] That is almost exactly how my trochotillomania started when I was around 5 or 6. I had no eyelashes until I was about 9. Vanity is the only thing that made me stop. It was very soothing, but I wish my parents had chosen therapy for me in retrospect. (I was diagnosed with anxiety as a teenager, and I think the trich was a symptom.) If he doesn't let them grow back (it feels so good to pull stubby lashes out!), please mention trich to his doctor and get him in some kind of behavioral treatment. I was made fun of a lot and I cringe at photos of me as a kid because of my lack of eyelashes. [info] None [info] 1423457059
IRageAlot [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder. I take Xanax 0.5-1mg as needed, and 20mg propranalol twice a day. =)As far as the OCD, i've been discussing it with a psychologist. I am extremely particular, ritualized, but I don't think it is to an unhealthy point. The closest thing I think that falls into that range, which some people seem to make fun of for some reason but is actually quite a miserable thing is penile insecurity. It's absolutely compulsive. By the numbers my measurements should be something flattering. My wifes friends started calling me Big-Kyle out of the blue and she admitted she had told them some personal details about me, but mentally I break down when I think about it for some reason... The compulsive part is the totally unreasonable anxiety over it, and having to use various enlargement techniques that have had limited success to find relief. It has driven me to lose 60 lbs and drop my body fat percentage from 37%(estimated) down to 14%(bioimpedance); so there has been some good come from it. My psychologist has made comparisons to OCD-like behavior but mostly he compares it to anorexia and having a fucked-up and unrealistic body-image that is never satisfied.TL;DR -- You're right =) [info] None [info] 1316614849
shinsoo [info] Nofap and keto are two giant anxiety hacks. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders when I was younger. Keto stabilized the anxiety. Nofap gave me the testosterone, confidence and stoic nerves. Time to take ur manhood into ur hands and leave the anxiety for the chicks waiting for u to call. [info] None [info] 1551483067
wildgreengirl [info] I was just thinking. ...is it bad I feel I fit all but the last of these...I'm diagnosed with anxiety and am on an SNRI I thought has "helped" but I also think it might have intensified some things like irritability and making me more reckless (like driving) [info] None [info] 1407734063
smolbeanlydia [info] Just fyi if this is for Psych I’m assuming this is about how social media impacts your mental health, so I think it should take into consideration people with already diagnosed conditions. I was diagnosed with anxiety wayyyyy before I found social media but in your data it could be used as a point that social media use and anxiety levels correlate when my disorder has nothing to do with it. Just want you to be aware people with previously diagnosed conditions may skew the results.  [info] 16 [info] 1553483016
muoniar [info] Yeah, I've lived with multiple illnesses such as eczema, asthma and whatnot. Whenever it'd get worse, my mom would read Ruqya on water and make me either drink it or bathe in it. It was absolutely tiring. Sometimes, she'd even assume that my faith wasn't strong enough and God was doing this to me to bring me back to him. When I was diagnosed with anxiety, she'd say it was the shaytaan giving me negative thoughts and I had to pray more. She'd literally even ask a Sheikh to read some next shit on me, assuming that it had a better chance of treating me than medicine does.. true ridiculousness  [info] New User [info] 1527405581
AlaeniaFeild [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks about 15 years ago. I never felt right with the diagnosis. It wasn't until about 2 years ago that I heard of POTS and went to my doctor asking for testing. She did a poor man's tilt table test and sent me to the cardiologist. Saw a cardiologist, did a 14 day Zio patch monitor, turned out to be SVT (not severe) and POTS (diagnosed after neurologist visit). I don't take meds for the SVT though and no ablation unless something changes. My attacks are only every other day or so and don't last for more than a few minutes (usually less.) So it could also just be something that is monitored. This is only anecdotal of course and I don't know if obesity affects treatment in any way, but I just want to point out that even if it is SVT, sometimes it's just monitored rather than treated with anything. OP, good luck. It can be very scary when this happens. I really do suggest seeing a doctor about this and don't accept a panic attack diagnosis without investigation if it doesn't sit right with you. I know that we shouldn't be diagnosing ourselves, but this is one area where I feel women (especially young women like you) need to push to be heard.  [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1544299452
Deadmanjustice [info] I'm extremely stressed out from many things this week, and something as fragile as CFW is not something I should be touching right now. I mean I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder, unmedicated, and very stressed from  multitude of very serious things.When I calm down in a week or two I plan to update my CFW to A9LH+Luma, but for now I just wanna know if it's safe to update my emunand so I can play Dragon Quest. [info] None [info] 1473815799
poth77 [info] My anxiety.  I was diagnosed with anxiety a year ago [info] None [info] 1572786476
JohannSebastianBlock [info] Yeah, When I was about 10 years old, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder NOS. I show OCD, GAD, and some phobic symptoms. But didn't meet the very specific criteria for any of them though, if that makes sense. [info] INFP 4w5: Longing for something. [info] 1438780929
bebahf23 [info] As someone who suffers from anxiety issues, it sounds to me like this might be your issue as well. Paranoia and over-thinking everything along with self diagnosis of random disorders is something I used to do A LOT. I went and talked to a counselor about all of this and I was diagnosed with anxiety issues. Which is very easily treatable. All of these actions just stemmed from my anxious thinking and state of mind. I took a small dose of anti anxiety meds and kept this in my concious at all times and it really helped. I hope this helps at least make you feel like you're not alone. Good luck in your quest for help! [info] None [info] 1364459821
JustGuru [info] Hi there. I know exactly how you're feeling. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder as a teen and have been suffering with it since. I remember I would have irrational fears, such as a huge fear that an asteroid would destroy the planet. I remember one time I got so terrified that I literally ran around the neighborhood screaming that the world was ending once because I had watched some crazy documentary about how an asteroid would strike us and I was convinced that it was imminent. I didn't understand it at the time, but I was being manipulated to buy survival gear. I never really feared nuclear weapons, but I can understand why you would be scared. Trump is a foolish person who is manipulating the situation with North Korea to gain approval points, because his polls are so bad. I have a degree in national security and have worked for the Defense Department. While my area of focus wasn't nuclear weapons, I learned a lot about national security risks and how states act rationally. It is irrational to use nuclear weapons in today's world since it would immediately receive a massive response from world powers. If Kim launches a nuclear weapon, his power would be incinerated. It is utterly foolish for him to actually use nuclear weapons. So why does he have them?We are living in an age where dictators are a rare species and countries such as America have been known to overthrow them. Kim is also looking at the situation in East Asia and sees a strong Japan and South Korea, a major US presence in the region (we have tens of thousands of troops in ROK and Japan), and an increasingly weakening North Korean state. He legitimately fears that he may be overthrown in a moment of weakness and get the same treatment that Gaddafi got in Libya. The only way he sees that he could prevent this is by becoming a nuclear power. Nuclear weapons serve as a huge deterrent. Ever wonder why Russia and China haven't been invaded since World War II? It's because they have nuclear weapons. If Germany or Japan get any stupid ideas, they would be annihilated in a matter of hours. Therefore, it would be incredibly foolish to attack a nuclear armed stated. Kim knows that the South Korean military on its own is vastly superior to the North Korean military. While he has more manpower, South Korea has one of the most technologically advanced militaries in the world, while Kim is still using outdated weaponry from decades ago. This is not to say that it wouldn't be painful for South Korea, but Kim knows that eventually, he would lose. On top of that, South Korea is supported by the US which all but guarantees that he would lose. Therefore, he develops nuclear weapons and threatens to strike major cities or US bases to deter any attack on him. Many experts would agree that even though North Korea may seem irrational, it is in fact acting very rationally. [Here is one article you can read about it. ](https://www.google.com/amp/foreignpolicy.com/2017/04/26/kim-jong-un-is-a-survivor-not-a-madman/amp/) I can find you more if you're interested. Now I get that Trump is another issue to worry about. I worry about him too. But even with him, I still highly doubt he would use nuclear weapons. Even if Trump launched an invasion of DPRK, the first thing that would be taken out is Kim's nuclear launch capability. We have a multitude of means to do this. The real concern is artillery strikes on Seoul. Let me tell you though, that South Koreans themselves are not overly concerned with this. They have been living with this for decades and are used to it by now. If you are concerned about Russia, I would understand. It is rational to be worried about it because Russia is far more powerful than North Korea. But even then I think a major war is very unlikely. I have been studying this country for years and I have predicted many of its actions (such as an invasion of Ukraine and political interference in the West), but I don't predict any sort of nuclear war in the future. Russia has the same fears that North Korea has and it is acting rationally to regain its influence in the former Soviet Union and Central Europe. It is hard to explain because the situation is much more complex, but I think a war with Russia is even less likely than a war with North Korea. I am not saying that the risk is null, but it is still very unlikely that a nuclear war would break out. Personally, I'm more worried about issues like climate change or a major pandemic than I am of nuclear weapons. Nuclear war is not something to dismiss, but it is not something to be overly afraid of either. Kenneth Waltz, a noted international relations scholar, famously said DURING the Cuban Missile Crisis that nuclear war between two nuclear armed states was practically impossible. People thought he was crazy, but he turned out to be right.I hope this helps put you at ease.  [info] None [info] 1502278537
saramew [info] Yeah, I was diagnosed with anxiety and it does make me freeze up sometimes, not hit the notes, or hit it too early.. especially for those easier hard songs that you mentioned. Sometimes, even some normals!! ;n; So it might be unrelated to your DCD.You must be doing a good job playing this game with a motoric disability. I wonder if games like this help your fingers function better? [info] ユリの迷路 [info] 1430718850
roseandrelease [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD and I wonder this all the time. I ask my friends to be understanding without using my conditions as an excuse, but it can be hard. I'm not distracted and disorganised because I'm lazy. I really do put in a lot of effort. But it can be hard to differentiate my behaviour from the behaviour of someone who isn't trying. I think you have to understand that I am struggling with a condition, not a character trait. [info] None [info] 1441894326
takeitslowinnyc [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and was previously on anti-anxiety meds. I go to weekly therapy and have made tremendous progress. A big problem I still have is always thinking ahead/looking to the future vs being present in the now. It's something I'm actively trying to work on, especially since I'm pregnant now (baby was a happy surprise) but it's HARD. I don't want to keep "wishing away the present" but I feel like I've just been so anxious for the next doc appt. Even getting my betas done twice, I was an anxious wreck. Last week we saw baby for the first time (it's doing well, yay) and already I'm counting down the days to our next ultrasound next month so I can make sure it's still there and ok. I grew up with an incredibly anxious - still anxious - mother and I refuse to pass that on to my child but shit this is difficult. [info] 26 | 8/12? | FTM [info] 1546282327
annie_M4E [info] It's stupid but here it is:1. I've been diagnosed with anxiety about 6 years ago and it costed me a friendship (long story but it still hurts)2. I have lost 3 people I loved and admired and my dog who was my baby boy in less than 3 years3. Me and my ex broke up about a month ago but remained friends. He texted me one day and the convo went like this (I copy/pasted)Him "I think we would be better off as friends for now"Me: "Why?"Him: "Bc it's for the best"Me: "Okay we'll talk about it tonight Okay?"Him: "I'd rather not"Me: "Maybe it is for the best"Him: "Okay we can still be friends"Me: "Yes id like that. Can you make an effort for me and communicate a bit Please?"Him: "Sure"Now to be clear I only agreed bc I thought it was what he wanted and because I want him to do what makes him happy but for the past month hes been putting the blame for the breakup on me because I agreed with him and then when we explained to each other our sides of the story I asked him if he ever wanted to get back with me he said 'never" and it hurts. He always acts as if it was my decision when it was his and keeps doing and saying stuff as if he wants me back and then he just breaks my heart again and I am sick of it. [info]  [info] 1551586678
ODB247 [info] Female. The doc was male. It’s pretty typical for me to be diagnosed as having anxiety first and then I have to convince the doctor to test me for things. I was diagnosed with anxiety but it turned out to be cardiac issues -occasional arrhythmias. Same diagnosis when I lost my period for 9 months and then had bleeding for 6 months straight. That turned out to be a polyp. Same when I had insane dizziness for a few years. That one was actually a Chiari malformation. I don’t make up symptoms and I don’t present as panicking or looking for medication. I just want to know what is going on. I’m not sure if my symptoms are ignored because I’m female, because I look healthy, or maybe because the doctors are all just overworked snd pressed for time. It’s really frustrating. I rarely go to the doctor for anything because it sucks to be dismissed and told I’m making it up when I know something is wrong.  [info] None [info] 1536801216
aquaboyh20 [info] [this is Gus](https://i.imgur.com/vn6SkRI.jpg). He is a plott hound and was a rescue from a pit bull breading and fighting house. They pulled a few of his front teeth. So eating is a challenge and messy. He is the sweetest boy though. My kids climb all over him. Me 1 year old pulls all over his ears and lips. All he does is lick her face and walk away. He typically chooses which one of the older girls he wants to cuddle with at night.He became my ESA dog back in December when we rescued him, as I was diagnosed with anxiety and a few other things. He is about to go to training to be a service dog. He loves all people and he'd rather be with me than be home by himself. He loves to run in the open field behind our home and be a turd and jump the fence and run off for a few minutes, then come back proud of himself.Upon request I can upload more pictures. He's a very serious dog. Rarely smiles lol. Except when he's running off in a field or riding in the van [info] http://www.amazon.com/registry/wishlist/2B4KFFIWZZWC [info] 1550984241
trippingtoadfunk420 [info] Hi all. Don't really know the rules for here but just thought I would check it out. I am starting on Day 1 today. Last used 21 hours ago. I quit last year on 04/09/2016 but unfortunately relapsed in October. Things were going good too just a dumb mistake that led further and further down the road of using again and I got back where I started. MY DOC was prescription painkillers never used H although was around it never wanted to try it because I knew I would like it too much. So I've since came to the conclusion once AGAIN to quit these things. The worse thing for me was that they weren't necessarily affecting my life in the typical sense. Never had money problems because of them, have a nice job, was present at all social events so I more or less used to compensated for something else medically wrong. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, ADHD, IBS and Gastritis. With painkillers they helped all of my issues in one pill verses taking something for each of one of those conditions. Most of which had side effects I couldn't handle and didn't take the medication.  Painkillers offered me everything I needed. I know this is impart a delusion of an addicts mind but on the other hand it truly helped me in ways I hope to find in other medications for my diagnosis'. I would binge very occasional but would 9/10 times conserve what I bought and use what I needed to get through the day and not be totally blasted from them. I plan to use the supplements and various withdrawal remedies that I used last time in order to kick this away from my life. If anyone has any tips on what has worked for them that isn't found on your normal everyday "withdrawal recipe" feel free to share with me.  [info] 05/08/2017 [info] 1494267492
nikkissippi121 [info] Interestingly enough, I was diagnosed with ADHD years before I was diagnosed with anxiety - the actual cause - even though it should have been apparent based on my frequent panic attacks (these happened daily - I was only 8 and they'd been going on since preschool at least). [info] None [info] 1432643744
douga_17 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety/ocd. My symptoms have dramatically improved since I stopped attending church! The shame from the church was truly hurting me mentally and emotionally. [info] None [info] 1542595285
BCD195 [info] I’ve had anxiety for as long as I can remember and I can tell you this feels very similar to an anxiety attack (for me) but it feels slightly different, which makes me worry that it’s something worse. Last time something like this happened I stoped smoking for 2 months and it seemed to fix me but I don’t know what caused the issue to come back, or if this is even related to what I experienced about a year ago. Like I said it’s very similar but slightly different so I cannot tell if it’s related My best guess is the weed is making my anxiety get worse for some reason (or in your case, making it so you notice your anxiety) but it’s never safe to assume and move on I’d much prefer to know the cause For future reference I use nicotine, caffeine, and weed on a daily basis (wow, shocker I have bad anxiety huh?) I occasionally use cocaine when I’m drinking which isn’t that often about once every three months or so. And I drink on average 1 time a week. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and am prescribed Wellbutrin for it (for some fucking reason) Cross reference that ^ to your day to day life, if you see a lot of similarities I’d say we’re having the same issue and it’s most likely panic attacks brought on by smoking weed. [info] None [info] 1573586584
daniellamk [info] Will I be discharged from the Army National Guard if I'm diagnosed with anxiety? [info] None [info] 1479841235
alosar7 [info] Ok to clarify what the psychiatrist said after his evaluation: He is AWARE that I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but he does not think that what I am dealing with is related to it. I have no family history of mental illness or somatic disorders. The anxiety diagnosis was from around 12 years ago and I have been managing it since then. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1571023097
PriinceV [info] Lol, I came to this subreddit to ask about this. Had unprotected sex 2 weeks ago, now I have night sweats, a runny nose, and a swollen lymph node in groin area and ofc I'm diagnosed with anxiety lol. This post gave me a bit of relief, thanks. Now let me get back to panicing and searching the web. [info] None [info] 1563670895
PM-ME-YOUR-TUMMIES [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety this year. To be honest I'm over the moon happy about it. *Finally* having a 'name' for what's been going on with me for so long. I've been starting to get an inner-monologue going when I'm feeling very anxious and thinking '*This is your anxiety, this is what it does.*'    It's nice to be able to at the very least recognize some of the time when feelings of anxiety are present.  [info] None [info] 1512406949
jacksepticeye_nt [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety reee [info] 15M [info] 1572907019
sayyoureaguy___ [info] I used to drink caffeine from the moment I woke up until I was trying (and failing) to sleep. When I was diagnosed with anxiety my doc was pretty adamant that I stop any stimulants. It’s been ten years and I haven’t looked back. I miss it sometimes but now I get anxious just thinking about how ridiculously anxious it would make me to drink it again.  [info] None [info] 1545053207
Younce-Davis [info] Oh gosh! I had that problem with some neighbors a few years ago. The guy would literally beat his wife on the front lawn! Luckily they moved. My neighbor is considered lower middle class— but it is full of retired folk and starter families. It’s not a friendly neighborhood since everyone is moving in and out constantly. I was raised by boomers— the pick yourself up by the bootstraps mentally is still very prevalent in my society. It’s not realistic. When I was diagnosed with anxiety and had to go on meds it shattered my parents world 😭. Luckily they are very understanding. I used to make morbid jokes out of situations. My bf is from the Philippines and over there, people who aren’t optimistic and see the joy in life usually lose hope and don’t make it. It’s a poor country so starvation is widespread. After I stopped making morbid jokes, I became more optimistic. That only happened a few months after meds though. It was a rough transition. It’s good your friends can read you well. Curious, are you a high school or college student? Or working? If you are an adult, that will probably open up more treatment options for you since you won’t need your parents permission to receive it. If you are an adult, that will also give you the possibility of moving out and into a better environment. Trade school, if you do not have the resources for college, can get you some very nice jobs— look at welding— salary of $100,000 USD. Edit: background info on me. Biomedical engineering student at a University. I live in a mixed cultural neighborhood. There are the conservative folk here and the more liberal. My family tends to be more conservative. I am more liberal/ moderate.  [info] None [info] 1554504669
eddie90100 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I'm unsure whether to start treatment [info] None [info] 1534151744
efarley1 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety, and I've had the same feeling before as well. I think it may just be the relaxing effects of it kicking in. The CBD was from a reputable source, so there wasn't any concern with that. [info] None [info] 1552722310
Kannazhaga [info] I have a little Texas on my wrist and "We're all mad here" on my calf. My Texas, well clearly I'm from Texas. And I think tattoos are an opportunity to outwardly show parts of our personalities that matter to us. Then my quote, I was diagnosed with anxiety in college and for some reason had trouble dealing with it -- I thought I was crazy and stuff. Talking to my mom about it, she said that we're all crazy in some way or another. I realize I should have known that, but it was important to me to remember that, so I put the Alice in Wonderland quote on my calf. And I love both of them and wouldn't change them for the world. [info] None [info] 1532277315
SeaSaltSeaLion [info] I guess I should have mentioned that I have been diagnosed with anxiety and have been on anxiety meds for many years. My psychiatrist “prescribed” the melatonin to me at the beginning of the semester along with upping my meds but it all just made everything worse. [info] NCSU '23 [info] 1569366560
keshi [info] Sounds similar to me, I had bad reflux for months then it went away and soon after I developed chest pains. After several visits to A&amp;E worrying about a heart attack (so many blood tests, x-rays, ECGs, etc.) I was diagnosed with anxiety and given pills.I wasn't doubting my anxiety, but felt that it was the chest pains causing it, not the other way around!Unhappy with the diagnosis I went back to see another GP. She pressed into each of my ribs and sternum and holy shit did it hurt on the top rips (but not at all on some of the others). She offered a working hypothesis of Costochondritis and it seemed to fit my condition.I felt much better after that visit and my anxiety went way down as I could tell myself it was just some rib pain. After having it for about 8 months I have more or less gotten used to it.I too feel it worst when I am hungry/tired/dehydrated. Night times are the worse, I generally use some anti-inflammatory gel on my chest if it's a rough night.I went back to see my GP this morning as a check up and she has referred me to a reoccurring muscular condition clinic for a second opinion and to give me some advice on stretches/how to deal with it etc.I too have wondered if the reflux is related to the Costochondritis and I really should clean up my diet via food elimination to check to dietary inflammatory responses.Good luck! [info] None [info] 1549882407
MadameOddfellow [info] You could definitely have anxiety. Talk to your mom and doctor about getting. Referral in your area. I was diagnosed with anxiety over ten years ago. I'd like to think I'm outgoing and like able, and I definitely love being the center of attention. Having anxiety and being shy aren't mutually exclusive. There are different kinds of anxiety - performance, travel, anticipation, the list goes on and on. My physical reactions were always over the top. I would physically pale to two or three shades lighter, my body should shake uncontrollably with tremors, and I'd get ill. Everyone gets nervous - shakey hands, sweaty palms - but the feeling of being unable to breathe might mean it's more than regular nerves. A doctor can teach you coping mechanisms - how to control your breathing, reminding yourself that you're okay, counting and word exercises for distraction, relaxation. You could have anxiety, or you could be a nervous kid with a less than stellar home life. Either way, talking to someone can definitely help you.  [info] None [info] 1401514087
MerchantofDeath79 [info] I know what you're going through. I was diagnosed with anxiety almost a year ago and my girlfriend of 5 years left me even before I could tell her about my struggles. The anxiety made dealing with the breakup a hell of a lot harder. I'd have panic attacks whenever I thought of her, which was almost always. I'd run out of classrooms and work, unable to catch my breath. To make things worse, I just kept getting high instead of dealing with my feelings.As cliched as it sounds, it gets better.  If someone would have told me the same a few months ago, I wouldn't have believed them. I feel so much better than I did for a long time. You'll have to work hard to get there. Read, listen to inspiring people, keep a journal, see a therapist and follow their instructions to the dot, avoid drinking and drugs. As amazing as your life was before, it can be better than your wildest dreams if you put your mind to it. Every single day will be rewarding because you'll know in your heart that you're doing everything you can to leave the past behind. That feeling is priceless. [info] None [info] 1540730455
LokisPrincess [info] I was 19 when I was diagnosed with anxiety and I was put on Buspirone and another thing. I was fit and active with a great metabolism until I was put on that. Gained so much weight, became depressed, and I struggled with my anxiety. I am off it now, and I'm on a different set that's working really well, but things haven't been the same since I was on that. I'm still not able to lose the weight, and curb the hunger. Now I'm 5'9 200lbs and feel like a piece of shit for it.  [info] None [info] 1509015683
cheddarbomb21 [info] What state are you talking about, if you don't mind? And do you know what constitutes a mental illness for that? I'm just curious because I was just diagnosed with anxiety (it's situational and has to do with public speaking or taking a test) a few months ago. I'm a gun owner and actually really like the idea of this, but I also think it should be on a case by case basis. [info] None [info] 1355889598
BigOneEyedPurpleEmu [info] Thanks. Ive been struggling with multiple illnesses for the past couple of years but never got a clear deliniation between them. Ive been on klonapin for 2 years and am currently on valium. Not very effective imo.Is that anxiety general anxiety disorder? I have been diagnosed with anxiety but at different times different types.Edit: is there a word for the dtart of the cycle ie the random thought that sends you into limbo. [info] None [info] 1517768775
LGBTerrific [info] &gt;have met the likes of Kevin Rose and Mark Zuckerberg, and a pile of other "famous" Silicon Valley types.Any interesting stories?  Any surprises?  What were they like in person?  I'm always curious when people meet someone who's famous, mostly to hear about how they met the person and how that person reacted to the public.&gt;I've been diagnosed with anxiety this year, and am receiving treatment for it.What led you being diagnosed?  How are your treatments working out?&gt;I've just joined up as a member of Australia's only GLBTI radio station (Joy 94.9)[Joy 94.9](http://www.joy.org.au/) - now added to my list of streaming radio stations. :) [info] New Mexico [info] 1302779123
cfabbro [info] Ditto... I'm not allowed back into the USA because I'm on a list (they wouldn't say which one, but I suspect DHS).  Supposedly since I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder, until I can prove that I am "not a threat to [your] country" I cannot get passed the border.  This, despite the fact that I was diagnosed while living in Florida, and lived there for 3 years afterward.  Go go gadget indifferent Bureaucracy! [info] None [info] 1223092271
aliencheese555 [info] If you're female, that's LITERALLY the norm for the way adhd presents itself. I should know XDI did fine/pretty well in school, Bs and As. But HOO BOY did I have trouble with remembering shit and doing homework and organization. AND I was diagnosed with anxiety. So I feel ya. But, take a look at [this](https://www.researchgate.net/publication/242642028_ADHD_SELF-RATING_SCALE_FOR_GIRLS). It might help you a bit in convincing doctors. Kathleen nadeau is the bees kneesAlso, if you can, find a new psychiatrist.  [info] None [info] 1553705883
IHateYouVagina [info] Lol, no I'm fine. My family is just super nosey and invasive and I am being raised by an African american single mother in her early fifties. She never talked about sex much with me and I never had an "official sex talk". I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but it doesn't really affect stuff like this, just social as far as I know. [info] None [info] 1544822906
TheMythicalShelBeast [info] If it makes you feel better, everytime I get settled on a medicine for one thing another comes along and screws it all up. First I was diagnosed with anxiety and given a low dose of cymbalta. I gained 60 lbs on that shot in under six months so they figured I didn't have anxiety and upgraded me to panic disorder. They put me on Zoloft but that opened up the opportunity for my OCD, Depression, and self hatred to rise to the surface so they added a benzodiazepine into the chemical concoction. Then they decided I need two shots and to get my blood drawn for extra testing. I have extreme needle phobia and so they told me I could get one shot in the form of nasal spray. Then of course they happened to be out of nasal spray so I left with three holes. Then we finally get the results after three weeks and they send us to a pediatric gyno who takes one look at my blood work and wants to know how the fuck nobody realized that I have had PCOS this entire time and the meds I was on reacted negatively with the PCOS. So she puts me on birth control but decides that I need more blood drawn. Flobotobitch said, "tiny needle, you won't feel a thing." And pulls out the thickest fucking needle I've ever seen and legit jabs it into my tiny vein. Needless to say, the vein leaked and my entire inner arm was purple for a few weeks. Then they tell us I can't take any of the good medications until I get an ultrasound to see if I have ovarian cysts. But they can't get me in for another month. Meanwhile, I can barely stand up straight because my uterus is swollen and every time I move it pulls on the muscles and hurts like a bitch. Then they say when I get my ultrasound they will prescribe me a two week course of pills that will shred the uterine lining and I will bleed out for a month and then I can take the medicine that will actually help me. But, the shredding overlaps with exams at my school and then my birthday (I'll be seventeen in three weeks) which was supposed to be a camping trip in the middle of nowhere. Meanwhile my personal trainer is putting me on a HIIT circuit and I have to work out four times a week and I can barely fucking move.  Now they want me to get food sensitivity testing done which is more needles and I have been stabbed more times in the last three weeks than in any year in my life. And last night at therapy my psych was diagnosing me with sensory sensitivity and other annoy little conditions. That should be treated by my current meds but aren't. And the other med that should help counter reacts with the birth control I need for the PCOS. FML [info] None [info] 1494055417
eulogyjones [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety for quite awhile (I suspect as a result from taking Ritalin as a kid for ADD) and it comes and goes but man there's nothing worse than just being anxious for no reason and then trying to justify in your head why you shouldn't be having anxiety only to compound that anxiety further until you're just a stressed out anxious mess by the end of the day. [info] None [info] 1411575281
tuxedolux [info] If it’s not absolutely something you have to take then you can ask them for other alternatives. I did this when I was diagnosed with anxiety and was immediately prescribed Xanax. However, In my opinion, therapy should be done in place of medication. Therapy gives you the tools to handle what’s causing the problems in your mental state. It can be scary to go that deep into yourself but once you learn to deal with things it gets better. If it’s too scary though there is also group therapy.  [info] 28 F 5’4” SW: 161 CW: 152 GW1: 150 [info] 1552508832
MikeStidham [info] THAT was what led me to go to the doctor in the first place, at which time I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.  Some 20 years after that, my wife decided to seek a divorce.  As bad as those first panic attacks were, going through the divorce was 30 times worse.  I'd get this odd sensation in my chest like I'd just drank boiling water, then a hot flash all over me, then my legs would turn to jelly.  It's the weirdest thing I'd ever experienced. [info] None [info] 1574057371
MannyOmega [info] Got diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago. For me, it's more like my ego and pride can be very big. Thus, I tend to project a reckless bravado, so that I won't be hurt due to rejection or feel that I'm a burden on others. This bravado, a result of my ego, makes me a bit of a dickhead, even though I'm well liked. I'm trying to change who I am, but it's very hard. It's like a defense mechanism for me. Without it, I feel vulnerable. With it, most people I know carry an affection for me. Habits that are constantly positively reinforced are hard to break. I might be different than others in that I know how to socialize, and am quite good at it. I have my moments of awkwardness, but for the most part I am socially competent. My father, due to the nature of his job, put me into a lot of social situations that I dreaded when I was younger. Thanks to it, though, I've developed many social skills. My social anxiety manifests in that it makes me nervous to be around my closer friends. Small talk with strangers or an idle chat with an acquaintance is no problem. but I struggle to consistently interact with close friends because I feel that at any moment I could make a mistake that ruins the friendship. I'm afraid that they wouldn't really like my true self (if I even have one anymore, the bravado has blurred the lines) so I often pull away in fear. I was diagnosed with anxiety in general though, not specifically social anxiety. I have no idea if you can even be diagnosed with specifically social anxiety, and in my case I was simply told to continue meeting with my therapist for my anxiety. I simply know that social anxiety is a big part of the anxiety I can feel. Thus, all that I have written has not been scientifically tested, but rather the findings I've seen based on the result of my own introspection.Take what I say with a grain of salt, as my experiences do not reflect all who have anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1549039645
loserkidtbh [info] Hard disagree. I've been a picky eater since I can remember. It's been linked to my anxiety disorder about trying new foods, texture issues, etc. I will try new food at home, but it takes a bit of working up to it. Also I can't explain to you the anxiety picky eaters feel when they go out to eat with family and friends. I've had to settle for just a water before because I was 2 seconds away from a panic attack if I got food. I know, all this sounds completely ridiculous to you and it sounds it to me too. But, I don't think you'll fully understand a lot of us don't want to be picky eaters. A majority of us aren't doing it to be "cute" or whatever. Anxiety just gets in the way of it. I've dealt with anxiety disorder since a little kid and I was diagnosed with anxiety around age 6? 7? That's also when I became a picky eater. Just give us a break, dude. We aren't harming you at all by being a picky eater. Like I said, a lot of us don't want to be one. We just are trying to push through it like a lot of the other stuff we have to push through.  [info] None [info] 1541764333
Dewdeaux [info] Interesting. I was diagnosed with anxiety in college (several years ago), but I never had panic attacks. It was more like insomnia and an inability to turn my mind off of intrusive thoughts. Are panic attacks triggered by underlying anxiety and stress, like delayed reactions? Because when these episodes happen, I’m not particularly worked up about anything.  [info] Son born 6/26/16; ? due 3/1/19 [info] 1544121740
Omars-comin [info] Curious..did your doctor(s) specifically tell you that the reason they are skeptical of you is because they have so many other people claiming to have POTS/dysautonomia? Personally, I may have never gotten an official diagnosis if it hadn’t been for my own research and some level of self diagnosing. I’m actually shocked to see that some people have gotten diagnosed quickly/easily because that couldn’t be further from the case for me. I’ve been highly symptomatic since I was 11 years old, but I had no idea that POTS even existed until a few years ago (I’m currently 30). I had a fainting episode and wound up in the ER because I hit my head on my tile floor. I noticed that every time I went from lying down to sitting up in the hospital bed, the heart rate monitor started going off to alert the doctors that my hear rate had gone above 120bpm (no one checked on me). The next day, I typed in “tachycardia upon sitting up” into google, and POTS was the first thing to come up. I have since been diagnosed with EDS and POTS, nearly 20 years after becoming symptomatic. One issue is a lot of doctors aren’t referring people to get the proper testing done. I didn’t have any ANS testing done until I got insurance that doesn’t require referrals to specialists. I was never referred to anyone by my GP. I quite literally was my own doctor and referred myself and demanded the tests that I felt I needed. It’s not *our* job as patients to request specific referrals/tests based on our symptoms, but that’s the experience I had. My primary doctor(s) should have looked at my symptoms and told me **everything** I should get tested for based on those symptoms, but instead I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and sent on my way time after time. I feel that anxiety should only be diagnosed after tests are done to rule out any and all conditions (no matter how uncommon/unlikely said conditions are) that have similar physical symptoms. Unfortunately, that’s not typically how it goes. Anxiety is diagnosed despite no tests for other conditions being done. Actually, if I’m being honest, I don’t think primary care doctors should be diagnosing or treating anxiety anyway. Leave that to psychiatrists. I agree that people who have had *negative* testing should accept the fact that POTS/dysautonomia isn’t their issue and keep searching for other possibilities. I also agree that people shouldn’t necessarily be recommending specific medications to people who are undiagnosed, but at the end of the day, that person is going to have to see a doctor in order to obtain medication(s). I think the majority of POTS treatment is harmless and isn’t going to have any ill effects on people who don’t have POTS. There are *always* going to be illness fakers. There’s nothing that can be done about that. That doesn’t give ANY doctor the right to dismiss symptoms just because an illness is “trendy”. Doctors who are doing that need to be fired by the patient. Period. I actually think part of the reason this particular condition is so popular amongst fakers is because it is *known* to be misdiagnosed and get blown off by doctors. Perhaps if doctors took *everyone’s* symptoms seriously and did a better job at getting dysautonomia patients diagnosed in a timely manner, people would be less inclined to fake this condition. Edited for spelling and grammar [info] None [info] 1566068655
Confused_bean [info] If you feel like this then you should probably get re-assessed. It depends on how thorough your diagnosis was and how skilled your diagnoser was as well. There are many stupid psychiatrists and psychologists out there who know next to *nothing* about ADHD (believe me -- I was diagnosed with anxiety and Asperger's, but not ADHD, twice), so if you didn't see a specialist, then you should. [info] None [info] 1443114183
dontspitonyourwaiter [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. I used to take medication for both, but now only for the anxiety as the OCD has lessened. Thanks for your concern about my medical life. [info] None [info] 1398189753
Arwres [info] I've come across people in my teenage years that did the exact same thing after I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, "I have that too" was thrown around a lot it can be disheartening to think you're normal because everyone has the same issue apparently but I do hope you're getting the help you need and I hope that people who do self diagnose see a professional so they can seek the proper help they need too. [info] None [info] 1547658898
the-masculine-egg [info] I go through cycles - I move forward with transitioning, feel happier and less dysphoric, and then feel "less trans" for not having enough dysphoria. I always seem to forget that the reason I feel less dysphoric than before is transitioning. I know I'm moving in the right direction because when I think about going back to living as a woman - well, I don't want to be too dramatic, but sometimes it feels like I'd rather die. I don't know about you, but I've been diagnosed with anxiety and have a long history of worrying about everything all the time, and I strongly suspect that's why. [info] 💉4/25/19 [info] 1556345435
NitretGaming [info] This doesn't help for everyone but I just simply smile and I taught myself not to care about the simple things. If I lost 50 bucks I would be so stressed 2 years ago but I've learned money isn't everything and that I care more about being happy than worrying about money. I know that stressing WILL NOT HELP AT ALL.  For anxiety I just smile and think positive. Whenever I'm in a large group I try to just smile it out and "act cool." This somehow brings my anxiety down + I've listed to common phrases that "good speakers" have used and used them myself in a conversation to act like I know what I'm doing even though I don't and I'm really nervous.  If it's social anxiety we're talking about this one helps A LOT. Learn to not be embarrassed. Even if you did the stupidest thing just laugh it off. (It's no big deal when you look at the bigger picture.) For example singing the wrong lyric to a song out loud and then on top of that, being called out for it. I just say "oh shit what is it then" and laugh it off. Even if I'm internally crying. (BTW if you have any friends that shit on you for getting a song lyric wrong don't be friends w/ them please)  Just try your best to learn to overcome it, kinda like a fear. Just smile and remember in the end, fuck it, just be happy.  (Note: I've been diagnosed with anxiety and social anxiety)  GOOD LUCK I BELIEVE IN YOU :D [info] None [info] 1551669465
Godofwar512 [info] Like this. I use that app all the time. I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well. This app does the same for me and helps me calm down. Less reliant on Xanax because of it  [info] None [info] 1521908638
fatcattastic [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety as an adult, and looking back on my childhood there were a ton of signs similar to what OP is describing. I wish I had communicated to my parents what I was experiencing, because early intervention would have saved adult me some money on therapy. [info] None [info] 1556111684
toxicskiamachy [info] I am so sorry for all of your struggles.  I was diagnosed with anxiety at 15 and Fibro at 25 and I’m a 27F so I’ve been living with it for about two years.  I agree with you that you would understand how your anxiety manifests and trust me that you know your body and it’s NOT in your head.  Do not let anybody insult you in that manner by making assumptions like they know your body better than you do.My fibro started after I developed mononucleosis for the second time.  I was diagnosed within 6 months of onset which is a huge relief but now am getting neurological symptoms so I’m kind of on the same boat as you with ruling out an additional condition that pops up acutely about once a month.  I know what I felt like before fibro and it’s not in our heads.  I even lost weight and it has nothing to do with weight or being in/out of shape.  I have to really watch my activity level and get about 12 hours of sleep a night.  I mostly push through pain to be able to work and go back to school.  The crashes are becoming less frequent this way but they still happen and I’ve ended up in bed too.  I’ve been in bed where I literally have to have a cup of soup brought to me that I can drink and where I have to physically crawl to the restroom.  Fibro can be managed and just know you aren’t alone.  Feel free to DM me if you want to talk.  [info] None [info] 1528653212
pkosuda [info] Going to a sporting event. I always worry some emergency will happen and I'll be trampled to death in the crowd. Or leaning against a window/window sill in a 3+ story building. I always think it'll break and I'll fall to my death so I'm nervous leaning against them. I have been diagnosed with anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1393083909
Mysticwolf1999 [info] Once when I was a kid, I was diagnosed with anxiety (I still have it today) and I was sleeping alone for once. My biggest fear would be death, I can't stand to go to see people lifeless bodies in caskets, it scares me. Anyway I had finally passed out until my dream was about me and my dad driving down a highway, I turned and said "dad the guys are-" right as I said that, I heard a gun shot. We panicked and went back to our old appointment and we stayed there, until we decided to try to escape. What ended up happening was I got shot in the back and fell, my dad left me and I was left there to die, I woke up screaming. Let's just say I didn't have proper sleep and nor did I go to school that week heh :) [info] None [info] 1481385038
Gymlover2002 [info] I was 'diagnosed' with POTS and hyperventilation at the same time. The doctors there said that that combo indicated anxiety, so I was diagnosed with anxiety as well. One visit to a psychologist later and it was very clear I did not have anxiety disorder.Maybe try keeping a packet of info about POTS with you so first responders can know what they are talking about? [info] None [info] 1573224388
fuckthisthat [info] I HATED the call center. Gave me the worst anxiety ever. (This was Before I was diagnosed with anxiety and was on meds so it made it even worse.)I remember a lady I talked to. Can’t remember if it was inbound or outbound. She said that her dad screened and recorded every call made in the house and he would listen to them. It sounded like she was a prisoner in her own home. She had to go and asked if I’d be there when she called back. I had to tell her my “shift” was ending and I wouldn’t be speaking to her again.  [info] Satan's Victory [info] 1542835254
ClovisBlack [info] For a bit more context, I used to be considered a gifted student, but I've struggled monumentally with school as I've gotten into my teen years. I've been agonizing over being told by adults that if I don't pull it together, I'll be stuck working jobs that won't satisfy me. I've been slowly and sadly accepting the fact that I may not graduate with grades that qualify me for a college education.There's absolutely nothing wrong with non college requiring jobs, but I've had dreams of being a psychotherapist ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety :) this is a huge deal to me. I thought I'd bomb the test.  [info] Glad [info] 1547097267
iMickeyx [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety. Social situations are a hard issue for me and any small flaw about myself makes me thing really down on myself. I studder and shake in conversation, as soon as I'm alone I'll start hating on my flaws which doesn't help. Being able to keep away from social situations helps me.  [info] None [info] 1484790743
smokingpickles [info] It's strange to me how often it isn't characterized as that though and how often people think of anxiety disorders as intrusive thoughts when many people just have real life stressers that cause them to feel out of control and deal with it in other ways. I was diagnosed with anxiety but it turns out most of my anxiety is career related-I worry about not having a job or not having a job that is good enough. If I can convince myself that I am working toward somethings in my career, everything seems to fall away. Not entirely, but not in an insignificant way either. What you have going on sounds awful, I am happy to hear you have a therapist that is able to work with you and help you get to route of the problem. [info] None [info] 1536018390
kindnesscary [info] Obsessive thoughts are very common in anxiety disorders, and although they are also a symptom of OCD, it’s just a symptom and can be found in other disorders. Going to a psychologist will do you wonders :) I was diagnosed with anxiety and have a lot of symptoms of OCD because they can overlap sometimes. Anxiety makes us a little obsessive every now and then, and maybe repeating words is a way your brain found to cope with something or to be rewarded after a conversation. [info] None [info] 1550745918
Iridaeth [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder. It just seemed so different than other forms anxiety has taken with me. I will be going to a psychiatrist as soon as I possibly can. Just trying to figure some stuff out beforehand. Thank you for the reply. [info] None [info] 1554664413
colleenshawkey [info] for all the people saying its a way of escaping reality, thats pathetic. The people that cut themselves 100% are doing it because they have nothing better to do, and they want people to feel sorry for them. The people who cut always say, " I need help", or " I hate myself, Im so messed up." Alright, if you really wanted help you would get free help, join support groups, call hotlines. Instead, these people post their slit wrists all over the internet. They try to make people feel bad for them. But the truth is, you just look irresponsible. Im praying for all of you with problems. trust me, I know what its like. I was diagnosed with anxiety. But i know how to fix my problems and help my situation.  [info] None [info] 1438998275
joanne31love [info] So a little bit of background: I grew up without too many friends, which really didn't bother me as a child because I didn't know any better. As I grew up and began understanding that I was socially isolated, I became lonely. I really began to make better friends when I was in high school and understood how great it was to have company. However, I occasionally experience these "manic" episodes around people (for a lack of a better term, sorry if this isn't correct.) I become extremely uncomfortably hyper, especially around new people. It becomes uncomfortable both to me and the people around me, and I am unable to stop. It is almost as if this other persona is taking over who is completely over-the-top when it comes to energy and speech. I tend to become crazy, and I come home feeling embarrassed. I tell myself before every interaction not to become hyperactive, but I can't stop myself. At work and around my family, I can keep a calm demeanor. Around new people it becomes unbelievably difficult to control. As a side note, I am diagnosed with anxiety if that makes any difference. Thank you to anyone who may have experience or answers to this. I can't seem to find people who know what this feels like. [info] None [info] 1513397228
Tigerbait2780 [info] Holy shit you're a sensitive little one aren't ya?  I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ADD, and I take stuff for the ADD.  I've almost certainly been depressed before but never talked to anyone about it.  Doesn't change anything about what I've said, and realizing that certainly hasn't "deepened my feelings of trauma and worthless uselessness".  Everytime this gets brought up someone says "well I think I'll trust the doctors over you", which is missing the argument entirely.And why would I ask about treatment before knowing what the issue is?  Seems like that's putting the cart before the horse. [info] None [info] 1520141630
Charming-ander [info] I used to LOVE horror movies! I was diagnosed with anxiety in my twenties and now I almost have panic attacks when watching them. 😕 [info] None [info] 1526632191
SirAwkward [info] My sphynx cat was solo up until a year before he passed away. We got him when he was 6 months old and my family and I were all at either school or work from about 8 AM-6 PM. While we did leave him alone a lot as soon as we got home he would be pet and played with. At night he had to sleep with someone. If we were at our desk, he had to be acknowledged and held. We made it work but only because we were regimented. On the few nights we got home late he would be at the door waiting or would get stuck some where behind the washer or in the closet because he was looking for us. Because he was a lone cat though, he spent many hours with me as a companion. We got him when I was 10 and we had a symbiotic relationship. When I was diagnosed with anxiety he was there for me for all my attacks and I was there for him when he started having seizures.I now have two sphynxes close in age and they are their own companions. I can go on day trips and unscheduled things and won't come home to crying or a stuck sphynx but they still hang out with me when I'm home. I guess it depends on your lifestyle but if you're looking for a companion kitty and have a fairly normal schedule, I definitely think you can pull it off.  [info] None [info] 1491973385
undeserving_sci [info] I'm trying therapy soon. I'll let you know how it goes? I've been diagnosed with anxiety and persistent depressive disorder. Something I suspect many of us suffer from possibly. [info] None [info] 1561339992
sh225406 [info] Those are mine too! I was just diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago after multiple panic attacks (first time knowing it was abnormal). I just though thats how people felt when stressedd or under pressure. [info] None [info] 1551046977
PumpkinSpiceAngel [info] So sorry that you had to go through. I've been diagnosed with anxiety since High School, so this transition has not been the smoothest for me. I've mostly made peace with the fact that I don't know about a god, but I'm still worried about telling people. Best of luck during this time in your life. [info] Ex-Protestant [info] 1565616364
zergling50 [info] Yeah, I was diagnosed with anxiety at the age of 6 and had no severe problems with it until college. It basically opened the floodgates and I was suddenly struggling with so many mental and emotional hurdles and feeling like I was going crazy. I'm doing a bit better now but I'm still recovering and trying to just finish. [info] None [info] 1496867815
Jake257 [info] Mate this is pretty much how i feel. I've been diagnosed with anxiety but think it's something more than that. [info] None [info] 1403433225
brillantezza [info] I've had this all my life and I've been diagnosed with anxiety. As you said, it's generally when you're alone in bed trying to go to sleep which is the exact same thing with me. I also sometimes worry when I haven't been in contact for my mom or dad or even boyfriend that they got into a car crash, and then my head goes to a very elaborate place like "What if their cellphone got destroyed and I'm not listed with an updated number on their info. It's not totally uncommon to sort of stew on what would happen if a loved one died but it is not normal. This is a symptom of anxiety, albeit a common one. You should really seek counselling because although these thoughts might not be particularly intrusive in your everyday life, they can be very insidious and indicative of an underlying problem. But know that you're not alone, and it's not just you. [info] None [info] 1390920946
hahabyeeee [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 9, ADHD when I was 11. I took an SSRI and adderall for 8 years. Adderall never caused anxiety.  I now am 20 and take Wellbutrin and adderall and my anxiety is horrible. I took 25mg when I was younger. The past year I took 15mg, and now I’m down to 10mg due to the bad anxiety it causes me. I can only take it on days that I have to do school work because it just causes unnecessary anxiety for me. It was giving me chest pains at 15mg, the 10 is better but the doctor said that we can lower it to 5mg if necessary. I’d ask the doctor if you could try Strattera which is a non-stimulant adhd medication. It does not increase anxiety, but i think it takes 6 weeks to get into your system. But, if you’ve managed the adhd symptoms for the past 9 years I think an extra 6 weeks wouldn’t be too bad to wait for medication to take effect. Your doctor also might want a new diagnosis. I started seeing a new psychiatrist this year and my adhd diagnosis was 9 years old so he wanted me to get a new one before prescribing any controlled substances. Good luck!  [info] None [info] 1553802629
tink9995 [info] I've had similar issues!  I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was a teenager.  I was prescribed Paxil and became suicidal.  (This was before they realized kids under 18 shouldn't take this med)  Fast forward to my adult years and I'm still struggling with anxiety.  Despite me telling him the past history with Paxil he tries to prescribe it to me again- and brushes off my concern and blames it on my anxiety.  It makes you realize just how uncertain we are on dealing with the mind.  We can fix bones, blood pressure, nerves- but healing a problem in the mind is still an unknown area. [info] None [info] 1407787338
Prairiegirl321 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder 20 years ago, and my symptoms are ONLY physical.  Except for the secondary anxiety that results from thinking I might be having a heart attack and wondering if I should go to the emergency room. Again. I’ve been to the emergency room and had EKGs/related blood work, chest x-ray, etc,  at least a half dozen times, despite knowing that I have this condition. Because surely some people with anxiety disorder DO have heart attack’s, right? What if it isn’t a panic attack this time? It’s sheer hell. The attacks come on with no warning, no pattern, and are completely unrelated to anything going on in my life as far as I can tell. I’ve been through various periods of extreme stress related to events in my life with no panic attacks at all. Usually when one happens, I will just be sitting there reading or watching TV, life going on smoothly, and all of a sudden my heart starts racing and I feel short of breath/dizzy, chest tightness, basically all the symptoms that we are told may signal a heart attack, and here we go again. They sometimes last 2  days or more. The only thing that really helped for any length of time was when one doctor sent me for a stress test, which showed that my heart function is excellent. I had such an easy time with the treadmill portion that I felt almost embarrassed to be there. So for a few years after that, when symptoms of a panic attack started, at least it wasn’t exacerbated by agonizing about what if it’s a heart attack, and it would pass very quickly. But that wore off. My original doctor tried a series of different drugs over a 3-yr period, but they were worse than useless because of having to deal with the side effects, so I gave up on that approach. Trying mindfulness now with maybe some benefit. At least I haven’t been to the emergency room since I started with it.  [info] None [info] 1544407662
brown_t_poison [info] Interested in joining because I have been diagnosed with anxiety.. But I am having an anxiety on whether to join this session.... [info] None [info] 1539931952
Haizenberg [info] Decreased my feeling of anxiety, even though I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder. [info] 83 days [info] 1432098963
VilePug [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and am happy to say that I have overcame it through shear willpower and I'm no longer medicated, but when I feel a little anxious, I like to recite Wu Tang lyrics (very familiar to me) and think about my dogs. If your struggling with anxiety DON'T WORRY. It gets better over time. When I started experiencing anxiety attacks I thought i was going crazy, but years later I have full control of my emotions, sometimes it seems like more so than most. Just see a doctor and find a hobby.Tl:dr, Song lyrics, dogs, get a hobby to distract yourself from your irrational worries. [info] None [info] 1502264383
lechino3000 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety a while ago. It is hard not to worry about things. Slowly though, with the help of others just watching them being so easy going and fun has helped me calm down.I don't know, I think you need to start rationalizing things in your head whenever you start freaking out. For example, whenever you feel anxious, ask yourself "why am I feeling this way?" and.."can I let this feeling go? if so, when?"..that helped me calm down.  [info] None [info] 1343721198
muffy27 [info] I'm not sure if I'm much help, but you should talk about this with your doctor or a therapist. It sounds like you might have a mental illness. I also know that it isn't easy to talk about this stuff or get help. I was so scared to go to the doctor but when I was diagnosed with anxiety, I felt relieved because I finally knew what was going on with me. I hope you talk to someone and feel better. Stay strong! [info] None [info] 1569365450
treefarmercharlie [info] I have the same issue.  I was diagnosed with anxiety issues about 15 years ago but cannabis didn't make it worse until recently.  I honestly don't know if cannabis is just amplifying my anxiety, or if it is creating more, but I have cut my consumption back to only two days a week (Friday and Saturday) and that has helped me a lot. [info] None [info] 1573153121
swingerofbirch [info] I've heard of ADHD being misdiagnosed as GAD because the lack of focus causes frustration/anxiety and a feeling of being out of control. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 14 and then at 18 my psychiatrist tried me on Adderall for a week and it seemed to make my anxiety better than years of benzos/SSRIs but it made me shake physically so I was scared of it. I always wonder whether I was misdiagnosed and should have stayed with it. Anyhow, very difficult to know how the psychiatrist would respond unfortunately because of it being a controlled substance. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1572850214
foodcourtdruide [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was younger. It's similar to any addiction, in that it never actually leaves you, but you learn to manage it. As an adult, I have some rough moments, but overall I'm able to live a very normal life.I have no sympathy for Fez. His anxiety is just an extension of his extreme narcissism. Everyday Fez chooses his own safety and comfort over everything else in his life. He goes to a job where he literally stares off into space 90% of the time, where he's not growing as a person or improving others around him. When given opportunities to grow, he denies them and hides behind his anxiety. When he has a conflict with someone, he always looses control of his emotions and uses any power he has to hurt that person. He has no remorse or guilt in doing so, either. In 2015, we use terms like "anxiety" and "narcissist" to make excuses for the fact that Fez is just an asshole. He's an asshole that believes since he's been doing this for so long, he shouldn't have to try hard anymore. He's mentioned several times that "Shelby is like me, but I wasn't this way at Shelby's age." Meaning that Fez's behavior is acceptable because he's "paid his dues".  [info] None [info] 1426686272
IndividualSchedule [info] Good point. I wish people would recognize it more and don’t potentially and maybe unintentionally normalize social anxiety. Me being introvert, I was diagnosed with anxiety and symptoms of social phobia years ago (along some other mental illnesses).Now I really struggle to recognize if it’s me being introverted or me being symptomatic. And it’s so hard to live like this. Sometimes I know when it’s symptoms of social anxiety and when it’s being introverted.And I really wish more people with potential social anxiety would rather seek help than just say “oh I’m introvert, I’d rather stay alone.” it just deepens the social anxiety. In both cases it’s important to get out of our comfort zone, get nice doze of social interaction and then recharge and do it again. Of course social interactions with rather positive energy. [info] None [info] 1554677110
ilovjedi [info] I’m a 32 year old woman with a 10 year old son we both officially have ADHD. We’re going to get my son started on meds this year. I worry about him taking them because he seems so little but the impact of his hyperactivity at school is noticeable and it makes it hard for him to learn.I was diagnosed with anxiety before I was diagnosed with ADHD both were diagnosed as an adult. Anxiety symptoms and ADHD symptoms can overlap so maybe it would make sense to talk to your daughters doctor about maybe treating her anxiety and seeing if that makes her school problems a little better too. You can also have both. And, would she benefit from talking with a counselor about the anxiety? They have play therapy for younger kids. Also, at school if you’re in the US have you asked for an IEP?I was taking 15 MG of XR Adderall before I became pregnant. I went down from 20 MG because it was too much and kept me from sleeping. [info] None [info] 1545626850
SympatheticStranger [info] Tunnel vision. Yes, I agree with that. That is an apt description. Narcissism is general looked at as a bad word, it's a bad thing, a wrong thing. I hate that. She loves people, she cares for people, she has a compassionate heart. It's all there, and her narcissism isn't bad or wrong or immoral, It just doesn't show because of that tunnel vision. Worse... *sigh* I know... and I'm scared I'm not going to be good enough for her (insert personal anxiety issues). I hope she knows that she can always trust me, and I hope that I can hide the pain she might cause me and only see that I will love her always and that even if it hurts in the moment, I  understand and it's ok. Life is fucked up for everyone, I think, mental illness or not. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD (long story), so I understand mental illness, but I struggle to understand illogical behavior. Call me spock, I can't grasp not wrapping my mind around logic and holding on for life, but I'm trying to accept it and work with it. I've accepted it as far as it's uncontrollable and there is a chemical misfire in the brain that blocks logic, but I can't feel it, so I can't understand the feeling of accepting illogic as logic. It's hard to be on the outside, maybe even as hard for the outsider trying to understand the insider.  [info] None [info] 1400037783
bacon_to_go [info] When I was 22, my best friend died of an aneurysm in his sleep the day after he tried to hang out with me and I gave him the cold shoulder so I could hang out with a chick I met at work. We found him in his apartment. He had tried to go to the hospital the night before and he had MediCal so they gave him aspirin and told him to fuck off. Turns out his brain tumor came back.  My family also lost their home from the recession, my parents got divorced, my older sister got hooked on drugs and my gf/prior best friend for 3+ years cheated on me.  I was diagnosed with anxiety, relationship based PTSD, ADHD but I still graduated with an unrelated engineering degree.  Programming actually keeps me calm and sane. Since changing to CS, I'm able to fall asleep in less than an hour after lying down, I've stopped grinding my teeth, my brain is so worked out that I don't mind-wander in bed, I've stopped taking Adderall.  The best part is, I do have a lot of "ideas" that I more or less gave up on, but even working on a cool idea for a few hours is really calming. It's really hard to do this in other industries. In Mech E, what are you going to do, manufacture your own tooling component? Engineer your own race car?  But with CS, you have everything you need to not just design, but plan, build, deploy and even release and test an idea right there on your laptop.  It's also very very relaxing to know that YOU are in demand in your industry. It relieves the stress of always feeling like you could get fired, etc.  Having companies sending you emails on LinkedIn begging you to consider their company can be confidence building.  Getting a dog helped too. My dog makes me feel safe, calm, makes me laugh.   [info] None [info] 1473564967
giraffeking [info] Do you have anxiety? I ask because I felt the same things until I was diagnosed with anxiety issues, and while I never considered my self anxiety ridden, I found that doing many of the exercises for treating anxiety helped with my self conscious issues, and the other things you mentioned improved because of it.  [info] None [info] 1442430736
Snake010 [info] I used to be just like this guy I didn't understand then I was diagnosed with anxiety now I understand and I wish more people could just understand [info] None [info] 1560396581
Bawka_Bawwk [info] My mom is great, she really is. But she pounded into my head when I was a child that if my future home wasn't spotless, people would think I am gross and dirty. Looking back, our house was too clean and we didn't get enough time with her. I saw myself going down this same road after my second child was born - a week after his birth I was baby-wearing and back to my clean-freak ways, instead of healing and snuggling all day. Something had to change... I knew I would never get this time back with my kids. After talking to my doc, I was diagnosed with anxiety and the meds have really helped. I can let some messes go now. Everything doesn't have to be perfect. No one is going to come to my house and tell me I'm dirty. We are just a normal family living life. I could probably still use some therapy though. I feel for your wife! Good luck addressing this.  [info] None [info] 1510797137
frostylakes [info] Anxiety is definitely a different issue, I agree, but I don't feel I can contribute to this particular thread of thought in a constructive way. I'll share my anecdote, though, I guess. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but it's hard for me to see it as something abnormal and I didn't even realize it would be considered diagnosable anxiety before I was told. Things like new social situations and meeting new people causes anxiety to where I simply don't act in these situations until 'invited in' in some way. It takes me a very long time to acclimate. All that said, even among close friends, among whom I feel no anxiety, I still end up drained and tired and in need of alone time after too long. I need to recharge. The situation of being around people is common to both situations, but anxiety only exists in one. Recharge alone time is needed after both. I can't find the words at the moment, but I hope that I'm getting across the point that introverted/extroverted traits may interact with the causes of anxiety in a person, but are separate things and learning to cope with or get treated for extreme anxieties is a separate matter from one's introvert/extrovert trait. [info] None [info] 1381200818
1135742 [info] Sorry I forgot to add that I've been diagnosed with anxiety and body dysmorphia is these are any relevant [info] None [info] 1468292924
TJoestar [info] Yes, I have been diagnosed with anxiety and social anxiety since a very young age. I have also had panic attacks for quite some time now, but it was the first time it happened in a moving vehicle. [info] None [info] 1531484876
vaqt [info] I have no idea why it's listed as adjustment disorder. I was diagnosed with anxiety and MDD while I was in. But my compensation says adjustment disorder. I also have sleep apnea which accounts for a good chunk of my percentage.  [info] None [info] 1520476249
thumpitythump [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety after a 12+ hrs panic attack with those same waves you describe, she said panic attacks are similar to a jack-in-the-box.  They're harder to recover from once one has popped out.  Medication made all the difference for me.  Be kind to yourself.  Adrenaline and cortisol are very hard on you. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1537483785
sodaigomi [info] Help, please? I was just diagnosed with anxiety, and, on top of that, I have to deal with a recent breakup. [info] None [info] 1450509120
ghoulkiddd [info] This fear of fire alarms carried through high school for me, and it got to a point in grade school that I'd ask every. single. Day. Then in middle school I figured out the schedule because nobody fucking else did, and I'd very conveniently bounce that day.Nobody was surprised when I told them I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1544958719
xRadio [info] If reading doesn't work, a good TV show probably will! Game of Thrones definitely helped distract me.I was diagnosed with anxiety, so I totally understand having irrational fears. The one thing that has really helped me with it was communicating with my SO. Sometimes I find myself having a mild attack over something stupid, like spilling food on his bed, and he will see me and help me rationalize what it is that is upsetting me, and why it's not as bad as I'm making it out to be: "Why are you upset?" "I spilled a thing..." "Do you think I would be upset by that?" "Yes." "Well I absolutely do not care, there are more stains in this bed than you could imagine. Nothing to worry about."And just like that my anxiety is quelled! So I would suggest talking to him. Tell him about your anxieties and he can try to talk you through them and think about them in a rational way. [info] 3,766 miles USA - UK [info] 1402483866
rufurious [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety by a physician. Will this qualify as a psychiatric disorder under their rules? Also, the physician who diagnosed me practices in Kansas. Would this be an issue? Would I have to be re-diagnosed? [info] None [info] 1561746656
foxpunch [info] Was just about to comment about this. I have what feels like an existential crisis multiple times a day and I can't look in the mirror without freaking out a little because, like. I'm alive? Everyone else is also alive with their own thoughts and experiences? It blows my mind, lol. It started around the time I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1564659899
StaleRomantic [info] It's improved my issues with anxiety a lot. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder for which I used to take medication, and it hasn't cured me by any stretch but it's forced me outside of my comfort zone a lot. Just being in medic school has raised my anxiety so much that things that used to make me anxious and miserable seem meaningless now  [info] None [info] 1512878445
PhasmaUrbomach [info] Same. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, and I'm almost 50. I only have two streaks of grey at the temples. At this rate, I will still have dark hair by 60. My dad also had dark hair until he was quite old. So I think it's a lot to do with genetics. If stress were the primary factor, I'm sure I'd have a head of greys. [info] None [info] 1564803004
HireALLTheThings [info] Another death to the pile. Was riding my bike with a friend when I got a call telling me that another friend had suffered massive aneurysm and was about to die. It was the first time in my life that some one I really, truly knew had suddenly, without warning, passed away. I was completely numb for the ret of the day, then spent the following day completely wrecked with crying.I'll also never forget the first time I ever had a real panic attack before I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. Felt like 3 days in hell while the world went on normally around me.Just for a dash of positivist, I have to add the feeling I got attending the graduation of a friend I made while working at  homeless drop in center. He had been addicted to crack for 5 years, but I saw something in him that I hadn't seen in other addicts in the center, and went beyond the job requirement to help him, which is  a HUGE risk for a social worker to take, but since that rehab graduation day, he's been clean for 3 years now. [info] None [info] 1374525900
Shraamper [info] Oh thank you! I work on philosophy quite a bit. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, so I philosophy my way out of it. [info] None [info] 1562597327
hobogauntlet [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was 17. I'm also shy, but I can tell when I'm just being shy and when I'm having massive anxiety. [info] None [info] 1373048654
djeco [info] It really does consume your life.. But hang in there buddy. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back and it was hell. The thing is I wasn't worried about things like social anxiety, but rather the fear it self. The heart beat, sufication, swetty palms, the feeling of lost. It always started in my legs and build itself out, that tingling sensation. After a time I was done with it. I remembered having a dream of me training, boxing and training MMA. Don't know why I dreamed it, never been into fighting myself, but I liked to watch it. For some reason I woke up happy, happier that I've been for many months. I looked myself in the mirror that day and wanted to take control, like really bad, to a sensation that even got me mad at myself. I started researching, read other stories, tried out things that worked, other things didn't work, started training a little bit, worked on my breathing techniques, etc. When the therapist said that I didn't had to go to therapy anymore because I was healthy was like removing the  biggest chains in my life. I even got to a fuck it, I don't care anymore. You build yourself into this cage, and the only person that can unlock it is you.  [info] None [info] 1547969012
weldmeup [info] Sorry for the shortsided reply. I look for certain strains that the distalate is made out of. Sativa dominant if not a full on sativa for me. I have had ADD since I was a young kid and I was diagnosed with anxiety. Typically stimulants are used to treat for ADD. However after using marijuana for a while I find the stimulating high that a sativa brings to do a far better job than any medication I tried as a kid and teenager and even now as a young adult. Sorry to burden you with details I am just simply outlining the point that it all depends on what you are looking to do. [info] None [info] 1549225241
Jessicash [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past so maybe it is something I need to revisit. Thanks!!Also that it one of my favorite quotes. [info] None [info] 1510100906
EndlessInsight [info] I was pink-slipped into a mental health facility for a week when I was about 23 (I am 29 now) for paranoid delusions.  They were evaluating me for schizophrenia or other mental illnesses.  Most of my episodes have been drug induced, and going for multiple days with no sleep.  I have never followed through with full psychiatric treatment because my symptoms always subside after I come off of the drug, get some sleep, and realize my delusions are delusions.  As I said though, I do still have panic attacks thinking about the incidents.  I think I could be at risk for schizophrenia or some form of mental illness, but no I have no official clinical diagnosis.  They wanted me to do some outpatient therapy.  Whenever I do any sort of dissociative drug now though I definitely get the same paranoid symptoms, and as such I've had to avoid those types of drugs completely.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety before and have been on SSRI's before as well, but I took myself off of the meds not long after I started using them as I don't like traditional medication.  I'd definitely tell this guy to get checked out though if his symptoms persist.  It could just be a reaction to the LSD trip he had, or it could be  a disease that the LSD exasperated.  Either way if symptoms continue some evaluation/counseling is the best way to go.  They determined when I was pinkslipped in the hospital that my episode was most likely drug induced, but the PTSD I have from the incident still causes me to be paranoid that things are happening that actually aren't when my mind goes to that place and re-lives the episode.  If you aren't careful these sort of things can become life-long issues. [info] None [info] 1439469558
theclamguy [info] It started about a month ago before I was diagnosed with anxiety.  I believed it is anxiety induced but i was wondering if anyone with anxiety went through this too. [info] None [info] 1571086096
0bsidian_ [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety for about 7 years now, and I was on an SSRI for 2-3 years I believe. I have xanax (.25mg) for emergencies and might only take a few a year. I've been doing that for the past 3 years, so my situation is pretty similar to yours! I was completely honest about ALL of my medical history, and my doctor cleared me. Anxiety came up as a topic in my interview this year, but in the end, I was shortlisted! I'll be an incoming JET this year. :)My advice would be to explain the circumstances to your doctor so they understand the gravity of the situation, and to NOT LIE on your form. Good luck! [info] Current JET - Awaiting Placement [info] 1461081520
NikaVika [info] Wow, my story is basically the same. I have been picking at my face (mostly) for a looong time and only this year I realized I did it when I was feeling anxious or I had a panic attack (I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder). At that very moment it feels so good but then the realization hits and I feel horrible, which makes me anxious....which makes me want to scratch and pick. I discovered this reddit just recently but it really helped me to finally feel like I'm not alone and that something can be done about this. So, you can do it! It won't be easy, there will be relapse or two on the way, but we can do it! Great thing that I started using are the pimple patches. Put it over and bye. But of course I cannot put one giant patch all over my face, but at least this helps me with the worst areas. [info] None [info] 1565185775
justatwister [info] I also went through a similar thing as a kid with the burglar stuff. It occurred during my tween years. I would check the doors and windows in the house several times before bed, and I slept with a bat next to my bed. I was in a constant panic that someone was going to break into our house in the night for some reason. I would often seek reassurance from others during conversations just to hear them tell me my intense fear of this was unlikely to turn into a reality. As an adult, I was diagnosed with anxiety, so a lot of things from childhood started to make sense in regards to my thought process.  [info] None [info] 1550989189
Grape72 [info] If it helps any I was let down because I was diagnosed with anxiety but I was not taking medication for it at the time. The Army only lets you in with anxiety if you are taking medication, which I refused to do at the time.  [info] None [info] 1506989140
SenorVolf [info] I'm a firm believer in the paranormal, but this seems like your average, every day anxiety. I remember when I was accepted into college after deciding to transfer schools, and I got my notice of acceptance only a week before classes began, the exact same thing happened to me when I saw my boss at work. Overwhelming fear, feelings of dread. I was diagnosed with anxiety years before this ever happened, and never felt a thing like this until I had my first panic attack. I was so concerned with my feelings from that day that I had to see my doctor about it. It's really amazing how simple nervousness can manifest itself.Edit:  I read this again and noticed you said you were specifically afraid of the man, not the situation. It still sounds like an anxiety issue to me. It can manifest differently for every person and every attack is different. I've had more than a few where I've been afraid of one person in particular. I had one, once, where I had an overwhelming fear that I was going to kill myself. I didn't want to kill myself, I had never been suicidal, but I was still so scared that I was going to be compelled to kill myself that I put all the knives in our pantry and went for a walk, just to get away from them.I'm not saying that something paranormal didn't happen to you, 'cause I obviously wasn't there. But if it were me, I would honestly just chalk it up to anxiety. [info] None [info] 1520715536
DubbleB [info] I wonder if it is common to have all three? I am the same but I have been diagnosed with anxiety issues aswell. I hate my brain. [info] None [info] 1353664342
Pokabrows [info] lol I was diagnosed with anxiety as a kid so I had it then too  [info] None [info] 1548894797
ilivearoundtheblock [info] YTA.I was a regular smoker of cigarettes by 16.  (Ocassional drinking and marijuana also in high school but not much by comparison to my peers.)In my FORTIES I was diagnosed with anxiety.  Ohhhhhh.Nobody knew enough then to know I was "self-medicating."  But we sure know enough now, asshole. [info] None [info] 1573361078
kristystianwin [info] whether you need therapy or not depends on the therapy.I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder with autistic features and for me therapy is about learning how to deal with situationsit's more like a dry run of social situations, like learning when I get too deep into a topic that nobody is interested in or doing small talk with colleaguesmy doctor also said that pills were only the last measure, if therapy really didn't help me. [info] None [info] 1305302165
Melania- [info] It's true. Even though I went to the psychiatrist and I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, many people around me keep denying this. [info] None [info] 1563818628
foofooonyou [info] I have the same problem.  I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and PTSD. Have you been through any traumatic events that would cause your paranoia?  Another awesome release on reddit is RAOA for positive friends and random discussion.  Also,  giving/receiving gifts from friends brings an awesome feeling. Also, as someone who suffers and battles these things, you can PM me anytime if you need to talk.  Sticking together as a team to motivate each other I feel is the best thing we can do,  for only we can truly understand those crazy feelings. Best of luck to you my friend. [info] None [info] 1364146762
dolphinblood [info] Yes, but how do I find a "special" doctor? Like right now, I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but my "instincts" tell me it's something else. How do I affirm that it is something else? How many doctors do I go through until I think, "yep, they're right" [info] None [info] 1386005028
omfgwat [info] Thank you for replying. When I was 19 I was diagnosed with anxiety, agoraphobia, and panic disorder. After finally knowing what was wrong with me my anxiety kinda went away and decided not to go any further with therapy. My family doctor wouldn't give me medication but gave me information about counselling. I never followed through though. When I was in college I talked to a few counsellors and found them to be helpful but I find it extremely hard to open up about my feelings. I am tempted to seek help again but am afraid I won't be able to afford it since I don't have health benefits anymore. I live in Canada by the way. Edit- The therapist who did my assessment also recommend I try the book "Mind over Mood" it did help a lot but I only use it when I feel like I'm losing my mind again. [info] None [info] 1448247104
rgdenis [info] As expensive as a therapist is, go see one right now (assuming you have insurance at the moment) and get as much counseling as you can before you make the move.Talk to friends, and talk to people you trust. I have been diagnosed with anxiety almost two months ago and I'm finally doing A LOT better just by talking to my best friend for about an hour on the phone a day. It seems really tacky and obsessive but from my actions before the help, I don't know how far I could've made it before my thoughts made me lose all sanity. [info] None [info] 1437584825
Stell2020 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety as a child, you sound similar to me study wise, I had to work so much more than my peers to achieve the same grades (I did well but man I worked and worked). Hit my mid 20’s and life became too much (maintaining a home, sustaining a job, attempting to cook every night, exercise, then have enough energy and motivation to socialise or at least be pleasant and intimate with my husband). I went to a therapist because I was sure I was depressed, she suggested adhd (to which I laughed, come on I wasn’t that hyperactive kid who was always in trouble and failing school), saw a psychiatrist who diagnosed me with adhd, started stimulant medication (to which I was worried would increase my anxiety) and within 2 months my anxiety had all but gone! Treat the adhd, so I’m organised, can prioritise, and enjoy life, bye bye anxiety! (It does still effect me when I’m overly stressed/ busy but so much better than before). There is success either way you go, just depends what you and your therapist believe is having the bigger impact on your life.  [info] None [info] 1553320770
BoosterBooty [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I was given an antidepressant. This is very very common. Something like xanax is more for panic attacks or emergencies, not for treatment, like you said that you wanted them for. I understand that and I went into the doctor with the same view. However, using an antidepressant and taking a pill every day is something that will help with attacks, making them less frequent or even non existent. When I first started taking my antidepressant I was given xanax for attacks and for falling asleep. I took at least once a day. After about 6 months, I was taking it once a month. Sometimes not even that. In summary, give it a chance and some time. You may be surprised. Good luck to you. :) [info] None [info] 1436234046
oddestowl [info] Yes!I have been diagnosed with anxiety because I actually was anxious. I felt wrong and I knew it was stemming from my mind. It was absolutely a mental issue because I was worrying about things for no reason and I couldn’t stop it. I have also been to the doctors and said “I feel anxious, I am not anxious, but these sensations are anxiety. I am a fairly self aware person and I do not feel anxious in my head, these feelings are stemming from my body it is happening symptom first what is going on?” and I was told I was just suffering from anxiety and was not actually self aware enough to be making that call, my head and body were tricking me. I didn’t really think it was true but I am really used to being brushed off by doctors so I sort of went with it. But those sensations make me anxious through association with anxiety and make me feel like maybe something is horribly wrong with me and doctors are ignoring it because anxiety is such an easy diagnosis (especially once it’s already in your records). Since being diagnosed with hEDS this yearI suspect it is POTS or something because I have a lot of symptoms and I am currently awaiting referrals so we shall see! [info] hEDS [info] 1571647708
eduardamenezesc [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder earlier this year and most times I don't know what's going with my body, I just wanna lay down and sleep till I feel better. [info] None [info] 1563199660
SecretBlogon [info] I have had some sleep disrupted before. But It's pretty rare. And I have been diagnosed with anxiety. My body just happens to love sleep way more than my brain loves panicking over shit. [info] None [info] 1444100273
Betterself0226 [info] Hey, correct spelling is important!I think it's possibly because when you know you have something it can exasperate the symptoms. That's happened to me with psoriasis (once I was aware of it it started itching more thus making me scratch more this making it worse) and it's kind of the same with mental disorders I think. I was diagnosed with anxiety so young that I just don't know my identity without it, so I made my identity around it.Then again it could be helpful for some people to have those labels, I have no idea haha   [info] None [info] 1503772383
cmunk13 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety first, because that's a more prominent issue in my life and obvious in my personality. It does way better with established routine, and consistency and preparation. However, it never really worked for me. It always made my grades WORSE, I was disorganized, and just unable to relax. Now, I know that that's the ADHD bit. So I have to compromise. A planned ahead schedule, so it changes per day but planned. Consistent windows for some things that are hard to schedule- meals, study times. Knowing when it's ok to blow things off and just do something weird, while not shirking my responsibilities or using it as an avoidance technique.  [info] None [info] 1523236237
antiqueguy19001 [info] Thanks for the very helpful post! It helped a lot reading this, thanks for typing it all out. Anxiety has plagued me my whole life, even at age 5 I didn't leave my house for weeks, scared that the planets would fall! I don't get as many all-out panic attacks anymore (though still some small ones more often), but the constant anxiety that I get about most things is very bad. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was younger, and want to see a therapist for it, but am scared that they will find a whole new problem with me. My parents told me that I should definitely see one anyway though, because it will make me feel a lot better to deal with my anxiety.As for my lymphoma worry, in the year that I didn't pay any attention to any larger nodes, I didn't worry once, or even feel any swollen nodes. It seems like my anxiety seems to get worse towards the end of the year anyway though, as the days get shorter and colder. I was a little relieved today when I read in many places that follicular lymphoma (the type I have been the most scared about), doesn't occur in it's normal form in people under 20 or 30, only a pediatric version (which is highly curable in almost all cases, unlike the normal follicular lymphoma, which occurs almost only in age 50 or older and is tougher to treat), and even then is only diagnosed around 25 times a year (which I said before). When my anxiety really gets bad though, I will be completely convinced I am one of those people. Luckily my dad made me feel better by showing my a rather large neck node he has had for decades that has been fine, and before he gained a lot of weight, says that he also could feel plenty of groin nodes too. My mom also has some rather large lymph nodes on her armpit which aren't cancer either.I am generally always at my happiest when I don't think about all the things I can't control that could go wrong, such as getting randomly killed by a murderer or drunk driver while walking on the street, or in this case cancer. Most of the time though I am forgetting about all the things that could go wrong, and enjoying myself biking, hiking and overall doing fun activities. It seems like it is late a night when I have most of my worst anxiety. I have never smoked or drank alcohol (or any other drug for that matter), not wanting to risk my health in a preventable way, a more positive side effect of anxiety I guess.Thanks again for the great reply!&amp;#x200B; [info] None [info] 1542253010
Jecykah [info] This is me to a T. When I was diagnosed with anxiety, it surprised me that my doctor said “anxiety and OCD.” I was like, “Oh please... I’m not one of those weirdos who has to flip the light switch 70 times or the moon will explode.” But when she explained my anxiety as an obsession it all clicked and made more sense to me than anything ever. [info] None [info] 1542954810
WINTER_1S_COMING [info] This is nuts....ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, I've found myself in constant need of mints as well, tic tacs specifically (white ones :P) [info] None [info] 1396249237
goldfishpoops [info] Hey absolutely! I have really strong opinions about the religion having being raised in it and leaving it. But trust me I don't think it is this sinister, I remember what I was wearing and that I wasn't touched. My theories are more in the realm of some weird pseudo science, I was diagnosed with anxiety pretty young and a big indicator was sleep walking and paralysis night terrors. My theory is my parents reached out to someone to try to aid in helping me but can't imagine what taking a picture of me sleeping accomplished. [info] None [info] 1570309816
AndyDoopz [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders so I've definitely been struggling with that.  [info] None [info] 1497413873
realstonned [info] See I have similar symptoms but I am diagnosed with anxiety and IBS and one of the few things that help me out is cannabis. I find eating a .1-.2 of a gram of rso before bed helps me not feel adominal pain and nausea. [info] None [info] 1441132020
thispersonlookswhite [info] I also take amitriptyline which has been ineffective. I have been diagnosed with anxiety but my neurologist was upset that I went through the therapy route first instead of ruling out anything chemical or physical first. Im actually surprised that the psyciatrist I saw 2 years ago never made me do blood work and assumed this is in fact anxiety and not a side effect of something not working properly. I work in front of screens allll day. [info] None [info] 1488730883
nespid0 [info] My boss laid me off four days after I told him I've been diagnosed with anxiety attacks [info] None [info] 1552144946
potterssuperhero [info] Volcanos.I was 100 percent convinced my house was built on an undiscovered volcano. Thanks "Volcano".I was also terrified of my house burning down to the point where I would get up four to five times before bed to double, triple, quadruple check the stove was off.I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was a teen. [info] None [info] 1567319254
MightyShiba [info] Good on you for going to therapy, that's a great step. I was diagnosed with anxiety during college so I understand feeling overwhelmed or just down in general. Try going hiking and visiting lakes and stuff. Being by yourself isnt a bad thing and being able to enjoy your own company will invite others in. Try talking to people at the lake or at a place you like, open up and invite some people to just hang out. It's a process for sure [info] None [info] 1556728709
absurdlyastute [info] &gt; ... but dealing with antagonistic people is so commonplace that it doesn't trigger that kind of response.You said that you avoid social situations IRL though. If you get anxiety with your peers, I don't understand how you can avoid anxiety during times of duress--especially after you said you'd push past someone like me to avoid confrontation. I've been diagnosed with anxiety (who hasn't these days) and while what you said sounds good on paper, I don't believe you're being candid.    Why does it have to be something beyond curiosity? You create a theory about someone, and you attempt to validate it directly/indirectly. It does usually have a side effect in that if someone believes there is another person calling them out on lies, that they will think twice about lying. E.g. Someone similar to /u/mvincent17781 used to delete every single one of his comments that scored below 1 for two years. When I asked why, he stubbornly refuted deleting any of his comments. However, in the next week or so 50% of his commentary scored zero or below. I never bullied or upset the guy, but his behavior changed. If you can apply what you've learned to real life that would be an incredible tool to avoid conflict, scams, and unscrupulous sales people. On top of that you can improve others' days or your own. There are women at the grocery store I visit that call me their work son/bf. The guys at the meat counter don't know my name, but they give me free steaks from behind the counter or 50% discounts on their prepackaged meats. Is that not the least bit interesting?I'm not here to fight. I'm only answering the questions you're putting forward.  [info] None [info] 1520004927
lozerlife [info] For me that's Yoga. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety I signed up for a yoga class and really enjoyed it. I usually hate excercise so this was add for me. I was mega stressin and yoga was helping me before my diagnosis. Yoga teaches lots of stuff to help with anxiety like patience, improvement, exercise, and mental awareness. The yoga itself helps give you a good work-out without taking all your energy away. The stretching makes your body feel great. You have to be patient during yoga or it won't work,  you have to sit and soak the stretches without pain. And when you can in a way you couldn't before,  then you see the results of your progress. It's exercise so it makes the body and mind feel good. After the work-out we meditate,  and it's the nicest part of yoga for me. For me this improved my mental awareness and got me to a doctor,  so I hope it helps you. There are lots of YouTube videos to follow if you want to do it at home. Honestly doing it at home is nice to because it's just you time, your mental day.  [info] None [info] 1552544587
rightlyanxious123 [info] This is an interesting thread for me because I’m over 90% turbulent. I have been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 8 years old, so yes, I agree to the whole mental illness thing. I’ve been in therapy for many years and I take anxiety medication, but I don’t know if I can ever truly be “healthy” [info] None [info] 1557072746
sammy0415 [info] Thanks will do :)Stress is a really huge thing for me. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was like 15. I'm 20 years old, with severe palpitations, balding, and greying hair that's apparently attributed to stress. So the doctors are also attributing the migraines to stress- they told me to just try to regulate my stress. How do you know what frequencies affect you?  [info] None [info] 1419212631
jbug8 [info] I had a miscarriage in November, recently I was diagnosed with anxiety associated with ttc again. sometimes I feel like a can’t breathe, it’s not easy and I hope your able to take care of yourself in this journey too ♥️ [info] None [info] 1550987248
TrillionStab [info] I could see it being a result of being anxious or depressed, but not one of the contributing factors of it. My eyes weren't ever dry before I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1501347080
bluerbythesecond [info] You are right, but I don't think I can. My parents don't really believe in mental illnesses of any sort, or even talking to counselors or psychologists. Like they'd just force me to eat if I did tell them about this. I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on medication, a month later they decided theres no such thing as needing medication for anxiety and I just need to grow out of it  [info] None [info] 1522430484
Obversa [info] Same here. Yes, I absolutely consider myself disabled.Not just because I'm autistic, but because I've been diagnosed with anxiety so bad at times that it *is* disabling. My diagnosing psychologist even wrote up a document for me to be excused from speech class due to said anxiety. [info] ASD Female [info] 1558801463
starshine33 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety pre-trauma, but I definitely agree that my anxiety has gotten a lot worse since the event. I'll ask my therapist about it, thanks so much :)  [info]  [info] 1552927046
that_gingergirl [info] I realize that I am perfectly safe smoking trees. The only negative effects have been anxiety attacks, but there were only a few, and they aren't just caused by toking. (I am diagnosed with anxiety, so, the fact that I was smoking at the time is likely only circumstance.) But, because they occurred a few times while toking, my mind wants to take that as my experience all around, and I KNOW I've had plenty more experiences where I was incredibly happy and relaxed. It's just this silly mind game I need to work through getting over. [info] None [info] 1324767291
Adaptasap123 [info] I’m simply implying that I’m not upping dosages or feel the need to at all. I’m implying that this specific drug is doing its job correctly. I did a little research and benzos have such a bad rep because people on the street love to use them recreationally. Take it under supervision (as I do prescribed by a doctor) and you’ll be fine. Exactly the same goes for any other drug and alcohol. I’m implying that what you’re saying is incorrect to MY PERSONAL EXPERIENCE and not “facts”. It’s easy because I don’t have that addictive personality.Your question is basically the same scenario as if I broke an arm and a doctor insisted I take morphine and I for a bit refuse to because it’s easy to resist the pain all because I have a high pain tolerance or don’t want to take it then you asking if it’s so easy to resist, why get the doctor to give you some? How stupid? I was diagnosed with anxiety officially and the drug manufactured (benzos) for anxiety, is working. It doesn’t automatically mean I HAVE to take it daily either. Some people are prescribed benzos as a every now and then prescription. Stop being ignorant. [info] None [info] 1507040561
Redsebir [info] I wasn't diagnosed with PTSD. I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1443206009
apple_pi_314 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and needed to start on medication for that. After starting, I started getting some nausea (a totally normal side effect) but the psychiatrist at the college counseling center kept insisting it was my seizure meds and that I should stop taking them. I’d been on them with no issue for THREE YEARS! When I told her that, she kept citing where she got her degree from and that she obviously knew best. My neurologist, who is the most intelligent woman I’ve ever met and I had a good laugh about it later. [info] None [info] 1561210615
myknifeurlife [info] I would say mentally ill before I found emo, at least got really into emo. When I was young (age 10) I found bands that I felt were emo but was only somewhat into them.  As I got older I was diagnosed with anxiety and it wasn't until maybe 3 years later I found and fell in love with emo music.  From the age of 19 to now (23), I would say that emo music became a remedy for sure, or at least a great way to know that I wasn't alone in a lot of the feelings I had.  Now, I still love the music, and I honestly feel like it helped me learn a lot about myself and find out what (i hate using this word lol) triggers my anxiety.  Now, its pretty rare for me to get the same bad anxiety attacks I used to get, I still have my problems with my anxiety disorder but overall it has gotten a lot better and I honestly can say I feel like emo music had a lot to do with it. [info] None [info] 1510759464
Cassi333 [info] At 22 I've been diagnosed with anxiety though I (and a few I know with AS)  suspect that's not all it is. Haven't gotten a doctor to take me serious though -.- [info] None [info] 1391367939
civilvillage1419 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder ( Obssesive Compulsive Disorder) [info] None [info] 1569385758
Bananasticker642 [info] Thank you for your comment. I have been diagnosed with anxiety from my doctor a few years ago.  For the most part I have it under control and am no longer taking any medication. But for this, my main problem is just the unknown. I know medically what sleep apnea is, but that doesn't help with the everyday part. I was just looking for real life stories to get a better idea of what happens during a sleep study and how people deal with a CPAP everyday.Like... how are the wires attached to your head? Do they pull your hair? I am very tenderheaded. Do they visually watch you while you sleep (on camera or something), or is it just when the machines go offline they come in? [info] None [info] 1534354503
sarty [info] Exactly the same thing happened to me.  Was diagnosed with IBS and they gave me something called Levin/SL (a little tab to put under my tongue that basically makes part of your nervous system chill out and stops the cramping).Later, when I was diagnosed with anxiety, the SSRI and/or the benzo that I took made that symptom go away.  It was always worse in the mornings and always if I had to go somewhere (no pun intended, ha!).  If I were to stay home, it wouldn't happen.   [info] None [info] 1364011813
chromakeydreamc0at [info] I recently got a weighted blanket and it has really started to help my quality of sleep. It holds you down firmly in the bed and just feels safe and calming. Other than that, I would suggest seeing a doctor. Do you ever feel anxious? I was diagnosed with anxiety later in life and realized how it affected my sleep as well. A doctor could look into that or any other possible sleep disorders.  [info] None [info] 1545967227
ItsJustLittleOldMe [info] I have felt the same as you and I understand your fear but you are probably NOT about to die. (I am not a doctor, but you were just examined by one who said the same.)   :)   I know exactly what you mean about the "before people die" thing. I cannot tell you how many times I have been afraid I was about to die. Trust me, it was a LOT but I didn't die any of those times.You, like me, have anxiety issues that sound like they are health-related. Hypochondria sucks. Anxiety sucks. Panic attacks suck. I know my friend. Look forward to that doctor appointment. I'm hoping it's with a mental health professional. They can help you.In the mean time, distract yourself when you start to worry. Count to yourself in threes, or say the alphabet backward. Mentally describe in detail something very mundane, like the car that's parked next to you, or the flower. YOU can actually experience panic symptoms without letting the fear take control. Don't be afraid of fear. I know it sounds crazy. You can experience the fear and let it pass by, reminding yourself that "this is just panic" and it will pass.The best type of mental health treatment for anxiety seems to be cognitive behavioral therapy and sometimes we need meds too. There is hope. I have seen people recover from just CBT. I have seen people recover from just meds. Sometimes it's a combination of both. Sometimes things get better and then bug us again from time to time and you need a little help from time to time. There is hope.Again, I am not a doctor but I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder over 20 years ago.I hope others will reply as well so you really know you are not alone. There are so many tips and things to try to put yourself at ease when you feel anxious.Stay well. You can do it!   :) [info] None [info] 1439760892
GreyPokedri [info] I came here so pissed because I was diagnosed with anxiety and I thought you thought it was a joke until I actually read it. I couldn't agree more. Thank you! [info] None [info] 1545198315
ChimpWithAGun [info] You're not stupid or weak. I also have anxiety, and I definitely don't consider myself any of those things. I've always considered myself a smart, friendly guy, with big objectives and a big heart.When I was diagnosed with anxiety, I realized a lot of stuff about myself: I understood why I was so obsessive, and why I felt bad when things didn't go as expected. I developed defense mechanisms (a term that my psychiatrist taught me) very quickly, by reading a lot, understanding my disorder, and applying what I was learning to my daily life. Little by little, I was able to control it (99% of the time).Don't feel bad. Be patient. It can't be fixed immediately, just like any illness. But the good thing is that, contrary to any other illness (flu, cancer, etc.) you can actually fix it... with your own mind!Let me know if you have any questions. I'd be glad to help you. You're not alone. And again, you are not stupid or weak. I've learned that usually the smartest people and the ones that are dealing with hard stuff are the ones that get anxiety. [info] None [info] 1409026516
ButReallyFolks [info] I feel you.  When I was in the process of the long road to my MS diagnosis, I was told upon arriving to the ER by the triage guy that I had anxiety. I didn't. But that night I was diagnosed with anxiety by the ER staff, as well. Brain fog and tingling arms and legs = anxiety.  Ever since then my doctors have labeled me with anxiety and major depressive disorder. I am circumstantially anxious - I strongly dislike doctors, and I have cried frequently at their offices because of how strongly I dislike visiting them and their disinterest in helping me. Apparently that makes me clinically anxious and depressed. Or I just want them to find out why I am having decreasing ability to breathe and immense lower back and hip pain. I was told it was anxiety and muscles. My MRI said a lot else. Go figure. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1574393164
Locke005 [info] Same here!  I've been diagnosed with anxiety in the past and I think this is pretty common for people with anxiety.  If I ever look up some symptoms I am having on the Internet I always think I have the worst possible illness. WebMD is very bad for me. [info] None [info] 1270824107
OhNoFlyingRhino [info] Would you have other resources? My problem is embarrassment. My mind remembers all the embarrassments and I blurt our an expletive. I hate this but I can’t seem to control it. I have been diagnosed with anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1546205859
Ailouros_Venom [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety.  I was livid reading all of the demands and then the NEED for the spotlight.  Holy shit. I was almost seeing red.  I got such a justice boner when you called her out.   [info] None [info] 1503721929
annmarieg5 [info] I feel the same. I have allergy induced asthma (during the spring I find it really hard to breathe, or when exercising outside. I have an inhaler and it works fine.) But before I was diagnosed with anxiety I would just be sitting at home on my couch and suddenly it would get hard to breathe. Thought I was having an asthma attack and would get frustrated when my inhaler didn't help. Now I realize its a panic attack (so much better right?! lol) I just have to lay down and try my hardest the breathe in deeply and remind myself im not having an asthma attack and treat myself for the panic attack (talking to someone, breathing exercises, taking my emergency meds). Idk if this helped but yeah... [info] None [info] 1529839294
localTXmom [info] I used to be like this until I was diagnosed with anxiety and started on an antidepressant, try talking to your husband but also talk to your doctor as well, I feel so much better and in control now that my hormones are balanced [info] None [info] 1572844260
Jperez06 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety a while back. And if I tell them, I have a feeling theyle say its cuz i dont do anything and play video.games all day. [info] None [info] 1564282934
SeaBeeDecodesLife [info] You’re absolutely not over-thinking it. She wants you to handle your child’s aggression and control issues by aggressively shoving him in the shower and showing him that you can overpower him. It just makes me sad that people act like children that young have no feelings, and the only way to get through to them is by physically overpowering them and proving that you’re the boss. But in reality, whatever your son’s dealing with is an emotional issue, and he’s throwing tantrums because he’s unable to verbally express what he’s going through and he’s frustrated. If there was an adult who started crying because they were in the middle of an argument and they were unable to express their feelings accurately, would we presume they were just trying to be difficult and grab them and shove them in the shower? No. Kids have feelings too, and deserve to be emotionally validated and have time to learn how to express what’s going on inside of them, not be physically overpowered. God, I’m sorry. You’re a wonderful mother though, and she shouldn’t have tried to target you like that in a vulnerable time. In all reality, she might’ve genuinely thought she was being helpful, but you just *don’t* handle a child that way when they’re struggling emotionally.Hell, I remember throwing tons of tantrums when I was four just because I was so frustrated. I was witnessing things kids shouldn’t have had to witness, and I didn’t know how to verbally express what was happening or what I was feeling, so I just cried and screamed to get the anger and frustration and grief out whenever something triggered me. I was diagnosed with anxiety that same year, when everyone else had been telling my mother to whoop my ass. I can’t imagine how horrifically traumatised id be if she really had done that, or shoved me in a cold shower, when I was struggling like that—because I *remember* what I was feeling. Anyway, I’m rambling, but I hope I gave you another perspective so you feel a tad more valid in your response. [info] None [info] 1548311486
myothersecretreddit [info] My entire life, I’ve felt different than other kids my age. I don’t mean that I think I’m better, just that I don’t really understand why other people do what they do. I’ve always been a weird kid, I struggled to make friends at school, I have really intense interests, shitty concentration skills, and a lot of other stuff. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was really young, so most people around me just found a way to blame how I acted on that.One day when I was 15, I was browsing tumblr and came across a post describing some common traits that people with undiagnosed autism might have. I related to almost all of them. I ended up on a blog full of resources for autistic people, and went through the diagnostic criteria (I’ve always been a bit of a hypochondriac, so I tried to do my research before jumping to any conclusions). I fit the criteria. On top of that, I found out that when I was around 8 or 9, I was actually assessed to see if I was autistic, but we never got the results.I brought it up with my psychologist and she referred me for a neurodevelopment assessment, it took literal years but in August I was finally diagnosed with autism and adhd. I feel like I know myself a lot better now, and if I think something’s wrong, I listen to my worries instead of brushing it off. [info] None [info] 1570744060
PM_ME_4_COKE_HOOKUP [info] I'm 24 and I've never had a seizure. Could I still have epilepsy?I know I have anxiety.I've been diagnosed with anxiety, panic disorder (under control mostly), ADHD. [info] None [info] 1440417662
jamison1325 [info] Hands down good, consistent supervision with your supervisor.Being able to keep work at work and not bring it home with you.Boundaries with work and personal life.Therapy! It’s great to vent to someone who isn’t part of your family and friends circle.Taking time away/off from work.Not to take away from your post, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I don’t take medication, but I’m able to manage my anxiety from going into overload especially in this field of work. I actually switched jobs over the summer because my anxiety at my old organization was spinning out of control without a present supervisor, stagnant conditions, low morale, and stress everywhere. Without consistent supervision and a supportive supervisor/director, I started to question my decision to become a social worker. Since my switch, I feel completely supported with weekly supervision and a wonderful supervisor! [info] LGSW, Treatment Foster Care [info] 1543193043
ahanna5291 [info] This sounds a lot like something I went through a few years ago. It was really intense. I was diagnosed with anxiety and went through some trial and error with medications but ultimately decided to deal with it without the meds. Some of the things I experienced struck me on such a deep level that I'm still looking for rational answers today.  [info] None [info] 1537674253
Servalpur [info] You're right, I didn't word that correctly at all. Where I said "sane", I should have said "capable". Generally when people hear the phrase mental illness, they automatically link to the capability of the person. I'm guilty of it too, even though I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders, a form of mental illness.That said, my point was that if this witch was capable of producing a potion or spell which could bend the will of someone to fit her wishes, she was also capable of creating some kind of life for herself and her son. [info] None [info] 1478126828
Kennyv777 [info] I was once diagnosed with ADHD. Nobody seems to now. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and that sadly stuck. So possibly. [info] None [info] 1569094845
HarleeeQuin [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and acute stress disorder after going through an abuse relationship *(before opiate use even started)* and one of the main reasons I continued use was because my anxiety just disappeared and I could finally function normal again as weird as that might sound?i got to week 2 clean and my anxiety started to get bad again, really bad and that was the reason I relapsed. I couldn’t take it anymore.That’s good that they know and you can be honest and not feeling your hiding anything. I feel terrible for hiding it but I know it’s best this way.Yeah if it wasn’t for the sub and the people who I’ve talked to then I’d definitely be in a way worse place. I think I actually need to make posts or talk to people here when I am going through withdrawals or feeling like my mental health is really bad. I think it give me a higher chance to get through it being able to talk to people who can relate / understand what I’m going through. Edit - I got to 15 days being clean before my anxiety started to get bad again  [info] None [info] 1544659274
PossibleAssHat [info] Okay, well now you have an angle to approach him, really. And I don't mean in a hostile way at all. Do you think you could have a conversation with him reasonably and express your concerns? I'm sure he's probably worried about what will happen when his parents pass anyway.His parents ARE enabling his behavior, and that's shitty. Probably not out of lack of love but just because they don't know what else to do. You said you don't speak to him much? Is he a complete jerk? I'm asking because if he's not, he might really need a friend.It's nice to know when someone cares. I had a good friend that was patient with me, but also helped me out of my shell, really. She is one of the best people I have ever met and I will always hold her in very high regard. Woman changed my life.That being said, don't do anything for this guy that would be a drain on you, but maybe he does really need a friend. It does sound familiar. It sounds very familiar to me. Not exactly the same circumstances, but I felt a bit like I was reading about myself and I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders. I could relate to what you described. [info] None [info] 1430412962
EchoVixen [info] My partner and I have a similar chemistry. I worry a lot about the big things and the little things. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago. My partner, on the other hand, is the most relaxed person I know. Everything washes over him, nothing phases him. I love him dearly and I know he loves me, but I still worry that my anxiety is grating on him and I sometimes wish he would reassure me the way you do in your post. That being said, he's never been one for speeches or romantic gestures and just as he accepts me, I accept him. He's affectionate in his own way. You seem like a genuinely great person, I hope you and your partner have an amazing future together. [info] None [info] 1540652289
Chrispat91 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 19. I still struggle with it from time to time, but seeing somebody has been the best decision I have ever made. I still see my guy at least once every 2 weeks, and I can manage the anxiety and paranoia very well. [info] None [info] 1378905691
babygorilla90 [info] Thanks, makes sense since i am diagnosed with anxiety. Although i do have a very faint wheeze but it's getting better. [info] None [info] 1533587861
09cjones1 [info] Sometimes it can be situational - I've been diagnosed with anxiety when a lot of it was my situation.  Is there anything you can do about the working situation?  And while meds aren't for everybody, I still think anybody can benefit from therapy. [info] None [info] 1454450191
fallenbutrisen [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder (GAD) and panic disorder and he reckons my other symptoms are caused by insomnia, regular caffeine overdose and ptsd from abuse in childhood. [info] None [info] 1520122351
Terradoe [info] I couldn't agree with this more. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I have always had (undiagnosed) stomach issues. Because of life getting in the way, I have missed 2 weeks of my normal gym routine. I am having diarrhea and mind boggling cramps every day and my anxiety is so through the roof that I'm in a constant state of over stimulation, panic, and feeling like I'm going to throw up. Please note, I do not feel ANY of the above symptoms  (minus very occasional over stimulation and panic) when I work out regularly. Exercise really does make mental health problems significantly easier to manage.  [info] None [info] 1531618875
thisisallsoreddit [info] For sure, I was diagnosed with anxiety a couple years ago. I still use a ton of avoidance techniques but the doc prescribed me some beta-blockers and they seriously changed my life. they let me keep control [info] None [info] 1493148276
stebbiv [info] I had this issue constantly since the equivalent of junior high and I ended up dropping out of college. - Years later I was diagnosed with anxiety, that has been causing all sorts of serious issues.So yeah. Find a clynical psychologist to help you out. Maybe your school can help you out. I literally lost years because of this and now I'm 28 and just getting back on track. (Or so I think.) [info]  [info] 1411947844
HannahBAnderson [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety in 4th grade my dad came up to me and started ranting about how "all [I] need is Jesus," like I'm some sort of depraved sinner and he (my dad) knows better than me. [info] None [info] 1492320613
tapstar2012 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety before I was diagnosed with ADHD. Your doctor may try doing an anxiety med that’s everyday that helps with general anxiety and then maybe something for panic attacks, obviously everyone is different but I take Prozac (anti-anxiety/anti-depressant) and adderall daily in the morning and then if I have a panic attack or am doing something that I know will trigger one I’m prescribed Xanax as needed. The daily pill really helped with my overall day to day anxiety but I know people are different :) I hope your doctor can help you!!Edit: 1 25 mg adderall ER, 30mg Prozac, 10mg adderall IR if I have long days and then 0.25mg of Xanax for panic [info] None [info] 1572628102
yumkittentits [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I try to make sure I get enough sleep, and don't go forever without eating. Those two things have helped me a lot. The rest of it for me is a mental game, and talking myself down from my anxiety.  [info] Ø [info] 1384055295
bluechupathing2 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and borderline personality disorder, so it that wouldn't be stretch. As for more details, we don't really ever fight, and when we do, we try to talk about it after some space. We spend most nights and weekends together. We're both homebodies, but there haven't been any moments of having a wandering eye, or thinking about how bored I am, which, if I had experienced anything like that, then I could rationally address those, but it was just this wave of fixation on these worries  [info] None [info] 1518554405
rachel095 [info] UPDATE:Thank you to everyone who has commented/PM'ed/read and thought of me. I have been diagnosed with anxiety which explains a lot of my symptoms as far as the overwhelmed feelings and crying for 'no reason'. I've been prescribed some medication for emergency situations and am feeling much better now. Thanks again everyone [info] None [info] 1422568637
throwy09 [info] &gt; anxiety and adhd are often confused for one another, particularly in womenCan you give me more details about this? I've been diagnosed with anxiety and Xanax doesn't really work I think.  [info] None [info] 1546622989
WaffleWolf124 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety [info] Plays MineCraft and not FortNite [info] 1574350108
mustafa80 [info] yeah being anxious doesnt excuse his actions. this is both blatant apologism and trivialization of that condition. I've been diagnosed with anxiety most of my life but I dont allow it to be an excuse for my shortcomings. stop trying to stick up for a man who already has a god complex anyways. [info] None [info] 1534370932
dfuentez [info] She might have a psychological issue. Once my boss drove me to the ER because I was having heart attack symptoms and i was in so much pain i was crying my eyes out (i dont cry for physical pain usually). I was diagnosed with anxiety and didnt even know. Help her find mental health [info] None [info] 1528888113
AverageRedditorMaybe [info] Dunno if 1 in a million but here goes. When I was 13 I smoked some spice not sure how much a little over a bowl of it. This is the same shit that killed otherwise healthy adults. I was born with Marfan syndrome so I have heart issues. Now immediately after smoking it this time I noticed something was way wrong compared to the other 10 or so times I’ve smoked it. Not sure what it was as I don’t completely remember but I rushed home and said I need to go to the hospital and told my mom everything. My uncle said to sleep I was having a bad trip I’ll be okay. Mom took me to the hospital where they rushed me in put me on an iv and oxygen to purge stuff out of my system everyone was clambering around and I remember taking a look at the heart monitor thingy. I saw my bpm rising 140,150,170,180,190 I started to think my heart was gonna give out completely at that moment and just flipped my shit. I managed to calm down due to this cool nurse talking me through it. At the time I was completely detached from reality and felt like I was in a dream. No exaggerations everything felt fabricated. My hearing felt distorted and had a ring to it. My vision was cloudy and tunneled. I pulled through when 10 mins later a cop came in to ask me some questions. He told me “yknow you got really lucky, when they called me down here they told me I would be here to arrest your mother and I wouldn’t be able to ask you any questions” implying that the doctors thought I wasn’t gonna survive. Still alive today with ptsd related toward any drugs. Took me 2 or so years to recover from that dreamy state. Imagine 2 years of feeling like you’re still in a dream. After that I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder but at least  I’m still alive. [info] None [info] 1550745655
kelseylynne90 [info] Has he looked into IBS? I had issues similar before I was diagnosed with anxiety at 17 (I’m almost 29 now) and my stomach is still wonky as hell.  [info] None [info] 1548881392
iloveanimals77 [info] A year ago I thought I had heart problems and saw a cardiologist and nothing came up so I was like huh weird. Also I have been seeing a therapist for about 4 years now. That year specifically was really bad for me emotionally and low and behold I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on lexapro and it does help me a lot I just wish I didn't have to take it due to a lot of negative side affects and for whenever I have to stop taking it like pregnancy withdrawal will be living hell. So I would love to one day be able to deal with my anxiety without medication. [info] None [info] 1459890575
masterofnone_ [info] Yes.  My palms start to sweat, my pulse increases, I get very fidgety and I have no idea why.  This usually happens when nothing is going on around me.  Unfortunately I was diagnosed with anxiety only recently, therefore I cannot provide and useful advice.  Sorry. At least you know you’re not alone in this.  [info] None [info] 1514868521
rough_lovely [info] I have been using CBD for about a year. I was diagnosed with anxiety, panic attacks and major depressive disorder after my husband passed from brain cancer at a very young age. It has worked better for me than all of the prescribed pills combined. It gives me an overall sence of calm and I sleep immensely better, which allows my body to recover.  I am not longer taking my prescriptions and let me say..the fog has lifted and I am overall feeling like I can tackle (most) everyday. The only downfall seems to be the high price of the oil. It runs me about $80/month (1 750mg bottle). It's definitely worth a shot if you can afford it. [info] None [info] 1548279310
UnknownRen [info] No need to be downvoted for your own beliefs. I mentioned in the story that I know how the brain works and that I could be "forcing myself to see this things". It could very well be my anxiety because I was diagnosed with anxiety a while back. I just can't shake the feeling that it's more than that though, ya know? I will try that camera setup recommendation though. Thanks! [info] None [info] 1474302645
wtlaw [info] Diagnosis - the identification of the nature of an illness...  I was diagnosed with anxiety. Does that mean it's not a mental illness? How is it wrong? There is nothing wrong with mental illness. You're mentally ill in how you don't agree with your prescribed birth sex.I was commenting on the post-op because you were saying that it can cure them of their gender dysphoria.  [info]  [info] 1501090124
IslandPanda [info] Typically just pack a bowl for myself, haven't smoked anything rolled in while because i haven't really needed to and it's way to harsh on my lungs anymore. I'd prefer to be smoked up then out, I don't like getting uncomfortably high. I'd love to have a favorite lighter and at times I have had one but more often than not they get stolen or misplaced, so typically I just use the one that's closest. Sooo hard to choose I like them all and all really have there intended purpose, anything rolled is better for groups. I typically smoke a bowl but find them super hard to pull. Bongs are excellent and a lot smoother and waste a lot less I feel. I've never done a dab, though I am curious. We don't get them around here often. My first time was with an edible, it was a brownie a friend made. I was stoned for a good few hours, playing video games and laughing my ass off. That's a hard question to answer I used to like smoking with people but anymore I find most of them annoying (because of other reasons) and I just get really uncomfortable at times. I like smoking alone because more often than not it's to go to sleep or unwind watch a movie in peace and quiet. I love riding around or going to somewhere with a lot of nature, it's more peaceful. I feel more tired now, relaxed, can honestly say I don't get the munchies really anymore. I like to smoke in my bed wrapped up in my blankets ahahah. But when it's nice the patio is my preferred area. I loved having a grinder got rid of it so now I'm forced to use the tools god gave me. I cough constantly I cough before I hit the damn thing. Hey my best friends dad always said you gotta cough to get off. I used to all the time, but because of work and everything else it's a rare occasion, but every now and then a wake and bake does occur. I like to smoke at night that's one thing that hasn't changed ever since I started smoking i loved smoking at night, I just think it's a little more relaxed and yes a little less inconspicuous. Stash: elephant bowl, cool bowl I got for only 5 bucks and is really nice pink and green, lip stick bowl, clear one hitter, cigarette hitter, dugout, pipe cleaners, papers, container, extra lighters. I've had a lot of piece and a lot of them i've given to friends because i've quit a few times or because of my living situation at times I couldn't have certain things. I definitely double on papers why I don't know because I rarely use them, but never have them when I need them. 12 I think, I just bought a huge pack so that's why I have so many but rest assured in a week i'll have 1. It used to and it was definitely a perk but now and I think it has to do with how you use it and what strain, it pretty much makes me the exact opposite. It really depends with friends blunts on blunts, by myself and depending on what time I have to be up a 1-5 bowls. If I have a rare thing called a day off I'll smoke hitters all day. Most of my friends and family. I try to hide it out of respect not that my parents really care anymore. It was an issue in the past for separate reasons, but now things are different. Yes i've been using it as a medicine for about 8 years now, it helps with a lot of issues I have. I've been diagnosed with anxiety issues and I am still currently on prescribed medicine and I take them and smoke (not that I'm saying someone else should) and I find it works very well together. I feel like it is my multi-vitamin in a sense because the prescribed medicine is just for anxiety while weed takes care of all the other things as well. I felt a little dependent on it when I was younger, but that was more circumstantial than anything. I've had to stop for jobs and just for tolerance, I've quit for up to 6 months before and i've had spurts of quitting for a month at time because of finances and what not. It really wasn't difficult at all. I'd say the first week is the "worst" and it's more being around it or being bored. I'm really glad you did this it will be kind of interesting to see what everybody thinks and says and their own personal opinions.   [info] None [info] 1461532702
Evergreen19 [info] I had the same problem until I was diagnosed with anxiety and started taking Prozac. You should probably see a doctor. [info] None [info] 1559847382
tootphaste [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, ADHD, and major depressive disorder early in life. When I first heard that it was approved by the board I was excited for the news of it being added. Unfortunately the Secretary of Health for PA postponed adding it in the May meeting. As someone who self treats in the shadows because it's better to be at risk of a fine instead of at risk of self destruction, this news has brought me incredible joy. [info] None [info] 1562874912
tokiistheking [info] Dear god I was just diagnosed with anxiety (my dad also has GAD) but I've been having a ton of weird head stuff as well. Sharp stabbing pains, tingling on the head and face, kinda like numbness....  should I worry or is it just anxiety? The world may never know.  [info] None [info] 1506041893
quiet156 [info] I’m actually far more cautious about dating now. I don’t worry about myself getting hurt, but I often find myself worrying about if I date someone, will they abuse or kill my bunny if they turn out to be abusive? What are the warning signs of someone like that? I have this tiny creature I love and want to protect, and you just never know what’s going on in someone else’s mind. It’s made me leery of online dating, or really dating much at all.All that said, I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was a kid, as I have a distinct tendency to worry about and expect the absolute worst things that could happen. But I’m in therapy, and have been since before I got into true crime. I think reading all this has simply given me actual situations to stress over. It’s why I do my best to avoid any and all stories with animals getting hurt, especially rabbits. I don’t need those thoughts and images in my brain. I make up enough on my own. [info] None [info] 1512200369
YourBoinLoins [info] Yeah it started as getting turnt once in a while, then I started selling, then it turned into self medicating because I was diagnosed with anxiety but the Lexapro they put me on didn't help at all. Now I stopped selling and just mostly self medicate but I still get pretty fucked up off them once in a while. It's a slippery slope but I think I'm ok for the most part right now. It hasn't effected my job or education so far.Edit: I just realized typing out a paragraph trynna explain and rationalize my use is kinda fiendish... [info] None [info] 1463545599
GnomeMadness [info] I had the same thing happen to me with the sunlight. As the sun was setting and I was in the shaded area, I felt like I needed to run to catch up with where the light was still shining. Also, the breathing part sounds like minor hyperventilating. I can only say that I was diagnosed with anxiety having experienced what you describe.Don't freak yourself out trying to diagnose yourself with anything further because everyone finds something if they start researching symptoms. It's hard to not think all sorts of things to worry yourself about everything you feel, but do your best not to.  Just talk to your doctor, and if he/she thinks it's anxiety, they will point you in the right direction, probably to a therapist.  [info] None [info] 1531053432
Kephrii [info] Absolutely! I definitely need to address my own insecurities. I am diagnosed with anxiety which makes it quite difficult. I am seeing a behavioral health specialist and am trying to work through my issues. Unfortunately, it isn't something that I can just magically get over overnight. [info] None [info] 1531382767
dunechka [info] The presumptions again, son. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder, hence my personal stake on the subject and why I'm very comfortable letting you know that your language is harmful. [info] Legs n. thighs. No biscuits  [info] 1475592163
FecusTPeekusberg [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in the top 1% of all anxiety sufferers... yay me... [info] None [info] 1504998047
Casualjeeper [info] If you quit before your first day you're basically throwing away any shot you have at a job in the future. Think about how many people work for the postal service. You can do this. I was diagnosed with anxiety by my therapist and here I am 3 months later (as a CCA) freakin getting it done. I like to think this job has made me mentally stronger and better at handling stress. Now I look forward to work everyday, they have me working 6 days per week, it's tough but I'm just happy that money isn't an issue anymore. [info] CCA [info] 1566773705
rubenmc11 [info] I can tell you probably haven't read most of Neville's teachings, I have... Now, 5 months ago I was diagnosed with anxiety, 2 years ago I was in a toxic relationship that hurt my self-esteem because I had weight issues, I'm 5' 10'' and was 225 pounds. I have been going to the gym for 1 year, at the most 3 times per week and haven't had great results until recently, What did I do? I have been imagining my friends surprised faces, huge smiles, all of them are happy congratulating me on how good I look... What has happened? I have been going to the gym 5 times per week, I'm doing intermittent fasting and I'm not struggling at all, I've been walking with a 20 pound vest on and jumping rope every day for the past 5 weeks and most importantly I went from being a 36 to 33 waist, I could be a 32 but my legs are getting big (BTW I used to hate doing legs, and now I love it) and have lost 16 pounds of fat in 5 weeks.... I'm not forcing any of this, I'M ENJOYING IT... so I'm manifesting losing weight, how is this happening? I'm enjoying my workouts, I'm not hungry in the mornings any more, I have motivation to go and work out twice per day.&amp;#x200B;You live in the world of CAESAR, things take time and most of the time you have to go through a process... If you expect to imagine the scene of your wish fulfilled and wake up tomorrow with a greek god body or being the president of the United States... well, I have bad news for you... [info] None [info] 1563946674
mikachuu [info] This all sounds like really wonderful advice.  I just don't know if I'm able to do it.  I'm in my (technically) last year of college, and I'm the biggest procrastinator.  I've not been diagnosed with ADHD, but I do feel like so many of my thoughts/actions are out of control, even though I seem very calm on the outside.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety big time, but basically my GPA is a 2.3 and I don't think I have enough time to even raise it up over a 3.0.  I feel like I'm too far gone, and it's definitely the electronics.  I'm surrounded by them.  Like you said, they can eat up hours at a time and you don't even notice until it's too late.  With me, I do notice and I mess around on my laptop or phone anyway.  So it all comes down to willpower, which I don't have any left.  The only way I've made it this far is by forcing myself to wait until the last minute and then cramming everything in while I'm at school.  That needs to stop ASAP, but I just can't break the cycle.  Sorry for rambling, but your post just really made me think about where I am in actuality, not where everyone thinks I am.  I tell people all the time that I'm just a fraud, but they laugh it off.  They don't know how difficult it is... or maybe they do and don't believe me.  Either way, I know I need help and there's too much standing in my way to even start.   [info] None [info] 1396268185
mespdx [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety which I think is a huge aspect contributing to this problem. My therapist is out of town but I made plans to meet with her when she gets back. We definitely had a rough (in a good way lol) sex life before, you gave me some good ideas on how to bring that back. Thanks! [info] None [info] 1510002675
jhennesy [info] I don't know how much it relates to your story, but about four years ago I lost 30 pounds, and had an oddly negative reaction to the compliments I was getting. I didn't feel that comfortable on my body, so the encouragement didn't feel like it was really about me feeling good, but rather just society's mess about weight. I didn't have issues eating (except one week when I was in a really bad mental state), but I was having panic attacks that moved to the point of my throwing up about once a week. At some point, I realized that's what they were, and got in to see a doctor about it. In my case, I was diagnosed with anxiety and given some medication to help. Once I understood the anxiety, I was able to deal with the panic attacks better. I'd definitely recommend getting in to a doctor or a therapist. I've now been off the medication for about two and a half years, and from better understanding I haven't thrown up from a panic attack in over two. I'm unfortunately almost back up to the weight I was before, but I hadn't originally tried to lose weight (turns out, having your digestive system shut down will do that to you). I also haven't tried to maintain that weight loss. But my mental health is so much better now.  [info] None [info] 1371300784
texasagrg [info] I'm not condoning drugs... but have you considered going to a psychiatrist for anxiety. I was much the same as you - very shy, blushing, perpetually nervous, yet loved my content area and students - and I was diagnosed with anxiety. I started taking very small doses of anxiety meds and they have worked WONDERS for me. Another good idea for you is to apply as a sub &amp; cross your fingers for a long term position once the school year begins. If you are looking in the Houston area, I know Galena Park ISD as well as Cy Fair and Katy all have Social Studies positions listed. Best of luck :) [info] None [info] 1501177821
JoeChristmasUSA [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in high school. Essentially, if I am faced with a problem in work or personal life, I could not sleep if it was solved. It would play over and over and roll around in my head, even if I could do absolutely nothing about it in my head. And often these "problems" were solved in minutes, after being built up for hours on hours in my mind.I am now 1 week into a doctor-guided "tapering off" of my medicine. After a year of treatment I feel much better. [info] None [info] 1447297643
txmsh3r [info] You know I was actually thinking of this a few days ago. I must have been about four, but one day I was riding on the bus with my mom, I turned to her and said, "Mom the bus is going to fall!" She would tell me that it wasn't possible and that I was just being silly. Now, i'm in my early 20s and I'm realizing this moment was probably one of the first anxious moments I ever had as a being. I was diagnosed with anxiety this year and prescribed anxiety medication, for the first time, last month.  [info] None [info] 1447047175
relicater [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety over 4 years ago, it's different  [info] None [info] 1551990184
moremeds [info] Ever since I was a kid, I knew something was off. I could never put my finger on it. I grew up telling my parents I was sick with something, and I grew up being told off for faking. The pain got worse and worse, and everything started going wrong. I stopped being able to go to school because I was in so much pain. My schools, my teachers, uncaring doctors, my family all yelled at me throughout my childhood. I was forced on antidepressants and anxiety medicine and some other things because everyone was convinced I was faking the pain. My organs were slowing down and I was diagnosed with anxiety. They all thought it was anxiety. Nobody believed me. It took over a decade for me to get any sort of diagnosis, and now I might only have a few years to live. Maybe if someone believed me sooner, I would have been able to have a childhood. I was too sick and in too much pain and all my teachers hated me so my classmates did too. I grew up with very few friends and if someone believed me I would have been able to do so much more. Now I have lived nothing and might die having lived nothing.  [info] None [info] 1521733793
mappingmeows [info] MFW in the last 4 days, I was diagnosed with anxiety, I've been coughing up chunks, my 89 year old roommate had a mini stroke, my thesis has been freaking me out and my bf is no help at all and says "you're fine" or "you're not that sick". [info] None [info] 1475853041
MrsTheJones [info] Never apologize. This is what this subreddit is for. I'm a woman too and I know exactly how you feel. And the multiple headaches? Yup, I've had a headache every single day since I was diagnosed with anxiety a year ago. This subreddit is here anytime you need to vent.  [info] None [info] 1406094087
kuhatelyn [info] Yes! I was able to get accommodations all through college. I did need documentation, but if you have a psychiatrist on campus (or through private health) they can do it for you easily. I went through it before I knew what misophonia was, so I was diagnosed with anxiety. It's not too difficult of a process. If you're just open about it and talk about the symptoms you experience during testing and elsewhere, they can document it and send it over to the disabilities office. Once it's sent over you just have to sign some papers and coordinate with them whenever your classes change. At least that's how it was for my university. Good luck!!  [info] None [info] 1474357578
ReturnedAndReported [info] I did this for 20 years. In 4th grade, I would go to bed at 9 and get to sleep around 12:00. My mom wouldn't let me get out of bed, so I would literally lay there for 3 hours, silent, and horrified I wasn't going to get any sleep.Fast forward to my 30's and I was diagnosed with anxiety. I take a pill once a day and I can sleep like a baby. Oh, and I take ambien on Sunday nights so I can adjust my sleep schedule from late weekends nights to early mornings in the week. [info] None [info] 1483205606
misshobbit [info] Are you me? I swear we are the same person. Get a second opinion. While some anxiety symptoms can mimic ADHD, as others have already said, they often go together. u/titsmcfly explained it very well. I was diagnosed with anxiety while waiting to be tested for ADHD. I have both, and I'm pretty sure the ADHD is a major factor in the anxiety. The right anxiety meds can help, but they won't do anything for the ADHD obviously. I will say that having the anxiety under control does help me manage my ADHD better. Go a head and see the anxiety specialist, but find someone else for a second opinion on the ADHD.  [info] None [info] 1365647440
space_boat [info] This is true but I've been diagnosed with anxiety. Smoking probably doesn't help at all. [info] None [info] 1339640011
whoninj4 [info] I know this is 16 hours old, but here's my 2cents if you'd like it.It's been about 8 years since I've been diagnosed with anxiety and all 2,920 days of it I have had anxiety on my mind.  Some days are great, some days are the lowest of low.  Sometimes I wonder why all of my days can't be this good.  Other times I'm nauseated, sweating, everything on (and inside) my body hurts and I can't even see straight; and I wonder to God why the hell this happens to me.  Sometimes you're positive that in the next few minutes, you're going to die.For me, it's all about perspective.  Once I got all medically checked out and my doctor(s) were *sure* there was nothing wrong with me, I tried to change my outlook because anxiety is 100% mental.  Why am I doing this to myself? Why do I let myself succumb to this disorder?  I have a blessed life, I need to overcome this.  I've been to therapy every week for 3 years now and I can't even begin to tell you what a positive influence it has had in my life.  There are still good days and bad days, but I'm much more in control over my own thoughts.  It takes practice, and (for me) meditation, exercise and lots of herbal tea helps.Good luck in your life's journey and be happy! [info] None [info] 1357915260
-Perchta- [info] Ok thank you. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so you are probably correct. I was only able to eat a small amount last night so I’m going to try again right now. [info] None [info] 1569324234
kmw920 [info] There are several causes, including my family. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder in last May. Looking back I actually had a panic attack (couldn't breathe well) on the plane in June in 2017. I think these two years or so have intensified my anxiety. When more and more physical discomfort got accumulated in my body, I couldn't bear it anymore. Last May one night I had breathing difficulty (this problem emerged significantly in last April). I couldn't stand up. My limbs got so numb and cold and purple. Heart rate was fast. My family called the emergency line and I was sent to a hospital. I get worried and nervous easily since I was a kid. Also since primary school, I've been underweight. My BMI now is around 14.6.  [info] None [info] 1549642306
numbdemgumz [info] I have some mirtazipines and trazodones. I haven't even tried the mirtazipine. Might tonight. May mess with my taper schedule tho. My goal is come off sleeping pills all together. But then again I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder and sleep problems so maybe I'm shooting to high. I used to be able to enjoy myself with beers here and there. Maybe take a small dosage of a benzo if my anxiety flared up every couple weeks. I was able to live a life like that for a good 3 years after going through a hellish cold turkey withdrawal. Huge mistake that I started abusing these things again. [info] None [info] 1521239077
Micropod104326 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety but I can't say that I have it anymore.If you have Clinical Depression, then it could be a result of different physical reactions in your brain. There is a theory called Determinism which I think states that every action and thought is merely a result or reactions between particles in your brain.So that might explain a lot of mental illnesses and other things. [info] None [info] 1498039427
sushi-suspect [info] I'm obviously no expert, but I agree, reading this did not give me an ADHD vibe. Though, I coped pretty well with mine for most of my life and did okay. OP, SHS psych diagnosed me with ADHD (inattentive type) last year and the med I was put on changed my life. I was diagnosed with anxiety as a teen, but it's not so bad that I medicate for it - though my anxiety spikes when my ADHD symptoms are heightened, they're intertwined for me. Controlling my ADHD controls my anxiety, but medicating for anxiety never controlled my ADHD.I was seeing my SHS GP who tried to manage my symptoms (treated me mostly for anxiety) for a few months, but he put in a psych referral for me the first time I saw him. My psychiatrist diagnosed me quickly, but said it was obvious. The wait list is pretty awful for psych so if you're looking into it I'd start ASAP, get on the list before the next school year starts. [info] None [info] 1565416643
Rambo_One2 [info] A few years back I had a girlfriend, whom I ended up living with. Up till that point everything was fine, but when we moved in together everything went south within a few months. I was diagnosed with anxiety, and so I was not very happy at the time. As the manipulative jerk she was, she would try to pin it as my fault, saying stuff like "You've gone to bigger events, you can go to this one" and "well if you don't come, you're clearly not man enough for me."So I put myself through emotional torture, and whilst we were out somewhere (at a club or party), she'd leave me nervous and sweating in a corner, whilst she would go have fun (usually involving either talking to or dancing with other males.)Once she started getting the scent of my resentment of her, she started manipulating me even more, saying that she was the only reason I'd ever go out, and that she was too good for me, that I'd never find another one as understanding as her. I was terrified, since this was my first real girlfriend, and we'd been together for almost two years. What if she was right? Anyways, I started seeing a therapist, who told me that even though she had never physically assaulted me, she'd still consider this a very abusive relationship. So even though it was the one thing I feared the most (even despite my anxiety), I broke up with her and moved back in with my parents. I think she saw it coming, cause she took it pretty okay. Now I have the most understanding girlfriend I could ask for: she doesn't drag me along to events, and if we go, she doesn't just leave me, we keep each other company when the other person needs it, and we even live together (despite my obvious fear of moving in with yet another woman.) [info] None [info] 1502350847
JayJay729 [info] I have very little body fat and have some nice definition. My problem is that I have difficulty eating exorbitant amounts of food and therefore have trouble putting on weight and staying energized at the gym. I have found that SS requires lots and lots of eating and energy. I know I need to eat more, but I just have trouble doing so. I have been diagnosed with anxiety (GAD) and my lack of appetite is one of my biggest symptoms. When I'm hungry, I eat, and eat some more, but there are times during the day when I just don't feel hungry. Liquid food is easiest to get down, but I just don't have the time available to liquefy everything. [info] None [info] 1330381745
acajacks [info] I'm 21 and was forced to be diagnosed (I was smoking weed about eight times a day by myself, totally unaware that the benefits eg: I GOT TO CLASS ON TIME!!! in focus I received was in all actuality self-medication... my parents forced a legal alternative) my sophomore year of college. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder as well as an IQ of 140. I'm now a senior, I have a job, off-campus, and a puppy (for stress-relief/exercise/forces-a-schedule... MY NONDRUG MEDICATION!).Soooo I was forced with a diagnosis, placed on a stimulant, and set out into the world; apparently ready and treated, now able to solve my own problems.If I knew how to do better at doing what I know, I'd totally be doing exactly that. Running across this last night was the first time I've actually felt like someone really got what my problem was, and he finally explained for me the recursive essence in a parent proposing that the kid with ADD should go and find their own help, in order to learn to be a responsible problem-solving adult. I had never understood why self-help books didn't help me, given that I had read it cover to cover about my EXACT problem... and nothing changed, nothing was helped. That I can't seem to get help on my own creates this strange issue between my mom and myself in that, to her, it really must mean that I'm lazy, yet I know I'm not. [info] None [info] 1354590555
Colonel-Rosa [info] I was treated badly for mental illness in the UK. Some GPs are far better than others though. The first one I visited suggested I move 100 miles away to start a new job while knowing I was depressed. During that time away I almost committed suicide because I couldn't deal with the pressure of missing my family and work. Came back home, got a new GP and got referred to a counsellor where I was treated properly. I was diagnosed with anxiety problems and perfectionism in the end.PS. I am fully recovered now. [info] None [info] 1342682143
okaygosh [info] Ah, that makes sense, thank you (and for the slenderman sounding static, that's exactly what I heard). Although I don't have ADHD, I was diagnosed with anxiety recently (I've had it for years, actually around the time I stopped having nightmares is when I developed it but I just thought that I was just shy) and so maybe it could have be linked to that?I haven't experienced anything like that since, but I certainly hope I don't because I had this weird feeling of "this isn't right." [info] None [info] 1393815877
KatillacGirl [info] Thank you, I was diagnosed with anxiety at the same age as you, and this feels very different.  I do know that anxiety can morph itself to latch on to you too though!  I am really glad that I finally have a doctor who takes my concerns seriously and checks for things now.  My initial doctor would literally tell me EVERYTHING was anxiety.  I am very thin, (in fact underweight), but I have never been a super active person, so sometimes I think I'm just very out of shape.  But then I see other people who are wayyy more out of shape than I am, and they can still do things MUCH more easily, without feeling like they are going to die. :/I've noticed for me, that I push myself too hard when I feel good, because I actually hate sitting still, and then I am tuckered out for days at times.   I need about 10 hours of sleep a night, any less = Pain.  Too much = Pain + Anxiety.  I don't know why that is.  I'm still feeling super skeptical about whether I have fibro or not.  I feel like I might almost doubt it if my doctor tells me I have it, even though I relate so so much to the condition. [info] None [info] 1528903029
lilybear032 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and anorexia, when I really have Graves' disease. It got significantly worse early on in my pregnancy. I could have lost the baby because nobody ordered a simple blood draw.  [info] None [info] 1520466519
Yuio6789 [info] I never even told my parents about my BPD diagnosis. They're pretty hardcore narcissists and even when I was diagnosed with anxiety they told me it wasn't a real disorder. That everyone gets anxiety. They thought my panic attacks were episodes from drug use. Then when I actually did turn to drugs years later because I couldn't cope - they caught me and they never even asked if I was okay. All they could do was tell me how embarrassing it was to be the parent of a drug addict and how I should have considered how it made them feel and look to other people when I decided to do drugs specifically to hurt their feelings. They basically turn any conversation about my problems into their problems. I only talk to them about really basic things now. Like clothes or the weather or something. I've given up trying to be close to them. [info] None [info] 1518653642
bethestorm13 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and depressive tendencies. Everything just feels really frustrating at the moment. [info] None [info] 1570281093
kratos0530 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, I didn't realise this was related but now it's obvious to me. [info] None [info] 1567227506
KingBaby87 [info] Hello and welcome!Anxiety can feel like it is overwhelming and taking control of your life. Your job is to remind it that you are in charge.When I was diagnosed with anxiety, the first thing I did was read a book called DARE, by Barry McDonagh. It really calmed me down AND helped me better understand what anxiety is. It's an easy read, I finished it in one evening.I'd start there and see how you feel!  [info] None [info] 1524462918
SgtOceanus [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety. I feel like it's different from what I see on reddit and that.For me, everything is normal until either A. i remember something small, or B. Have something happen to be that seems super important.For A, I start panicking and worrying, going straight to the worst possible scenario. It's happened with leaving stuff by my computer, not remembering if I left my door open, or even which pen I took to school.For B, it's insane. I was working a double shift on Friday, and trying to hurry up so I didn't get left behind and make my boss (who is also my grandpa) mad. While adding whipped cream to a pie piece, I blew whipped cream out the back of the bag all over my apron. I was alright until I realized that I had tracked it on my shoe. Then I wanted to burst into tears and cry.B also makes it hard to fall asleep. I realize it's taking me longer to fall asleep. If I don't handle it quickly, I panic even more, and the cycle continues.Also intrusive thoughts but working out has helped so much with that. [info] None [info] 1497833252
mad_zamboni [info] I'm curious, do you take medication to help? An ex-GF was agoraphobic and it took therapy to help her come out of it. I was diagnosed with anxiety late in life and managed it for a while with counseling, but ended up going on a low dose of medicine that helps dramatically.Mad props for coming here to socialize, it's a step in the right direction. Isolation can be bad if done too much.  [info] http://a.co/csI3Ii3 [info] 1489154414
Psychonautics101 [info] Anecdotal evidence: I was diagnosed with anxiety, ADHD, and possible sociopathic symptoms. It's been a couple years since I've tripped and my anxiety is pretty much gone, I'm a lot more focused, and I finally know what genuine empathy feels like. [info] None [info] 1423676146
vehiclesshockme [info] My mom has some meds that helped a little bit not a whole lot. I feel like my body has just trained itself to wake up whenever I hear her move (her room is next to mine) especially after the incident in March which is where most of my sleeping stopped. It doesn't help that I was diagnosed with anxiety and have been on and off meds for that basically since I was a teenager. [info] None [info] 1558622346
Passionofawriter [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was 14. I'm sure if I went in to the psychologists office now, I wouldn't be given the same diagnosis; I have recovered from it, and the reason why is probably tied to a bunch of reasons (some of which I probably am not aware of).One thing that really helped me - I have not suffered from panic attacks in years because of this - is recognising how I feel, and telling myself that I do not have to feel this way. I ask myself if I want to feel this way and why. For example, the other day the fire alarm at work broke, and it was silenced while we were getting a specialist down to look at it. I was going to have to sit for hours in a reception with a repetitive high pitched signal sounding off. That's exactly the stimulus that would normally trigger an anxiety attack for me. I immediately felt tense and anxious, memories of my past attacks flooding me. I realised this, and asked myself why I was feeling this way. Is the alarm going to hurt me? Will worrying about it help to stop the situation?The most important thing in a panic situation is to calm yourself down, and for me that worked by asking myself questions and realising I can change how I feel; I am in control of my emotions. When it came to burdens in my life, I tried only to think of events that worried me for as long as it would help me. It helped to remember that worrying about an event in the past or future would not prepare me or help me in any way for it. [info] None [info] 1506707992
HamiltonLBBH [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety. I'll have to schedule an appointment. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1567238818
Palonirya [info] This post actually made me tear up a little bit.I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2009, by actual doctors in an actual hospital and not just some internet forum, and even though I am so much better mentally than I was back then, there are still times when I will disassociate to the point where my own name doesn't feel as though it belongs to me.Knowing that there are people my age out there who will actively feign having anxiety and other mental illnesses and who think that having a mental illness means you literally have to talk about it all the time makes me sick. It is NOT so easy and so intriguing to talk about that you can write reams and reams on Tumblr about how your life is 'full of darkness' and how your body aches. A lot of the time you don't even want to talk about it because it can make you feel worse.The last thing I want to do when I'm having issues with my anxiety is turn it into a freaking poem for the internet to enjoy and praise me for. It is NOT worth my time. [info] None [info] 1471390836
HollisFenner [info] Entering* Thank you so much for doing this giveaway! I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago and have had trouble finding a job that doesn't make me extremely uneasy and it has been rather hard to leave my house as of late. Again, thank you so much for you kindness, it is greatly appreciated! [info] None [info] 1399074132
burf [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and basically all I felt was physiological symptoms, and therefore thought there was something physically wrong with me, so in my experience it's possible for anxiety to manifest in a purely/primarily physical sense. That said, any weird/new physiological symptoms are worth getting checked out. [info] None [info] 1431406003
heyuhhhdrigs [info] This happened to me, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and the abilify made it so bad, it also made my anxiety make me incredibly angry so I was cuddling through aggressive anxiety, to sad boy anxiety. It literally made new ruin my life and destroyed my relationship. You need to talk to your pdoc right away about this because it's not worth staying on it if it's making you gave really bad anxiety [info] Bipolar 1 [info] 1566405468
evileine [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder in the past, and I'm being treated for PTSD, but my therapist is leaning towards C-PTSD. She can't diagnose it if it isn't in the DSM; maybe it will make it into the next edition. [info] None [info] 1472656810
therandolphcarter [info] Thanks for the response. A few years ago I've been diagnosed with anxiety but it also happens when I'm relaxing at home. It happens simultaneously. Whenever my feet gets cold (but only my feet, not the whole body) my face starts to flush almost immediately.  [info] None [info] 1453023658
SourTongueTeaser [info] Yes, I was diagnosed with anxiety. The Zoloft helps a lot. It doesn't change me as a person, it just makes me a lot more calm. I don't lose my mind anymore when a too tall person stands over me or I am being stared at. When I first started it I had some sever emotional ups and downs but it eventually evened out.  [info] None [info] 1388904076
Bubbline [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety induced IBS. After taking several medications for it with no relief, I diagnosed myself with Endometriosis. I had to quit my job, drop out of college, and pause my life for a Stage 4 Deeply Infiltrating Endometriosis diagnosis. 4 years, 3 surgeries, a radical hysterectomy and 27 doctors later my life is finally starting again.  [info] None [info] 1551676750
stanstanstanLM [info] So, I'm not sure I understand all the details (or if I really want to) of your situation, what I can say is that it sounds like you're unhappy the way things are. If you're at a point where you're considering ending friendships over this, then that's all you really need. You don't need to justify yourself or your actions to anyone. It may annoy them, or confuse people, but you don't owe them closure or justification. If ending the friendships results in a better, less stressful, and far healthier, situation for yourself, you should. You are responsible for yourself, your health, and your feelings and to uphold those responsibilities to yourself social obligations are less relevant. If, however, there are those who you want to remain friends with, you need to talk to them. Friendships are a lot of work, and properly telling someone your feelings is the only way they can continue. If that means over text, or a letter, or face to face, then so be it. Many people don't see text as seriously as face to face, since you can't hear tone or see body language, so it is difficult to discern feelings, so that is something you should keep in mind as well. In these kind of situations though... I would say have as open and as blunt of a conversation as you can. Try to put aside being hurt at what you hear, until digesting everything that's been said. People can be emotional, and say things that hurt or things they don't really mean, especially when confronted with the faults you see in them. If you have the patience to do that with any of these girls, then that says you care about your friendship with them and perhaps they're worth a shot. All in all, what I'm saying is, think carefully about each and every one of them before making your choice. If you feel like 3 of them are worth trying for, then do it. If none of them are then don't. If you want to explain to them, than do. If you don't want to explain anything, then don't. Something you should consider though, is some of the things you've mentioned they've said about you seem... well extremely valid for them to be upset about. Being jealous about 3 friends hanging out, constantly doubting their feelings, and never trusting them, while leaning on them emotionally, are just some I'm picking out from your text. See, the problem is, it really seems like these feelings are a constant for you. Pulling from my own life, I have been diagnosed with anxiety, it's to the point where I believe that strangers harbor malicious and evil intentions for me. Lady walking in the park? My brain tells me that she's there to murder me, obviously. Guy walking past my house everyday? Well he must want to break in and steal all my things, right? But you see, that lady likely just wants to walk on her lunch break. And that guy? Probably is going to school or work. You see, what I have learned is that the narrative my sick brain writes for others is not the truth, and moreover this is a 'me' responsibility. It is your responsibility to deal with your emotions, and I would strongly suggest seeking therapy. It is not your friends or peers responsibility to be your therapist. It is not a responsibility of a friend to constantly have to reassure their friend over everything. And frankly it is exhausting. It's not healthy to not be able to trust people, or feel jealous that friends hang out with each other without you, or feeling overly controlling or possessive. The more out of control feelings become the more you rely on others and at some point that is also not healthy, especially if that means that they're being backed into a place where your emotions are forcing them to go on a rant. Honestly, G here sounds like someone who cares about you a lot, and certainly sticks out from the others that you mentioned. If I was in your position, (and as a fellow over thinking who can be a debbie downer) I'd fight tooth and nail for someone who had the balls to call me out on my shit right to my face. Respect. And another personal feel too, is these friends who are 'talking behind your back' or 'snitching' could be doing so with the best of intentions. Perhaps someone told F things but intended to try to fix the relationship and it blew up in their face? And talking with each other about you doesn't mean it's full of malice, they could be concerned and as far ad they see it, you're all friends and these friends may be concerned about you too.Tl;drYou're not nessicarily wrong, do as you please, though regardless of ehat you do think about therapy for yourself because some of the things you are expressing here is not indicative of, (or an environment that would lead to,) good mental health.Also r/relationship_advice would be a good place to post if you want a more empathetic(?) Normal(?) approach to dealing with these friends, I'd suggest asking there as well. [info] None [info] 1572163846
hibecca [info] Not a doctor.. had very similar problems and I was diagnosed with anxiety. Didn’t believe it at first, and my problems got much worse. Thought i had an inner ear disorder, brain tumor, etc. When I did finally accept it months after diagnoses, things are getting a lot better (therapy and medication to help). [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1557174147
gene1113 [info] It'll be ok.I was just diagnosed with anxiety and had trouble learning to cope with the panic attacks. It was rough.  [info] None [info] 1526345969
Kardinale [info] I was the classic underachiever in high school, but was still offered a full ride to an in state university. Where I struggled was freshman year, since I had spent high school just skating by and not giving a shit about my future in general. My first college semester ended with me skipping my finals and getting a .69 GPA. I took a year long break, during which I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. I retroactively withdrew from my first semester, giving myself a clean slate. I’ve been back for a year and a half now and I’m about to attain my 4.0, thanks to me giving a damn about my future and some studying. On another note, I’m done trying to have a social life lol. It’s just not possible for me [info] None [info] 1544495649
speedhating [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety, and do work a high stress type job so... that would make sense... [info] None [info] 1493330387
ramsay_baggins [info] My fiance and I have been together just over five years.In that time he has stood by me as I became physically ill with fear of confronting my flatmates in halls at University, as I stressed and stressed and stressed with Uni work, as I developed anxiety doing my dissertation, as I had really bad worries about getting a job after graduating, as I was diagnosed with anxiety because of the job I got...Just before I graduated I got really sick. Had to go to the hospital at 3am after only developing symptoms about six hours beforehand. He was panicking more than I was, but he sorted transportation, held my hand the whole way through, and then looked after me when I was bedridden for a week, couldn't eat and could hardly move.He held my arm for support everywhere I went when I got labrynthitis and couldn't walk unaided because I had lost all sense of balance.He came literally running to comfort me when I found out my stepsister had been involved in a serious and potentially life-threatening accident.He still talks me down when I had panic attacks and random freakouts.He reads me to sleep every night because he knows it helps me calm down. He even puts up with me when I interrupt him with questions or random observations about the story or character.He always encourages me in pretty much everything I do.He's wonderful. [info] None [info] 1417631451
NateGrey [info] &gt;  I have been diagnosed with anxietyAlways love this gem.  [info] None [info] 1501701424
Earthly87image [info] Depends on the person,  first and foremost, weed has all tons of strains, for example I am diagnosed with anxiety and I smoke weed I prefer the medical pot indeed just wanted too share [info] None [info] 1565775857
Shelbstill [info] I wouldn't try to self diagnose yourself. I was diagnosed with anxiety last year. There's a lot more that goes into it than just being afraid of the dark, for me.  [info] None [info] 1446640669
fredemar [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder back in 2007 and got my first panic attack in 2010. For me it was also a point in my life when I was stressed out about multiple things, and I just snapped I guess. That feeling of your first panic attack stays with you for a while, it's scary. It helped me to see a psych about it. With her I trained so that I could feel the panic attacks coming, and knew what to do. For me I start having a tingling feeling in my arms, signaling that I need to get up and go do some exercises (that makes them 'go away' most of the time). She also made me realise that the things I feel when having a panic attack is normal, it's my body and it happens even during my 'downtime'. So during a panic attack I have a high heart rate, so she made me do jumping jacks until my heart rate was up when I was feeling good. Same thing about dizziness. [info] None [info] 1568995633
dreyhannah [info] I’m on Ocella right now, I’m only on my second month, they switched me from my other Yazmin Generic, and I’ve noticed some moodiness, but since switching to Ocella I have had THE WORST moods, like from happy to absolutely angry and stressed, and the bloating is pretty bad right now...but!!! There is a catch, I am diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder SO I’m sure that having this diagnosis affects how I react emotionally to the pill...usually the side effects calm down after a while, I’m hoping I get used to this new generic soon! [info] None [info] 1560130766
holyshmoke [info] Yes I get this sometimes and it's one of the reasons I am currently struggling to go back to work. I have been diagnosed with anxiety attacks as well as ibs so it's sort of a chicken or the egg scenario when it happens -- does the anxiety attack cause the need to use the bathroom or does the ibs trigger something that causes the anxiety? I don't know if I'll ever know unfortunately. Seeing a therapist to deal with the anxiety attacks and always having some Ativan on hand for emergencies has helped somewhat but I still try to avoid scenarios where an attack might happen or where I won't be able to escape to the bathroom if needed. I wish I could be of more help, sorry, but yea I think you're definitely not alone!edit to add: random question but are you female and happen to be on your period? Just curious cause I usually get very similar attacks to what you've described on the first/second day of my period. Think it's something to do with the cramping causing bowel movements and loss of bp from blood loss (I have very heavy painful periods however in general). [info] None [info] 1444095177
Isrozzis [info] So I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder this week. Really explains a lot of things that I've been struggling with for awhile. Panic attacks are absolutely terrifying. Going from chilling out to feeling like you're having a heart attack is 0/10. It doesn't help that I'm either a hypochondriac or real close, so I'll worry about small things in my health until they become a problem. I've seen some doctors and got some medication which has helped, but it takes time to fully get going. Of course life style changes are important too. The weirdest thing is that after a big panic attack normal things that I love will make me panic. Like I looked at a gochiusa gif and was just absolutely terrified for no reason. That's been a really weird experience, but I've been able to convince myself that the anime girls won't hurt me. The brain is a hell of a thing sometimes...It's been a rough week. I feel like a used rag that's been tossed aside.  [info] http://myanimelist.net/animelist/isrozzis [info] 1483774101
xerces717 [info] Fuck, that last line got me. I was diagnosed with anxiety 13 years ago. It's tough. You're not alone, there's other anxious wrecks out there like us. I hope you find peace and live well, friend.  [info] None [info] 1538174297
Prostitwat [info] I went through this when I was 11, it turned out to be anxiety related although at the time I didn’t know what I was experiencing was anxiety. It would usually happen at night that I would wake up with bad anxiety or in the midst of a panic attack and go get my parents. I was diagnosed with anxiety soon after. Just a factor to consider.  [info] None [info] 1548946745
totoro_7 [info] Thanks a lot for your interest in my case!&gt;I don't think there's mucus in the stool but I never checked properly. &gt; Almost all episodes (except one) have happened at nighttime, after I'd eaten dinner and was already lying in bed. &gt;Never tried keeping a food journal. Episodes have happened after eating big and small meals, with and without lactosis, with and without gluten, etc. They once happened straight after eating just a soy yoghurt.&gt;No accid reflux but excessive fatigue is definitely present. I need 9-10 hours of sleep in order to feel rested (and still sometimes don't). I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder about 8 years ago. &gt;Episodes are very irregular and unpredictable. Last year, I had about 6 episodes over the course of 10 weeks. Then they were completely gone for over a year. Had an episode last May, nothing since. &gt; No weight loss, abdominal pain is only present during episodes, blood in stool happened twice, the morning after an episode. &gt; I had my stool tested six months ago, but I'm not sure what they tested for. I remember the only positive thing was Escheria Coli. The test was done shorly after an episode and after a week of taking Flagyl and Oflocet. &gt; No fevers, no eye redness, no joint pains, some mouth ulcers but not often. &gt; Stool looks solid and brow, not greasy. Frequent gassiness, frequent bloating, frequent gurgling sounds. &gt; I have had iron deficiency anemia twice before, it was attributed to my vegetarian diet. &gt; Haven't tried completely eliminating lactose not gluten nor sorbitol. Doctor said he didn't think it was food-related. &gt; Still have my gallbladder. &gt; No swollen lymph nodes (that I notice).&gt; Never travelled outside of Europe.&gt; No HIV.&gt; No stool incontinence.&gt; No history of bowel disease in the family. &gt; No known thyroid issues. &gt; They did biopsies during the colonoscopies. I don't know the results.  [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1511881166
Psylax01 [info] Oh, I have experience with this! I'm diagnosed with anxiety/panic attacks/agoraphobia. I say this just so that you know I feel your pain.You have time to prepare for your visit, here is the best thing you can do. While you are hanging out and you have thoughts that you think, "Damn, I should ask my therapist about this, but I don't think I'd be able to." Just write them down on a piece of paper. Then, and this is the hard part, when you get to your therapist, give them the piece of paper that you have written out everything that bothered you. This really is the hardest part, I know. But do it. Once you do, they will be so much better at being able to help you.  [info] None [info] 1499747510
rayfraz5585 [info] Hey, no worries. I live by the beach. Every other little gift shop sells kratom, so it’s all around me.  I’d pay $45 for 100 capsules. 40 a day and you’re looking at almost $200 a week. I didn’t make much at my job and if I’d wake up without Kratom, I’d call in sick.  I did that too many times and lost my job.  When I didn’t have the money to buy more, I’d pawn things. That’s what I meant by losing things. As you can see by reading this forum, kratom is highly addictive. Not like weed. People don’t taper off weed. I’m glad it’s going easy for you, but everyone is different. I was diagnosed with anxiety which I why I started taking kratom. When I didn’t have it, I’d get the worst anxiety attacks. Anyway, with the help of the kind people of this forum and AA. I’ll be 30 days clean on Friday. I’m proud of that. Take it easy and I wish you well. Ray [info] None [info] 1545224176
hemmmlock [info] You know, I never made the connection between my dizziness and anxiety before. I went to a nurse practitioner for dizziness a couple of years before I was diagnosed with anxiety but nothing came of it. This makes much more sense now .... [info] None [info] 1380077915
Simon442 [info] Hmm maybe the first part but not the second one. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I used to have panic attacks that lasted few hours. This wasnt a panic attack as I was completly normal, just amazed. And I felt it going past me  [info] None [info] 1522240561
chaimeanstea [info] I agree. It wasn’t until I was diagnosed with anxiety that my dad confessed to me how bad he had it. It made me notice that over the years I’ve picked up a lot of my dad’s habits because of how much time I’ve spent with him. I’m not blaming him for my issues, but it was insightful and helped me identify areas where I needed to change. [info] None [info] 1571326251
Fuckingplasticbag [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I really can't stand it when people say they have because it's so "cool and quirky", like, no sir it's a mental illness that can ruin your life. [info] None [info] 1574790468
jcannawithya [info] No longer doing this, but when I was in uni, I’d commute for 2 hours to go to school, then after a full day of school, I’d do the two hour commute back.. just to rush back so I could attend officer’s meeting, choir practice, bible study, etc. I was at church almost every day for some kind of event. By the time I got home, I’d have to choose between doing my homework, sleeping, or eating.. I’d usually chose homework first, sleep second. I ended up loosing about 20% of my body weight before I got into grad school and moved out of my parent’s house. Not healthy, and my grades definitely suffered.  If anyone else is resonating with the statement above, I’d recommend readjusting some of these priorities or reaching out for help!! I was diagnosed with anxiety because I was so brainwashed that I would panic if I missed any church events. You are not alone!!! [info] Done with EVM [info] 1556150626
imnotgrownupyet [info] It’s okay. I have had my resting HR around 140 without any drugs when I tried to donate blood (spoiler: I was diagnosed with anxiety 10 years later). It felt pretty bad but I was okay.My HR still frequently shoots up to 120+ just in daily life.Have a calming beverage - milk or decaf tea. Read a book if you can or watch your favorite comforting TV show. Snuggle in bed. Don’t force yourself to meditate or breathe a certain way if it doesn’t work for you.It will pass. [info] None [info] 1549592953
mmmgluten [info] For me a critical part of getting to that detachment point was therapy and medication. I was diagnosed with anxiety (imagine that!) and started taking medication for it just as needed. I also secretly went to therapy. Therapy taught me what to recognize and medication during arguments kept me level enough to actually see what was happening instead of getting caught up in the whirlwind of bluster and manipulation. Once I had that objective view of what was being done to me the detachment came naturally.  [info] None [info] 1550831722
prettycasualiama [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and social anxiety several years ago and put on a lot of different types of medication (none helped).One time I had a major episode of anxiety lasting days. It became so bad that I had to see a doctor in the middle of the night; he prescribed me 4mg of diazepam and told me to see my doctor the next morning. I found the diazepam to be amazing. I felt the calmest I could ever remember feeling. There was nothing to worry about and everything was going to be okay. A bit over a year ago I found myself in a situation where I was able to acquire diazepam regularly, and so I started self-medicating with benzodiazepines for my social anxiety. I was once taking upwards of 50mg of diazepam a day. I also had alprazolam and clonazepam.It's been a year and a half now and I'm down to just 5-10mg of diazepam per day. It greatly affected my short term memory, I'd forget nights out, etc. I also ended up in the hospital from mixing alprazolam with alcohol (don't underestimate how easily this can happen), and I'm afraid that I'm a different person than I used to be. Not to mention it broke apart a relationship which had lasted several years.I can't wait to stop taking diazepam, I'm relatively quickly tapering my daily dosage down and hope to be off of it in six weeks or so. I would see a doctor about this but don't want to be labelled as an addict or drug-seeker for many reasons.Anyway, I just wanted to tell this story and make sure you guys know that you should never self-medicate. As well as this, a lot of doctors simply throw pills at people with our problems because it makes it easier for them. For a lot of people, medication is unnecessary and they may be able to overcome their issues with other methods besides changing their brain chemistry with drugs. [info] None [info] 1374349415
JohnDivney [info] Not too long at all, thanks, any information I can get is good. I have been diagnosed with anxiety before, and Adderall definitely agitates this, and creates a craving for alcohol. Also, it has, like everything, simply stopped working as well. A long time ago I took Lexapro and while it worked well, I wasn't comfortable not being able to "turn it on and off" so to speak, I prefer taking something when I need it to taking it every day, and this is another attitude I have towards drugs that is at odds with the Medical Profession. [info] None [info] 1305736439
Gaboyski_ [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety last month and the symptoms are severe (palpitation, headaches, fatigue, brain fog, short-term memory loss, etc). I had to postpone my thesis because I could not handle my workload this semester. Even coffee/stimulants can no longer give me the fix I craved in usual amounts. Which is why I can't go on a reboot; I honestly doubt that my ailments can go away by going cold turkey for a few days or weeks. [info] 3 Days [info] 1554708510
sonicfreak360 [info] Hi op, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and keto have been my life saver! The reason simple Carbs help with anxiety is because of how sugar acts as a comfort food. Keep calm and keto on, because keto starts to be more comforting than comfort foods and simple Carbs!  [info] None [info] 1453137649
vanjs [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety but thankfully (for this case) it's more mentally than physically. I was shaking so much I dropped the post-care paper they gave me (they made me sit up once to rinse my mouth after anesthesia/before the actual extraction) so I was close to my peak for anxiety. I listen to some good music, hummed a little and didn't know my tooth even came out until they started working on the bottom one (I kept saying 'huh? huh?' since I couldn't hear well due to my headphones and the assistant kept yelling 'it's out! it's ooooout!!!!!').Still no pain, but lots and lots of drool :(And I know how you feel man. I've been pretty healthy (physically) my entire life so I've only gone to the dentist to get scaling done and the doctors to get immunized. It's my first time getting 'surgery' so I was terrified but now I'm just sitting here in my own drool, packing away... you'll be fine :) [info] None [info] 1502938801
slimgunner [info] I normally sleep on my side. When I was young I did fall and hit my head but that was when I was 10. I noticed this sensation when I was 18. Not sure if it could be related but I have always been thinking that they have. I couldn’t really say what brings it on because it is pretty much constantly there, just depends how much I notice it. The pain is on top of my head and is always in the same spot. But no sensation in my neck. I do sometimes get tingling and numbness feelings in my body and arm. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I have seen psychologist previously so maybe some could be anxiety related. But if it was a brain tumour or ms, wouldn’t my symptoms be bit more severe considering I have had this for 4 years?  [info] None [info] 1553287904
itaraki [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder pero true to my illness... naiilang ako humingi ng recommendation from my psych for a pwd card.. pano to ?  [info] None [info] 1546172362
FawkesLOL [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks my 3rd year of college.  My doctor believed it was brought on by living with someone (my father) who has horrible anxiety/PTSD.  It really interrupted my studies, my life and my relationship with other for the first few months.  I was given medication that turned me into a zombie for long lengths of time.  Eventually I was referred to a psychiatrist that was offering a new form of help known as Neurofeedback, it works through the measurement and training of ones brain through sound.  I don't know if it actually helped or was a placebo for me but it picked my life up dramatically and allowed me to improve myself and be more then I was even before anxiety.I HIGHLY recommend anyone suffering from anxiety look into it as a solution (long term).  It has since been a year since I suffered my first major attack and my grades have been the best they ever have and I have motivation.  And all it takes is like 30 minutes a week.http://kipn.org/I linked the website of the office I use and I am also going to post a link with some info about the treatment.http://www.eeginfo.com/what-is-neurofeedback.phpIn terms of things you can do to help I have quit drinking entirely, smoking, cut my intake of caffeine and regularly try to work out.  Also try finding a hobby that allows you to relax and think enjoy alone time/quiet.  I enjoy painting, guitar and reading for instance.  It is important to remember that anxiety usually cannot be completely cured but it can be managed and eventually you will be able to manage it when it begins to bother you.  Atleast this is what I learned from personal experience. [info] None [info] 1389664445
streamlinetacos [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 7, and I still haven't learned to effectively cope with it yet.I'm also depressed. I am not on medication, my mother won't allow me.There's a lot to talk about with all of this. My parents suspect I have ADD/ADHD.I'm can also suffer from disassociation at points, especially when I get very low. [info] 17; totally earned this [info] 1452254083
hey_yall_whatsgud [info] I am 15 years old and i have been there. It’s not the fact that people who do his can have great lives, because so do I. It’s our heads. I can’t control how I feel about myself. I hate every part of me, but I was always seen as a girl who was happy with her life and always laughing. When I was twelve I was diagnosed with anxiety and proclaimed anorexic. Everyone I knew had the same question: How? Well, I couldn’t tell you that answer if I tried. People don’t always have a reason for hating themselves, it’s just the way our minds work. I send out my sincerest regards to you and your family and tell your son he is not alone. There is ALWAYS someone there for us, whether we choose to believe it or not. [info] None [info] 1554917005
AnEmancipatedSpambot [info] If you have particularly bad OCD I'd highly recommend getting diagnosed by a psychiatrist. I was diagnosed with anxiety. It helped me a lot.  [info] None [info] 1532376944
cookem8 [info] If you have any kind of anxiety disorder this could have manifested itself as a form of OCD or HOCD. I believe that site yourbrainonporn discusses it in length. You can't get it up with a girl, then you think you're gay, then you think about how you fapped to pictures of dudes one time when you were a curious teenager, so you think you must be gay. Then you end up fapping to straight porn to get rid of the thoughts. Becomes a self-fulfilling prophecy. Trust me, if this sounds like you, you probably aren't gay. I was diagnosed with anxiety with obsessive thoughts early on in life and I have struggled with this for years despite being in quite a few successful long-term sexual relationships with women. [info] 376 days [info] 1396749269
Caymerr7 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well. I've had to go to the emergency room for panic attacks and other health anxiety issues. Old me would drink to make my anxiety go away. Since I've been about a month sober my anxiety had improved greatly. I still can feel the uptight feeling at times but I haven't had a full blown panic attack. I always felt like it was worse when I was hungover. Anyway sorry for the ramble but drinking only makes the symptoms worse. I think anxiety contributes greatly to a lot of people's issues with alcohol.  [info] None [info] 1391655326
venhedis [info] I'm never sure if I have "real" panic attacks. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and everything, but so far the worse I've ever gotten is sobbing while feeling like I'm going to throw up.My usual panic state is basically being very very uncomfortable while trying to bottle the above. [info] Shitlord [info] 1452397304
bridget22 [info] I used to sweat through multiple shirts a day, only would wear dark shirts but would often just wear hoodies. it never went away until I was diagnosed with anxiety and got on a good medication. I remember 7th grade was so embarrassing because we switched to gray gym shirts and had to stay in them all day. I was sweating through the shirt before gym class even started. My white uniform shirts had yellow stained armpits.  [info] None [info] 1531621322
Stevienines [info] bro I've been diagnosed with anxiety, I have a history of it in my family. Please don't assume you know me [info]  [info] 1542222896
Gaydonut [info] Numbers that don't end in a 0 or a 5For example if I see a 203 bus I'll take the 2 add it to the 3 to get 5 and then put the remaining 0 on the end for and anxiety reducing 50.I don't know what it is about 0's and 5's that bring me relief, but if I see any numbers that don't end in them I'll do all the mathematical gymnastics I have to to make it happen.I have a few forms of ocd not just relately to numbers also I'm diagnosed with anxiety, avoidant personality disorder and I'm anorexic perfectionist so being in my head drives me kinda mad.  [info] None [info] 1503455039
theredditorswife [info] I have had the same exact thing happen to me. I just came clean and told everyone that I was diagnosed with anxiety and surprisingly, they were  nice about it. Kids generally pretend stuff like that never happened. I would tell my teachers about it so they'll let you leave class before you get a panic attack. [info] None [info] 1328331392
Karmagirl1 [info] You’re an amazing parent, screw the hatersMine are 5 and 7 and I call those days mental health days. Sometimes kids, like adults need a day to recollect themselves and especially if the day prior was a bad stressful day for them. My mom forced me to go when when I was diagnosed with anxiety. I don’t remember learning anything those days just remember the torment of having to be there. I promised I’d be kinder to my own children. And mine are model students that love school bc I let them take breathers when they truly need one. You’re not modeling laziness, you’re showing them that your love for their well-being is more important than an attendance record [info] None [info] 1572355434
feathersandanchors [info] I’m sorry. I have been diagnosed with anxiety for a few years now and it’s awful but it CAN get better. I’ve managed really well with diet and exercise along with tools I learned in cognitive behavioral therapy. I have friends that have managed well with medication. There are a ton of options, and you deserve to explore them so you don’t live like this ❤️ sending you love  [info] 25 | WTT #1 | Fall 2020 [info] 1542462292
TimeWasting992 [info] I have quite bad anxiety, can this lead to other health problems that aren't necessarily mental? For example, I have been diagnosed with anxiety (only anxiety), but I find that I now have other problems, like vertigo (diagnosed today, only happens when I'm calm and relaxed), I've also ended up with pleurisy in the time since the anxiety diagnosis... basically, is my anxiety causing these things or am I just unlucky with my health? [info] None [info] 1570795369
WTF_Christine [info] I went through a bad breakup at the same time my parents were divorcing. My dad asked me to move home because he had this huge house and no one to help take care of it.I did most of the cleaning and was able to stay on top of it, even while enrolled full time in college. However, my dad's entire family was coming for Thanksgiving and he wanted the house to be "deep cleaned" so he hired a professional cleaner.I came home from class one day and the cleaner had washed dishes. No big deal. But as I went to unload them, I noticed she loaded them differently than I loaded them and I had a full on melt down, including screaming and hysterically crying. It lasted about 10 minutes.Afterwards I called my doctor and told her that I thought I was having a mental breakdown and she had me come in immediately. I was diagnosed with anxiety.Turns out I have BPD.  [info] None [info] 1551417778
C1awed [info] &gt;I'm also introverted and avoid social situations that I haven't experienced before or that I'm anxious about. I tend to avoid people altogether if I'm particularly tired or in a particularly bad mood. I've never felt the need to go to someone for emotional support... I dislike music, loud noises, drunk people, dancing, partying and crowded gatherings of people. I don't use any drugs. I'm not good at expressing emotion.&gt;I sometimes feel extremely lonely and I long for the kind of connection that I used to have with my close friends. I miss the great times we've had together and would like to have more similar experiencesWithout trying to be insulting,  what kind of connection and great times are you talking about?  &gt;I've been diagnosed with anxiety(mostly social) and Asperger's syndrome.Have you considered therapy?  Something like CBT could greatly help with the anxiety and teach you strategies to be able to stand - or even enjoy - a wider variety of social experiences.Right now it seems, even with all the changes you've made, that you're still waiting for other people to reach out and be friends with you, the way they did in elementary school.  Unfortunately, you're going to have to do a fair amount of the reaching out as an adult, and you're going to have to be willing to put effort - emotional and non-emotional - into the friendships to grow them and maintain them.All the experiences in the world aren't going to make a difference in making friends if you're not actually actively trying to make friends.  You won't passively attract them by looking nice and showing up the way you could in elementary school.Adult friendships tend to be more about chatting with each other during the week, and meeting up to do things once to a few times during the week, evenings and whatnot.  Neither of those seem to be areas you feel particularly comfortable with or good at.The first step in friendship, and the goal of the clubs and groups and meetups, is acquaintances.  From there, you talk, you find things you have in common, you move the friendship outside the club.  Or maybe you just hang out at the event and see them there.  But that's an active thing.&gt;I've changed my diet several times and have started exercising more and am slowly getting into shape. I'm experimenting with doing different stuff with my hair, facial hair and clothes. I'm learning a second language. I'm learning to drive.That's great to improve yourself.  Self-improvement is always a good start.  None of those are "I asked people to do something with me / got their facebook or digits / invited someone to hang out / was in any way social."  I'm not trying to say that what you've done is bad - it's not! - but ... &gt;They all seemed to be well functioning socially so I can only assume they'd have asked me if they actually wanted to be friends with me. They're assuming the same thing about you. [info] None [info] 1484786074
julcarls [info] I'm so so sorry you went through that. I can relate slightly, though my illness truly is "in my head." I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder 2 years ago. Basically my body goes into fight or flight mode for no reason at all or if I get too excited watching a movie or something normal. It's very, very irritating and it caused me to be suicidal. Six months after my diagnosis, my husband and I had a mild argument and I started to panic hard. He proceeded to tell me how "convenient" it was that I was having a massive panic attack following an argument and that I was probably faking for his affections. That hurt so badly. I will never forget it. He has since apologized and always comforts me when I have attacks. I understand his point of view because he literally can't see my heart rate ascend 100 more bpm or my vision going haywire or my lungs taking in less air. He can't see that I feel like I'm having a heart attack. He knows it's not convenient in the least for me. I was able to forgive him because of his continued support. [info] None [info] 1568984538
nukesisgood [info] I would say yes, although it can often depend on what you're looking to do.  Working for a design team or in a maintenance crew or working on outages for a contractor?  Sure, I could see that being ok.  Trying to get a license to operate?  Then it might be a problem.&amp;#x200B;First off, I'd make sure you believe you can handle the responsibilities.  Especially if you want to be a licensed operator, you're going to be responsible for the health and safety of the public.  That's a big responsibility, and you should be sure you can handle it.  It might not be quite as big an issue if you just want to be an unlicensed operator.  But the NRC and your company's FFD personnel may take your condition into account when deciding whether to give you a license.  Operations training programs can also be pretty stressful so be prepared for that.  I was diagnosed with anxiety in the middle of my training program.  Might not be as big an issue as your condition (I don't know that much about major depressive disorder), but at least it gives me a little insight.  I just disclosed that I'd been prescribed medication, and they were fine with it.&amp;#x200B;As for advice on how to approach the hiring process, I don't think you'll have to disclose major depressive disorder when you're initially applying for the job.  But if you're hired, I'm sure you'll have to disclose that in your paperwork for getting access to the site.  Being honest is the best policy.  I've worked with people who've admitted to minor criminal records, health problems, even alcoholism.  As long as they were honest and disclosed their issues before it caused a problem, the company was fine with it and offered to help them with the problem.  If you lie and they catch you later, you're screwed.  And you probably won't get access to another nuke site for a long time if ever. [info] None [info] 1551830378
LushEnough [info] Hey! Me and my partner used to only trip together, but I’ve been solo tripping for a year now. I have been diagnosed with anxiety since elementary school. I won’t lie to you I’ve had a few trips where I got a little uneasy at times but it’s nothing a good distraction won’t fix lol. Find yourself some good shit to watch on tv, or get some various arts and crafts to do, music is also a must. Solo tripping is very rewarding. You’ll be fine :-) I took 200ug about 20 minutes ago so here I go again! [info] None [info] 1561086866
TripleGenesis [info] I’m going through that right now with my ADHD. My medicine has slowly been less and less effective since 7th grade. That’s when I was diagnosed with anxiety. I was put on Prozac and it made me (what I think is) high. So I disregarded his diagnosis. Just yesterday my doctor told me that Anxiety can effect ADHD and make it worse, and I was diagnosed again. Hopefully when the medicine starts to work, I can focus again. [info] None [info] 1548781952
artfullyjaded [info] I know. I have been struggling with this lately, too. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD in the last year too, and it's especially scary when I'm having really bad anxiety on a day when I am more likely to have a seizure. Also, when my anxiety gets really bad, it is hard to focus on anything, and that's eerily similar to an aura for me. I feel kind of fuzzy and "off", and if it happens at work or somewhere where I am talking to people, I'll notice myself stuttering and slurring my speech. It's so very similar to that pre-seizure feeling for me.When I find myself in those situations, I remind myself that I have had anxiety attacks before, and that this is what they feel like. I'll remind myself that I took my medicine that morning, and that I didn't forget. And then I breathe, inhaling and exhaling at my own pace to calm down. The not knowing is definitely the hardest part, but you're not alone. [info] Briviact 150mg [info] 1570507658
ang_2k6 [info] I've recently started seeing a psychologist and I've been diagnosed with anxiety... [info] None [info] 1555195822
yacula [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety prior and handed the doctor a form typed by my therapist. There were people there who got diagnosed by the on site doc which made their visit with her just a tad longer. [info] None [info] 1573494692
unofficialmoderator [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder. [info] None [info] 1576387188
ClassBShareHolder [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety. It was really cool having the same symptoms as you until I worked myself into a pit of sleep deprivation. I was then willing to risk addiction just to get some sleep (prescription.). Once I got a couple good nights sleep (it was like waking after a year of fog) I then pursued non-addictive alternatives. Ended up on antidepressants. I miss not waking up at night with great ideas. I don't miss the feeling of my brain wading around in water up to it's knees. It took 20 years to get to the point of utter exhaustion though. And that was after I stopped ALL caffeine intake. I guess to answer the question, it could be. If it's not affecting you negatively then it's not a problem, it's a "feature."  And, a lack of sleep can exacerbate minor problems until they become big problems.  [info] None [info] 1493466357
SinLives [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder and agoraphobia but I gotta say I agree with you 100%. I can't take any anxiety medication like benzos cause I am on other meds they would interact with. So I don't have a fast acting pill I can pop to just make everything OK. There are plenty of breathing exercises and pre planning things you can do. If I'm nervous about something I have to NOT overthink it. That is the basis for a lot of people's problems. I just make up my mind if something has to be done then I'm gonna do it. I'm not gonna let a diagnosis hold me back or make me prisoner in my own home. And as far as the lady pushing cop she should be charged with assault. There are laws in place for a reason. Do you excuse people for rape because their feelings made them do it? I'm sure people won't like my opinion but people with anxiety need to actively take steps to work thru it. Medications can help, therapy can help, but ultimately it comes down to that person working on it not hiding behind it. I understand it's different for everyone but it can't be used as an excuse for everything.  [info] None [info] 1547059068
infinitebarz [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and I have to take zoloft [info] None [info] 1403641277
woundedbearhair [info] ADD/ADHD can be misdiagnosed as having anxiety and that tends to be alleviated by the medication. I was diagnosed with anxiety a long time ago by a doctor who had no real clue how to test for ADD/ADHD since it was pretty common for people to think that it went away as you got older. Shocker! It doesn't! [info] None [info] 1556135829
smolbur [info] Thankyou, the OP is absolute cancer and so are a lot of the comments.I'm fucking sick of people glamourising mental illness.I was diagnosed with anxiety and it is a complete detachment from reality, it's about your mind cooking up nightmares of the immediate future and them scaring the shit out of you until you are paralyzed with fear.Mindfulness is the ONLY way out.People need to wake the fuck up. [info] None [info] 1542941179
unityway [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety. tbh it’s probably nothing lol it’s just kinda weird because it never used to happen until now  [info] None [info] 1534554704
FerisProbitatis [info] Ugh! Retail is the worst! I was diagnosed with anxiety after working in retail for a year. Quitting that job to go to school was the best decision I've ever made.I hope you will find the resources and right circumstances to pull you out of that mess. No job is worth your happiness and your life. [info] None [info] 1571345284
FitzMurkz [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and quite often find myself overthinking and becoming upset over seemingly miniscule situations. The comments I get often are actually from friends who say things like "don't worry" "get over it" etc etc. Despite their knowledge of my diagnosis, no one seems to understand that when you black out, you can't just stop worrying and you can't just get over it. Another huge one is 'stop thinking about it.'I find people fail to realize that with mental illness comes a lack of control. Anxiety literally takes control of your thoughts and you can't stop it. [info] None [info] 1483656848
YoLazySammich [info] See I was like this as a child too. I would cry, not wanting to leave my family to go to school cause I feared they would be dead when I got home, or that no one would pick me up cause they've left me. It was definitely a strange fear. I was diagnosed with anxiety, and as I get older, the irrational thoughts just seem to go from one topic to the next.  [info] None [info] 1455928843
plushdroid [info] Thank you for your advice. I have been considering a therapist. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but I think it’s a great idea to go and see why I am in this rut. Thank you again.  [info] None [info] 1546015596
catnipdealer16 [info] Does your school have a health clinic on campus? You could try seeing a psychologist there. I recommend going to a doctor. Like the above comment, it's true that anxiety can become so intense that it's obvious something is wrong with our chemicals. Don't live in constant fear when there's great medicines out there that will help!Also just tell your parents "I was diagnosed with anxiety" - I find saying I was diagnosed means to other people that someone medically trained informed you and so there's no skepticism that you self diagnosed (which can lead to people not believing you or taking it as seriously). [info] None [info] 1480768034
magicjem [info] I have anxiety and ADHD. I was diagnosed with anxiety first and took Prozac. Prozac and other SSRIs can take up to six weeks for full effect, but you might start to feel something within a week. I took Prozac for two years before I was also diagnosed with ADHD. Prozac is wonderful and really changed my life. My anxiety completely went  away, but some of my ADHD symptoms, like impulsivity and  difficulty with concentration, got worse. I was then diagnosed with comorbidity ADHD and when on medication for that. What I'm trying to say is if you take the anxiety medicine, it will absolutely take care of your anxiety even if the root of the anxiety is ADHD. Unfortunately, anti-anxiety medications can take a while to work unlike stimulants that that work immediately. It know it feels like a long time and can be frustrating. Believe me, I've been there. But once your anxiety medicine kicks in you'll wonder how you ever lived without it. Just be sure to keep an open dialog with your psychologist. Make a log of how you feel each day. If you don't feel like you're making progress, ask your psychiatrist to adjust your dose or switch to a different SSRI. Everyone has a different body chemistry and only you know how you feel. The psychiatrist knows this too and she is there to help. [info] ADHD-C [info] 1464220896
walee1 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, and still haven't started therapy. Spent one of the most memorable birthdays of my life by spending it with an insanely smart person I highly respect in a gorgeous place. Had a lot of screw ups, followed by failed attempts to put myself out there in terms of dating. So, all in all, considering how the last year went, I would say it's going like normal? The bad sprinkled with the good. [info] None [info] 1564929815
lalka808 [info] I am just like this too. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and it manifests itself in this way.  I'm not socially anxious either but like you I spend the whole time worrying that I'll loose my alone time.  Recently I've now started to worry about the worrying.  Not nice.  I've always tried to schedule my alone time: plan it and then accept the social times when they inevitably come along if it's not during a scheduled quiet week.  I'm trying to accept that I can't control everything and let it happen.  Sorry I can't give better advice!  [info] [F/33/INFJ] [info] 1441361918
Theprofil3er [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder, ADHD, and touerrets (I'm not sure if that's spelt right) syndrome. [info] None [info] 1389930489
phorensic [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder 7 or 8 years ago. I used to have panic attacks while driving to work. I had a big one that sent me to the ER while I was walking in the parking lot. Complete tunnel vision and total disorientation. I had no idea who I even was at that point, let alone have the ability to drive. I can imagine a scenario when having a panic attack you get to the point of passing out, which would be potentially lethal to you, passengers, and other people on the road. So yes, it would be the same as having one in a plane, the same potential consequences. Is one life worth less than 100+ on a plane? It has the same weight in my view. You might have been able to pull over "safely" while having a panic attack, but can others?? You should think a little harder about this. [info] None [info] 1540493143
MilkMyHonkey [info] Thank you so much for sharing your story!I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ocd prior to children, so like you, I expected it to heighten as well. I think you’re absolutely right about the circumstances surrounding our births. Every story is different. My first, was traumatic and I had no help. My mother left for a different province 16 hours away, 4 hours after I gave birth. My in laws created an embarrassing scene, just impacting my trauma even more. My sister had just had her second child 2 months prior, so she did her best to help, but I was in no position to ask much more of her. I feel like this time, I can prepare better.  [info] None [info] 1546467993
Allskinny [info] It was a mocha syrup tho haha! 60 calories a pump!!It's not 1200 but I'm definitely not sedentary and I'm average height (about 5'4") so I should be good. But idk. It just looks bad haha. Tbh idek what my goals are anymore. I don't weigh myself often and last month I had lost 5 lbs for no reason and then gained it back. I just want to feel my pants loose again even tho last time I did it was a problem because there weren't smaller pants that fit me (too big for a 0, too small for a 2 x.x). I also want exactly healthy sooo. Maybe I just want to see what I'm eating because i was starting to get a little too mindless lol. I felt heavy all the time. My biggest achievement was getting to (the equivalent of) 1 cup of coffee a day tho! I used to drink 4 and then I was diagnosed with anxiety. Yeah. [info] Losing/21F/162 cm/CW: 54.4 kg GW: 49 kg [info] 1543278814
shitsintents [info] Over 5 years ago I noticed whenever my chest was underwater when swimming it would feel like it wasn't strong enough to resist the pressure of the water and I couldn't take a full breath. Then a few years after that I realized I couldn't do slow diaphragmatic nose breathing comfortably. I feel like I can't breathe in enough air through my nose. With my mouth I feel like it's more than enough. Previous to these sensations I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1460748558
Lordkeravrium [info] I never said it does. And if you look down upon me that much why do you feel you need to go and be an ass? Also, you didn't read the comments of that post either. I was diagnosed with anxiety at age 8 and I've had it my whole life. I'm not attempting to say I'm entitled. You just don't need to go and be hella rude about me making a tiny ass mistake. It doesn't affect you in any way.  [info] None [info] 1546039406
booksareadrug [info] There's a certain anxiety about not doing things that I have had to unlearn (after I was diagnosed with anxiety). I guess the best advice I can think of, besides maybe talking to a therapist, is to try to set aside a block of time, even half an hour, to deliberately relax. [info] None [info] 1546258422
Waluwuigi [info] I’ve had tics for 8 years, I’m experiencing a mix of motor and vocal tics, OCD has been running in my family, and i show symptoms of it but i haven’t been diagnosed, same with ADHD. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and have had it since i was 9, none of these are being treated. I want to know how long the wait is, what the process is, and how i’ll get diagnosed. [info] None [info] 1556081375
owoifier [info] A wittwe backgwound, I'm 23 yeaws owd, and I was diagnosed with anxiety in high schoow. I have a smaww gwoup of fwiends, but I wike to stay in the same woutine. I was tawking to one of my fwiends about my daiwy woutine, because we wewe having a deep convewsation about both of ouw anxiety issues.He said, "Do you have OCD awso? Sometimes I have to wash my hands fow minutes aftew I pee befowe I feew cwean." I had to teww him my biggest secwet, someone that I've nevew towd anyone. I said, "I've actuawwy nevew peed befowe. I know it's something you'we supposed to do, but I guess I just kinda nevew had the time." He was stunned by my wevewation. "You've nevew peed befowe?!?!" Maybe it's because he had a fascination with uwine ow maybe it was just because I had nevew towd him that befowe, but he was amazed that someone had not expewience uwinating. “You NEED to twy it. In fact, wet’s go to the bathwoom. I’m going to teach you how to pee.”He wawked me into the bathwoom, and taught me how to wift up the toiwet seat. He took my hand and awwanged my fingews on the stem of my cock. “Wewax, it’s easiew than it wooks. Hewe, watch me do it.” He puwwed out his cock and stawted pissing into the toiwet. “Just wewax the muscwes in youw cwotch, and focus on the sensations inside the penis. Whenevew you feew a fowce coming outwawd of the penis, focus on it but don’t twy to contwow it. If you feew it moving inwawd, then wecognize it, and wewax the muscwes again untiw it’s moving outwawd.” I fowwowed the instwuctions and nothing happened. I said, “I can’t hewp it. I feew the fowce. It’s moving back up. I’ww nevew pee, I shouwd just give up.”“You got this, just wewax. Don’t pway mind games with youwsewf, you wiww pee befowe I wet you weave this bathwoom. If you don’t think you wiww pee, then no pee wiww come out. Twust me, you just have to bewieve in youwsewf.” I twied again, and pee stawted spwaying out of my cock. "I'm doing it! I'm uwinating!"I peed fow 5 stwaight minutes. He said, "How do you wike it?" I powitiewy asked him to weave the bathwoom so I couwd be awone with my piss stweam. I wiped the tip of my cock with a singwe squawe of toiwet papew, and fwushed. "I am a new man today," I thought. I wan ovew and hugged my fwiend in the most intense dispway of pwatonic affection I had evew expewience. My pants wewe spwinkwed with wet spots and uwine continued to dwip down my weg. My fwiend saw the uwine mawks on my pants, "Don't wowwy about that. You'ww get the hang of it soon." We feww asweep togethew on the couch in his apawtment. [info] None [info] 1553724128
sowhatbroseph [info] 1. Good point2. i have no health insurance, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder before. Was on meds but the side effects were unbearable. 3. Would love to, but no health insurance4. I've done it before and it helped, need to get in the habit again5. I have been going to the gym a few times a week, but I know I need to do more. 6. Fair enough.  [info] None [info] 1409845695
exceptionallybland [info] [NSFW] I was diagnosed with anxiety earlier on this year and I’ve lost my sex drive [info] None [info] 1572559957
YoloReally [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I just didnt see talking as something that would help me. I spent entire summer living in this peripetual state of hell. Magnesium helped control it, but it was still there. I also have insulin resistance. At one point I decided to measure my blood sugar before and after eating sugar. 45 minutes after eating this I got a really strong anxiety attack. It was something that I didnt expect. Over the next week I realized that I would get these anxiety attacks almost 45 minutes after eating something high in carbs/high GI. I researched reactive hypoglycemia and adapted my diet and since that point, I didnt have a single one. Its so weird that this is overlooked by some doctors when bodies reaction to sudden lowering of BG(because hyperinsulinemia in my case) is to produce adrenaline as it then increases BG. [info] None [info] 1514558221
AsaKurai [info] Hey, not that you're an expert, but is feeling "foggy" also a symptom? I definitely feel like insomnia, heart palpitations and feeling bloated have been prominent since I first felt like I was diagnosed with anxiety and I guess those symptoms come and go depending on when I take Xanax, but this foggy feeling has been persistent for weeks now. Almost feels like i'm tipsy or have done an all-nighter, but I kinda push through and go about my day anyway. I'm assuming it's because of my sleep? But I try at least on the weekends to catch up on that, just wondering if it's a symptom people go through... [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1535173681
AnitainKelowna [info] Not a doctor, but I had quite the experience with a misdiagnosis. When I was 30 I tore an intercostal rib muscle when I slipped hiking. I immediately felt that something was wrong and was in immense pain. Went to a walk in clinic to see a doc about the problem and was told it’s extremely rare to tear that muscle and I probably just had a strain. The pain went from bad to worse and I could no longer exercise (I was currently marathon training and at the gym 6 days a week). I went back to the doc to make sure I hadn’t serious hurt myself but they just continued to ignore my issue. Then, a couple weeks later I couldn’t get out of bed. My back was in so much pain I could barely walk. Back to the doctors to see what was going on and I was diagnosed with anxiety. They prescribed some crazy medicine for pain and sent me on my way. By this time I went from running 50kms a week and strength training 6 days a week to being unable to walk or carry anything more than a loaf of bread.  But, apparently I just had anxiety. A complete wreck, I head back to the clinic to be told there’s nothing major wrong but given more pain meds. Note, at this point no tests are done, no X-ray or check of my body. But they believed me enough to prescribe opioids to me. Fast forward 4 months, I’m finally able to drive long enough to see my family doctor 1 hour away. The minute I’m in his office he sees that something is wrong and sends me off for testing and X-rays. Turns out I had three fractures in my back, a herniated disc, and sciatica. It all happened because of the torn intercostal rib muscle. Turns out, it severely lowered my immune system and caused a whole host of disorders to come out. I ended up with osteopenia, malabsorption problem, iron deficiency, vitamin d deficiency, an autoimmune disorder, kick started peri menopause, and more. If the original doctor had taken me seriously and listened to my concerns it would have never gotten as bad as it did. Now I’m 36 with the body of a 70 year old. Doctors still don’t believe me when I have issues and say I’m too young for this or that. But when I go for second opinions, turns out I’m right. I get that my case is not common, but that doesn’t mean I should suffer as a result. [info] None [info] 1558391594
faithful_infidel [info] &gt;How hard is it to pick the right answers here?I mean, for a person on the autism spectrum, it could actually be quite difficult as they often struggle with how others percieve social situations and emotions.  I'm not autistic but, I do sometimes struggle with social reasoning.  And I don't  know the right answer to "Do you get angry at people you care about?"The first answer that comes to mind is yes.  Because literally everyone does. So answering no would indicate a dishonest person.  Overthinking it?  Probably.  But I am diagnosed with anxiety which is basically overthinking these things... [info] None [info] 1572125670
threeyearwarranty [info] People always talk about doing something you fear so that you can conquer it so why is this being viewed as a bad thing? Dyeing your hair is a concious choice.. and for some, it's a choice to be more confident.. or at least the chance to pretend to be...Also, sometimes people just want to change their appearance for *themselves* and they dont necessarily take the time to think/care about the effect it will have on how others would view them.PS. I've been diagnosed with anxiety but I actually do want to dye my hair somehing bright. (Am a straight guy) I just havent been able to yet. I've spent a lot of time thinking about the attention it will draw (which terrifies me, like you said) and honestly I still want it bcs I still think it's hella cute. I'll probably regret it afterwards bcs my self confidence will still be shit but honestly I'm kind proud of myself of actually wanting to try. I dont know what else to tell you. [info] None [info] 1556197729
Qi_ra [info] I HAVE THIS TOO. I swear, my mother, can talk for HOURS about stories of her childhood, but when I think back on my own life, it almost seems fuzzy. People can remind me, and pictures can help bring back memories a bit, but I can hardly remember anything before middle school. I don’t really think it’s normal. I always thought it was because I started taking medicine when I was like 14 and maybe it messed with my memory, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder too. Or maybe it’s both?? [info] None [info] 1558839458
Mr_body_bags [info] Oh ya I love football when ever we are practicing or working out I love it it’s awesome to just scream and yell and be with my friends and get stronger and shit. I can’t get a job because of it tho cause track is after school but when ever I’m doing somthing with my team I’m always in a good mood I guess it’s when I’m alone and have to think just for me. I do watch joe Rogan sometimes hahahaAnd ya I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 13 and took lexapro for 2 years but stoped so I could cum and actually feel myself I’m gonna stop over thinking tho  [info] None [info] 1548450271
julietonnes [info] I get the same way with noises in my apartment.  I'll literally go from having a normal conversation to screaming and crying the next second all because I heard a couple thumps from the apartment above me.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety rather than misophonia, but it sounds like we react the same way. [info] None [info] 1353598337
grill_friend [info] I know how you feel! I remember I was talking about this to my psychiatrist and he said I was hiding from something, and that's why these things that can "pull you in" were so attractive to me. Hiding from things like school, job, non-existant social life, etc.I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, now being treated for a few years this addictive part of me is much more under control. I still play games, but I don't get so into them anymore.So all in all, I think you need to be honest with yourself and find the reason why you like the escape so much. Then you can work towards fixing that problem. This is just how it was for me! Sorry if I am misunderstanding you. [info] None [info] 1495185807
Tylerr_7 [info] I've always been alone.. and I don't even know what's been happening.. I want to say around 4 years ago tons of things happened.. I know that I was diagnosed with anxiety, but that's it.. My memories of that time are all but gone.Recently.. just so much bad shit's happened. and my mental state has been plummeting. Panic attacks, constant stress and so much more.. I don't even know how to express it. More recently, everything's been worse. and I don't know how to stop these thoughts either, talking to people has helped remove that pain, but the second i'm alone I have a panic attack, or that I see they're not talking to me.. My brain rushes to ideas that I'm being ignored, but then I remember that I'm not worth there time.. and I just begin to have a panic attack.. I sit there still, and I feel this wave of sadness rush over me.. And I can't stop it because I've basically taken my friends and used them so I don't hurt.. but I made them into almost an addiction.. and I hate that I'm using them for it. They always say its fine but I hate the idea that I'll never be able to do what they do for me.. I'll never be an equal.There really is no point in me living my life. It serves no purpose, I'm only wasting the time of those around me in all honesty. [info] None [info] 1544768967
GoBackToMeddit [info] To supplement my post title:I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder after several trips to the ER for chest pain/discomfort, lightheadedness, nausea, sweating/clamminess, heartburn,and several other heart attack symptoms. Each time, they run blood tests, x-rays, and EKG and find nothing. After the fourth visit in August 2018, I stayed overnight and had a stress test that showed no signs of blockage, so it was written off as anxiety or panic attacks.Since then, I am still always experiencing the symptoms above. Last night, however, I experienced the same symptoms, but these felt distinctly different and more intensified. For example, the heartburn I usually feel is esophageal whereas what I felt last night was a raw burning sensation in the core of my chest cavity, kind of like the lactic acid burn you feel in your arms or legs when trying to get in that last rep of a set of free weights.So it got me thinking about the stress test which, as I understand it, only detect around a 70% blockage. Given my age (41), sedentary lifestyle, alcoholism, obesity (6" and 280 lbs), poor eating habits, high cholesterol, and high blood pressure (tldr: I am a ticking time bomb waiting to go off), it seems theoretically possible that an artery could have been 65% blocked at the time of the test which would have gone undetected. Since it was 7 months ago when I had that stress test, would it be possible to jump from 65% to 70%? What if an artery was 50% clogged?Therefore, I think the real question is this: How long does it take for a clogged artery to increase by a percentage point? I understand that there are a great number of variables that go into such an estimate, but is there a rough estimate? [info] None [info] 1551744864
MereGirl [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety last year because things got *really* bad so I had to finally go to a therapist. She diagnosed my symptoms as anxiety and I started looking back through my life and realized it was anxiety whereas I thought I was crazy, abnormal, and lazy.  [info] None [info] 1450801380
claireylouise [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety by an actual physician. [info] None [info] 1572468575
Xyoloswag420blazeitX [info] If you're smoking at a Snoop concert and calling it medicine, you are a part of the problem. Medical marijuana has become an insult to both the word "medicine" and the movement to legalize marijuana and it is because of idiots like you. Smoking five joints isn't medical in any way, shape or form, it's getting too high to function semi-legally and then bragging about gaming the system on reddit.If I was diagnosed with anxiety and put down three bars while I was out for the night, would that be medical use in any way? [info] None [info] 1377715961
JLeww69 [info] Earlier this year I was diagnosed with anxiety after a long conversation with my parents. After two therapy sessions I met with a doctor to discuss what my options were. I explained to her that a few of my friends have anxiety and that they've gone through a variety of different medications with no avail. They were finally prescribed gabapentin which worked the best out of all the medications they had tried. I told her that after researching all of my options I decided that gabapentin would be the best choice for me since I didn't want anything addicting like a benzo or a ssri because of the wd horror stories. She acted like she had never heard of gabapentin before and prescribed me propranolol which doesn't seem to work at all. Prop's main use is to reduce the physical symptoms of anxiety such as rapid heartbeat and sweating which I never even reported experiencing with my therapist prior to the meeting with the doctor... The whole spiel about my friends getting prescribed gabapentin was a lie but I truly did believe gabapentin would be the best option for me. Plus I knew it would be useful for the kratom addiction I had at the time. Oh well. I just had to get all of that off my chest.  [info] None [info] 1506879015
alxbailz [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and a couple of other things, all of which I have almost completely overcome. Of course, they will probably always still be there, but for me, I literally just said “get the fuck over it”. To myself. I just constantly force my logic to be louder than my inner “but what if-“‘s. It works. When you start JUST DOING IT, whatever it is that’s making you anxious, and seeing that there is almost never a repercussion, you get over it. Especially with social anxiety, and especially in the adult world, shit just really really doesn’t matter as much as you tell yourself it does. Majority of people that you could have a potentially awkward situation with, you never fucking have to see again if you don’t want to. Life’s just too short to hold back. Turn your “what if this goes terribly” into “what if this goes really well”. It’s a conscious effort, you have to stop yourself in the middle of the situation, as it’s happening to really make a change [info] None [info] 1535448463
CellarDooranon [info] The same thing happens to me. I justify it with the fact I'm diagnosed with anxiety and chalk it up to a really bad attack. [info] None [info] 1567111472
throwawayvdilators [info] Thank you so much for your response!  It really meant a lot.The more I think about it, your point about just having tension in your pelvic floor makes a lot of sense to me. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and although I can often rationalize the distressing emotions away and not "feel" anxious all the time, my body does react to the stress a lot (I have periodic breakouts of eczema on my fingers, and a fairly rare reoccuring gum problem the dentist thinks is related to stress, for instance.) More than that though, I've had some massages and the woman has said I'm ridiculously tense all through my shoulders, neck, and back, even when I'm very relaxed and have had periodic massages, so I wouldn't be surprised if I just also hold a lot of tension in my pelvic floor as well.I don't think having sex until I finish the different sizes will be possible, unfortunatley, as our attempts ended up with terrible pain only like half an inch in. But then again, after this week we'll be in a long distance relationship so hey, between times we can see each other I'll have plenty of time to get ready for it :P [info] None [info] 1442379501
marie1192 [info] Not yet diagnosed with OCD but experiencing intrusive thoughts and I have been diagnosed with anxiety recently. F you OCD/Anxiety. 🙌🏼 [info] None [info] 1547047247
cheekyuptowngirl [info] Thank you soooo much!!!! I just had my LO on 7/23....but I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder, panic disorder and major depressive disorder. I have been on so many meds and combinations of meds and we finally found one that worked. Then I got pregnant....I wanted to do the right thing and stop taking my meds and was advised by the psychiatrist on how to ween off of them. Well, I ended up going through withdrawl during my first tri and was in the hospital to get IV fluids because I was so dehydrated.  It was decided in concert between three different Dr's that I would stay on my meds as the benefits outweighed the risks for me.  I got a bunch of unwanted flack from people about continuing my meds and that I was hurting my child. It made me angry...I should have kept it to myself, but I wear my heart on my sleeve.  You are so brave.....you are empowering other women who are pregnant or may become pregnant by letting them know that it's ok to get depressed, it's ok to ask for help and it's ok to take the meds if the benefits outweigh the risks! Thank you, thank you, thank you!  [info] ~*Ruby Fae 7/23/15*~ [info] 1439680331
Nasserahmed094 [info] Bro I was diagnosed with anxiety/OCD and was prescribed with anti-depressants. They made feel like I'm 10 years back without any worries and nothing that I have slept one of the best sleep in almost 10 years (I'm 22 btw and this was 2 years ago). I think the main cause of all this is PMO but the anti-depressant and supplements stopped having effect after 2 weeks of taking them and I decided not to take anymore. Now I'm on day 83 of NoFap and the anxiety is killing me. Do you think I should see a doctor or wait for a few more months? [info] 35 days [info] 1467567520
Uma__ [info] Holy shit, thank you. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but I haven’t had the time to do therapy or medication yet as I’m drowning in school and work (so I can continue to go to school). I’ve been making time to exercise at night every other day because that really helps me, but I’m going to start doing these. Thank you so much.  [info] None [info] 1517447283
abduayoub_ [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago and maybe that's why no girls are into me, not coz of my looks its coz of how weird I am :/ [info] 1 Day [info] 1490288259
firfetir [info] Well, I can relate to your symptoms.. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back and breathing has been a problem more like every once in a while, usually when a specific thing is stressing me out, but not always. I sometimes, very suddenly, will start feeling terrible and realise I've forgotten to take a breath for a moment. Sometimes it's because I'm so lost in my thoughts but sometimes it can be because I'm so lost in whatever I'm watching/doing. Then, I take a breathe and my heart races and I'm focused on not just breathing but taking good, deep breaths.It really sounds like anxiety to me - even more so because you're so worried it's something worse. And it makes sense, since your vacation plans got fucked up. I hope you can find an alternative to your plans and I think you should read up on anxiety some more - it manifests in many ways. I've never had a lump in my throat but I have a bad habit of picking at my skin. If it is anxiety, it's important to learn how to relieve your stress day to day - without the vacation. Diet, exercise, hobbies, therapy, medication... There are a lot of ways to improve.I don't feel like my response was very helpful but it's all I could think of. Trouble breathing is a common problem with anxiety so I'm surprised this doesn't have more comments. [info] None [info] 1496444243
sinkorswim400 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I used to have panic attacks twice a month but now is only anxiety attacks once every 4 months or so and are less severe as time goes by.  [info] None [info] 1531763711
sociopaths-throwaway [info] Masters and PhD’s all around and I would say we are rather upper class. My family on my mother’s side has always been full of incredibly intelligent and rich people. My father’s side perhaps lacked on the intelligence and money but I was never around them or him much. I don’t use drugs, and I use alcohol socially. I hate not having control over my own brain and I can’t help but look down on addicts. I have been diagnosed with anxiety but that was a very long time ago. I used to have severe social anxiety when I was in my early teens but have felt none of it in the past four years. That is also subsequently around the time I stopped feeling most thing all together. Weakness to me is more general sometimes but the things I find weak are as follows for my current boyfriend since it is freshest in my mind: not pursuing further education, not in constant pursuit of higher positions (or work for him overall), high level of emotions whether it is sadness or anger, constant self doubt and shame, lack of money without attempts to better the situation, alcohol or drug problems (he was addicted to pills and some other substance), self pity is my biggest one too. I have more but this is what I could think of at the moment. These traits always tell me that the person is open to manipulation. If someone immediately puts me above them it lets me know they are weak. My best relationship has been with a woman who had sociopathic/psychopathic tendencies because we were both on level with each other. That of course fell apart because I wanted to be able to manipulate and be praised and she wanted to inflict pain that I couldn’t feel. [info] None [info] 1561218251
gdubbaya [info] Well.. Now I feel even worse. I'm still doing them even as we speak, but to answer your question, it's because I'm so worried. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so situations like these really put me on edge. I hope my response doesn't spark a negative reply though, as I just genuinely want to know. [info] None [info] 1562008438
sigbox [info] You're acting as though all anxiety is the same.I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and yet, I'm capable of interacting with people normally on a day to day basis and it's quite manageable. Every single person is different. [info] Toronto Blue Jays [info] 1498325518
LorAu [info] It doesn't automatically mean you've a illness at all however it is an indicator that you might have one.  I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder and a form of PTSD. It has to do with the impact on your life but also on how often and how strong/ in what way the symptoms accrue. Self diagnosis is generally not very accurate and I advise against it. [info] None [info] 1573558900
revmyk [info] I can only speak for myself, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder (also PTSD) about two years ago. I was prescribed Xanax, then decided to give it a weed a try after reading about experiments conducted for anxiety and ptsd. My symptoms were chest pains and panic, usually when I had to go shopping for groceries or sometimes in other public places. I have found great relief from using weed. I prefer vaporizing.  [info] None [info] 1358912950
thesilversound [info] I was recently diagnosed and almost all of the friends I’ve told were really surprised and didn’t believe it, which has been discouraging. To clarify: I have childhood trauma issues that intermingle with the ADHD, and so most of my friends were more so expecting me to tell them that I was diagnosed with anxiety or a trauma disorder (which I still think I have, on top of the ADHD). I am also in medical school and always did really well in high school and college (except for the higher level college classes that I couldn’t keep up with due to my inability to follow what the professor was saying or study for exams earlier than the day before the test). So everyone is skeptical that I have difficulty focusing on a daily basis.For the past month or so, I’ve been overcome by this compulsive urge to prove to myself that I actually do or don’t have ADHD, which has led me to spend hours and hours each night searching this subreddit, reading about ADHD, and talking about symptom-related memories and experiences to my friends and partner every single day. It’s been really exhausting and has been really draining for my partner as well, who is dealing with her own issues but always patiently listens to me spilling all of my stream of consciousness thoughts on to her.My dad also confronted me yesterday because he found out that I filled prescriptions for Adderall and Vyvanse. He gave me this lecture about how I should stop being angry and frustrated that I have trouble studying, because there’s no use to being angry, and that I should just accept that I might need to take more time than other people. He told me that everyone needs to just learn to live with their hardships in life and work with what they have. He said that he also is more disorganized than his coworkers and sleeps a lot (uh... yes, my whole family is like this, where does he think I get it from?) and that when I was younger, I always concentrated really well on drawing and reading (yes, because those were my favorite hobbies and I hyperfocused to the point that my mom banned me from reading fiction books up until I was 18) and that there’s nothing unusual about all that. And that he hopes that I don’t rely on the meds forever.So all in all, it’s been discouraging because for once in my life, I finally feel alert during the day and I finally have been able to sit down and do work without stressing about how I keep reading the same sentence over and over again. Tonight, I tried to watch a video for studying purposes after my meds wore off. I had forgotten what it was like to study before I was diagnosed. And I found that as soon as I sat down and clicked play, my brain immediately went into a sleepy trance and I was using all of my energy and willpower to redirect my attention, all while still missing stuff in between. I know that checking and rechecking your symptoms is not a healthy solution to doubting your diagnosis, but it’s what I’ve been turning to. All this to say, yes, the self doubt is a real struggle. [info] None [info] 1545615325
deathbymcat [info] I think that's bullshit. We all deal with anxiety. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and even had meds prescribed to me, but I don't think it would be fair for anyone to get extra time. Are you going to get extra time during surgery? Or can you freeze time when you have to make a split second decision or answer a patients question?  [info] 510 128/126/128/128 [info] 1471631894
spookyartskeleton [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and while it's gotten better than it used to be, I still get the occasional anxiety attack. One night I was laying in bed trying to sleep. I usually don't have problems laying alone in bed but for some reason unbeknownst to me I couldn't rest. I turned onto my side, and I felt someone breathing on me, as if they were inches from my face. I opened my eyes and there was no one. I listened to see if I heard the A/C turn on, but heard nothing. I swear to this day I felt distinct breath on my face. I turned over onto my other side and tried to forget about it. After a few minutes again I felt someone's breath inches from my face. I looked around my room. I have posters on my walls, and while I looked at them trying to calm down they seemed to morph and twist, like I was hallucinating. I thought I was dreaming so I checked my clock and pulled out my phone to try and confirm I was awake. This is when I got the sickest, most paranoid impending doom feeling I've ever felt. I felt like something extremely horrible was about to happen. My stomach did flips, I was sweating and shaking but I couldn't find the energy to move or get out of bed. I've never felt unsafe in my room, and I've had anxiety attacks before but this was by far the worst. It might not be paranormal but Jesus did it scare me. Eventually I just noped straight out of my room and slept in a different room that night. The following nights I took melatonin to help me sleep and I was fine. I'm still not sure what happened and why I got that feeling, because nothing did end up happening that night. [info] None [info] 1559493220
cheeseandwine [info] Hey, while I'm well out of highschool now, I still know that feeling. It wasn't till my final year of uni that I was diagnosed with anxiety - I'd worry about not getting good enough grades and disappointing people, ignore whatever assignments I had to do till it was almost due, panic because I hadn't prepped enough, do a rushed job and not get the grades I wanted, and go through the whole spiral again the next time.  The advice on here is really good, especially with the exercise and getting restful sleep.  One thing I'd modify is while Pomodoro is great once you get into it, I found that I couldn't focus for a whole 25 min when I started.  What I did instead was shorten the time - 3 minutes, tops.  It sounds stupid, but you CAN do 3 minutes.  And once you've started, it's easy to hit reset each time you get through your 3 minutes, and then you've completed your 20-odd minutes before you realise.  Also - just launch into it, if you know you have to read something, or write an outline, do it.  I would get into a trap of writing a to-do list for everything, and while it can be a useful tool to get your head in order, make sure you don't get stuck writing lists instead of your assignments.  The hardest thing for me to come to terms with was that those negative voices in your head are just that - in your head.  They are not a accurate reflection of your abilities, they are your worst aspects trying to sabotage your self worth.  When you catch yourself thinking like that, stop, close your eyes and take a deep breath and realise that you can do this.   The first few assignments can be tough going, but you can do it :)  Good luck!!  [info] None [info] 1355736680
anon3333444 [info] Is misdiagnosis still a big issue?  I tried to get diagnosed a couple of years ago, but they said I just have social anxiety after a 45 minutes interview.  I still believe very strongly I am on the autism spectrum, and I believe I was very much so when I was younger.  I'm not just shy, but I'm really slow in understanding what's going with other people and myself, despite having some serious IQ.  When I was a child (30 years ago) I was diagnosed with anxiety and bad parenting.  I understand they were misdiagnosing back then since there was no autism spectrum, but I was quite flustered with the latest diagnosis. [info] None [info] 1460139299
ostentatiousbitch [info] I've been having the same issues. I'm a reporter, and as a result I'm glued to my phone. I constantly refresh Facebook and Twitter for breaking news. The thing is that if there were anything happening that was important for me to care about my NY Times app would alert me or my editor would shoot me an email or a text. I've since started blocking my apps with an app blocker. I only get 10 minutes on Twitter, Facebook and Instagram every day and that's it. I'm done after that. What I noticed was that the first week I did that my anxiety was through the roof (I've been diagnosed with anxiety, so there's that disclaimer). My phone was like a pacifier. If I was in an uncomfortable situation, like waiting for class to start or waiting to cross the street, I would immediately grab my phone. Bad habit. I even had to leave my morning class a couple of times because I felt an anxiety attack coming on because I couldn't check my newsfeeds. It sounds pathetic, I know, but after a while I got used to it. The world has always been turning without us having to check out social media. Sorry for rambling, but I guess my advice is this: everything in moderation. Your friends' posts will still be there tomorrow if you don't get to them today. Social media is a part of our lives now, and it's understandable to want to check it, nobody is making you feel bad for that, but you have to know when to stop and realize that you have a life that doesn't need to be posted online. People who care will reach out to you and let you know they got engaged or are having a baby or got that awesome new job.  [info] INFJ [info] 1463506685
rushedblue [info] I grew up pretty neglected - my parents were both young work and alcoholics. When they did give me attention is was always negative; they would yell at me and make fun of me and frequently throw things at me. I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD at 11. Despite wanting to not be alive, i never did anything to actively end my misery until recently..  i was suck in a mentally and physically abusive relationship for about 2 years. I was gas-lighted and made to feel awful everyday. If i didn't do what he wanted me to, he'd slap and hit me and yell at me until my ptsd triggered and i'd go into fight or flight mode - he'd then call 911 and have me section 12'd (when you are sent to the psych ward). I would always try to leave him but once i did, he'd call the cops on me, and even if I did get out, i didn't know how i'd live because i didn't earn enough money to pay rent and all my bills myself. Back in the summer, my now ex abused and beat me so bad i had to run from our apartment to a neighboring gas station seeking help; I was covered in blood, eyes swollen shut and a few teeth knocked out, an ambulance was called and I was taken to the ER and he was arrested and he is still being held in custody. The months following the incident were incredibly hard - i was suffering survivors guilt, and even getting a second job, i couldn't afford rent and bills and i was evicted.  I became homeless, with no family where i am and very few friends. One day i said fuck it, i got a hotel room a handle of vodka and a large bottle of sleeping pills. Next thing is remember was being in a hospital bed - apparently my vomiting was so loud and obnoxious, the people in the room next to me complained and found me blacked out covered in vomit* and they called 911.  6 months later, I'm doing better, i moved in with a good friend and have been trying to get better. Things are looking up, but it's hard. I still have a lot of court dates i need to attend and it's very stressful, but i'm taking it one day at a time. [info] None [info] 1510859709
Sausagesanga [info] I didn't realise so many others thought the same things. I was diagnosed with anxiety after I lost my first daughter, and after my second daughter died in September it got really bad! I have the "intrusive thoughts" all the time. Maybe it's not an anxiety disorder I have after all. Maybe it's just a broken heart. Stolen innocence. Seeing life and death differently. It seems so cruel now, so different. Through the eyes of a bereaved mothers :(  [info] None [info] 1389025555
morganafiolett [info] I do this. I get really upset over pointless things. I know I'm doing it. I can't help it.And yes, I have been diagnosed with anxiety and yes, I have medication to help. [info] None [info] 1538123640
4theloveoffiber [info] I totally believe what we eat has a lot to do with what goes on with our bodies. I own a 95 acre organic farm so I try to ensure that as much as my diet as possible is food I have grown myself. Which is hard in the winter time when I still have to get milk and fruit at the stores, but two items that aren't homegrown that I consume seem to affect me if I have them during my period. Of course it's two things I love: coffee &amp; chocolate. So I try to cut down and not consume too much of either the week before and during my period. I take the vitamins every single day and as for the tincture, because it was $60 for a 1oz bottle I use it sparingly. 5 drops in a glass of juice when I'm having a good day 20 drops on a bad day. I also noticed that when all of this started my blood pressure went from low to sky high, I was diagnosed with anxiety attacks the summer before all this started as well and was having them two or three times a day.Thank you for sharing your experience with me, I look forward to reading the links.  [info] None [info] 1482868393
shaderade [info] I came to this thread to see if anyone answered with this! I've literally never been able to explain it. It happened for the first time when I was going into daycare. I've been reading the responses but they don't seem quite right. It's not because there's danger. It's just a fleeting moment of feeling like I'm in the wrong place, if not the wrong universe. I don't know what triggers it other than sometimes the sun shines a certain way or very occasionally anything dealing with sexuality.I used to call it "feeling like different people" as a kid. Edit: I've seen some comments about anxiety. I was diagnosed with anxiety just before I turned 19 but this started happening when I was 3 or 4. [info] None [info] 1514387572
Caliboy50124 [info] I'm kind of similar. Last year, I really enjoyed weed, then one day the day after smoking, I felt Dr. Thing was it didn't go away.  Months later I still "think " I have Dr, but only when I think about it. When I do things I never consider it there.  I've also thought I'm just paranoid and I convinced myself I had it ( I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I am the type of person to think he has a fatal disease from the slightest pain). Anyways I started smoking slowly a few months after and I'm fine. But I know how dp/Dr feels and I don't want anyone to experience it, especially the months I did. The only thing I can say is, and this worked for me, start smoking with a small amount, in a good environment, and if possible not alone. For me, getting high with friends takes away most of my paranoia and bad times during my high because you are having more fun and having a  conversation. Anyways, good luck, and if you do start smoking again, don't rush into it. Baby steps. [info] None [info] 1514349307
MysteriousNomad [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, but as they later found out, it was me knowing that i wasn’t going to get XYZ done which was giving me anxiety...gotta attack the issue at the root!! [info] None [info] 1570375584
dammit_daniel [info] I can definitely relate to this OP. I am 23 I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ADD and have been on ritalin previously. I have just had a sleep study and hope something comes of it. [info] None [info] 1470868363
paincoats [info] To me, that sounds like anxiety. I get that to a lesser degree, and I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Intrestingly, the counsellor initially thought I was on the spectrum. I wouldn't be surprised if anxiety was commonly comorbid with autism. [info] None [info] 1423107859
justhereforthemems7 [info] It’s been a year since I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1564957354
amoz2k12 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety before, I only really stress out when I'm driving if it snows or if it's thunderstorming at night. I'm really light sensitive and for some reason lightning in a night sky gives me horrible headaches. Other than that driving daily is just boring. I've driven 1000 miles alone before and that really sucked. [info] https://amzn.com/w/332121UEHWAN1 [info] 1452195874
garlotch [info] Still, d1fty has a good point. Check out /r/chch. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, as well as a list of other illnesses. I was put on resperidone, a drug to calm my anxiety. It was so powerful, that for all the time I was taking it (3 years) I was quite literally a zombie. The best decision I have made, was to stop taking it, and throw it in the bin. Despite my anxiety, the surges of hot prickles up my body, I have definitely changed. I made it to the second audition of New Zealand's got talent, in Wellington (2012), and I went up on stage in front of thousands of people, that was probably the most frightening thing of my life. I also play in a highland-pipe-band, and go to events every year, thousands of people watch me there too. But you know what? I don't feel scared of them any more. I honestly could not care what those people think of me, and when I get out there in the spotlight, I am proud of what I do, and have accomplished. Now, I welcome fear, I welcome anxiety. It reminds me that I am human. Fear is one of the most vivid feelings in your life, and if you embrace it... you will live a lot happier. My doctors have urged me to get back on ANTI-ANXIETY medication, but I wouldn't take that again. Even if I was paid 300 dollars a week, I wouldn't take it.Point being, I got over my anxiety from 'Practice'. From being out there in the crowds. The more you experience it oxychromaticdynamite, the less it will effect you so.Sorry If I rambled/ranted on, I'm really bored, and this is the perfect thread to vent my thoughts onto. &lt;3 [info]  [info] 1432191032
lKnown2Bl [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and Bipolar disorder and weed honestly makes me really calm. When I'm sober people think I'm on uppers, I'm always moving, trembling hands, fidgety, and have the potential to become easily agitated which leads to rage. I'd recommend smoking Indica for a chill relaxing high. No jitters, no moving, just stuck in a euphoric bliss. It would also be a good idea to do this in a safe environment because smoking can cause paranoia in people and that added with agoraphobia can't be a good combination.  [info] None [info] 1320752894
autisticparsnip [info] Well Mum brought it to my attention a few years back that she thought I could have aspergers, just from reading the symptoms and such online. I was taken aback by this and took it the wrong way. But then when I met the guy I'm dating, I asked him a few questions about my friend, but he thought I was talking about myself and said "Yeah, I have actually been thinking that you have aspergers."So I went to a psychiatrist and a psychologist and am now working with a specialist. It has been the most amazing journey, and I have realised that for most of my life I've let people walk all over me hahaBut yeah, before that I was diagnosed with anxiety, which is still there obviously, OCD, and one particular psychologist thought I could have BPD - which is far faaarr from the truth.  [info] Asperger's Female [info] 1511859448
music_boy93 [info] I have not been diagnosed with OCD but I think it's possible I do have it. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder NOS and social anxiety. The reason I think OCD might be at least slightly probable is because of the poisoning fears when I was little, my social anxiety takes the form more of obsessive thoughts (I go over everything I had said and done in my mind after a social interaction to look for anything embarrassing or stupid I may have said/done), and I kind of have a very irrational fear of becoming a pedophile or being accuse of being a pedophile. I've had this fear for the last 5 years and it's slightly worsened over time. I have absolutely no attraction to children and pedophilia disgusts me so I know *logically* I'm not a pedophile and no one has any reason to think I am one. It wasn't until recently that I found out that Pedophile OCD was actually a thing. The only reason I'm not more certain that I have OCD is that I don't think I spend hours a day obsessing about the pedophile thing. It's more like short durations off and on during the day. I've never really kept track of how long it lasts and I feel like if I did, it'd only get worse.  [info] None [info] 1432007941
mrsmarycrawley13 [info] Hugs, mama. I was diagnosed with anxiety years before becoming pregnant, but it was mild and I hated the meds so I got a pet instead which helped. I had my baby last August and literally just last night admitted to myself and my husband that I've got PPD/PPA. I think if you're already predisposed to these types of conditions, the hormones can make them so so so much worse postpartum. You're definitely not alone. Like others have said, seek out counseling and please talk to your OB so they can prescribe/adjust your meds. PPD isn't just not connecting with your baby. It's different for everyone. Good luck, mama. You've got this. [info] None [info] 1497996900
chicklet2011 [info] Anything that causes me stress makes my ticks worse.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but I'm doing great right now.  [info] None [info] 1375085187
mega_trex [info] One thing I didn't mention was that I have been diagnosed with anxiety and do have panic attacks.  New experiences definitely make me anxious.  But I don't know if I should want sex and be anxious because right now I don't desire to ever sex. [info] None [info] 1471203486
faith6274 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and then I guess more [info] None [info] 1586497061
RobAlly [info] Similar to me. I've had anxiety for 10 years. I was diagnosed with anxiety. But it wasn't until recently that I realized I have agoraphobia. I've also know that I had it,  just didn't know it had a name.  [info] None [info] 1451284914
pesh527 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety. So I'm not using the term loosely... I'm using it to describe what actually happened to me. Where did you get the idea that I don't actually have anxiety?Also, it's my employer's responsibility to protect me from sexual harassment. I shouldn't have to do something I'm uncomfortable with, and I don't have the authority to ban this customer from the store. [info] None [info] 1459569596
forloveofscience [info] Oh *man*, before I was diagnosed with anxiety, I spent three months only being able to eat from about 10 in the morning until 3 or 4 in the afternoon, because I would literally throw up if I tried to eat earlier or later (when my anxiety was the worst).  I had just switched mouthwash brands, so I stopped using that brand, thinking that might have something to do with it.  When it didn't make a difference, I stopped using mouthwash entirely.  When that didn't help, I tried asking all the nurses I knew (several of my friends' mothers were nurses) if they knew of some kind of flu that last over a month (it had only been a little more than a month at that point).  When friends invited me out for dinner, I would have a mini-anxiety attack worrying over whether I should actually eat or not, and if anyone would notice if I didn't, or if I could get away with just eating very lightly, and, if my body didn't let me, what they would think if I ended up puking in the bushes outside afterward?  Managing my eating schedule felt like a full time job in addition to the full time job I was already working.At the end of three months, the nausea mostly went away because I was having difficulty holding onto thoughts long enough to feel anything about them.  They just whirled around in my mind like scraps of paper caught in a tornado, and trying to catch and hold on long enough to read what was there was a Herculean task.  That was worse than the nausea, but not by much.Stupid anxiety. [info] None [info] 1411271404
nedermeier [info] okay. thank you very much. maybe it is, I am diagnosed with anxiety also. [info] None [info] 1488827696
redrebellion [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety by a psychiatrist and told my mom (who does not work in the medical industry at all). "No, you don't have anxiety!" Oh, what a relief! /s [info] None [info] 1469549616
PieShouldBeFree [info] I just wanted to add another perspective to your analysis.  On week 2 you say that you became more social and the paranoia of social situations grew weaker.  For me this is the opposite, as time goes on I become less social and grow to hate social situations all together.  I'm sure this is just because we have different personalities and my normal sober self hates social situations and always has.  Also as time goes on and I become even more sober I turn back into my normal anxious self and start to miss the cannabis even more.  On a side note, directed towards the "fake happy chemicals" statement.  I would also like to offer a different perspective on this if I may.  Now, I have been diagnosed with anxiety before and was on prescription anti-anxiety medication for it before I had ever even started smoking cannabis.  Now that was an addiction, I absolutely despise those things.  They worked for me, but the body has a way of becoming extremely addicted to them even though i hated them and their horrible side effects.  Anyways I could go on about those but I won't as it's not the topic.  I just find it peculiar that you refer to cannabis as "fake happy chemicals".  But when you really think about it, if it truly brings happiness to someone, how could it be considered fake.  If you are happy, then you're happy.  If no harm is being caused to anyone then where does the problem lie.  It changes the normally anxious chemical make up of my brain and adds a some happiness and positivity where it would normally be drowned out, overlooked, and unnoticed.  And it's not fake happiness, it allows me to see all the very real things and people around me that are positive.  Things that before I took for granted and had no time to acknowledge.  I appreciate everything more.  I stop worrying and putting all my focus on mundane negative thoughts.  When I go to bed at night I'm not bombarded with unimportant worries but instead fall asleep quickly and sleep well.  My health improved, my normally high blood pressure was for the first time at normal levels when I started smoking daily to a functional level.  People noticed that I was all around happier in life.  I opened up to people, shared my feelings.  All of this I owe to these chemicals you speak of. They keep the negative chemicals away and let me experience real happiness that I otherwise deny.Anyways, I understand that many people are effected differently from cannabis and respect that it's not for everyone. I just wanted to throw out another perspective to the situation. I wish you and OP well in your journey away from it.  As for me, I'll smoke the next bowl for you.  Good luck. [info] None [info] 1362472941
djsnek69 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety last week lmao. Just relax man. Try talking to your school counselor [info] 🎉 1,000,000 Attendee! 🎉 [info] 1552984062
dancinginthesunshine [info] First, if YOU are opposed to medication (not your SO...they aren't dealing with this), then what about a natural help? Magnesium has helped me a lot.Therapy isn't your only option, but its a really helpful one. I find going for a run helps too...anything to get me out of my own head.I've been diagnosed with anxiety for 11 years, but this summer was one of the worst yet. I coped through with meditating and magnesium for a while, and then finally I started therapy and went back on some medication. It's a long process of recovery. [info] None [info] 1538521206
MajesticTie321 [info] Cheers for the advice! Sorry for any offence caused - that was not my intention, especially as I have been diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1547835111
gimmenutella [info] Yes, but I'm so used to them now that I don't notice them... Or I don't get them as much, not sure. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety I for sure thought I had some kind of heart issue, and went to a cardiologist and everything.  [info] None [info] 1421770347
Cutel1ttlebutterfly [info] I can see how the relationship with my dad left me feeling lonely and anxious as an adolescent and later on as an adult.  My dad was violent and aggressive with me (a boy) and he was never kind when I showed even the slightest feminine mannerisms.  I adored my mom and women in general: singers, teachers, classmates, and my dad made me feel like there was something wrong with that.  Reading this article, I can see how our relationship greatly influenced my feelings of loneliness and anxiety.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and stress disorders and I lament that I had to go through what I did and what I am still going through.  I work with young students and I feel sad that some of them may be going through what I went through once.  (Again, another reason why planned parenthood should be taught and practiced in every society!) [info] None [info] 1513829533
momsasylum [info] I used to do this so often a woman I worked with complained to my boss.Sometime later I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. That was the last time I was able to work. [info] None [info] 1390808230
seagull19 [info] Same thing happened to me when I was diagnosed with anxiety. It took me a long time to finally ask my mom to get help, but after my first therapy session, she wanted to know all the details about what I was going through, and what I talked about in my session. I did the same as you, told her I didn’t want to talk about it. She cried and cried and cried and tried to guilt me into telling her what was going on. Like you, it didn’t make me want to open up to her. I moved out about a month ago. Best thing to have ever happened to me. I wish you the best, you are not alone.  [info] None [info] 1540085494
Sophie_Amelia_ [info] Wait what about the NHS?Does the fact that I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and given anti-depressants exclude me from their treatment? If so then I guess I might as well not delay and just go private. Who needs money right? [info] MtF | Am I really trans though? [info] 1560081618
gunkdad [info] I’d say more or less the worst feeling in this world for me is paranoia, which sadly is a reality for me every day. I was diagnosed with anxiety about 7 years ago, and lately it seems to be getting worse. I have trouble being in houses or rooms alone due to the constant feeling of what seems to be a dangerous energy that follows me around wherever I go. [info] None [info] 1566552226
rachiedoubt [info] I struggle with pretty severe anxiety. I have PTSD &amp; generalized anxiety and often experience panic attacks. One of the main symptoms for me is heart palpitations. They are such a normal part of my life now that I often just ignore them. I used to get scared to work out or get my heart rate up too high, because they were more likely to happen then, and having the palpitations would make me worry I was about to have a panic attack (because they often happened before or during a panic attack). I had to train my brain to understand that just because I have a heart palpitation here and there from anxiety doesn't mean I'm about to have a full blown attack. The more I can live my normal life through these things, the more my brain doesn't react in fear when I have these symptoms and other certain ones that usually signify anxiety.I went to a doctor and had an EKG when I first experienced these issues and they told me my heart was perfectly healthy. Later on I was diagnosed with anxiety. I'm not saying that this will happen to you, there's no way to know until you speak to a doctor. But this has been my experience with heart palpitations. I know a handful of people who have had these symptoms and did have another issue that wasn't anxiety, but it can definitely be caused by anxiety and just simply stress as someone else mentioned. I hope you feel better soon. [info]  [info] 1466323720
Drifter1000 [info] I suffer from general anxiety disorder. There is no trigger to it, it simply comes and goes. I can go weeks without an anxiety attack, while at other times I can get multiple attacks a day.When I first started getting it, I thought it was something wrong with my heart since my heart would flutter and my nerves would be shot. Went to the ER, they said everything was fine. But they prescribed some benzos the same night since then and there, I was diagnosed with anxiety.I opted out of medication for more natural solutions. I've heard some horror stories about benzos, so I only took them once and stopped. [info] None [info] 1418305814
rc1025 [info] My first pregnancy was a 20 week loss, my second was successful, and I am here again now. All the worrying in the world could not prepare me for the pain of that late loss, it was so useless. Worry is such a useless exercise. I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD after that, and my next pregnancy I was on zoloft a bit and had appointments every two weeks, mostly to manage my anxiety. I would talk to your doctor about your levels of anxiety. Tell her it is impeding on your day-to-day life. When it gets to that point, I think something needs to be done. Also, if you are anxious, get off these boards. Stop reading about incompetent cervixes and PPROM and stuff. I wish I had taken that advice myself. I'm doing better this pregnancy so far- the other day I was reading about something horrible (like you are doing) and freaking out and then was able to tell myself "stop it. stop worrying about this rare, unlikely thing. you'll deal with it if it happens". And then I just...stopped. It was a huge moment for me, brought on by therapy, drugs, and doctor's help. You will deal with it if it happens. Until then, you are okay. [info] 21 week loss 5/16, rainbow boy 4/17, #2 due 10/1 [info] 1519329281
Surr07 [info] I recently had a breakdown with my ADHD, anxiety and hypersensitivity. I am diagnosed. However, my medicine is slowly starting to not work as effectively as it once did. So until I can get that fixed it is going to be an uphill battle. My suggestion is to allow yourself to feel those emotions. My problem seems to be keeping all of what I like to call my asshole feelings (really it is just honesty) to myself for a good portion if not all of my day. Becomes a sincere task that occasionally I am unable to overcome. I would say try going and getting diagnosed. That is what it took for me. My first trip, I was diagnosed with anxiety, my second trip I was diagnosed with ADD and ADHD. It sucks not being medicated for it but it is do-able. Just have to tell yourself you are taking steps in the right direction to better your current situation. Good luck, hope this helps in one way or another. [info] None [info] 1531486077
TheRosesAndGuns [info] I tell small white lies when I think it'll protect people I love. I told my mum the other day that I'd slept good (when I hadn't) because she's worried after I was diagnosed with anxiety and am on medication for it. Other than that, I make a huge effort to make sure I don't lie. [info] ♀ [info] 1396983219
Pneu6 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and very rarely get less than nine hours of sleep, so I would definitely say the latter from personal experiences. The former implies that less sleep makes you more anxious, but I don't think that's the case for clinical anxiety. I'm sure there is a correlation between sleep deprivation and being temporarily more anxious, but I don't believe that would require anxiety medication or therapy but rather medication or other methods that that aid sleep.I've been anxious for many years and just recently realized that it wasn't normal. Since I went so long undiagnosed I developed my own methods to fall asleep amidst my thoughts, which is why I can get so much sleep, but during the day there is an onslaught of thoughts of running off the road, having an aneurysm, or anything like that.Tl;dr: I think there is a significant difference between anxiety that comes from too little sleep and anxiety that keeps you from sleeping.  [info] None [info] 1515348551
GunstarGreen [info] I agree. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but I show up to work on time every day and do it to the best of my ability. Its a high-pressure job too, although not as high as WWE talent, of course. Lars has been on PPVs in feobt of millions, and in live shows in front of tens of thousands. If NXT id supposed to ease tge transition from developmental to the main roster, then Lars is in an unfortumate position.  [info] I got all the numbers [info] 1547253393
TotallyNotSurtr [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, but in the context of this post it stems from me fucking up with tipping, since I always try to tip people in the service business; because in the country I'm currently living in they get a low base salary and mostly rely on tips. Also over-thinking it, now that I look back at that time, I guess. Did you ever experience something in the past that you feel really embarrassed about, even though it actually isn't something that terrible if you look at it objectively? Well, it's one of those moments for me.  [info] None [info] 1530044947
allofthebeards [info] I should add that I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders and have taken anxiety medication in the past but have been very successful with my therapy and meditation this past year, and I'm happy not to be on the drugs while pregnant :) the drug I was on is not safe for babies  [info] Aug 22 [info] 1455050862
sundaygrrrl [info] One of the questions asked by my doctor when I was diagnosed with anxiety was "do you tend to get angry quickly?" which was a huge YES for me. I've been on Zoloft for 3 months &amp; have noticed a tremendous difference in that. [info] None [info] 1481309972
IntrovertIdentity [info] I think what touch my nerve (although I didn’t post anything because today wasn’t my day for it) is that too often, I’ve been taught that “mental illness is simply unconfessed sin.”Too often, the solution to any mental health situation is more prayer or the likes and it neglects what is actually going on.Anxiety is more than just “everyday stress” or “DSM diagnosed psychological stress,” because it can be physiological as well. For example, my internist is my primary care physician. He once prescribed Paxil SR because I had anxiety. As a result, I see anxiety as a medical issue even though most folks see it as psychological.So, when there’s a post that reads “anxiety is contemplating your future without putting God in it” seems overly simplistic at best and dangerous at the worst.And while I was diagnosed with anxiety, I was an active church goer. So, then, what was the basis of my anxiety? Not contemplating God?If you’re trying to make a Successory poster like statement, what you said was fine. But, it really glosses over what anxiety actually is.And when we factor in the immanence and transcendence of God, our relationship with God when we are not feeling our best only gets more complicated. [info] John 12:32 [info] 1550004855
Mega-Mew [info] The issue is that she insists on going like an hour away to eat something and I kinda have to work on other things too. XD And she has like a ton of homework. She's worse than me with procrastinating. Then again I have been diagnosed with anxiety so yeah. That might have something to do with it.  [info] 4485-2366-6045 || May (Y, X, ΩR) || 3768, 2041, 0908 [info] 1466754878
TheLadyOfLiteracy [info] I have the same fear of throwing up in public, it's a serious phobia and I often feel paralyzed by it.  But is it actual nausea, or is it just anxiety?  I remember having to sit in class before I was diagnosed with anxiety, and when I got waves of nausea and dizzyness I thought I was physically ill with a virus or something, I didn't realize anxiety could manifest itself so strongly in physical ways. [info] None [info] 1397702968
Plagman39339 [info] Grandma's old and not dying perse but everyone in the family has heart disease. My uncle's ex-wife got diagnosed with terminal breast cancer.I'm diagnosed with anxiety and took my medication but I haven't been doing the breathing techniques. [info] None [info] 1545779422
shhsunshine [info] I’m the same way. Honestly, when someone argues or debates with my I go full defensive. I don’t mean in an angry way, I just mean I get really worked up. Probably because my NMom made EVERYTHING an argument so I constantly had to be prepared for an emotional battle. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago and I get the same symptoms. I get extreme heart rate, I start panicking and can tell I’m getting upset. I’m sorry you go through that. (Not saying you have anxiety I hope it didn’t come across that way I’m just stating that’s why I think it happens to me)  [info] None [info] 1523029477
gabez814 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, I'm hoping to find a physician who agrees its "similar" to PTSD because like you said based on the wording it definitely sounds like its up to the physicians. [info] None [info] 1478738886
EllaCOfficial [info] The first step in losing weight is accepting that it is *your* fault. It was hard for me to do. I was diagnosed with anxiety and it made it very hard for me to find my fault in how I got so big. I blamed my anxiety, I blamed the abusive relationship, I blamed everyone but myself, and it really was my fault. I over ate, my anxiety did not make me, it was something I chose to do. [info] F22 | 5'3" | SW: 174.0 CW: 119.9 GW: 109.0/sexy af 💥 [info] 1489275300
jimmyscorncracked [info] I can't speak to exactly what you are going through since I can't handle Keto (brain fog, worst headaches) but I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder and panic attacks. They have been under control for years but when I started intermittent fasting 16:8 they started to come back, especially after I break my fast. I had read and heard that adrenaline (epinephrine) is produced in much higher amounts when you are in a fasted state. Dr Jason Fung explains the logic behind this pretty well. Basically if you have no food, your body gives you the adrenaline to go out and hunt for food or to go out and gather it. Adrenal spikes in today's sedentary society manifest themselves as panic attacks. That could be what is happening to you.Ultimately though, listen to your doctor.  [info] None [info] 1493490268
OliveWildly [info] YTA. People are looking at her and making comments about her behavior -- not yours. It's easy to assume that people are judging you when you have anxiety (which it sounds like you have a dose of), but if she's the one creating sound and movement, they're not looking at you.I was diagnosed with anxiety several years ago, and I can see where your frustration would come from. Here's something that changed my entire outlook (from my therapist) *"People are inherently selfish."* We approach every situation thinking more about ourselves than about the people around us. So all of that embarrassing stuff? Most people don't even notice it because they're too busy thinking about themselves.She also pointed out that it's **instinct** to look at something/someone when they create movement or noise (e.g. walk into a room) but it doesn't mean anything. We do it because (even tho we've evolved) we are still hardwired to notice changes in our environment and check to see if we're still safe. So when you walk into a room and 20 heads turn to look... or when your GF starts dancing in the grocery store... they're just checking the change in environment. They don't care as much about what she's doing as you do.I'm calling YTA because your anxiety is YOURS to own and deal with. When you push her to alter her behavior to placate your anxiety, you are making HER deal with your anxiety. Recognize that it's yours to learn how to manage. It's okay! There are plenty of us out here still figuring it out. [info] None [info] 1558476318
EmersonJay [info] My friend hasn't done anything but serve as a support system. She's an amazing person. I was talking about the angle of potentially having developed PTSD. That's the boat I'm in.A couple weeks ago, I woke up at 2 in the morning to a stranger standing over me in my bedroom. I chased him out, and there was more light outside. It was my new neighbor, who was ridiculously drunk. He kept saying he needed help, but only managed to tell me that his girlfriend was at my best friend's house before stumbling off. The guy was bleeding pretty good from his arm. So I walked to my best friend's place, because she's right next door to me, to figure out what the hell is going on. Sure enough, the guy's girlfriend was there, drunk and covered in dry blood, sobbing on best friend's couch until her dad could pick her up. Scary shit. I've been having nightmares and flashbacks and panic attacks (I have been diagnosed with anxiety since before my insurance ran out).  [info] None [info] 1504460894
emmysobes [info] Ugh, slight would be an understatement. I have been diagnosed with anxiety/ocd for over 20 years. Have had PTSD since I was a teenager. It’s ALL gotten worse since having my daughter. I didn’t realize how much of a delicate balance I had going before I had her. We tried for a baby because I felt great, normal even! But then once morning sickness hit...bye bye. I saw other posters mention rage; yeah, hello🙋🏻‍♀️ [info] None [info] 1560301110
CrypticEmpress [info] Silence can be nice, if you just wanna hang out that's great you don't have to talk.I was diagnosed with anxiety a while ago and I'm not so sure that's true anymore but silence can be really comfy and I'm just glad to have you there with me.So people in general, especially those with anxiety, please don't feel like you need to keep coming up with things to say. I enjoy your company regardless :) [info] None [info] 1542946821
anothermanoutoftime [info] Hey buddy-Your story mirrors my own in many ways. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder a few years ago, but it really reared its head in the last 6 months or so as I coped with a great deal of work stress. I would get home, eat supper with my wife, and play Skyrim until bedtime. Usually past bedtime, because I didn't want to leave that world where I was a hero, or a villain, or maybe just a simple leek farmer, who happened to also be Archmage of the College of Winterhold. On the weekends I'd sometimes load the game up after breakfast and only stop for dinner. I know exactly what you mean about the roleplaying aspect- I'd construct a character in my head and really dive into it, and all the worry and stress would slide away. I wasn't me, I was a Nord warrior with a grudge against necromancers, or a Khajiit trying to find redemption for past crimes. But I'm also here to tell you that it gets better- I'm on a new med combo that finally seems to be working, although one of them makes me sweat like a damn pig, and life looks bright instead of terrifying for the first time in a long time. I'm glassing up a bit here, so I'll just say keep moving forward, that's all any of us can do. And PM me anytime you want. And death to the Stormcloaks! [info] PC [info] 1470462618
clearlyalark [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks and bpdII.  This sounds like tachycardia or maybe even ventricular fibrillation (beats around 300) if it feels like you had to go to the hospital.  I have only officially been diagnosed with “panic attacks”, not heart issues, because I’m never in the Dr.’s office when tachycardia occurs - though my provider agreed that it was most likely what I was experiencing.  That being said, Pranayama yogic breathing exercises are really the ONLY thing that helps stop rapid heart beats for me.  Hope this provides some useful info 🤟🏻 [info] None [info] 1538840948
lachesepia [info] Oh god I'm 19 and I still have those thoughts. I gotta beat the panic down lol.... Yes I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders [info] None [info] 1560630867
blueboy1095 [info] This is not the right thing for here. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I hear “it’s not that bad,” and “just get over it,” all the time. [info] None [info] 1548951587
mrs_sugarlips [info] Yup. It sent me to the ER twice before I was diagnosed with anxiety by a GI specialist. The meds helped me. Therapy (CBT) helped me. Having a husband calm me down and remind me to do the CBT and to remember that it is anxiety and not me being sick helped me. [info] Panic Disorder, PMDD, Specific Phobic Disorder [info] 1434859529
phoebrie [info] I've had the worst year of my life this year it's the final  year of my a levels and I was diagnosed with anxiety this year because I couldn't cope because of everything going on with school and my wreck of a family life. I've put on over a stone and have started to genuinely hate myself I could do with some motivation to lose the weight and get my life back on track.  [info] None [info] 1497205369
VictoriousssBIG23 [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety, borderline personality disorder, and PTSD. While I still struggle when I'm sober, I find that weed helps me be more in touch with the emotions of other people and how my actions affect theirs and vice versa. It also helps keep me calm because the BPD causes rapid mood swings including periods of intense anger or sadness, but stoned me is always happy and go-with-the-flow. It also helps me with PTSD related nightmares because I don't dream when I smoke before bed. I don't have the urge to self-injure when I smoke. However, I've been experiencing more anxiety and paranoia lately when I smoke. For years, it was the opposite. I was always relaxed and calm, but lately, my anxiety's gotten bad and idk what it is, really. I think part of it has to do with the legal status. It's not legal in my state yet so I get scared that someone in the hallway of my apartment building will smell it and report me for it or if I'm at home, I'm afraid that my parents will catch me with it. But I also experience anxiety sometimes even if there's good vibes around so idk. This didn't start happening until around this time last year so maybe my body chemistry changed? I still very much enjoy weed and the positive benefits I get from it. The anxiety is just an inconvenience at this point that I hope gets resolved.  [info] None [info] 1515398264
BoogerInYourSalad [info] I used to drink at most 10 MUGS a day. Then I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, the psych almost a had a heart attack upon mentioning my caffeine intake.  Slowly reduced the cups, had headaches/felt lethargic and had to look for caffeine-free substitutes. I wouldn’t declare I’m anxiety-free but I feel “flatter” now and it’s been awhile since the last time I felt there’s a tennis ball in my throat and balloons in my chest. [info] Because Itchy Nostrils [info] 1507717780
Tam3DK1LL3R [info] My parents noticed I was caring different a couple months ago and I went to a psychiatrist. I was diagnosed with anxiety and I really felt like lying on some of the tests lol. [info] None [info] 1561870436
gazork_chumble_spuzz [info] That's the spirit! When I was diagnosed with anxiety and was talking it all over with my doctor, he told me that it was going to be hard to deal with it and it would take a lot of time, but that we have to *fight*. That really stuck with me. It is a fight. [info] None [info] 1423062126
jesseroundy [info] I am a 17 teen year old and was placed in a "youth treatment program" at the age of 13 and was only recently just discharged. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder  and have a almost constant overwhelming feeling of panic in public spaces and have a fear of leaving my home. The reason I was placed placed into the ""program" was I was using drugs. [info] None [info] 1328737631
livelifelove13 [info] &gt; Would you say a person taking insulin is looking for attention?How can you even draw equivalence to this? It completely trivializes the DEATHS that occur as a result of people not taking their insulin. And before you come back at me with the deaths that occur from not taking pills for these perceived illnesses, try to remember that they are all suicides and self-inflicted.&gt;I have education in early childhood development and have worked with the 4-6 year old age group for fifteen years. I have seen kids with ADD/ADHD versus neurotypical kids. They are very different.I worked in child care for a significantly less amount of time than you did, and I agree with you, I know the hyperactive kids from the normal ones. Why does it have to be a disease or a disorder, though? ADD/ADHD kids aren't exactly rare. Not in the majority, but certainly not uncommon. That's enough for me to say that this is simply a trait of a sizeable chunk of kids.&gt; It's kinda naive until you live it.The reason I posted this in the first place is because I did live it. My parents were determined to find a reason for every one of my perceived faults, including hyperactivity. So I was diagnosed as a kid--and in high school, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder as well as MDD. It wasn't until later that I found that these perceived issues went away when I actually started trying to care about my life. I was always hyper and never focused, but I later chose to not be hyper and to focus. It's all about choice. You and your husband may not choose to place ADD/ADHD onto your identity, but you can't deny that many people do--especially kids in junior high, high school, and college. The epidemic of attaching one's self to a mental disorder can only have negative consequences. [info] None [info] 1490010015
Sam_theMan [info] My life is great. I have an above average IQ, great parents, grandparents who have offered to pay my way through college, and I live in a very nice area. Yet somehow I'm depressed. My psyche says it's biological. So it's not going away unless I take my meds. Except I've been taking medications for two years, and very little has changed. And the only reason I was diagnosed with anxiety and ASD is because I tried to kill myself. Common sense would have you believe my life is perfect. But apparently not.I feel trapped in my head. So to answer OP's question: Life is a lottery. But that doesn't mean everyone else loses. We all have to just try and survive. And I guess it's important that we all do our best to make the next generation of kids the happiest, healthiest, and safest of all time. [info] None [info] 1412220560
littlelamb0814 [info] When I was in high school I was diagnosed with anxiety. I took medication for a while, but went off of it when I was a senior. I wanted to go to college without meds. And I did! But I also sorta thought I was "done" with anxiety. I thought, "I don't want that to be part of my life anymore", so I thought it wasn't.Sometimes that works. But sometimes it doesn't. I definitely have problems with it again. I sort of wish I paid more attention to that anxiety earlier on so that I could deal with it better now. I don't like the feeling of having been "beaten" by it, and going back to a counselor to pick up some better strategies and just have someone to talk with about it who understands is also stable themselves. I mean, I look forward to finding ways to cope, but I just wish I had done the leg work earlier.I get super obsessed over little social things that I feel I did "wrong". Ruminate on lots of things, even things out  of my control. I have these unrealistic expectations for myself and don't even realize it most of the time. And I feel super guilty about the possibility of doing the wrong thing or making someone feel bad or worried about them thinking bad things about me. I wish I could just not give a fuck but I do not know how. [info] None [info] 1492738233
IsolaOw [info] For me it was when I was diagnosed with anxiety, nothings been the same since and I don’t know if it ever will be again. I hope though, but for anyone who’s just been diagnosed or in the early years, trust me, it does get better &lt;3 [info] None [info] 1549625315
sheriff1980 [info] Hey bud, I was diagnosed with anxiety a little over a year ago. I started having the same symptoms you are describing about 2 weeks ago. Through CBT training, I kinda told myself that it was all in my head, I started drinking GALLONS of water a day, peeing every 45 minutes or so. I went to the doc today and got tested, and sure enough I am diabetic. Don't let your anxiety diagnose you (or not diagnose you) go get checked. I am 37 years old and scared about what is happening to me. But at least I know it isn't all in my head.  [info] T2 / 2017 / PILLS  [info] 1496191296
likestosleep [info] I'll probably get hell for this, but I think it may be helpful. Some points that I would like to note are that I was only in an abusive relationship for 3 years and I am currently I mental health professional. It wasn't until I was with my current SO that I realized that I had turned in to my so hated ex. I would yell and scream and manipulate. It's a wonder he stuck it out, but he also made therapy a must. I didn't want to go at first for many reasons. I was strong and didn't need it, I shouldn't still be affected by the abuse, and because I help people with problems, I'm not the one that has them.  Right? Oh so wrong.I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD along with anger issues. Through the past year and a half I have learned so much about myself and even more so, how to handle my emotions in a healthier way. You can see that there is a problem and you want to fix it, so make that step. I can't tell you how thankful I am that I did.  [info] None [info] 1453754140
iYNS_55 [info] I act non-anxious, confident and "the tough meat", even though I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1565182607
roxychick4327 [info] I am on the verge of making a big move myself (although not quite as far) as well as starting a new job. I also have a 7 year old who is making this move with me and I fear repercussions of it not working out so much. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I know the feeling. Every day the move draws nearer I need to talk myself out of talking myself out of it all. For every negative, anxiety filled thought I remind myself of something in my current life I want to be different and how this move is going to help me accomplish that. I never let myself dwell in fear too long if I can help it. Sometimes I fail, but sometimes I succeed. Make a list of pros. Refer back to it when you get scared. Immediately following every scared thought with a small positive is something I've tried to train myself to do. Honestly, sometimes it's the little things like I think about how my new apartment has a fireplace and I've always wanted a fireplace. It sounds so juvenile, but it works. Think about how no real reward comes without risk. The discomfort of the move is only temporary. Your new definition of normal will set in. All of us have the ability to adapt. I would hate to think that you or I didn't succeed just because we were too scared to try. [info] None [info] 1452932222
jacob_v [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety as a kid so i had to go and do some psychology test then have a doctor say i was clear and then just recently i had to get a waiver because of my concussions from playing football [info] None [info] 1543941196
Certainlyunsure22 [info] Yeah I’m starting to think I also have ocd although I haven’t been professionally diagnosed. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and for the longest time I’ve just thought my episodes were just anxiety episodes. I guess we will have to wait and see until my next therapist appt. stay tuned  [info] None [info] 1550356559
GonnSoares [info] Hey there. If that helps, years ago I have been diagnosed with anxiety by some sort of general medicine professional. When that happened, my symptons were mostly physical and I ended up going to the hospital emergencies because of a panic attack, thinking I was having an heart attack and I was going to die (I made a dozen of cardiovascular exams) . Now, years later, I still deal with those physical symptons (and worse), but emotionally and psychologically I feel just like you described. I can't sleep, I don't feel motivated to do anything and I think about death uncountable times during the day. Are you having any physical symptons (concretely and in detail) that are a constant? I would be glad if I could help you. [info] None [info] 1492483973
brittybat [info] I feel like this a lot. I feel really calm most of the time, but I'm also at home most of the time, and not much makes me anxious when I'm at home in my comfy bed. But I've been diagnosed with anxiety by two doctors (just my regular primary care doctors) when I went in for unrelated issues and put on medication for anxiety.Also my boyfriend seems to think my anxiety isn't that bad for me to be on medication for it. But also I feel the most relaxed when I'm with him and he's never really seen me in the situations I get anxious in. But does make me second guess myself, my diagnoses, wonder if the doctors are just pushing medications. [info] None [info] 1556174116
mademoiselle93 [info] If your school has like educational services to help people when struggling academically. When I was diagnosed with anxiety, it helped to sit down with someone who could talk to me about everything I was experiencing and trying to pinpoint problems. If she hasn't done this, I would suggest it. [info] None [info] 1459912371
Chimerasame [info] Oh yeah, I get you.I've been diagnosed with anxiety by a GP to the extent he felt comfortable prescribing me as-needed medication for it, but I don't know if it's "chronic". I get it sometimes when I go to grocery stores, and when i'm around a lot of unfamiliar or only-slightly-familiar people in a scenario where there isn't a really specific prescribed sort of action-we're-supposed-to-do (e.g. parties w/ like 20-30 people are often bad, but audiences with like 200-300 people are fine).I'm not real clear on where the neurotypicality line is, heh. [info] None [info] 1498591682
zingersting [info] That's true. I am saying anxiety because I have been diagnosed with anxiety by more than one professional. This is a similar thought pattern to my own which does cause a constant hum of irrational fear and/or a full blown panic attack. Ruminating on these things are what is my issue. I'm not trying to Dr.Google or anything.  [info] None [info] 1524192526
lonelyanxiousfreak [info] It will be difficult to type me since my medical condition influences my emotions and hobbies. It is a mobility-challenged related disability. And my other medical condition gives me self esteem issues as a female physically.• How old are you? What's your gender? Give us a general description of yourself.I am a 17 year old soon to be 18 girl. I play video games, read on science, and love human anatomy.• Is there a medical diagnosis that may impact your mental stability somehow?I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. And my disability (condition) makes me bitter toward abled people.• Describe your upbringing. Did it have any kind of religious or structured influence? How did you respond to it?I was abused as an infant, my feet tied together and never given toys or talked to, only when I needed food and water (poor orphanage). When I was adopted at age 2, I became part of a Catholic family. We rarely practice and only pray on holidays. I personally don’t believe in a higher being.• What do you do as a job or as a career (if you have one)? Do you like it? Why or why not?I have none.• If you had to spend an entire weekend by yourself, how would you feel? Would you feel lonely or refreshed?I would be refreshed despite wanting friends for once. I need my alone time often since I am energetic in public or am overwhelmed by crowds, smell, touch, sounds, etc• What kinds of activities do you prefer? Do you like, and are you good at sports? Do you enjoy any other outdoor or indoor activities?I like video games and drawing but due to neck pain they are burning out fast. I want to like sports, but am banned from the ones I’ve always wanted to try (why I resent those who play them). I would love outdoor walks if my skin wasn’t hypersensitive. But for now I am an indoor person due to medical reasons. I love music though. Music sparks my vivid imagination and distracts me from my pain.• How curious are you? Do you have more ideas than you can execute? What are your curiosities about? What are your ideas about - is it environmental or conceptual, and can you please elaborate?Let’s just say people are extremely annoyed by me because I ask “why” to everything. And I do have more ideas than I can execute. My curiosities are why people are being nice, ask how I am, how the universe works, how animals relate to each other, etc.. My ideas are conceptual and about the universe and the far future of it and earth.• Would you enjoy taking on a leadership position? Do you think you would be good at it? What would your leadership style be?No. But yes, I think I would be fairly okay. I first would assign a task for each person and expect them to do it regardless of circumstances unless physical problem.• Are you coordinated? Why do you feel as if you are or are not? Do you enjoy working with your hands in some form? Describe your activity?I seem to get into arguments a lot, so probably not. And I enjoy playing with clay. It makes my sensitive skin feel nice. Ceramics or simple clay is the activity.• Are you artistic? If yes, describe your art? If you are not particular artistic but can appreciate art please likewise describe what forums of art you enjoy. Please explain your answer.I used to be very artistic but am not anymore. I draw my original character, a transgender shapeshifter trying to fit into a human society.• What's your opinion about the past, present, and future? How do you deal with them?I think of the past and future too much. I hate thinking about the past and can never move on until I get closure. And I think about the far future because it’s fun and you get to make up depressing scenarios of the earth ending. The present is fine but I believe in those who are competent should be alive and anyone who fails constantly should be discarded. If I was a ruler I would be like the government in the Harrison Bergeron short story.• How do you act when others request your help to do something (anything)? If you would decide to help them, why would you do so?I hate when others ask for my help. It’s not my problem. I do it anyway to appear good or expect something in return.• Do you need logical consistency in your life?Yes. Dear god.• How important is efficiency and productivity to you?It is not that important unless I was a leader of a company.• Do you control others, even if indirectly? How and why do you do that?I correct people or point out flaws, but that’s as far as I go unless someone’s incompetent in-game sensitivity is pissing me off because it’s too high.• What are your hobbies? Why do you like them?I play video games, draw, and read online. I honestly don’t like them that much besides video games. It’s painful to do pretty much anything except breathing, so video games are the least painful hobby therefore I’ll do it.• What is your learning style? What kind of learning environments do you struggle with most? Why do you like/struggle with these learning styles? Do you prefer classes involving memorization, logic, creativity, or your physical senses?I memorize. I am too stupid to truly understand a concept. Math, I struggle with a lot and hate. Numbers shift or disappear in my head, even like simple 5+7 I can’t solve in my head unless I use my fingers. I prefer classes that use memorization and logic like biology, chemistry, physics, any science or history related class. People say I have an abnormally good memory for my academics or trivial facts.• How good are you at strategizing? Do you easily break up projects into manageable tasks? Or do you have a tendency to wing projects and improvise as you go?I am good at it but never take action using it. I break up projects according to what I think I can do in a certain period of time. This is for school only. For my own projects I improvise.• What are your aspirations in life, professionally and personally?I want to be a radiologist! I find anatomy fascinating. And personally I want to be happy and true to myself.• What are your fears? What makes you uncomfortable? What do you hate? Why?A lot. Tardigrades, spiders, ants, etc.. But seriously, those who are younger than me and smarter, abled people, girls (have another medical condition that makes me kind of jealous of “normal” girls), and anyone who makes me look handicapped or stupid. I heavily rely on what my mind is capable of since my body is useless. I hate fake people who just smile to be nice. I want a damn conversation where someone replies with something other than “okay” or “cool.” And who won’t mind my partial hearing loss and repeat something maybe four times.• What do the "highs" in your life look like?Video game victories unfortunately and also overcoming 17 surgeries. In general though, figuring on my own what medical condition someone has from an image alone, getting a math problem right because of possible dyscalculia, and being called “smart” to boost my nonexistent self-esteem.• What do the "lows" in your life look like?I never talk about negative emotions. At worst I talk about anger. I have never discussed deep sadness with anyone in my life. I put emotional walls up and bottle up my feelings since I don’t think crying is rational. And I get annoyed by those who cry anyway (could be projecting). I would prefer to keep my funny, outgoing, friendly and happy image alive.• How attached are you to reality? Do you daydream often, or do you pay attention to what's around you? If you do daydream, are you aware of your surroundings while you do so?I am attached to it fairly well, but only due to hypersensitivity and easy distraction externally. If I wasn’t then I would be daydreaming endlessly. I wear music for sound sensitivity and usually I start daydreaming. And I am aware of my surroundings usually. But I get startled if someone touches me while I daydream.• Imagine you are alone in a blank, empty room. There is nothing for you to do and no one to talk to. What do you think about?When will we all be killed and what will our dystopian civilization look like?How long do you take to make an important decision? And do you change your mind once you've made it?If important, a few days. And usually I change my mind and have endless alternatives I worry about.• How long do you take to process your emotions? How important are emotions in your life?I do not process them. I reject any hint of sadness and put it in the back of my head. I hate emotions. But if a subject intrigues me I will be grinning the entire time shouting about it.• Do you ever catch yourself agreeing with others just to appease them and keep the conversation going? How often? Why?Never. It’s not my problem if you disagree. I will argue until I get closure like a good discussion and conclusion or am declared right.• Do you break rules often? Do you think authority should be challenged, or that they know better? If you do break rules, why?No. They should not be challenged usually. If I do break rules, I want to experience what others do on a daily basis like doing sports I am not supposed to do (basketball or dodgeball are examples). Or I break rules ironically to do academic work like homework during school mass in the bathroom secretly. Hey, free hour and a half study hall, okay?• What is the ideal life, in your opinion?The ability to exercise and play sports without pain, middle or higher financial class, having friends but also mainly being a loner, and being happy in your own skin. [info] None [info] 1565092019
SnackRaptor [info] So I've been diagnosed with anxiety issues for the past 17 years here and tried just about every SSRI out there (most "pooped out" after a few months, didn't help, or the side effects were unbearable)... Effexor is the only one that's worked right for me (for 4 years now) and that didn't need to be increased (in fact we even decreased it a little and it still worked!). Everyone's different, and there's a lot of trial you may have to go through to find the right one(s) that work for you.  [info] None [info] 1524274068
ohtheplacesyoullgo_ [info] I have a heart murmur thing and I got it tested and the docs said nothing was wrong. Later when I was diagnosed with anxiety I realized that was probably the culprit.  [info] None [info] 1512021616
mathilda420 [info] I could have written this myself about 2 years ago. I didn't actually understand what death really meant until I was 24 - noone in my life had ever died. But in the space of a month my grandpa died, 2 of my friends' mothers both died and a guy who I used to volunteer with died too. All of them were sudden. I was already going through a lot and this totally messed me up. I was like you and unable to understand how people were able to live knowing they might die at any second. It was around this time I was diagnosed with anxiety (lot of other stuff happened at the same time.)Now though, the knowledge that I am going to die one day makes me feel peaceful. It gives my life more meaning than it had before and things are more beautiful and special than they were before. I'm just so happy that I'm alive. I make the most of my time.It didn't take me long to deal with it, a couple of months, but it was hard. But the thing that REALLY brought me peace was getting out amongst nature and the realisation that I am so insignificant in the grand scheme of things, but still a part of the world. I was standing by a river under this huge tree and all these birds were singing and there was so much life all around me. It was beautiful. And I thought "it doesn't matter if I die, all of this will still be the same. The tree will still be there, the water will still run by, the birds will still sing and the grass will still grow." It just really struck me, and I just felt so much better about death after that. I'm like you, in that I have a knack for science but also a very spiritual side. Getting out in the natural world really reconciles the two and gives you perspective.This might not be what helps you, everyone is different, but it's an example. I don't agree with people when they say "don't think about it and just ignore it." It's not helpful, and I think truly accepting and coming to terms with your own mortality really gives you a different, much better perspective of life! Ignoring that doesn't fix it. You are totally not alone in this, if you want to talk or anything, feel free to PM me. I know how scary it is, but it's amazing when you get out the other side. :)  [info] None [info] 1368207586
Hybernative [info] Thanks for the welcome! I was diagnosed with anxiety last week or so, I've been suffering all these years because I didn't even know anxiety was a thing that could be treated; people usually just drink alcohol here (the UK) to temporarily get over it. I'm totally in the dark about what medications there are available out there that can help. My doc has given me amitriptyline, but I also use it as a sleep aid, so you can imagine taking a sleeping tablet in the middle of the day, isn't the most conducive thing to productivity...  [info] None [info] 1456741113
homebythefence [info] I haven't had a proper period since I was 12 and I'm now 22. I was diagnosed with anxiety early 2004 and they put me on BC that I've never been told to stop taking. Wasn't until I started getting ovarian pain that they found out I had PCOS when I was 19.  [info] None [info] 1393313833
Synikul [info] I see, I can somewhat relate.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but it's more that I worry about everything to a ridiculous point instead of it affecting me socially (unless I let worrying make me stay home, which happens sometimes).  I'm sorry you had to go through all of that, but I'm glad it's getting better and it sounds like you have a pretty great boyfriend.  Some people really suck at committing to plans, and hey, some people might feel as anxious as you do about going to hang out.  There's been a few times where I've ducked plans for literally no reason other than I was feeling anxious.  Anyways, I hope you feel better about this whole thing and hopefully your friends are around more in the future! [info] None [info] 1453578077
voidkilla [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and agoraphobia. I was stuck in my house for a year and half. With faith, hard work, and citalopram I'm out in the world again working 70 hour weeks, paying bills, married, and HAPPY! [info] None [info] 1467833091
rooroo999 [info] I feel like I've finally moved on from a girl that I tried and failed to start a relationship with. So I started talking to an old classmate that I had a minor crush on in high school. We made plans to go see a movie one night last week. I stayed up till eleven and never heard from her, and now she's avoiding me. On top of that, I'm getting tired of my current job in retail, but I can't find anything in my town that would be any better. I can't really afford to make a big move to another town though or to go to college without going into debt. On top of that, I think I have the onset of either thyroid problems or anemia, and I've been diagnosed with anxiety problems in the past.  My current insurance is crap, and l can't afford to pay out of pocket to see a doctor about it. I just kinda feel like I'm stuck. Like I graduated high school and am ready to move on in life, but I can't really get out of my current situation. My health is going downhill. My job is going nowhere. I'm 20, and I've never had a serious relationship. I just feel worthless right now... I don't feel like I'm living my life; I feel like I'm just waiting for it to end.  [info] None [info] 1537475852
HobbitLass [info] Yep. I know that feeling to a t. I noticed it maybe 4 or 5 years ago as something that wasn't normal. Like you said, I felt high all the time. Like i had a constant body buzz... But not in a good fun way! Like my limbs felt detached from my body. It comes and goes. I was diagnosed with anxiety back in the fall. The anxiety got to a full blown state this summer when I worked about 1000 miles away from home for 2 months. I missed my boyfriend and my family. Anyways.... I've always had varying degrees of it since I could remember but it wasn't until I had a complete depressive melt down that I put two and two together and realized it was anxiety.... Long story short.... I know that disconnected, out of body feeling!!  [info] None [info] 1365204223
illdoxyou [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety.  I am fortune enough I can support myself to see a therapist each fortnight who has assisted with helping me deal with stressful situations.  My first sessions waere at a public school and was enough to get me my first job.  As far as I'm aware anxiety does not qualify for NDIS and therefore if her condition (often self diagnosed BTW) is anxiety then she would not qualify for NDIS. Would be good to know what disability she aimed to qualify as to get on NDIS and why she was rejected.  Why only apply once over a 10yr period? [info] None [info] 1555817767
Verifiedvenuz [info] Is it possible to have a panic attack without a pain in your chest? I've been diagnosed with anxiety and have had things that seemed like panic attacks but no chest pain. [info] None [info] 1549350509
ThugHercules [info] Hey thanks for the comment. Always good to hear experiences.I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on a SNRI. I'm having gradual changes through it and realized that ADD effects I had were more social anxiety (although haven't tried any intense stims while on this but imma do some coke soon and see). I've been thinking about getting into meth and speed. Seems amazing for concentration and way cheaper than study drugs. I know I probably won't get addicted (I'm low energy and prefer shit like benzos and opiates way more), just concerned about the neurotoxicity and to control it. It scared me that meth can damage dopamine receptors. My natural happiness/dopamine levels are already pretty low and I don't wanna risk making my natural level lower. Any experience you have related to changes in dopamine would be appreciated.  [info] None [info] 1466364748
Xenouz [info] I mean it happens to me, but I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder by a doctor so maybe it's just a small amount of people. [info]  [info] 1464311334
germanshredder [info] I am very new to all of this and don't understand much. Two years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. I took meds and did the therapy. Now I take Ativan just as needed and learned to manage to anxiety most days. I am so confused since being diagnosed with ADHD. A lot of the symptoms for adhd, I feel like go for anxiety. I felt like a lot of my issues were caused by misunderstanding my triggers. Now I feel like I'm starting over again. I didn't really believe I had adhd until my Dr (he is amazing) prescribed adderall and I took it to see if it would help anything. I took it as directed and it hit me like a ton of bricks. What I thought were anxious thoughts all went quiet and I feel calm enough to sleep for days. I did actually have to go lay down for a bit because of it. I'm hoping that part evens out. I'm still sorting through all of the info so any advice, experiences, or general words of wisdom would be appreciated. [info] None [info] 1469165729
Hansungani [info] Depends on your definition.I have been diagnosed with anxiety and social skills disorders.Now that I've moved to a new town, therefore a new mental health agency's catchment area, I'm still needing to take a 5-hour long battery of tests to determine some new diagnoses. [info] None [info] 1469324926
esmejones [info] A lot of college makes more sense now. I'd have episodes of that frequently, but couldn't really describe it without sounding like I was losing my mind- which I thought I was. Later on as an adult, I'm diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks (plus some other stuff), and since I've been medicated, that derealization sense has not happened. It's nice to know all that ties together. I'd wondered why that had stopped (didn't mind, just noticed it had stopped). [info] None [info] 1545358309
bellaacapella [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety just recentlythe upcoming school year just terrifies me'I'm going to be a Freshman in high school, the last school year I was being frequently bullied. i don't understand why,though. I never did anything to anybody. I am also afraid of authority figures. I get scared to ask questions or ask for anything, and i would often stress over it the whole class period. It really took a toll on me. People saw i lost weight because i wasn't eating. I was so scared to talk to the cafeteria ladies. Teachers were concerned. They contacted my parents because they thought i was undergoing some sort of abuse at home. erff! summer has been okay. Every time i would buy something at a store, i would have to ask somebody else to talk to the cashier for me. i would get so mad afterwords because of frustration that I can't do anything on my own. I'm taking Omega 3 Fish Oil pills to help with my anxiety. I've heard it helps. Hopes so..  [info] None [info] 1344212177
cola_pop [info] Thank you! I really want to try! I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was separated from my twin sister in school. It really affected me to the point where I developed OCD and kept on washing my hands over and over. I was always a shy quiet kid so I believe ive always had it. Another issue I have with it is kinda embarrassing but I also suffer from IBS which is triggered by my anxiety! Why must I be human :| lol [info] None [info] 1515780052
kwg88ss [info] Ha.  Deja Vu...I graduated college at 26.  Went right out of high-school and was booted for coming up with a .5 GPA after my freshman year. No need to adjust the resolution, I really said .511 years later?  top 3% of income, about to complete my masters from a top 40 university and yeah, I was diagnosed with anxiety, ADHD, learning disabilities, and the like.  I remember quite clearly my guidance counselor telling both my mother &amp; I that I would become nothing and go nowhere.  I've already mailed one college diploma her way, hope she's ready for dessert.I have an undergrad in psychology.  I do absolutely nothing at all with anything related to the field and there's no reason why you need to do anything with information security if you don't want to.  Right now you need small victories.  Graduate, get a job doing something and figure out quickly what it is you WANT to do.  When you figure out what it is you want from life, start getting credentials in whatever that field is.  Don't become a nurse because you heard it was easy, become a nurse because it's your passion.  If it isn't, look for something else.Most importantly.  Don't be a victim.  Everyone has their story but at the end of the day nobody gives a shit if you've had a tough life, got diagnosed with this or that or blablabla.  Wake up, punch life in the mouth.People's only roadblocks in life are themselves and they're the only ones that can break through.Get to work. [info] None [info] 1515373044
queenbleepbloop [info] This reminds me of my mom’s very helpful advice when I was diagnosed with anxiety in grad school: “but you didnt *used* to have anxiety so why have it now?!”.  It’s almost like people’s minds (in your case) or people’s mental health can change (in mine). But I guess since the TSCC has never changed, we can’t either!! [info] None [info] 1524419342
Ptolemy222 [info] Hi, I have felt this way (Although I was diagnosed with anxiety at 16). I have struggled with it for years. But from my perspective what’s happening here is that you have personal insecurities in yourself. You feel although if you were to start talking to someone you would be judged, ridiculed, labelled. THIS is a natural thing that some guys go through. (I have some evolutionary theories that back this up a bit).But this may come from different things. Like times where you feel like you shouldn’t step up. or you think that someone has an advantage over you and you are comparing yourself. Or what I personally went through was fear of talking to people. It’s really “The Ego” which you never want to threaten. Eckhart Tolle - The power of now, IS A GREAT BOOK FOR THIS. But I think overcoming things like this comes with that internal belief that who you are is valuable. What you believe is valuable. You can have confidence in almost any situation. You think what other people say is valuable, but interpret what people say to be truthful to yourself before accepting it as a fact. You need to think less that people are “Higher” or “Lower” than you, and start thinking that we’re all human on the same level, some people make really stupid mistakes, we get over it, and we’re all trying our best. This will come with time naturally because we grow into stronger people everyday if we move in that direction.Some stuff I did to get over my anxiety (Not necessarily what you have), was by taking weird challenges. Like Saying something stupid to see how someone will react. Start making conversations with strangers. Literally going out everyday through my anxiety and socially experimenting to figure out what are good things  and what are not good things to do. Socially experiment, have confidence in yourself.I’m not sure if this helped. But I am trying.  [info] None [info] 1510969498
AllRebelRocker [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and major depressive disorder long before IBD. Would that mess with the survey? I'd be happy to take it, but I don't want to ruin your results!  [info] C.D. [info] 1414101483
dora_not_the_explora [info] During college I went to see my doctor about some stomach pains and breathing problems. She told me there was nothing wrong with my stomach and that it was all in my head, and that I was having breathing issues "because my lungs were resting on my spine and rib cage in a way where a rib would poke my lungs to tell me I needed to sit upright and breathe". Wtf? I was a biology major and took only one anatomy class and knew that wasn't it. I went to a different doctor and turns out I was diagnosed with anxiety and IBS. When I told her about what the last doctor said she had the same "wtf" look on her face I did.Reading everyone's comments, can someone tell me how the hell these kinds of people make it into medical school? And make it past medical school? It genuinely worries me that the med school interview process isn't doing anything to omit these idiots from making it through and potentially killing people from incompetence.  [info] None [info] 1534264057
NothingButTime1 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and stress. I have pretend everything is peachy for my employees. [info] None [info] 1423714933
toccoto [info] I feel you dude. Can also be the people around you. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was younger and my mom would blame so much of my laziness on it. I'm not saying it wasn't hard but I wasn't working as hard as I could in life.I finally moved away to force myself to take care of myself and my life is really good now. Yeah, anxiety still attacks but I've learned how to deal with it. I think even diagnosis can lead to some using it as an excuse in life. Howeve,r I think people who really do suffer eventually get to a point where they understand excuses don't matter and learning to cope.. Whether through good habits, drugs, etc etc is what matters. [info] None [info] 1524800741
nimaf2000 [info] &gt;Did you ever consider... it's just anxiety?I have considered this but one day I wake up happy and relaxed and the next day edgy and wired. I am in a stressful part of my life but this happens specifically when I go on keto.&gt;As opposed to purely energy or emotional or? I'm not sure how this distinction helps.All I mean is that I don't think it is anxiety. My evidence is that I don't get it when I am on carbs. I was diagnosed with anxiety two years ago but I never took meds as it coincided with the sudden positive changes that I saw when I went gluten free/low carb. But I guess I need to go see a professional as my life is being really affected by this whole thing.&gt;Is your AD[H]D self-diagnosed? If it isn't, then I'm surprised you would be caught unawares about the "being driven by a motor" feeling.It is self-diagnosed. Carbs make me too slow and inattentive and super sleepy if taken during the day but not hyperactive. In the meanwhile I just drank two cups of bouillon so I am set for sodium today :)Thanks a lot for the input [info] None [info] 1499780537
nerdc0rerizing [info] Hey, yeah that's really rough. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders so it was definitely masking a lot. That's been my worst symptom of withdrawal is the anxiety and irritability. I just feel suspicious and angry all the time. I'm hoping to get through this hump soon. Thank you so much for your words. [info] 19 days [info] 1509028322
Sh4me [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was eleven years old, and after that did I learn that my dad and grandfather both had it as well. It came as a surprise, and I had no idea. I doubt that I picked it up from them either considering my dad didn't live with us, and I didn't spend a lot of time with my grandfather.  [info] None [info] 1376316684
theyseem [info] I hit a semi head on on the interstate in 2011. I have the same feeling to the point that if one day I was told by a randon stranger "you're dead. You've been dead." I wouldn't doubt it for a second and I wouldn'tfreak out.I feel like I'm dead because my life has gone far too well. Also people just disappear for years at a time, even if I remember them. Im kinda just rolling with it and enjoying my life as best as I can.I've been diagnosed with anxiety but I've never told my doctor I feel like I'm dead. I've never told anyone except my ex husband who was in the accident with me and he said he had the same feeling. [info] None [info] 1547410883
hnsnghyk [info] Recently I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder after resigning from work. Nag-decide ako na mag-stay na lang muna sa bahay hanggang December. Pag nag-apply ako ng trabaho sa January, ano bang pwedeng isagot kapag tinanong ako na bakit mahaba ang bakasyon ko? My psychiatrist said I don't have to disclose my mental health condition kase posible akong ma-reject ng ina-applyan ko. [info] panic! at the office [info] 1570634053
Business-Socks [info] In high school I was diagnosed with anxiety, boy got them freshman gitters! Within a few days I was being rushed into surgery for an appendectomy.Cleared it right up. [info] None [info] 1403526252
piclemaniscool [info] That's very important. I was diagnosed with anxiety partly because of my obsession for perfectionism. When I took a summer class in order to raise my GPA (I needed a C to make it an acceptable level) I didn't do one assignment. Even after all the talks about accepting all of this my dad kept asking why I refused to do that particular assignment when I *could*. I showed him my current average and how even if I got terrible grades for all future projects my final grade would be a B. He reluctantly accepted. Point of my story is that it is deeply ingrained in people through generations and it takes some serious introspection to reverse much of the damage it causes. We live in a world where well supported kids are living in fear because they genuinely believe that if they fail it is literally the end of the world. Teaching someone how to lose is twice as important as how to win, I'd say.  [info] None [info] 1382378999
wootwootclapclap [info] I was not even planning on getting an account on reddit, but after I read your post I knew I had to get one. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 16. I've always been anxious, I remember being a kid, around 8 years old, and overthinking things. I know how you feel, I've been there. Luckily, my anxiety has gotten better, I went from having panic attacks, everyday, to having panic attacks as little as three times a month. I went from having therapy sessions twice a week, to once a week, and now I'm going every two weeks. I no longer take antidepressants or xanax, and I've been going to a psychiatrist, for a little over a year and a half.Please, reach out for help, don't be afraid to tell people how you feel, I'm sure your family does not think of you that way, and if they do, they will stop thinking about you that way, when you speak up.  A counselour won't be able to give you the help you need. You need to see somehow that has been trained, and has the skills to treat you.Anxiety/fear, are common things, and fearing something has saved our lives, at times we don't do stupid things, because we fear the outcome,  because we know it would hurt us, or kill us, therefore, having a little bit of fear, it's ok, BUT, when you're in such an awful state of PANIC, when you can't even walk outside, cause you feel as if you're going to die, that's when anxiety needs to be treated in a different way.I'm far from being a professional, I'm speaking from my own experience.I don't know where you live, but there are special organizations that help people with mental illness.Please, don't be afraid to tell people about your feelings, and your worries. I know it's hard, and I know that at times, you might feel that it is embarrasing, but this is not a joke. These disorders are real, and you have the right to tell people how you feel.Sorry for my poor spelling, I'm not a native english speaker.I hope you can get through this. [info] None [info] 1416177517
overcometogether [info] I haven’t taken medication, it’s the route most don’t take. I was prescribed Zoloft,  because I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder. I was having panic attacks for a week straight, one after another. I was actually afraid of taking medication because of the side effects. For 5 days I haven’t gotten any attacks, just mild chest pains. I keep telling myself, it’s not a heart attack, just anxiety symptoms. Eventually the symptom goes away but comes back. I don’t let it stop me, I went back to work 4 days ago and I told my boss about my anxiety because I missed a whole week, thankfully boss was understanding. I went to a psychologist and he did recommend breathing exercises. Taught me to breathe with my belly. Put your hand over your belly, keep your chest staright, and breath in through your nose while pushing your hand into the belly. Breathe out through your mouth, and your belly will push your hand away. Repeat this exercise everyday. 3 times per day. That’s all I got taught.Also side note, I’ve learned not to think about the past, or future just the present. It will take slot of worries, what do you we know of 5min into the future? We don’t, so there isn’t much we can focus on, just the present. Also talking or people about my anxiety has helped tremendously. Message me if you have more questions. Wish you the best.  [info] None [info] 1540662330
layer11 [info] How old are you and what country do you reside in?I'd press it.  I was diagnosed with anxiety and given some stuff and my quality of life has increased dramatically. [info] None [info] 1534294395
SplinterItToPieces [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and referred to “Cognitive Behavioral Therapy” (I didn’t go) because I was “making up an illness” that I didn’t have. 3 months went by of me arguing with my doctor about this and he then “diagnosed” (his words) me with “Denial” because I wouldn’t go to therapy and take Paxil. Got a second opinion and they immediately discovered a 3 month old sinus infection that sat for so long I now need surgery. [info] None [info] 1509567997
anxietyisabeotch [info] I have been using it on my face a for a few months now and it works fine. Though when I use it a lot of days in a row it will stop working for a week or two and I have to gut it out so now I only try to use it when I absolutely have to like when I am in court or meeting with a new client, that way I can be sure it works. Drysol also works.I have even used right guard clinical strength anti-perspirant on my face, but you have to rub it in good or it looks like you are wearing makeup (not good if you are a dude like me), and it will also stop working if you use it too much in a row.I finally got sick and tired of dealing with it and went to the doctor to relate my embarrassing saga. I was diagnosed with anxiety and am now treating the sweating with beta blockers (metroprolol) and am going in today to maybe get a low dose anxiety med. It has made a huge difference. [info] None [info] 1367858642
Barneysparky [info] I'm not going to compare notes but I can give you some insights on what you might go through. I'm 50 and ran away from a good home when I was 12. I saw things and had things done to me. Until I was about 35 I was in complete denial that I couldn't just suck it up. Even though I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder before it was a thing. That came at about nineteen. On the outside I was doing well, owned my own business with no help,  had three kids married. I was too stubborn to get help. Don't be me. I do have a great life but I know I did it the hard way.  [info] None [info] 1481439299
Elenorelore [info] I don't know if this helps any, but I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder every three years since the fourth grade (I'm a junior in college now). I've frequently had moments where I've heard phone rings, wake-up alarms, etcetera when nothing was going on. Heck, I used to always have my phone on vibrate and started getting phantom phone vibrations  that I could've sworn were real. When I got my first apartment, there was a couple of times throughout my lease that I felt as if someone was in my apartment. I'd get out of bed just to check everywhere. I'd even slept with all of the lights on so that I could see anyone if they were coming (not every time, but a few times). Schizophrenia is a common illness in my family so I've also became immensly worried that I was in the early stages-- but I think that's just what anxiety does to you. Sometimes I'd think that I was seeing things outta the corner of my eye, then I'd just psych myself out for the rest of the day because of it.Now that I'm on medication for anxiety, all of those feelings have gone away. [info] None [info] 1565492707
bewareoftheaussie [info] I was officially diagnosed just a month ago, and I felt the same way you did. It made all of the health problems I've ever had since early childhood make complete sense. Like you also, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and for years my doctors just said it was stress causing all these health issues. I hope, like me, you can find some answers and coping methods in this diagnosis.  [info] None [info] 1453871834
CaterpillarRage [info] This hits me so hard. I went to a doctor's appointment a few months ago and I just made a mention that my anxiety was making it hard for me to sleep recently and that could be why my headaches have gotten so bad and the doctor totally dismissed me. She started saying that she doesn't think I actually have anxiety (even though I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 19). This was the second time I ever saw this doctor and she didn't take me seriously until I started to cry and defend myself. It was ridiculous. This isn't the first time that this has happened to me and makes me so angry. I shouldn't have to tell personal, embarrassing details about how I grew up and why I have anxiety to get taken seriously. [info] Ming the Clam. [info] 1527017118
ibrasamovic [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders aswell. Just realise that each day is a new chance to kick its ass. Keep at it, the day where you do will eventually happen. Best of luck brothers  [info] None [info] 1500677195
spookymug69 [info] Fake it till you make it. If you act confident, eventually you'll become confident. And if you're worried about blushing or looking nervous, tell yourself this: 1. Nobody can even tell.2.And if they can; who cares? Wtf are they gonna do about it and what can you do about it?I was diagnosed with anxiety and had to take pills for it two years ago and it TERRIFIED me to even think about being in front of people. Now: I just got cast in the school musical where I have to sing and dance in front of people and thinking about it makes me excited. [info] None [info] 1509757881
Kevlar23 [info] Thanks for posting this, it gives me hope that someone else was in this situation and it went away. I've been to the doctor, they shrug it off as "normal tremors" aggregated by stress, and tell me it will go over. 40 days later, and it hasn't. I'm not questioning doctors, but some of them have very little knowledge about illicit drugs, and since I'm diagnosed with anxiety, it's very easy for them to shrug it off. I've scheduled a new appointment with another doctor, and hopefully they'll take me seriously and let me do an MRI. Mentally I'm horrified I've done permanent damage to my nervous system, and it's been two really hard months. Hopefully I can get some clear answers soon, and hopefully it's not bad answers.  [info] None [info] 1466459360
lumpycakemix [info] Mine too then terror feeds the anxiety. I was diagnosed with anxiety 10 years ago but only recently, like weeks ago, started reading about it and trying to find strategies to live life without letting the anxiety bring me down.  [info] 35/F/5'10" | SD 6/17 | SW 283 | CW 204 | GW 170 [info] 1528916862
cuhooligan [info] It may.. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder but I don't think it's very strong. Took Lexapro for a bit. Didn't like it so much. [info] None [info] 1379344958
thisisappropriate [info] Also UK, took nearly a month off of my weekend job having to call in on Saturday with assorted sickness/headaches every week until I was diagnosed with anxiety and given two more weeks off. Mine said "anxiety state" typed into the section, I just told everyone it was the stress of uni when I went back, handed in my notice and made a few counselors appointments, the pay was nice, but not worth it. [info] None [info] 1395702072
LizzyLemonade [info] I hate that. I was diagnosed with anxiety earlier this year and I'm just getting used to recognizing the symptoms. It's awesome that you caught it quickly! [info]  [info] 1472583127
CrazyProudMom25 [info] I don’t think convincing them will work.  Not from what I’ve seen on this sub. And with my nmom, even if she does concede it’s a hollow victory. She ended up convincing me to go to college instead of taking a year off school, and to do it for engineering instead of writing. I. Was. Miserable. Dropped out in a month. Six months later I was diagnosed with anxiety, social anxiety, adhd inattentive type, and got a provisional diagnosis for autism. And it’s only now, 6 years later, that she’s finally acknowledged that I sometimes am not up to doing some things, but there’s still this air of expectation that I’ll do it. I told her ‘maybe’ on something yesterday, and she told me ‘if you’re y up to it of course.’ But it felt like a hollow victory because she was assuming I’d even want to do what she suggested... because she didn’t even ask.So, I’d only try convincing them as much as you feel comfortable with, but it’s not likely to work and if it does it might be a hollow victory- maybe they’ll try to make you feel guilty about the choice but say ‘if you have to’. That sort of thing. See if you can get any friends or family to help out, talk to people, do research. Maybe you can find some easy thing for moving, maybe not. Maybe you’ll need to skip on moving things you’d like to keep but don’t need. Who knows? Just prepare as best as you can and make a lot of plans. [info] None [info] 1564142498
solojones1138 [info] I thought I had a TIA once and my roommate had to call 911 for an ambulance. Turned out to just be a random panic attack (this was before I was diagnosed with anxiety). But my face was numb and I couldn't speak properly, so it was definitely scary. [info] None [info] 1571242611
ageekyninja [info] As someone with both disorders, ADD and anxiety have similarities but ADD doesnt cause you to be super nervous to the same extent anxiety disorder does. ADD causes nervousness and irritability for different reasons, especially if its sensory related. Anxiety itself is a bit of a different ballgame. Anxiety is just plain nervousness for no reason. ADD interacts with that in how it distracts me and how it effects me handling it but doesnt cause it. So its really a matter if your experience is something like that where you are irrationally nervous about a lot of things or if this is just one insecurity you have. If its just a matter of insecurity in relationships thats a different issue of course.Any time I was tested for ADD the doctor was only ever focused on what he was specifically testing for, not what other problems might exist. Like the doctor would suspect ADD and so he would just focus on if the test would confirm it. At least thats my experience. It wasnt until later that I was diagnosed with anxiety and that was after specifically asking the doctor about those specific symptoms. [info] None [info] 1523833300
unfromageluv [info] i'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder. got hospital records-suicide.also got hallucinations in my case files [info] None [info] 1446251311
unpubpoet [info] So the anxiety goes in and out? I was diagnosed with anxiety at like 8 years old, so it’s nothing new. I do feel like pregnancy has made it worse! [info] None [info] 1506718017
JessicaRoyy [info] I do this all the time. Certain sentences get stuck in my head too and I get frustrated trying to remember it exactly as it was said or what I should have said. It only started after I was diagnosed with anxiety disorders so I figure that's what it is. [info] None [info] 1548510529
assume-youre-wrong [info] Same thing happened to me when I was diagnosed with anxiety and an eating disorder when I was younger. I had allowed the “demons” in my head. [info] None [info] 1570038478
aptrcki [info] * **Name/Nickname:**  Patrick/ptrck or aptrcki* **Age (optional):**    21* **Location:** US (TX) CST (UTC/GMT -6)* **Platforms:** PCSteam: http://steamcommunity.com/id/risedown/ Origin: aptrckiUplay: aptrcki         * **About Me (optional):**I'm really bad at talking about myself because I can't ever figure out where/how to start. So uh, I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 14, hasn't really been a huge issue. I haven't been to a Doctor in a while, but I do get pretty depressed quite often. More so now than ever before. I'll typically play something casual and listen to music to cheer me up and I sure wouldn't mind a few partners.* **How to contact me:**I'm always up for conversation, just add my Steam or PM me on here. (or go in IRC) [info] None [info] 1454463777
Dokii [info] Unfortunately for me, I was unable to join. I tried to join the Navy and was declined by MEPS. I wanted to join and still would love to, but it's no longer an option. Kind of a story in itself honestly; the only reason being that I had one therapy appointment a few years back and they didn't like that. I never took medication, never was recommended for another doctor. I was diagnosed with anxiety, however I believe it was just typical teenage bullshit. Anyway, that got me declined unfortunately, so I'm going with my only other option for an advanced career and that's college. [info] None [info] 1378412166
EvilSeaWitch [info] Then I don't.        I was diagnosed with anxiety almost 15 years ago. I don't bend for other people anymore.      The hardest thing for me is going to a doctor of any kind. If the idea of going is too much, I reschedule.           Don't let anyone pressure you. You know your limits. There's nothing wrong with taking a pass to protect your mental health.  [info] None [info] 1544770603
LilPad93 [info] Thank you very much.  Although I fear that I am BPD a lot, I know that being aware and actively fighting my issues is something to be relieved about in that aspect.  I don't deny nor hide the fact that I  have issues. When I can afford therapy, I most certainly am going. I want to try it, and I want to try to get this burden off of me.   I read articles, I and I buy self help books, I've read a few, and I tend to get too analytical of myself, so maybe my husband needs to read them with me.  I know some people in our situations tend to be a little off in relationships.  My relationship with my husband comforts me in that I am normal with him, and he tells me that I overthink how I act too much.  (I have been diagnosed with anxiety.) Thank you again.   [info] None [info] 1480523970
__Nevermore [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety, I think. I know I saw the word "anxiety" written on paper after seeing a psychiatrist/psychologist. [info] None [info] 1498002747
WarKittyKat [info] Unfortunately, it's also not a great idea when you're still in a relationship with an abusive person.  I think for me CBT was trying to dismantle something that was on some level still keeping me safe, without necessarily looking if there was anything I needed to be kept safe from.  Therapy seemed to proceed based on the idea that everything was safe for me then, when it was not.  And there wasn't any real check, just the fact that I was diagnosed with anxiety and needed CBT because that's the therapy for anxiety. [info] None [info] 1566609034
atomsofttech [info] Ugh I know exactly how you feel. I've been through points in my life where I stood home for months just barely surviving. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Been living about 10 years with it and it does get managable but still if fucking horrible to have. I'm sorry to hear about relationship issue too. I left my ex wife about 3 years ago. Had 2 kids with her.. they are now 12 and 7. Boy and girl.Jumped right into another relationship right after and have a 5month old now. (Girl).Every single day I feel like something is bad is going to happen. Some how I'm not happy even tho I love her and don't want to leave her at all. I feel she doesn't understand me tho. Feels like I'm always doing something wrong. Feels like she hates my previous marriage kids and knows she doesn't trust me.I think about death but not in anyway wanting to die.. more of the opposite.. like ugh I don't want to die at all. I want to keep going.Life is freaking complex. Life isn't perfect and I fear it never will be but always remember.. it's your life. If you don't like it you have so much time to change things. If you fail.... Who cares.. your alive and have more time to try other things. Move... Start new relationships. One day you will cope better and will find someone who will treat you great or maybe you will make the mistake of cheating again and have to start over, but that's ur life. Do what ever you can to enjoy it.Try not to let the anxiety control you too much. Learn some breathing techniques and find a lil hobby or habbit.. like .. I choose music or reading or tapping my knee.. all help manage my anxiety.To be honest. I know u will hate hearing this like I do but just try and relax lol the world is full of people you can talk to if you need to. Sorry if this makes no sense but ugh.. anxiety makes it hard think.. also so does having 2 kids over for the weekend. :) [info] None [info] 1558200589
Jokerlolcat [info] Say, I'm not 100% sure but I do have ADHD but I was diagnosed with anxiety before. My anxiety can get pretty bad and even kept me put of work for a bit. Is there any way that could help? I need to find out who would help diagnose me lol [info] None [info] 1562915035
keylimeallatime [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, OCD, and tourette's. My heart attack, admittedly, was diagnosed a few days after. I did not have a medical professional monitor my detox, so that is just my interpretation honestly. I had fever-like symptoms. [info] None [info] 1398995140
captaincupcake234 [info] Heya, I also read some of your other posts on here. This one really stuck out to me:&gt;Well for one I don't know what I want to do anymore. I was in nursing school when I had my injury but I look back and am like "why the hell would I want to be a nurse. I'm a jerk" lol but there are things I want to do, but I don't really know what I'm capable of doing.&gt;I'm just a completely different person than I was then. Although I still relate to a lot of nurses and nursing students.&gt;Secondly, my friends all either graduated college or moved away. I've tried reaching out but I just don't feel relatable with them anymore and they most likely feel the same about me. I'll be real.&gt;There just feels like a whole lot of bs in my way and I don't know how to fix it.Six years ago I was in a sort of similar spot as you, so I'm going to post my story. It's really long so you don't have to read it. I'm hoping you can glean something out of it if you do read it. All I want to do is help, maybe provide some advice because when I was going through my ordeal, I wish there was someone who could have been at my side for me. Anyway, I was in my 3th year of undergrad as a microbiology major. My goal was to get to medical school but I wasn't feeling it. All of my life my parents and family (I'm Korean-American) told me I had to become a doctor so it was ingrained inside of my mind that I needed to become a doctor. Becoming a doctor also resonated with my love for helping people. At the time my ultimate goal was to work establish a Doctor's Without Borders presence in North Korea (where I'm pretty sure lost parts of my family still reside, they were separated during the Korean War). From age 13 to 21 I dedicated my life to taking pre-med classes (like chem, calc, physics, ALL the Biology), making pre-med students (yes even in HS). I read books on becoming a doctor, watched TV shows on doctors, etc. When I began undergrad this feeling started to wear off. I hated all of my pre-med classes, I didn't know why I had to slave through them. I began to fail all of them. My pre-med friends were soaring through these classes and I didn't understand how they were doing it. My pre-med friends somehow got jobs at biology labs and were excelling at them (some even got published as early as their junior year). I began to ask myself "do I really want to become a doctor? Or was it something forced on me? If I don't become a doctor, then what can I do? I'm not good at anything else? What's the point of life if I cannot become a doctor?" At this point I had also ruled out other medical professional fields like becoming a pharmacist, dentist, or nurse. I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on Citalopram that year.The hard part was, I could still mostly relate to my pre-med friends and friends in med-school. Like them, I wanted to use science to help people and make a difference in the world. But my drive to become a doctor had fizzled out. I tried reaching out to them but I discovered that I couldn't relate to them any more. If I asked for advice all they told me were variations of: Oh you're just hitting a rough spot, you'll get through it, I know I did; maybe take some time off?; just man up, we're all suffering here, just do it; maybe become a pharmacist, dentist or nurse. They just didn't get what I was going through. The worst part was, no one told me something like "maybe becoming a Doctor isn't for you, maybe look at another thing to go into? Here let's take a look at other options outside of medicine." So at this point I didn't know what else I was capable of and there was a lot of BS in my way and I didn't know how to fix it. A part of me still wanted to become a doctor, but I didn't want to do it anymore. On top of all this, I had ALOT of parental and family pressure from home to become a doctor. Anything else would have literally brought shame to the family. I'm not kidding about this, I know it's very stereotypical of Asian American families, but I was from one of those stereotypical Asian American families. I can go on-and-on about this, but that's another story. Anyway, I had been lying to my family about my grades. All they wanted from me was to get to med school. To tell my family I was failing my pre-med courses and/or losing my desire for med school would have devastated my them, they would most likely yell at me for hours over the phone, humiliate me, tell me I was hurting them, tell me I was selfish, I'm a failure at life, I'll die homeless and poor, just guilt trip me into oblivion. The summer before my 3rd year and the following fall semester was when I just gave up on becoming a doctor. I stopped going to all of classes, I slept all day, played board games with friends, played ALOT of video games, did anything that wasn't academic related. Maybe I had cracked? I don't know. I felt like I was only living one day at a time with no plans for the future. I was like this until March of my 3rd year in college. I went on a volunteer summer break trip to a state park in Virginia where I helped construct dams using rocks on the Potomac River and other labor intensive landscaping stuff. Being able to work with the earth while being surrounded by it helped me (yes this will sound super corny) connect to our planet for the first time in 15 years. I say 15 years because the last time I felt this way was when I was 6, that summer my parents took me to the Chicago Field Museum where I fell in love with the volcano and geology exhibits (there was a dark room with a glowing Hawaiian lava flow exhibit that frightened me at first, but I slowly become fascinated by it). Later that summer I took my first nature walk at forest preserve. Flash forward 15 years, back at the state park in Virginia, there were some other volunteers from my school who were geology majors. I overheard them talking about river delta systems while we sat on a bridge that over looked a small sandy river delta emptying out into the Potomac. I was drawn to their conversation as my memories of falling in love with geology and volcano exhibits from age 6. After talking with these geology students I became hooked. When I got back to school I scheduled a visit with the geology dept at my school. All of the professors I talked to were kind and saw in my eyes a passion for rocks slowly reigniting. Switching into geology was easy to do. But psychologically it was difficult. All of my friends told me I was crazy and stupid for changing to a completely different major during the spring semester of my 3rd year. People told me things like "just suck it up and finish your degree, you only have 1 more year", "it'll be a waste of your parents' money", and the worst "how selfish of you to waste your education like that, if you wanted to do geology you should have started as a freshman!". I also knew I had to tell my parents what I was about to do, and they would not take it kindly. Remember all of the things I wrote earlier on what I thought my family would do if I told them I had lost interest in becoming a doctor? Well it all happened on a Sunday in April when I finally made the call. I didn't talk to my family for 2 months. But at that point I had already decided to become a geologist no matter what anyone else told me, I had to right to be selfish about my life by that point because my passion to become something had been re lit. Now this didn't mean things got easier for me. From then until now things have been difficult. I barely finished my geology degree, wasn't sure what geology subfield I wanted to get into, had to suffer the reality of student loans, deal with the BS my family gave me for giving up becoming a medical professional, took 3 years off and worked for AmeriCorps, then finally somehow got into grad school for geology where I am now. Currently I am stressed beyond belief about my grad program, but I know I have the drive to force myself through the stress because I'm passionate about it. So long story short, it takes a lot of time for someone to discover a new passion for something when their old passion fizzles out. My story is vastly different from yours because I never had a severe brain injury that completely changed my life. But our stories are also related because I went through a phase of confusion and disillusionment and I wanted you to know you're not alone. I read you loved hiking and snowboarding with friends. Keep on doing that. If you love it and makes you happy, don't stop. Life is more than just having a career. I know that's a corny phrase, but it's true. And I deeply wish one day society will change where life experiences are valued over how much money someone can make. Finally, a little shameless pitch for you to consider pursuing geology. You seem like someone who loves the outdoors. Ever wonder how the mountains you snowboard on formed, study geology. Ever wonder why some mountains are volcanic and some are not, study geology. Ask any question about how a natural vista formed and geology will be able to provide fascinating answers. Come drop by /r/geology if you're interested. Lot's of nice people there who can answer any questions. And if any one is a jerk to you there, they'll be met with angry geologists armed with rock hammers, dynamite, and bottles of acid (we drop acid on limestone to see if it fizzes, helps us determine if a rock is limestone or not). I hope all of this helped. If you want any advice or have questions (about anything, us geologists do more than just look at rocks all day), feel free to reply to this comment or PM me.  [info] None [info] 1444243312
grrawritsjordi [info] I never knew why I was always so angry and flew off the handle at the smallest things until I was diagnosed with anxiety. Now that I know why I feel the way I do, it would be so easy to say "I was a bitch because of my anxiety." However, I know that I should be able to better control my anxiety, specially since I am on medicine.There are some things that I do blame my anxiety on, such as when I have attacks that I cannot control (which will cause me to not want to see people or go out in public), but when I'm just being a bitch, I know I'm being a bitch and my anxiety has nothing to do with it.  [info] None [info] 1448784090
LindemannO [info] Haha I was diagnosed with anxiety and desperation a couple of months back. It definitely doesn’t help my situation, and in fact, it probably holds a lot of weight as to why I am feeling this way. Thanks very much for your detailed comment - and I’m truly sorry to hear you suffer as well - I hope you’re doing okay. :) [info] None [info] 1528821899
kaarrii [info] I'm more open with my mum now I've moved out, we get on 100% better. We've bonded more recently as I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago so I talk to her about it as she has the same.. kinda makes me think sometimes mental illness can be genetic. I see her every Friday after work for a few hours and we chat about everything really. I try to talk to my dad but he's quite self-absorbed and doesn't listen.. so I just talk to him about vapid stuff like games/tv/films etc. [info] None [info] 1571238493
emmaensign [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety disorders and I'm totally fine when I'm drunk, infact it helps me loosen up and be more friendly and open towards people [info] None [info] 1451107881
ShouldHaveSwallowed [info] Thank you for commenting. I dont know but I feel more trapped than ever now that I'm sure. Yesterday i looked into psychologists near where I live but it's surprisingly expensive (to me at least. 95€ per session) and i never had good experiences with them in the past. (I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when i was 16)I'm at work now but maybe I'll chat u up later. Thankyou ♡ [info] None [info] 1563791149
BabyGotBantz [info] Honestly, it probably is. I have been diagnosed with anxiety but crouching down in the bathroom as an elementary schooler, and hearing the roar overhead of the tornado as it passed while hiding under my desk has fucked me up forever. I remember there was a small window in the gymnasium and I saw the sky turn a greenish color before we had to go hide. Terrifying. [info] None [info] 1556660785
Dsg1116 [info] I’m 24 and have a bachelors in psychology. I have been diagnosed by a psychiatrist. Taken meds and seen counselors. I was diagnosed with anxiety and minor ptsd. I’ve contemplated borderline too but my dr said I had the symptoms and he said  there was not much need for the label. I guess cuz only a few were displayed. He said I was a bit histrionic. Medication didn’t work well, I dunno what to tell you all. I’m sounding like a monster. [info] None [info] 1562378449
starwish68 [info] I'm sorry I can't offer much help but I know exactly where you are coming from. I am very obsessive with things being organized and done thoroughly. My boyfriend is the total opposite. I have to remind him to shower sometimes... Anyway, I have yet to live with him, but you sound a lot like me. My obsessiveness grew exponentially when I left for college and faced some personal issues that resulted in a ridiculous amount of stress. I was diagnosed with anxiety and unfortunately let it out on my boyfriend more often than I'd like to admit to. Counseling helped a lot. Just being able to vent was honestly a huge factor in my recovery. If you do also have anxiety, I would strongly suggest working out. I've just started and it's helped me relax and sleep better. Good luck! [info] None [info] 1422331531
Katherington [info] I am the same way even though I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 5, and have been on antidepressants since I was 8. [info] None [info] 1471657099
mello151 [info] Was it a routine blood test our were they checking for this specifically? I have physicals and blood tests always come back normal but I wonder about things like this. I've been diagnosed with anxiety in the past. [info] None [info] 1405967101
kiosk68 [info] Yes!! The same exact thing happened to me. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety, I told my doctor all of my symptoms and he suggested “meditation” which was bullshit. I later found out after going to a psychiatrist that i did have anxiety and all of my head aches, sleepless nights, etc. were due to that. It’s best when you have one of these head aches to be in a dark room if you can. Try getting peppermint oil and rub that on your temples. Aleve personally works somewhat better for me. To help the physical symptoms, it really does help eating as healthy as you can and exercising. [info] None [info] 1560150647
Miiaevia [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety and I can say that CBDs help with that immensely. I can't even describe how much. I hate Xanax and almost never want to take it, so having a safer alternative when I need to calm down is huge. While I'm not diagnosed as autistic, I have immediate family members on the spectrum, so i learned a lot of my socialization skills (or lack thereof) from people with autism. Not sure if/how that plays into my anxiety but I can definitely relate to having strong emotions, the way you described. It's definitely a struggle. Don't be hard on yourself when other people judge you, be proud of yourself for navigating through this everyday and taking care of yourself. It's not easy. [info] None [info] 1535808809
RealHumanHere [info] Interesting question. Not really, I have not been fined once, nor a speeding ticket nor anything. I have very high education (Ivy). But I am diagnosed with anxiety, and I am a perfectionist and control-freak, and I definitely over-worry about things, I've been looking forward to joining Freemasonry for a long time (many years), and since my interview is so soon, I was worried I had everything under control :P. But you've risen a good point, I should not worry, and if it works out, it does.  [info] None [info] 1466344827
JordisTheSwordMaiden [info] Thankfully not always the case. My manager found out I was interviewing somewhere else and told our bosses. An hour later they put through a $10k pa raise. (No shit). That was 13 years ago, I’m still there and now earning almost double what I was. They have their moments where I want to tell them to stick it, but they give me all the time off I need to look after my daughter (single mom with a severely depressed teen), paid for therapy when I was diagnosed with anxiety, and took out income protection insurance for the entire staff (90+) when one fell terminally ill so she could have an income, with no wage adjustments etc. Awesome place to work.  [info] None [info] 1531622281
big_diction4ry [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and tbh im in complete denial of it like I talk easily and openly to others and find conversation comes fluidly HOWEVER omg group situations are scary omg no omg everyone hates me [info] 16 [info] 1511467855
whostolethesampo [info] Fellow anxious person, and I get this too! At times before I was diagnosed with anxiety I legitimately thought I had throat cancer or a plethora of other horrible diseases. Now, years later, I’m finally able to recognize the feeling of “something stuck in my throat” as a symptom of my anxiety, and nothing else. Once I stop focusing on it, it goes away. It took me almost 4 years to be able to take control of this symptom, but I know how real it can seem. Last year DH and I were traveling in Europe and I was so convinced that I had throat cancer that I almost made us cut our trip short so that I could go home and see a doctor 🙄  [info] None [info] 1544007486
AlienLoser [info] Yea, that could definitely be how it helps you! Anxiety for sure can cause migraines, at least for me anyways. I've come to my own little diagnosis that my stomach problems root from stress and things of that nature, because I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder a few years ago. So, marijuana could possibly be helping my stomach because I feel no stress or anxiety whatsoever when I smoke. All I know is shit would suck for me and my overall health without my lovely, lovely bud. Haha. [info]  [info] 1418951290
BrookieeWookiee [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety before I was diagnosed with IBS, so I had been on 10 mg of Prozac daily for several years. I bumped up to 20 about 6 months ago and think it has really helped with my IBS. I've also found that my fast-acting anxiety med (klonopin) helps as well. My symptoms just aren't as bad when I am calm. [info] None [info] 1465751575
easterbran [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety my sophomore year here. I've always made sure I have an outlet to keep me happy when school gets tough (hobbies). One pitfall I see a lot of GT students fall into is abusing alcohol to feel less-anxious. Be really careful with that stuff, I am still getting over my problem with it.Also, STAMPS psychiatry has been awesome for me. I worked with my doctor to increase the dosage (anti-anxiety meds) until it was worrying to me how little stress I felt about classes/assignments. Then we lowered the dosage a bit to where the anxiety is still there (keeps me a hard working student) but does not interfere with my day-to-day life. [info] None [info] 1556115052
calamitynacho [info] If OP had come out and said something like "I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder but my parents are forcing me to stay at a strict monastery to 'cure' me, please help" in the original post instead of withholding that detail and sounding like a stereotypical whiny teenager, I imagine the response here may have been a little more sympathetic ... [info] [東京都] [info] 1467014565
pbwarren2001 [info] Well, I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder so it makes sense to me that alcohol would make it worse, and that it would continue throughout my drinking. If I was not constantly in a state of fear about what other people think of me in the moment then I would probably be blackout drunk at that point. [info] :nato: NATO [info] 1558981931
Daide [info] I'm going to do my best to reply like you're a human being, a courtesy you didn't bother to attempt to offer me.I'm not excusing his behaviour entirely nor am I saying he has anxiety, social or otherwise. I don't know because we only know her side of the story that focuses around one event. Your advice immediately assumes the worst of him, calling him passive aggressive. **If** he does have anxiety, your advice sucks and she needs to recalibrate her expectations on introducing him to some new things and how she does so.As far as the ren faire, I'm going to do my best to try and explain why *I* might begin to shut down in such an environment: Well, for [our] anniversary, my wife wants to go to a ren faire. Okay, it's not something I've been around and I have no idea how to act but I'll go for her. I know she'll like it so I'll give it a try. Once we're there I'm being asked if I want to wear a costume. I'm *really* not comfortable with this. It's at this point where I actually start shutting down. I feel like, unjustifiably, people will be judging me. I'd feel stupid. Everyone here is having a blast doing weird things, people are talking in ways I don't know how to react to. Should I reply trying to do a bastardized version of what they're doing? Will people start judging me? If I don't do it, are they going to roll their eyes at how I'm not even trying to fit in....Everyone around here is having a blast. Why can't I? [My wife] really wants me to enjoy this thing but I'm starting to hit a really bad negative feedback loop. Oh great, she's now in costume and wants me to keep trying these different. Can't she see how much I'm really not having any fun? She keeps trying to involve me in these conversations but I'm really starting to freak out. I don't like it here. I don't like how unfamiliar it is and I don't like how I'm *still* being pushed out of my comfort zone.By this point, I'd likely be sitting by a tree and hoping that the night ends and that nobody even notices me. I don't want [my wife] to ask me what's wrong and I certainly don't want to talk about it. I don't want to drag her down in my own issues...but now she's angry...and the feedback loop keeps going. Do you see how this might really fucking suck **when you cannot control it**. I'm not choosing to do this and I would probably give up a limb in order to be 'normal' in large groups and new settings. It's not always like this, but when it happens, there's no "sucking it up and faking".&gt;Don't even try to make your wife feel special on your anniversary. Trying to take her to a ren faire, which she likes, is an attempt. Just because I suck in some social settings doesn't mean I don't have to try. I'm not excusing him, I'm just trying to offer *possible* reasons as to why th&gt;Since it's not easy for you, why bother?It's not like I decided to live in a hole and stop trying new things when I was diagnosed with anxiety... I'd hope that I could verbalize my issues and also how I perhaps needed to be given slightly different considerations when doing some new things. Anxiety isn't a free pass to just never do things a significant other wants to do, nor is it life ending...This is where adapting her expectations and her method of introducing him can make a pretty big difference. Like maybe going to a ren faire once to try it out. Not going overboard, not trying on costumes or pressuring him to try events if he isn't feeling up to it. Just getting to know it, trying some food and drink and seeing how it all works. [info] None [info] 1376876353
dragonattack [info] Good luck! I actually have "Don't Panic" on my wrist as an Adams tribute and reminder to not sweat the small stuff. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 8 years old, so it's been a long ride for me and I'm finally sorting things out.  [info] None [info] 1365861048
Clob [info] Well. Just remember your doc works for you. If you have symptoms then you should be treated if it makes sense. Find a doc that can work with you, understand your symptoms, and not just treat a number. Always go for injections. Don't do gel or implants. Injections should be done weekly or twice a week. Every 2 or 4 weeks and the doc is clueless.  If you're in Dallas , Texas I can recommend to you a good clinic that keeps up on the latest data on this stuff. Basically, gains were slow or none. Issues with keeping it up sometimes, though I could have sex. I was diagnosed with anxiety, and my TRT has helped with that tremendously. Sice I've been on it, Iv'e been happier, stronger, confident, and generally feeling and performing better in every aspect of life.I would average low 3's.  My low was in the mid 2's on a 250 to 1100 scale. My low is now a 750 on my worst test and about 1000 on my best. Free test is above 25. I feel like a beast. No other side efects.  [info] None [info] 1447384938
goodfriendfc [info] There’s science behind diet and exercise affecting ones mental health. A lot of mental health is tied to the flora in your gut and people feel improvement in their lives changing small habits and developing a better, healthier routine. Please stop buying the story billion dollar industries are trying to sell you. I have been diagnosed with ADD and put on adderal at 12, I was diagnosed with anxiety as a teenager and prescribed Xanax and then klonopin, I know prescription medicine and the affects. I also understand what exercise and a healthy lifestyle feels like.  [info] None [info] 1522770306
FreezeWolfy [info] Agreed. Another issue is, if you think you have a serious issue, get HELP and don't just leave the diagnosis without seeking proper care. When I was diagnosed with anxiety it was my kindergarten teacher who realized my anxiety levels were abnormal, and she talked to my parents/school guidance counselors, she didn't just say "oh, this girl has anxiety, cool".  [info] Shitlady [info] 1424365943
katelynnxoxo44 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety as a separate event. So the therapist’s visits were for valid reasoning. And after telling the therapist about our lives recently, she did recommend that having the dog would help. [info] None [info] 1558063198
cy3n [info] Don't do that It will literally cripple you internally Like what my physics teacher has said "any questions isn't stupid" don't fear the "embarrassment of not knowing" Honestly take heart and just ask At the end of the day you will be the one on the top I relate to cou,as in the fact I calculated all of my actions:tried my hardest at PE (2nd in class),Joined Guitar ensemble without any knowledge of it in J2,Tried my hardest to excel in my subjects for CT :ABD/ES But inside I was broken(had family issues,mental breaking inside to the present where I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder) I tired my hardest to hide my imperfect life by being another person. Please live yourself [info] JC [info] 1573917373
k10morgan [info] When I told my parents that I was diagnosed with anxiety, they said "oh, that's not anxiety, you're just an introvert. We feel those things too!"Since they both have degrees in psychology, I think it's just that they've been taught to keep their potential anxiety hidden too and to not acknowledge it. [info] None [info] 1483984303
latteloveranonymous [info] Hi, I'm new. Just waiting for AF to arrive so we can TTC#1. I'm mid 30s, and have been off bc since mid February. I'm on my second cycle since and it is literally and metaphorically the longest cycle of my life. We've been married 10 months. We were going to start TTC sooner but I was diagnosed with anxiety last year so we focused on dealing with that first. Looking forward to being a part of this community.  [info] TTC#1, cycle1 [info] 1494415122
invaderpixel [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety in the past, not taking or doing anything for it at the moment, the BIGGEST thing you have to watch out for is everyone else. A wedding is the ultimate small talk for most people, even though for you it's deeply personal. I had a ton of random acquaintances who found out I was planning a wedding in 7 and a half months tell me "WOW THAT'S REALLY FAST!" and go on and on about it, to the point where I was convinced I had something seriously wrong with my wedding and everything would be a disaster. (I actually even had my dress and venue, catering and drinks taken care of before I was officially engaged with a ring on me because my FH was saving up for one) I think anxiety made me freak out more about people's reactions to how short my engagement was, when really my engagement length wasn't THAT short or unheard of. The thing that helped me the most was making quick decisions after basic research and then reciting all the things I've done so far. "I already have my dress, venue, catering, invitations, cupcake tower, cake topper, shoes, undergarments, dj, photographer, flowers, etc." Little random things will pop up (absolutely need a musician to play at the church? Ok I guess) but I will handle them after reciting all the big things I have done already.  [info]  [info] 1370648039
NorthboundXVC [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and about a year ago I went to a treatment center. it helped a lot at first but my mental state has been declining this past year with no signs of stopping even when I have sought out help  [info] 17/M/Gay/OregonUS [info] 1508804298
FedexMeYourJewGold [info] I've been wondering if I might suffer from some degree of bi-polar disorder. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and take antidepressants but I just feel like there is something more to it. Sometimes I will feel so fucking down and depressed, with absolutely no desire to speak to anyone. Then again, other times I will feel almost wired and completely sociable.  Sorry I know no one asked for that rant but it's been something that has been floating through my head for a while now. [info] None [info] 1537979055
Speed0c [info] I have had the pleasure of trying this strain. I’m not exactly an introvert, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I remember this strain being one of the better ones. Cheers! [info]  [info] 1560720998
klumpp [info] &gt; If I invite him to come along and meet them he says it would be imbalanced because I got to know them first.--&gt; I try inviting him to meet people with me. He hates it. I try letting him know he's wanted, but it's fine for him to not interact with my friendsSounds like how I was before I was diagnosed with anxiety issues. Have you or your husband ever considered talking to someone about that? [info] None [info] 1434470915
fullsunflower [info] I agree that some people need to chill out. I go to a school with a very large Asian population in America. As an Asian myself, I always feel obligated to get the highest grades possible. I always feel guilty doing poorly in school because my parents who immigrated to America when I was little sacrificed so much for me to get American education, so that I wouldn't have to go through even more rigorous education in Asia (literally 1 test defines your life). As time goes on, my parents have become more relaxed with me. Ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety, they've started to focus more on my happiness instead of my grades. [info] None [info] 1537915540
divinecore [info] Physical appearance, usually. And yes, I do get worried that I might owe them something or that I’m leading them on simply by being nice to them :( or that they have ulterior motives. It makes me want to go home and lie down. I have been diagnosed with anxiety before. Not sure if I just don’t like that kind of attention. I’m fine with attention if it’s because I’m being funny, though. I get scared that people might get too close to me. It just makes me sad for a reason I can’t explain! [info] None [info] 1528085283
gemgembott [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety very recently, (presumably) as well as a whole bunch of other mental health issues that are yet to be exposed. Struggling to even understand anxiety or what it is, I'm in a state of fear for my future. Can someone clarify please, I am struggling immensely. [info] None [info] 1500806246
LGflower [info] I’ve tried. When I was diagnosed with anxiety and low mood I reached out and spoke to them individually. spoke about wanting to be close visiting often. I would text and try and call but no one would confirm a day or time to meet even for a cup of tea. I am always the first to text any of them and my self esteem is being affected. I feel like I’m trying to be in a clique I don’t fit in with. I’m not surprised mum is being defensive, when I’ve brought up how I have felt in the past I get told I’m being silly, it’s all in my head. I just don’t feel welcome there.  [info] None [info] 1526321337
FlacOrGtfo [info] I switched from Vyvanse (40mg) to Evekeo (10mg x 2), since Vyvanse gave me side effects like some increased heartrate and anxiety, as well as agitating crashes and a little acid reflux.For me, Evekeo, which is instant release 50/50 d-amph/l-amph, kicks in after about 45 minutes, (gives me like 15 minutes of euphoria) and has about 1.5 or 2 hours of focus. Then I have a crash a few hours later and causes me to be perhaps worse than before. I actually have worse anxiety, longer periods of increased heartrate, and worse acid reflux. But the effects are going to vary a lot from person to person. Like, for me, I'm diagnosed with anxiety. At first, the crash effects made me feel sick like a cold or something and then settled down after a couple weeks.It is a temporary anti-depressant, I suppose. And it is energizing and helps me focus for a bit. But ultimately I want to find something else since I find the limited benefits and excessive side effects to be annoying... isn't Evekeo just a revival of benzedrine? [info] None [info] 1446471898
beepbopboop810 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety long before hypothyroidism was even on the table. I often wonder the same question you are posing.... is one affecting/causing the other? Following. [info] None [info] 1572232577
TorradaTorradinha [info] What do you mean by dissociated? I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was like 4 years old but I'm 19 now and idk if it might have gone away or evolved into something else, I don't wanna say I have a condition without proper diagnosis [info] None [info] 1570675701
jadedwine [info] I've had this pretty much all my life...seriously, I remember being a little kid and being constantly worried about getting sick/dying. There was nothing traumatic in my childhood, nothing that should've triggered those kind of thoughts. But I worried about *everything*, and it was only much later that I was diagnosed with anxiety.Health is a big one for me, too. Unfortunately, my anxiety tends to manifest itself through physical symptoms, so that makes it even harder to deal with. I constantly have to try to figure out if this symptom I'm experiencing is just caused by anxiety, or if it's something I actually need to see a doctor about. And getting anxious about the symptom just exacerbates everything and makes me experience more symptoms! Ugh. Anxiety is the worst. [info] None [info] 1459392574
burnsrado [info] There's a chance it could be anxiety. I've had symptoms for a few years, and what you described partially aligns with my early symptoms, especially being a few minutes late for class and deciding to bail. Just see your physician and talk about your symptoms. He/she may refer you to a specialist. In my case, I was treated for everything it *could* be, once that was ruled out, I was diagnosed with anxiety. Good luck!Have you always been this way? Because what stood out to me the most was I used to love being in crowds and talking to new people, but when that changed I knew something weird was going on. [info] GAD [info] 1362199588
mithedthiel [info] I used to work as a barista and was super into coffee until I was diagnosed with anxiety and decided to quit drinking it. (I had to stop pursuing bartending as well because alcohol was also triggering anxiety symptoms).I switched to green tea and it makes a huge difference. A nice zen like awareness, rather than coffee jitters.  [info] None [info] 1547605952
darkcooger [info] I have anxiety which manifests as stomach and intestinal pain, and it's just like you describe: I get anxious, my stomach goes wonky, I get more anxious because of my stomach, my stomach gets wonkier, and so on. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety and starting learning how to deal with it, I was certain I was physically sick and couldn't eat due to nausea, even to the point of losing about 50 pounds.It's amazing how our brains work. Keep that stress managed! [info] None [info] 1414496733
smokeypanda [info] Seconded! I am diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder and was put on the usual drugs which ended up turning me into a zombie. I weened myself off and now smoke Indica strains daily due to the higher amounts of CBD and it's anxiolytic effects. I'm better than I have ever been and I have no need for those nasty pills. Now.. to get medicinal Cannabis legalized in Australia damnit! [info] None [info] 1284431281
ShearlyDisappointed [info] Whoops. Posted this in the wrong spot the first time.  appreciate you taking the time to answer. I've never thought about it in this way. Every time I have asked in the past, he says he wouldn't be here if he didn't want to be. But his actions tell me otherwise. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and sometimes I start to feel like I'm just being crazy and that I'm not doing something for him. But I'm honestly at the end of my rope. [info] None [info] 1497378439
camerer_marsh [info] I have this exact problem but I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back. So...I just got lucky? [info] None [info] 1546146914
_Classic_Rando_ [info] Good for you OP! I was diagnosed with anxiety for ages before ADHD even came into my radar.After starting treatment, my anxiety got way better, but I still feel that general dread/snowballing thing now and then. I still want to get re-evaluated but I think my diagnosis of ADHD and generalised anxiety is more or less right. I'd say my brain's tomfoolery is 80% ADHD and 20% anxiety... But my suffering/ shitty life quality was definitely 80% down to anxiety. I felt so lost when I became so much more productive and functional, but still couldn't be happy... Anxiety is a thief of joy, for real. Only now, a year after diagnosis, am I learning ways to cope with life from the inside out. Onward and upward! [info] ADHD &amp; SO [info] 1509994537
throwaway04053242 [info] What age are you? Reading this, I identify with so much. I've convinced myself I'm suffering from a mental illness or a personality disorder. I have been diagnosed with anxiety...but listening to other people and listening to my friends and how they're feeling I'm starting to think this is how life is in our wonderful 20's?If you would like to talk feel free to message me.  [info] None [info] 1444598757
refugefirstmate [info] First, call the number on the back of your insurance card to see whether you need a referral from your doctor or not.  Generally with psychiatric care, you don't.Next: County mental health center. Make an appointment.  They charge on a sliding scale, they take insurance, and there are lots of different practitioners in one place. And they have seen everything more than once, believe me, so don't feel weird about needing therapy at all.  IME the problem with goign to a private practitioner is that it's a crapshoot, and some of the therapists out there need help themselves.  (As I left an intial session with one after telling her we weren't a good fit, she sadly called out "But I *like* you!"  uh no)You'll have an intake interview to find out what your treatment goals are and the kind of therapist you think would be a good fit.  Then you'll get an appointment with a therapist.After a couple therapist meetings you'll see a psychiatrist, who reviews the therapist's notes and talks to you and makes a recommendation for what anxiety meds might be useful to you. You choose to take them, or not.Then you continue to see the therapist, learning new ways of thinking, usually once a week, and the psychiatrist after another month to see how the meds are working or if the type of dosage needs tweaking (it usually does).  Once you're on a satisfactory med schedule, you see the psychiatrist only every 3 months or so.  Your therapy can continue until you decide you've achieved what you want, which means it can be half a dozen sessions or a couple years.If you don't click with the first therapist, you can always discuss switching to another one so that your sessions will be more productive.Remember:  Therapy is only as good as you make it.  It's *hard work*. Don't just show up, unload or passively sit there, and then go back to your old thinking as soon as you leave.  Really make those sessions count.I was diagnosed with anxiety at age 50. Yeah, I waited that long.  Good on you for not being me.  Let me tell you, it is eminently fixable and boy when you do get a handle on things you feel like the king of the universe. [info] None [info] 1569701423
JimmyDThing [info] I am in no way saying that you do not have these things.  But I have to say... these thigns are over-diagnosed by doctors who don't really have the authority on the subject to do this diagnosing.I've been "diagnosed" with things that are utter bullshit.  I was diagnosed with anxiety caused by slight OCD for a little while, and was given pills.  I didn't need them... those are just normal human feelings that you get once in a while and they went away with time.  I never took the pills, I am fine.  I really think that your general physician should be directing you to a specialist, not giving you pills that are for a specific disorder.  That could definitely be the way things went for you, but if the SAME doctor is diagnosing you with all of these problems, I'd go see a specialist to see what they have to say.EDIT: I accidentally a word and spelling/grammar. [info] None [info] 1314793021
sunday_smile_ [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and it's in my direct family to have similar conditions as well as OCD. I can't afford to go to a psychiatrist right now (I know that sounds like a lame excuse but my college one is completely booked up with a waiting list and I love pay cheque to pay cheque just to get my degree)  [info] None [info] 1434014158
nbgbernd [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder and can somewhat relate. I'm in my early 20s and used to have a normal sex life, but dating and having casual sex became impossible since I'm having serious anxious episodes and panic attacks. Last time I had sex is over a year ago...But to be honest what does it matter? I'd rather have no sex for the next 10 years as long I can live without anxiety. This shouldn't bother you, I think. I'm in therapy and slowly feeling better, I wouldn't be surprised if I even have fun with a girl soon. But I don't wanna rush this and becoming healthy is really the #1 priority here.&gt;I'm wondering if these feelings will ever change.Things will change for the better if you work on yourself. Anxiety disorder is curable, you don't have to be like this forever. Remember that thinking "this will be forever as bad as now" and "I'm going to be crazy forever" are normal thoughts when you have anxiety. This is your illness talking to you, its not the truth.&gt;My mom keeps bugging me for not having a girlfriend. I wouldn't be surprised if she thinks I'm gay haha. Does your mother know about your condition? You could talk with her about this maybe.PM me if you feel like talking privately.  [info] anxiety/panic disorder + depression [info] 1455803184
Narit [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders, so i know all that already hah.  My stomach is super topsy turvey [info] None [info] 1363908951
Rsubs33 [info] Hijacking your comment. I am diagnosed with anxiety and deal with it through medication and coping mechanisms. It sucks balls when you get an anxiety attack. I thought about this example for a while because my wife asked me and the best example I could think of is that feeling you get when you tilt too back in your chair before you fall forward and resettle yourself or if you are unlucky and just fall backwards. Think of that split second feeling, but imagine that it lasts way way longer than a split second. Now think of trying to anything never the less playing a football game in front of tons of people. Glad he was able to get diagnosed. Before I figured it was fucking horrible.  [info]  [info] 1481769645
ako19 [info] I was talking to a friend. He mentioned that he was really nervous a lot of the time, and might have an anxiety disorder. Later I thought to myself, man, it'd be tough to deal with that. I'm glad I don't.A month later, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder [info] None [info] 1534608606
kawaiisailorbabe [info] Thank for your advice, the problem is that I know I’m safe and that nothing can go wrong if I don’t let it, it’s just when that time comes my brain just automatically goes in to panic mode and I can’t get out of it. Maybe it’s because I have been diagnosed with anxiety and adhd so makes it harder for me to focus positively? Just a hard thing for me to get there I guess, pretty frustrating  [info] None [info] 1523213061
Thetiz [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety.It was only recently that I finally decided to check it up, but before that I only had suspicions and at times though it to be something else. Exams-everyone gets stressed right, socially-some people are just quieter than others right? That's what I thought. But recently it had gotten worse, especially my social anxiety which was why I checked it out.Ofcourse I hate the fact that I freak out, blank out, and shake in exams, but what I hate the most is how socially broken I am, extremely shy and quiet, and i I stutter and freeze when I talk to people. I only talk to 5 people, my 5 close friends, if I am with them, I seem really open and outgoing, but take them away, and I'm going to be mute, staring at phone. Sometimes I feel glad that I'm quiet because if people notice, they won't talk to me, which what im thinking all the time, whether it be a train or out and about, hoping no one talks to me etc.Atm what I'm struggling with is this girl from my lec that I like, she too is very shy and quiet, so I'm pretty much screwed. [info] None [info] 1431858965
CantHugEveryPlatypus [info] Last friday, I was diagnosed with anxiety. Yesterday, I made it through the office christmas party without making a single excuse to go home early. Yay me! [info] wine is kind. wine is delicious. wine is important [info] 1449340791
fobfromgermany [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and breathing control is the only thing I've found to be helpful in controlling the physical symptoms. Even just a few minutes of mediating can have effects lasting a day or more  [info] None [info] 1394818346
avocadotoast297 [info] Thank you so much for replying! I'm not currently seeing anyone, the therapists I've seen are only familiar with anorexia and bulimia, it's not a widely discussed topic in my country and there aren't many specialists in the subject. I have been diagnosed with anxiety 6 years ago and I do still struggle with it from time to time, recently a lot due to overworking and everything. I haven't considered them being related tho, I have told this to my therapist and they just told me I need something to focus on. And I have been very busy as opposed to how I was when I had my darkest moment but the thoughts and all the habits didn't go away despite being busy. [info] None [info] 1555186808
Alienz8mypopcorn [info] Yup. I've been diagnosed with anxiety as well. Bad enough to keep me from being a MTI even though the AF is hurting for female instructors. My husband deployed to Afghanistan in 2013, and for the first month, I barely slept, and barely ate. I told myself that to surprise my husband for all his hard work overseas, I'd lose weight so he'd come home to a sexier wife than he left. After I started running 5 days a week, my appetite came back, and I was sleeping on the regular. I was still panicked when I didn't get my scheduled call or if it came a little late, but it was MUCH more manageable than when he first left.  [info] None [info] 1423089765
barelyonhere [info] It would depend on the severity of their disorders. I was diagnosed with anxiety (by a real doctor) and have mostly just learned to live with it. I have days where it's a but much, but I don't do medication.Fun fact: every medication the military gives you for anxiety apparently makes sex *really* hard, and not in the good way.   [info] None [info] 1466953515
Grounded323 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety two months the ago, the first 6 weeks of adjusting to my meds I was good but the last 2 weeks I've been sleeping all day unless I'm going to get food or have to be somewhere.I don't know if it will get better on it's own or my meds needs to be adjusted. But I'm hanging in there because I feel hopeful before I got diagnosed I was miserable wondering why I'm such a fuck up not knowing I have anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1525948266
Odysseus32 [info] Yes you absolutely would be screwed.I was talking to my boss the other day and he was telling me about the guy before me who would always have anxiety attacks.  and he said every couple of days they would flare up and he would need to go sit in his car for 20-30 minutes to calm down.  That made him a bad worker.I have been diagnosed with anxiety.  I have taken anti-depressants/anti-anxiety medicine and can't quite find the right one because the meds make my already terrible anxiety so bad before it starts working that I can't handle it.  I told them that anxiety was very real and that every once in a while I while have an attack during the day (most of mine are at night or when I'm sleeping) and they were like "oh he didnt really have anxiety he just wanted to not work" and I thought "how in the world could you possibly know that?"  If I have an attack it won't be apparent because I'm doing everything I can to control it until I can get somewhere private.US employers care about you showing up, and you working hard.  they don't care about anything else, unless you're with a local company with a very empathetic owner.  This is capitalist nation.  Get with the program or live under an overpass. [info] None [info] 1490662408
DarkKnightCometh [info] Hmm. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and even prescribed Xanax for it... "Lazy" is not the word that comes to mind when I have an anxiety attack. [info] None [info] 1548388451
name_schmame [info] Hello everyone :) I'm new to reddit and this sub seems like a welcoming place. I was diagnosed with anxiety last year but still feel kind of embarrassed about it.My favourite way to relax is to play the Sims or clean the house. It's very clean right now! [info] None [info] 1462261594
jgardner [info] I think teenagers would need to see a list of things and where they fall on the spectrum according to common understanding. With enough examples, they would know what to do in the various cases *and* remain perfectly tolerant. (I had someone say "I'm getting an abortion" when we were teenagers. That shook me to my core. I wish I had known at the time there were people who would've wanted to talk to me about that like my parents and my bishop.)As a professional, you can tell them what "signs of abuse" are and how to properly report, as well as what kinds of things are kept confidential with the bishop, etc...Another thing I might add while I have your attention: One thing that blew my mind as an EQP was having my mom (earned a degree in psychology) explain what the various common disorders are, what their signs are, and most especially, *what it is like living with these things.* Understanding what it meant when someone says, "I am clinically depressed" or "I have been diagnosed with anxiety" really awoke me to a better understanding of these issues and my patience, tolerance, kindness and charity towards people who deal with these things grew infinitely. I think teens need to know because that's when some of these things start presenting and I understand a very large number of people develop their illnesses in their twenties and their peers can be the most help of anyone. [info] child of God (and so are you) [info] 1560376105
peeps_queen [info] I don't know if it's the same for anyone else. But I'm a compulsive skin picker (there is a sub if you're curious). But when this started being an unconscious act and I was tearing my skin apart without realizing it, I was diagnosed with anxiety (10 years ago). Bipolar came recently. I think your desire to pick is normal but if your concerned always check with your doctor. I have to stay aware of my hands to keep from doing it. A fidget ring helped me bunches. Hope this helps.   [info] None [info] 1426577916
madmaxturbator [info] He had no clue how much a single pill would affect him, so to take two and then an ambien is intense.That’s a terrible way to prescribe meds.I have taken pills recreationally and also for medical issues / anxiety. In both circumstances it’s good to start with low dosage to understand your tolerance / threshold. That’s what a good doctor will do... When I was diagnosed with anxiety, my doctor told me to take .25mg klonopin. Then work your way up, if it’s not helping with the anxiety.Popping two Xanax and ambien for what was his first time trying those meds is really reckless. Dude is defending his doctor, but she sounds like a terrible doc frankly. Mixing strong meds like that in a fucking airplane (ie medical help is very limited) is insane. [info] None [info] 1527699410
Oniguri [info] What? It's not subjective, I have cysts scans from before my diet and a year after and the cysts on my ovaries are literally gone. It's insulin related so being ketogenic stops the progression, but carnivore put it into remission. I was diagnosed with anxiety by a practitioner, I'm not self-diagnosed, I know what it felt like and the fact you're telling me 'it's denial' shows a significant lack of empathy and bias on your side.Why are you so against people getting better? Who cares how it's done, lets just acknowledge something positive is happening and try and understand the mechanism. Maybe I'll die of CVD in 20 years, who knows? But at the moment I feel better than I ever have in my life and my mental clarity is something I thought I'd never achieve.Science is about seeking truth not your predisposed dogmas.  Also, what you don't seem to understand, I didn't do this diet first. This was literally my LAST course of action after trying every single diet that was supposed to improve symptoms, none of them helped. I didn't wake up one day and decide to eat lamb fat and rare liver lol, it was slow progression and following the things that made me feel good and lessened my symptoms. Digestion being the most impactful. [info] None [info] 1561388123
ariel529 [info] Hey how's it going. Hopefully it's not too late to add to this post, it took me a while to finally work up the nerve. I was diagnosed with anxiety &amp; ptsd as well. I live in katy but I'm here if you want to talk/vent, I'm free most days.  [info] Katy [info] 1432678237
couerdepirate [info] just a thought, and maybe i'm overstepping here, but do you have any, even minor, issues with anxiety? whether it be about school itself or just in general?I only ask because for a couple years in high school, I COULD NOT eat breakfast. I would feel so sick, but like you be famished by lunch. Once I was diagnosed with anxiety problems and realized I was subconsciously anxious about school, I was able to eat breakfast. Now I love getting up and having a big breakfast before I start my day!  [info] None [info] 1380329385
kirby__000 [info] What's your story?&amp;#x200B;I'm a business student but I'm very curious about studying computer security and reading good books, not to mention that I can't see my life without studying.&amp;#x200B;What is your dream?&amp;#x200B;my import business is finally certain, i am working to keep it on track i have always had a dream to have my own business and be against all kinds of status quo&amp;#x200B;What's your biggest challenge?&amp;#x200B;at the end of last year I was diagnosed with anxiety, it was one of the worst recent phases of my life, I hadn't realized that I myself was, breaking up with me I didn't have a base of physical activity, I didn't socialize, my import business hadn't been created yet, that time was where I studied the most, very heavy things, and I was finishing my business school, being so all attention was turned to these independent study that I liked, and learned a lot of things, but also left me very anxious yet, I did not return to my college, to finish today some people say to me that my business will not work but I know how to filter that negative opinion in positive is only so that your business will have exodus never give up. [info] None [info] 1566063460
alpacameat [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks. For a long while, even after been diagnosed with epilepsy I thought I only had anxiety and panic attacks. Funny thing is that I eventually developed an anxiety disorder cause by my epilepsy. [info] Vimpat 200 [info] 1566440086
DFJ17 [info] How do you even cope with it? Some days it makes me feel like I'm going insane, it's horrible. It's not like I've been diagnosed with anxiety or anything, I just feel like I have some strain of it. I hate it. I feel like it's turning my life upside down, making me feel afraid and inadequate of doing basic things. I'm honestly starting to get worried about what my future is going to be like because of how I am now. I don't know where exactly this all started, but it feels like it's gone haywire in the last few years [info] None [info] 1568920176
TeaAndCandles [info] Okay, I know this misery all too well. First off, don't be afraid of conventional medicine, you may need it as a jumping off point. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder several years ago and went on medication for a year. I knew I didn't want to be on the meds forever so during that time I took the opportunity to learn coping mechanisms and tools to deal with my severe panic attacks, through my doctor, support groups and the internet. Now I'm able to recognize and stop an anxiety attack in it's tracks before it ever has a chance to sneak up on me. Some things that helped me besides the meds were meditation (candles, incense and new age music set the mood for relaxation), distraction (a hard work out, doing long division in my head, basically anything that takes focus away from that anxiety thought spiral) and coming to terms with my fears (realizing that yes, horrible things MIGHT happen, but until they actually do, it's just pointless to worry about it). Also, try to stay away from caffeine and other stimulants until your situation is under control. I substituted green tea for coffee for a while and it seemed to help as well. Maybe cut sugar out of your diet, too. Best of luck to you. [info]  [info] 1392679234
dinggbatt [info] Thank you I appreciate your comment. So glad to hear your feeling better. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and was given medication to try. I didn’t like it because it made me very tired and just feel weird.... I’ve been trying to heal by meditation &amp; yoga. I’m gonna try cbd and see how that helps with my anxiety [info] None [info] 1572225212
kittlekattle [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety for longer than I have with hEDS, and I know where some of you all are coming from with the chicken and egg scenario.  I sometimes will feel "anxious" physically without a trigger, which can then lead to my brain running with it, desperately trying to figure out what's wrong and getting panicky as a result. (Thanks, brain. It's not helpful, but I know you're trying you're best, poor thing.)  Though I haven't been formally diagnosed with POTS, I'd be astounded if I don't have it.  (Feeling like you've been slammed in the head by a two by four during yoga because of position isn't normal, is it?)  &amp;#x200B;Anyway, my docs have been semi-helpful.  After ruling that my heart is ok structurally, they prescribed beta blockers off label to help control heart palpitations.  That's been pretty good, but I've now been receiving bio-feedback for the last few months and that's really starting to help.  If you have access to that at all, I'd recommend giving it a shot.  It's lessened my panic attack frequency, and also has made it possible for me to help slow my breathing and heart rate.  During my sessions, they also record hand temp, and sweat response as well as look at muscle tension.  Basically, I meditate and the sensors and recording equipment let me know immediately which techniques work best for lowering my own stress responses.  It's not perfect and it's not immediate (my therapist says that best evidence shows it generally takes 9 to 12 sessions to work best) between that and CBT, and meds, the anxiety is less.  Not gone, but at least it's getting to the point where it's easier to tell what's just physical manifestations and what's got the mental/emotional component, so I can tell my brain it can chill out. [info] None [info] 1571887191
Ellajt [info] Yes!! I have been diagnosed with anxiety but my counsellor and work OHC both think it’s OCD. I’m 100% sure it is. I have had 4 GP appointments in the past 2 weeks and still they won’t send me to a psychiatrist, even though they’ve deemed me unfit for work and signed me off. ArghfjjfjgEdit - I didn’t even realise the ins and outs of OCD until it was mentioned to me by them. So I didn’t say ‘I think I have this’ at all. But it makes complete sense now I know about it! [info] None [info] 1542208346
hairenya [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and although my meds work pretty well, I am still affected by the following triggers:Large groups of peoplePhone CallsEye ContactShop at Walmart (sounds funny, but I'm actually serious)When my family members are angry or stressed. Being Late or Off-ScheduleLoud NoisesUnfamiliar People or SituationsWhen I am Solely In charge of/ Responsible for SomethingDrivingLast Minute Plan ChangesGood luck at the dentist! I've had my top wisdom teeth out, didn't hurt that bad. The pills they gave me were awesome :)   [info] http://www.amazon.com/gp/registry/wishlist/1JH3EWY5G2Z1P/ref=top [info] 1389269986
mrtrollstein [info] I wouldn't go. Simple as that. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I have asthma anyway so I couldn't be picked,  but even if I was, nope, cya, bye. I'm a scrawny anxiety filled woman whose coping mechanism is drawing cute fluffy pictures on myself while I hide behind my long hair, which I would not cut off for anything.I would rather be homeless in Canada than in the military. [info] Erin - 21 - MtF HRT 8/22/17 [info] 1505343206
gangie95 [info] I'm in my final semester of college and it has a been a tough and rough journey to get through it. I struggled in school my first year at a different college and when I transferred to OSU my jr. year I was diagnosed with anxiety. I also felt so lonely because I didn't live on campus, only knew a few people here, and my classes were so big and felt impersonal. I still feel that way sometimes, but what has helped me get through is a support system, for me it's my family. My recommendation would be to find your support system, it could be a friend, family, it could even be a dog, they will help you get through. I hope you don't act on this and that you are able to get the help you need, because you are worth it!!!! [info] None [info] 1540340599
Bobysaur [info] I've never been able to stop thinking but it wasn't until recently that I was diagnosed with anxiety. I got prescribed Buspar and now I feel great.  [info] None [info] 1341709554
8thful [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and have gone through an intensive outpatient program where I learned about an amazing philosophy called ACT (Acceptance and Commitment Therapy). Might be something worth looking into if your worried are getting in the way of enjoying life. [info] None [info] 1477406095
camohorse [info] Can I legally own a firearm in Colorado if I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder? [info] None [info] 1569666247
Peach_Muffin [info] All my life I've kinda been super anxious about stuff. You know, the worrying and blowing things out of proportion thoughts. I remember in sixth grade I was being bullied, I then started worrying that it would happen for the rest of my life and that my family might disown me for being weak enough to let myself get bullied. I would become an absolute wreck due to unhealthy thought patterns, the kind of person who would freak out that their partner had died in a car crash because they didn't pick up their phone and were running late. Our worry that every time somebody wants to talk to you that you are in trouble. That stuff might be familiar to some people. Occasionally as a child/teenager I would have trouble getting enough air and supplement my oxygen with deep sighs. This condition (called air hunger) got way worse when I was 24, in 2012. Eventually I was diagnosed with anxiety. For me some days are easy, others I seem to worry about every damn thing. I did everything I could today to avoid a 5 minute conversation with a colleague that would simply involve inserting a USB stick into her computer and running a program. That scared the shit out of me. The air hunger is on and off too. There was one night I thought that I would die, and imagining my parents finding a corpse the following morning didn't help matters much. What helps is meditation when I am exhibiting symptoms; air hunger is pretty good for cuing me into when I'm stressed. Coloring helps me too :) [info] None [info] 1455004475
triagonalmeb [info] I thought it was an allergic reaction to eating cup noodles for the first time and never ate it again. I felt nauseous but for some reason I was terrified of throwing up. I had no idea why, it was never an issue, but it was like suddenly vomiting was my worst fear. And that made me terrified. I would start shivering hard, get palpitations, cold hands, cry a lot and run to my mom. Sometimes I couldn't sleep because of it and had to go to school super tired. Years later someone mentioned panic attacks and it clicked. Even more years later I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1522096163
ImThatMelanin [info] My mother died last year because of a disease called sickle cell and a medicine allergy reaction and I also have a disease called sickle Cell and I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and I get bullied at school and I was molested by my uncle at age 7. yes I'm a teenager but my problems are far from crying for attention this sub is for support people who don't have it at home but you're here bullying people who are probably already being bullied🖕🏾 [info] None [info] 1513575258
dennismiller2024 [info] Urinated. Until yesterday.A little background, I'm 23 years old, and I was diagnosed with anxiety in high school. I have a small group of friends, but I like to stay in the same routine. I was talking to one of my friends about my daily routine, because we were having a deep conversation about both of our anxiety issues.He said, "Do you have OCD also? Sometimes I have to wash my hands for minutes after I pee before I feel clean." I had to tell him my biggest secret, someone that I've never told anyone. I said, "I've actually never peed before. I know it's something you're supposed to do, but I guess I just kinda never had the time." He was stunned by my revelation. "You've never peed before?!?!" Maybe it's because he had a fascination with urine or maybe it was just because I had never told him that before, but he was amazed that someone had not experience urinating. “You NEED to try it. In fact, let’s go to the bathroom. I’m going to teach you how to pee.”He walked me into the bathroom, and taught me how to lift up the toilet seat. He took my hand and arranged my fingers on the stem of my cock. “Relax, it’s easier than it looks. Here, watch me do it.” He pulled out his cock and started pissing into the toilet. “Just relax the muscles in your crotch, and focus on the sensations inside the penis. Whenever you feel a force coming outward of the penis, focus on it but don’t try to control it. If you feel it moving inward, then recognize it, and relax the muscles again until it’s moving outward.” I followed the instructions and nothing happened. I said, “I can’t help it. I feel the force. It’s moving back up. I’ll never pee, I should just give up.”“You got this, just relax. Don’t play mind games with yourself, you will pee before I let you leave this bathroom. If you don’t think you will pee, then no pee will come out. Trust me, you just have to believe in yourself.” I tried again, and pee started spraying out of my cock. "I'm doing it! I'm urinating!"I peed for 5 straight minutes. He said, "How do you like it?" I politiely asked him to leave the bathroom so I could be alone with my piss stream. I wiped the tip of my cock with a single square of toilet paper, and flushed. "I am a new man today," I thought. I ran over and hugged my friend in the most intense display of platonic affection I had ever experience. My pants were sprinkled with wet spots and urine continued to drip down my leg. My friend saw the urine marks on my pants, "Don't worry about that. You'll get the hang of it soon." We fell asleep together on the couch in his apartment. [info] None [info] 1553696566
shfiven [info] Hey, you, drink as much ginger tea as you can stomach for the next week! It did wonders for my chronically inflamed lungs. I was diagnosed with anxiety when it turns out the anxiety was a byproduct of the athsma. Ginger cleared up my lungs better than steroids and Albuterol combined. I read somewhere that it's being studied for use in inhalers because it has fewer side effects.  [info] None [info] 1526699062
SquidYurt [info] Hi everyone,So a back story: for the last 6 years I have had a strong feeling of brain fog and fatigue and I am now trying to put things right. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and was on Citalopram for around 5 years, but during this time the brain fog still persisted, despite the anxiety symptoms lessening somewhat. I have now been off of any medication for 2 months but still feel exhausted and apathetic from the moment I wake up to when I sleep at night. I went for a blood test last week but it came back fine. Is there anything on this test that I should be looking into, or anything else that could help?For the last few days I've also been supplementing Vitamin B Complex, Vitamin D3 &amp; Magnesium. I'm only 26 years old and have no real cause of stress in my life to make me feel exhausted. Any advice or suggestions of what to say to my doctor or any other routes to go down would be greatly appreciated, as this is affecting my ability to work and my relationship. Edit: Just to add, I have tried CBT three times, which made no difference to my fatigue or brain fog, so I am leaning towards it being a physical issue. [info] None [info] 1499019687
CoolJoey99 [info] I thought as much. I have been diagnosed with anxiety but I didn't connect this paranoia with that.Unfortunately, I have no one to talk to at the moment. My family doesn't believe in mental health and I'm home for the vacation so no therapist or doc anytime soon. [info] None [info] 1559406374
TheLemonMage [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but that's just something I inherited. As a person, yes, I'm emotionally resilient; it's easy for me to not take things to heart, and I'm surprisingly adaptive to big life changes, including deaths of loved ones. My friends can rely on me to vent to, as a shoulder to cry on. I'm not an emotional person, but I'm always there for my friends and family [info] ENTP [info] 1566874283
Lost_in_redditland [info] Thank you for commenting. I have been having sleep issues for sometime but it hasn't been this bad since when I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2013. I just was super scared with the suicide ideation because that hasn't happened in such a long time and now that these intrusive thoughts are popping up, I thought I need to write it out somewhere. Reddit has been a lot of help, I made this account in 2012 when I had my breakdown and although I used to post a lot more on my throwaway, the main account reminded me that I was lost and it was okay to be lost. Anyways, I just need to make sure that the part of my brain that is trying to cope is just a little stronger than the part that is trying to drown out any feelings. It feels good to be able to completely honest about what is going on with me. Since I could not sleep last night, I tried listening to a sleep podcast/story on youtube and it did work! Maybe that could help you too. [info] None [info] 1499169637
wackylol [info] Lol I actually have OCD and it's never bothered me when people use it as slang because I'm pretty sure anyone with some level of organization obsessiveness actually is a bit OCD. Of course it's only a disorder when it's actually harming your life but the ritualistic side of it still is valid. It's not some hyper exclusive diagnosis.edit: To clarify I have been diagnosed with anxiety. OCD is one of my many symptoms and I have experienced anxiety induced OCD on a very real level to the point of it invading my life. [info] None [info] 1358913312
HappyFawn836131 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and add at the same time, I’ve never had any actual problems before this. My doctor prescribed be strattera. Me and my mom did a ton of research all over the internet to find out about this drug. And we both firmly decided we didn’t want it. My mom and doctor then came to the consluison of a script of 60x 10mg adderal irs. She encouraged us to mess with the dosage and tweak it just right and such (Mom held the bottle, I didn’t get the chance). They both believed that my anxiety stemmed from my add, therefore causing me to get anxious. 2 months later and not a drip of anxiety left in my body... I don’t know what do tell you man, but the best explanation in my opinion would be that everyone’s body is built differently, and no drug will effect anyone exactly the same way... [info] None [info] 1522061476
nerdularATX [info] Thank you. I don't have OCD but seeing people throw that around like it's a cute little quirk is disgusting. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder in third grade and went into a really bad spiral not long after my older child was born that took months of therapy to get out from under.  As someone with anxiety, I can't even fathom why people would want to draw so much attention to it. I want nothing more than to hide it so people think I am "normal"! I think it has at least helped my performance at work. I am so on top of things because I'm terrified of missing or forgetting something. And my dreams are trolls. I never have pleasant dreams.  [info] None [info] 1453244378
SilverYayFern [info] Check, check, check- my experience has a lot of similarities to those you describe. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and take medication for it, and distracting myself with shopping is one of the few ways I've found that snaps me out of that anxiety spiral. It replaces thoughts with the feel-good numbness of looking at pretty things. Instead of a directionless frantic energy, I have a direction, a mission through which to funnel that energy. I also get very anxious when my surroundings are messy, so, yes, reducing clutter (generally visible or not) is a goal of mine.I read your comment yesterday and thought about it over the course of the day. I journaled for a while too. There were some stressors I was already aware of. Actually, a big reason I'm moving to the other coast is to deal with some of those stressors (they're mostly family life-centered). But actively confronting them did help me realize that a lot of the guilt and conflict I was feeling was baseless. Most of the worry is not baseless, which is why I was afraid to confront it. But it did help me to confront it, and separate the real concerns from the baseless concerns. So. I think I should do this regularly. (I can think of it like decluttering/destashing my mind haha.)TLDR; Your advice is/was sound and helpful. Thank you.Edit: originally posted reply incorrectly. [info] None [info] 1468039717
leosolon [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and shoved in a bottle of meds for it. The meds made me a zombie. Years later i went back to the doctor and she prescribed me adderall. It turns out that it was anxiety due to ADHD. Adderall works as stimulant and anti anxiety for me. It works greatly. [info] None [info] 1425412902
amzbeeee44 [info] Yep .. I had many games like this .. I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD and am now medicated so don’t play them anymore thank god  [info] None [info] 1550331142
matilsal [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety long before it was cool. Come at me. [info] None [info] 1551897485
bootsstormy [info] I feel like I peaked when I was 9. Buckle up this is a long one.I used to be this happy, fun, and animated person but when my grandma's brother passed away both of my grandparents became a little less happy and their health began to decline. My granny was the first to go. She passed in her favorite chair in the living room after one of her organs busted (I don't really know how she died. That's what I have gathered from eavesdropping. My parents have not told me since her death almost 6 years ago.) The day after her death my mother forced me to go down to their house and spend time with grandpa and help her put a cover over her chair. I couldn't really go down to that house after her death, to many memories and sadness. After his wife's death my grandpa lost the will to live and keep fighting his many health problems. After 6 ish months he became ill with what we thought was tuberculosis. He was soon hospitalized and we couldn't be near him without a mask. I couldn't breathe with the mask on and would soon overheat and eventually pass out so my visits were short lived. I had to watch him wither away in hospital bed while he wanted to die in his home, but my parents thought they could keep him alive longer in the hospital. This was the start of a massive rift between me and mainly my mom, but my dad too. After his death the hospital ran more tests that they could have done while he was alive and found he didn't have TB at all, he had a CURABLE disease that is similar.A couple on months later my parents decided to take a break from each other. Instead of sitting me down and saying exactly that, my mother thought it would be a good idea to go to her parents house without allowing me to decide where and with whom I wanted to live. I love my mom, but she is a control freak, thinks that because I'm her carbon copy we are the same, and doesn't even try to communicate with me or anyone. I cried so much that night I got a day out of school and was taken back to my dad that night. When she went up to my maternal grandparents' house she took most of the belongings from my dad's parents' (talked about before) house with her. After a couple weeks of only seeing her is passing late at night she decided to move into my deceased grandparents' home. She would come up to our house late at night to visit and would always try to get me to spend the bight with me so she wouldn't have to pick me up for school. I did that maybe 3 times in over a year. Like I said before, after my grandma passed I hated being in that house and she knew it, but did she care? NOPE. She also liked to go to the gym instead of visit or help around the farm dad built for her. They got back together after a year,  but things got worse for me. To my dad and outsiders it seems like we're a happy family. After my mother moved back in she expected me to treat her the same. When I was distant with her she would always just try to annoy me to get a reaction and then punish me when I would snap. She still does this nearly 4 years later. She likes to make me her cleaning slave and will push me until I shut down emotionally or my body can't take anymore and I have to stop. She then gets angry at me for not doing what she asked. My mother also expects me to be her perfect angel and never backtalk, fight back at her, never make a scene anywhere, and NEVER let anyone see that I'm not mama's little angel by choice,  but by fear. She's never been violent towards me, but she likes to be emotionally abusive. When I started middle school I began having major panic attacks and would fight tooth and nail to keep from going to that place. I was diagnosed with anxiety. None of the meds worked, my doctor told me to my face I was faking for attention and to get out of school, and my mom didn't care. Dad was sympathetic, but gave me the classic southern grow up and get over it. My mother has been telling me to just deal with it since and has given me no support unless someone is watching. I had to force my doctor to send me to specialists to be diagnosed with several different conditions. My mother isn't sympathetic and doesn't seem to care about the diagnoses though. My mom and I fight a lot and my dad doesn't notice the abuse. He really is the light of my life as I don't have many friends. He thinks we fight because we're to much alike, but doesn't see we are polar opposites and that she is abusive. I'm constantly stressed and unmedicated (by choice). I really just hate my life at this point.I'm sorry this is so long, I had to get this off my chest and internet strangers seem the best way.TLDR: My grandparents died, mom and dad took a break and got together again, mom is emotionally abusive, and I have disabilities. [info] None [info] 1564736849
beersforfears [info] I don't know whether this would be considered rational or irrational, depending on what your views are (two out of the three people that know of this fear of mine consider it irrational), but after I had my daughter, I have always had a major fear of something bad happening to her. It doesn't help that I am diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder, so I will every now and then have a moment of weakness and have panic attacks at the mere thought. A major thing lately that I have been working myself up over is the fear of what could happen to her in her lifetime, as far as the conditions in America/the environment. Before I had a child, I never thought about things like this in the depth that I do now, because I was living for myself an had no one depending on me for their well-being, therefore I could worry a lot less. But now that I have her, I'm not living for myself anymore and it is my job to do whatever I can to protect her. I guess just knowing I can't protect her from everything really just scares the shit out of me. [info] None [info] 1313214482
TheRunningMango [info] You sound exactly like me. For years I ignored it and thought it was normal, and that I was just 'type A' personality, and that was that and I didn't need any sort of special help. But, I started seeing someone when I had so much anxiety that I couldn't perform on exams (the LSAT, specifically) without having major panic attacks, and I simultaneously developed severe insomnia. I was diagnosed with anxiety as well as OCD in the form of perfectionism. I started taking zoloft and was prescribed klonopin (a take-as-needed) and it's helped quite a bit (though tbh only on week 6 of that, so take this w a grain of salt). So tl;dr: no, you're not making this up, and I would definitely recommend seeing someone and inquiring about SSRIs and maybe even a take-as-needed if you ever have panic attacks or insomnia. And feel free to reach out anytime if you need help or have questions &lt;3 we gotta stick together us high-functioning-high-anxiety-ers  [info] None [info] 1543779252
haveanupvote2424 [info] I do this when I am trying to fall asleep. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, it sucks.  [info] None [info] 1384628775
BeambugB [info] My story is similar. I began failing all my classes after being a straight A student at 13. I was depressed and anxious about everything so I just did nothing. I was diagnosed with PCOS when I was 15, put on birth control and told that would help. It helped with the physical issues but not so much the emotional. It wasn’t until I was in college that I was diagnosed with anxiety and given meds. The first meds I was given were for extreme anxiety incidents only and made me a zombie so I never used them. Then when I was 25 I was diagnosed again with anxiety by a different doctor and put on meds that worked for a year but my panic attacks came back and were worse than ever. I learned about yoga and meditation and that helped me mentally calm myself once my panic attack started but it didn’t stop them.Then last year, at age 30, I was diagnosed with ADHD from a new primary care physician, given Vyvanse and changed my anxiety med from Lorazepam to Lexapro, with the hopes that once my ADHD is under control, I wouldn’t need the Lexapro anymore. She also suggested I search for counseling to help me learn how to better manage my adhd. The Vyvanse has helped so much. The first day I took it, I was driving to work and I noticed for the first time ever, my mind was quiet. It was so weirdly peaceful and when I realized my mind wasn’t running wild, I cried because I was at peace. I’m still taking Lexapro and Vyvanse together but it’s been so much better. I’m searching for a therapist to help me with my ADHD since I’ve basically grown up with this impairment and I’m just now learning how it can or could effect my life. My brother was diagnosed ADHD at 8 so he’s always been medicated and aware. There are lots of options out there to choose from. Try CBD oil. It’s helped me some and one of my coworkers uses it to help her handle her PTSD. Look into alternative therapies like using essential oils or even changing your diet. I’m effected by the levels of estrogen and testosterone in my blood streams I have to watch what I eat and drink. [info] None [info] 1539219484
dogfins25 [info] I had this problem for many years.  This was actually a symptom I had before I was diagnosed with anxiety.  I went thru a bunch of tests to see if it was a physical issue and it wasn't until I started high school and my anxiety got worse that I got help. First I wouldn't recommend wearing a maxi pad. If you do it once it may become a habit. I did this for years and I had to "wean" myself off them, I would wear the thick heavy flow ones daily because I was afraid of having an accident. I would also tie a sweater around my waist. I would go to the bathroom, clean up and then sit down again because "Oh! I still have to go a little bit" so that became a nasty cycle and I would spend a long time in the bathroom. I always had to know where the toilet was and if I didn't have access to one... I hated school assemblys because I felt trapped.  I was terrified of school trips because the bus didn't have a bathroom. You know what though, I NEVER HAD AN ACCIDENT. Ever. If you can distract yourself on the bus that may help, read a book, listen to music, talk to someone on the phone. You can PM me if you want. It will be OK.  [info] None [info] 1461821469
Avannar [info] Anticipatory anxiety used to be crippling to me. It was the main basis for my disabled status when I was diagnosed with anxiety. I overcame it in part with words like these:&gt;-Never let the future disturb you. You will meet it, if you have to, with the same weapons of reason which today arm you against the present. &gt;-For a man can lose neither the past nor the future; for how can one take from him that which is not his? So remember these two points: first, that each thing is of like form from everlasting and comes round again in its cycle, and that it signifies not whether a man shall look upon the same things for a hundred years or two hundred, or for an infinity of time; second, that the longest lived and the shortest lived man, when they come to die, lose one and the same thing.&gt;-Remember that neither the future nor the past pains thee, but only the present. But this is reduced to a very little, if thou only circumscribest it, and chidest thy mind, if it is unable to hold out against even this.&gt;-Is any man afraid of change? Why what can take place without change?&gt;-Nature which governs the whole will soon change all things which thou seest, and out of there substance will make other things, and again other things from the substance of them, in order that the world may ever be new.&gt;-The universe is change; our life is what our thoughts make it.All from Marcus Aurelius.For me, it was important to realize that those events, most of which had either not yet come to pass, or had occurred in the past and were thus behind me, would not, and could not, reach through time to harm me in the present. What, then, was causing me distress? Only myself. Only my own thoughts could be the culprit. I wondered, "Why am I self-harming in this way?" And that put an end to it. I realized the absurdity of allowing my mind to tear itself to pieces over things that hadn't even happened and chose to put a stop to it. [info] None [info] 1496628320
aeroluv327 [info] That's exactly how I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder!  I took myself to urgent care because I thought I was having a heart attack.  Those poor nurses were so nice.  [info] None [info] 1499680727
edwardsamy1984 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I get something like that but on my right side it's a horrible thing and I sometimes wonder with the horrible thing that anxiety is it puts it there on purpose  [info] None [info] 1523732742
HarmDeezy [info] Yup. I was diagnosed with anxiety but nowadays everyone has “anxiety” so if I were to ever mention it people would not think of it as an illness but as fake  [info] None [info] 1545194301
Paisley_hippo [info] My anxiety does this too. In fact, that is what I told the Dr I was concerned was going on (early onset alzheimers) before I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1455684527
jazz4 [info] Anxiety is horrible in the morning. I coped really well as a kid and teenager - got up for school absolutely fine, but I remember dreading every single day I had to go to University and work and it's when it started. This was before I was diagnosed with anxiety and knew what it really was. Anxiety keeps me up all night, especially if I know I have to get up early or have a tough day.Cognitive Behavioural Therapy has helped a lot with that. Trying to live more in the "now" and identifying triggers, but these physical symptoms are brutal. I might try meds.  [info] None [info] 1454366361
SaintPhoeniix [info] In answer to your final question, yes. Things like going outside or even being in a conversation can be severly affected, depending on how bad they have it. I turned down every single offer to go out from friends all through my school life, before I was diagnosed with anxiety, I just didn't know why I couldn't face going out. I don't really know how she feels though, she probably wants your support but doesn't want to be treated as if she can't do anything. Maybe try and ask her, nicely, if she wants to go out somewhere that she feels safe and if she says 'No', say "That's fine, we don't have to do anything you don't want to" etc. [info] None [info] 1375318614
plazey [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety early in life (around 11?) I was also later diagnosed with OCD (13 years old). I've had periods of intense panic attacks and other time periods where the OCD has been completely out of control. My life at this point (25 years old) is relatively free of anxiety-related symptoms, though symptoms tend to come and go with what's going on in my life. I think that the large majority of relieving those feelings was defining what it was that was causing the anxiety in my life and doing hard work to remedy fears, issues, thought patterns and realizing an anxious thought from a rational one and using self-talk to bring myself down from high anxiety times. Developing healthy habits (meditation, less caffeine, more exercise, etc) has really helped as well.My point in saying this is that there are therapies that work and it is possible to work through these disorders. It takes some work and dedication, but you can totally do it :) [info] None [info] 1335551661
pastypirate [info] You pretty much just described exactly how I feel when I'm getting ready for ANYTHING. I have such a strong desire to HAVE to be on time for everything which results in me always waiting around for others as I'm early. Being late and not doing things in the 'windows of time' really stresses me out. I have been diagnosed with anxiety though so I guess that may enhance this haha [info] None [info] 1423352340
JCashish [info] The comment below by [GoldenBirdSong](http://www.reddit.com/user/GoldenBirdSong) from another [thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/Meditation/comments/1uun8j/effect_of_meditation_on_anxiety/celvr73?context=3) is so damn good that I have to re-post it here. [{I've started meditating after my therapist suggested it to me. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD, and I suffer from panic attacks.It took a while, but it's helping to the point where if I feel myself getting agitated I'll meditate for a few minutes and get less anxious. I also don't get anxious as often.The trick is not to grab onto any of your thoughts, just let them float by.When my mind is wandering or relaxed, the reason I get anxious is because my mind is latching onto thoughts and it turns into a spiral of obsessive anxiety.TL;DR: Try it. It helped me and you won't know if it helps you without trying.}] [info] None [info] 1390436103
VariegatedViewpoint [info] Welcome!  I too started last week because I felt that I had to do this or else I would miss my chance at starting a family.I was diagnosed with anxiety as well, so it will be interesting to see what effect this has on that area.I'm happy you are trying, and I hope this works out for the both of us!  [info] 842 days [info] 1358885630
kariroxygirl [info] I feel the same way and I was diagnosed with anxiety. I still feel out of it and crazy :( idk how much longer I will feel like this. Also I got sent to a physicist  [info] None [info] 1548400505
Legolas170 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder so yeah, I know what I'm talking about. Fortunately social interactions don't causes them to trigger generally, I imagine that's hell for those people. Nice burn tho  [info] None [info] 1542350198
CityLights8 [info] I appreciate your suggestion; thank you.  I am diagnosed with anxiety disorders, panic attacks, and PTSD, so during some of the time that I have not worked or have had very part-time or low-responsibility types of work over the past several years, it might help if I explain to them that that's the reason why I was not working harder. [info] None [info] 1574990377
moni_bk [info] The crack-down on opioids can be really unfair to those who legitimately suffer from chronic pain. My mom has suffered with trigeminal neuralgia, has had ovarian cancer, and has fibromyalgia. She has a hell of a time getting medication to treat her debilitating pain. The pain is so bad sometimes she throws up. She's tried everything natural, acupuncture, holistic medicine, and just about every medication possible. She's seen dozens of doctors and had numerous different treatment therapies. The only thing that helps is pain meds. Which she has been addicted to and has gotten clean many times over the course of my life. If she hadn't been able to get pain meds I am certain she would have killed herself a long time ago. It's a shame that something that exists to help people is restricted so much that even people that need it have extreme difficulty getting it. I understand that it's over-prescribed and that we have an opioid epidemic, but people who really need it end up suffering because of this crack-down. I don't know what the answer is really. This is also happening with anti-anxiety meds as well. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and take Xanax on occasion to help. I probably only use 30 pills every six months because I actually don't like taking it. I hate feeling spacey and sleepy. However, just knowing I have a prescription cuts down my anxiety in general. I have a terrible time getting this prescribed. Years ago my anxiety got so bad I ended up in the hospital legitimately thinking I was going to have a heart attack. Obvious disclaimer, this in no way suggests that killing people to get meds is ok. [info] None [info] 1501521923
greenbeencasserole [info] I have a lot of the same tics that OP posted. I’m so relieved to see that someone else experiences the same ones, nose twitches, throat clearing, interesting breathing techniques... I also flex my stomach and *other* muscles... wish there was more insight into what all of this is.... I was diagnosed with anxiety but medication didn’t seem to help my tics and I feel like it made me complacent... like I didn’t care about anything. [info] None [info] 1532283959
PreposterousMurmur [info] Honestly, I was diagnosed with anxiety and paranoia in my teens and have tried my hardest to work through it. Weirdly, I've never felt calmer about anything in my life than the health and safety of my babies. Haha, I still get startled when the wind hits my front door, but I know deep down inside the babies are okay.  [info] 35 wks with b/g twins [info] 1337781033
reddit_login123456 [info] I have some, but little, doubt in the short term and with appropriate dosages it helps. I'm from Colorado I have more experience with pot culture than you can imagine. I've had more friends than I can count negatively effected by long term use in their formative years, many who self medicated.I've read more peer reviewed papers than you. I've been diagnosed with anxiety by both PhD and MDs. I literally never said it doesn't work for some people. Don't put words in my mouth. I don't need advice from un-educated, inexperienced crusaders on the internet.  [info] None [info] 1468273622
phoenixink [info] On the other side of the coin, being pregnant and struggling to give up that last one or half cigarette a day is fucking hard. I had anxiety in the first place, add in no support and no way to calm myself down, yeah I'd take part of an organic cigarette over me wailing locked in the bathroom for an hour. Next go-around though, now that I've been diagnosed with anxiety ill seek out a different alternative. But yeah until you've been in that position it's really hard to speak for everyone else.Edit: in response to the whole organic cigarette bit...this was my reply: &gt;"Yeah, it's still a cigarette. I am not nor was I under the delusion that because it was organic that it was somehow totally fine. But yeah, if I'm gonna smoke tobacco, I'm gonna make sure it's of the highest quality I can find." [info] None [info] 1431539785
Lassa76 [info] I know what you mean. Are you on medication for the anxiety? I can't be of much help (I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but most psychiatrists say it's psychosis), but if there's any consolation, just know that you're not alone. That happens with me a ton, and unfortunately, I don't have any advice except to think about the great times you've had with her when these attacks begin. It always helps me when I worry about my SO cheating.  [info] None [info] 1493521055
myloxoloto [info] Ive always been described as an anxious child, I hated social situations, even going to town would freak me out. Throughout school  I was bullied, never had any friends, and in work/university I've never managed to have a group I see regularly. That mystical group of friends who see each other every weekend or even sooner? Hmm yeah that evades me. I'm 23, and have just in the last year had cbt. It worked to an extent but I'm noticing myself starting to get a hell of a lot anxious again, and it's getting harder to rationalise stuff, and I keep panicking and freaking out. My flight instinct is in overdrive and I faint incredibly easily. I was diagnosed with anxiety and "obsessional tendencies". I've come to this sub as I don't want to keep burdening my friends with my worries.  I hope this is ok! Are we allowed to ask for advice when we make threads? Or is that what the chat room thing is for? I'm still very new to reddit, apologies. Thank you. :) [info] None [info] 1468013453
commevastu [info] Yeah, you're right it's a shame that it's not compelling. I don't understand why mental health issues (I am diagnosed with anxiety) are not considered as serious as ADHD etc. what about the lower t14, Cornell-Vanderbilt with medians of 167? [info] None [info] 1510238036
Petro0162 [info] Honestly, it's cases like that, that give cannabis a bad name. People who overinduldge to the point of constant dependency bring all of us down. I'm an army vet, never did anything serious but due to the nature of my work, I've been diagnosed with anxiety. Cannabis helps me wind down and take the edge off, but I don't huff it all day, everyday. I take care of my kids, I clean my house, go to work, and looking at me, you'd probably never guess that I would smoke. I'm not saying your opinion is wrong, but please don't condemn a very helpful substance based on the poor desicions of the few. Again, not throwing any shade, just presenting the information from a different perspective. [info] None [info] 1555232109
sleepyeyes_24_7 [info] That is one of the first questions I was asked when I was diagnosed with anxiety.  "If three people were walking down the street toward you, and they were laughing, would you think they were laughing at you?" [info] None [info] 1405540800
Dev_57 [info] yeah pretty safe to say it was no surprise when I was diagnosed with anxiety xD [info] 🎉 1,000,000 Attendee! 🎉 [info] 1559446624
TheFlood58 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and put on Seroquel. I felt like a zombie all the time. I was never worried about anything but I also wasn't happy, sad, angry, etc... just numb. Started smoking weed now it's not an issue. [info] None [info] 1504393380
rowrowyothrowaway [info] Yes. Go to the doctor. Or maybe even better, go to a therapist. You *do not* have to live this way. Medical professionals can help you understand what's going on in your body and give you coping methods. That doesn't mean they'll *cure* it, but they can absolutely help. I would recommend *not* talking to your parents about it until you know what to talk to them about. Lots of times, if you say "I feel worried all the time," people will tell you to just not worry. They don't mean to be hurtful, but it is! It will be better if you can go to them and tell them what you need to be well. Say, "I was diagnosed with anxiety. Here's what that means. Here's what makes me worried, if anything. Here's how you can help me."  [info] None [info] 1525275992
drowningGreenBean [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 8 and have been taking anxiety medication on and off since then. I got diagnosed with ADHD (primarily inattentive) in my first year at college. I am now in my 3rd year of college and I take medication for both anxiety and ADHD. I have asked this same question about myself and I don't think that there is a chicken or an egg for me. Rather, the anxiety and ADHD build off of each other. If I am anxious I have struggle concentrating. Conversely, if I can't focus my anxiety gets worse. Hope this helps! [info] None [info] 1488244970
hairpuller_ [info] I haven't been officially diagnosed with trich, but I've been diagnosed with anxiety/OCD, so I'm assuming that the trich is just an offshoot of that.I've never mentioned my trich to anyone besides family (who think it's long gone by now) just because I'm embarrassed by it. I'm on an SSRI which has helped a lot with anxiety, but not at all with the trich. Unfortunately, there's not a lot of treatment options for it. For me, it generally just comes down to willpower. [info] None [info] 1338713457
soverycute [info] I don't watch KL but based on what you mention I can compare the too a little. Regarding anxiety (I have been diagnosed with anxiety and am definitely not comparing how people experience it) I once read a post of KL explain why she couldn't upload and she mentioned anxiety as the main reason. I thought this post was very informative and down to earth. JH seems to mention her anxiety in irrelevant situations and exaggerates extremely sometimes. She also talks about essential oils and not taking dr prescriptions of medicine as if she is NOT an influencer. I find this worrysome. Regarding brand loyalty I think the world is annoyed with Morphe and BGS promoting it every second everywhere. JH shows everything from Morphe she unboxes and once in a while she shows 1 other product of this one other brand. From what I've heard or assumed (this may be not true) KL doesn't do this particular thing with Colourpop. Also I personally see JH flaunting her wealth constantly even though she keeps saying 'stuff is just stuff'. After one quick scroll through KL instagram I don't see the flaunting that JH does. This flaunting in combination with always shilling Morphe like crazy is bothering for some people. I can't say much about KL uploading schedule but JH uploads once every blue moon and it's the same thing every time. Together with the excuses; 'sim card' (sim card tho really Jaclyn?) lost because she ALWAYS puts it in her bra???This is just me comparing a bit. What Im stating about KL may be total wrong assumptions because again, I dont watch her. Please correct me if I'm wrong anyway regarding facts [info] None [info] 1483995942
apiaries [info] Exciting to see all of these new farms popping up! I haven’t been able to try a more “premium” CBD product and I would love to evaluate what a quality product does for me. I am diagnosed with anxiety due to some complex traumas and even low dose CBD helps with it, along with some chronic physical pain that I have from a wrist surgery and Lyme Disease hip injury (which I start PT for tomorrow!). It also helps settle things if my GERD kicks in. CBD allows me to stand for shifts at work, something that is agonizing if not impossible without, along with being able to enjoy my day. I’m not interested in opioids or pharmaceutical muscle relaxers, the former because of the side effects and ridiculous abuse potential and the latter because they don’t work for me. As far as anxiety goes, I would say that being able to control my disordered eating (binging) changed my entire life... I lost weight, am in less pain because I am now a healthy weight, feel more confident about my body, and am just living a healthier and better life. I’d love to try your product! I’m starting my senior year as a Mass Communication student in one week and I’m curious to see how my semester could be improved with less anxiety and more focus! [info] None [info] 1566233157
pequenamorena [info] Honestly I haven’t decided, I’m very indecisive which I guess means I’m not an 8 despite my matching up with almost everything else. I find it hard to just flat out describe myself so I found this questionnaire on a thread (There are two parts):• How old are you? What's your gender? Give us a general description of yourself.I am a 24 year old female from the U.S. • Is there a medical diagnosis that may impact your mental stability somehow?I have been diagnosed with anxiety but it’s under control/pretty much obsolete right now (probably due to a change in living situation)• Describe your upbringing. Did it have any kind of religious or structured influence? How did you respond to it?I was raised loosely in an Episcopal church, we fluctuated in attending church regularly and only for Christmas/Easter. In middle school my family began attending a Methodist church and I was active in youth group activities and mission trips which I loved but didn’t like going to church. If this had any influence on me it was probably just my fondness for helping people. It didn’t bother me to attend but my whole family grew out of it. (When I was 16 or 17 I got a cross tattoo on my foot/ankle, I don’t regret it but I’m not religious anymore plus I probably thought I was more religious than I actually was back then)• What do you do as a job or as a career (if you have one)? Do you like it? Why or why not?I’m 2 years post grad (public health major). In my first year post grad, I taught math in a middle school. Now I live in Spain and teach English. It’s okay for now because I like it but I go back and forth on it this is what I want for my life. I am constantly researching nursing school, medical school, MPH programs, psychology masters programs....I guess you could say I’m still figuring it all out. • If you had to spend an entire weekend by yourself, how would you feel? Would you feel lonely or refreshed?Probably very lonely. In my lowest times, I felt like I was going crazy if I was left alone. I get really bored and would probably need to go to the mall or a restaurant just to shake the feeling (speaking from experience). • What kinds of activities do you prefer? Do you like, and are you good at sports? Do you enjoy any other outdoor or indoor activities?I was good at sports, played rugby in college. I coached middle school basketball. I’ve developed a new fondness for working out, but I need structure. (I found that in a new fitness program I am doing). I also enjoy group fitness classes. • How curious are you? Do you have more ideas then you can execute? What are your curiosities about?I’m super curious and can be obsessively curious about things. Researching and spending a lot of time and energy on new things. I often spend more time researching than executing. • Would you enjoy taking on a leadership position? Do you think you would be good at it? What would your leadership style be?I would enjoy a leadership position; better yet I would prefer it. In my experiences as in a leadership position I have done well. I think my leadership style is strong and dedicated. I can be bossy and bad at delegating (if you want something done right do it yourself). • Are you coordinated? Why do you feel as if you are or are not? Do you enjoy working with your hands in some form? Describe your activity.I’m not sure if I’m coordinated. But sometimes I like working with my hands. I enjoyed building my own headboard, compost bin, working on remodeling or painting the house with my dad. I used to love ceramics/pottery. I’m terrible at art otherwise and I don’t really care for it. • Are you artistic? If yes, describe your art? If you are not particular artistic but can appreciate art please likewise describe what forums of art you enjoy. Please explain your answer.I am not artistic and would consider myself avert to art in general. I hate going to museums and think a lot of famous paintings are overrated. • What's your opinion about the past, present, and future? How do you deal with them?I often hold grudges from the past. I am also not very sentimental other than a small amount of random things so I don’t know if that’s telling about my thoughts on the past. I spend a lot of the present considering the future rather than actually doing things. Im not 100% content with the present.  [info] None [info] 1550686081
TheGapeKing [info] I thought about that.  But he told me on the phone when I called him back about doing that that he looked over the fence because "we heard your wifes voice so we knew someone was home"My wife said she heard them say "We know you're here".At that point she had no idea who they were.  That is not okay... freaked her out she called me hysterical because she didn't know what the hell was going on.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and this nearly sent me into a full blown panic attack and I couldnt drive until I calmed down because I dont want to risk an accident. [info] None [info] 1501616097
inthebookcorner [info] I'm not sure, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety (and panic attacks) and I'm a Scorpio.  [info] None [info] 1486587628
KitKatThePirate [info] "it's really nothing to worry about, it's just practice. It's not a tournament or anything. So just stop worrying!"My dad said this to me. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1549031707
V4ST4 [info] I've already invested in a lock for my chest. I will be sleeping with my phone and wallet in my bed next to me. I really want to do this without all that build up. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and take medication for it. I'm afraid that mentally I will not be able to handle this without my grades and mental health suffering.  [info] None [info] 1507772479
4dham [info] As I am sure you are aware, ADHD is often comborbid.I was diagnosed with anxiety alongside my ADHD and to be honest, it's gone away with medication. I think therefore that anxiety was probably just a coping mechanism I developed for dealing with the aspects of ADHD that I found most difficult - it's difficult to deal with racing thoughts all of the time, so mild anxiety helped me to anchor my thoughts on a single (but usually negative) thing that might happen because of my ADHD e.g. running late, might blurt out the wrong thing in a social situation, might find it hard to sit still etc.It sounds very similar to this?&amp;#x200B; [info] ADHD-C [info] 1541837633
calebinator42 [info] As a kid, I went to a really religious school. That shit fucked me up. They refused to teach me science (this was lower school so it didn't matter too much, I had my first science lesson age 9 at my middle school) and were very strict. Apparently I used to preach to my family about jesus when I got home.My life started to go downhill age 6. I was diagnosed with anxiety, I was getting bullied, I hated school, I started to realise I had a crush on a girl (I was female at the time) as well as thinking that I was a boy. I prayed so hard to god every single day, and he didn't do shit for me. As I grew up, around 10/11, I gave up on faith. I felt betrayed. My cat ran away, I became depressed because of my brain and bullying, I tried to kill myself, I felt so lost and alone. God was never there for me when I needed him to be, so I soon came to the conclusion that there was no God.Today, I still don't believe. I researched and came to the conclusion that there was no evidence of God, rather than just being an atheist out of spite. If I were to believe in God, it'd be via Judaism, as that's my family's religion (I was taught Christianity at school though). I respect everyone's beliefs, but religion is not for me and it makes me uncomfortable. When people are super religious and blindly make statements about God's power and grace, it makes me uncomfortable. Religion feels like a gross cult scam to me, and I personally think that people raised in religions, especially children, are brainwashed. But hey, that's just me. [info] None [info] 1566861791
kawaiiyummycum [info] You're home alone and you hear a sound, you feel that sinking feeling. You're afraid, you try to calm yourself down, because its all in your head. Right? but you grab onto the closest hard object and listen closer just incase. Your heart pounds and so does your head in unison. It's that feeling but it crawls up on you with no reason. Anxiety is being afraid of nothing, your brain creating chemicals it does not need, your heart beats fast and you feel sick, you sweat and you can't think properly. It's crippling, it's so hard to deal with day in day out. The worst part is few people understand so when you start crying or hyperventilating, people just leave you and point and say things. It's hard, it feels like they are all against you during that small moment. I was diagnosed with anxiety 4 years ago, the medication did not suit my brain chemistry. So I just deal with it. It's difficult, it won't change or go away because I'm sick. It's just who I am.  [info] None [info] 1521952436
YourMiserableLife [info] This reply might be a bit late for this post, but hey. I'm an ENFJ. I'm extremely social- served as public relations head for a youth organization; had a background in theatre; and briefly worked as a personal secretary to a business dude, who's life is literally "work hard, play hard." Two years ago I went into isolation, was always just in my apartment with my boyfriend. All I needed was inside those four corners- my boyfriend, my dogs, and my computer. I didn't need to go out- both work and school were now done online. Those two years have completely changed me- slowly I became uncomfortable outside. I started hating being in a crowd- the pandemonium of noise stresses me. I also began to feel left out when I was with my friends- the only thing in my head was a countdown till I'm home again. Things turned for the worse- I had an attack in a public place,and was rushed to the hospital. They checked me for everything but they didn't find anything, so I was advised to go to a psychologist. A panic attack they said. So yeah, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. Have been taking meds since the panic attacks are extreme and unprovoked. I lost a lot of friends because I didn't wanna meet up and bond. I kept the diagnosis a secret, because I was ashamed... how can an ENFJ, a social butterfly, ever end up in this state? I was ashamed to tell my friends and family of what I become, it's too far away from who I was just a couple of years ago. Just this year I am trying to embrace it. I want to accept that I'm a socially awkward ENFJ who has an anxiety disorder. I just want to accept me, and have friends who will accept the new me. The point of this long reply is that YOU SHOULD ACCEPT WHO YOU ARE. ENFJ'S can have anxiety, and most of the times is because we are afraid to disappoint others of who we become. We are anxious because we know we are uncomfortable, but we don't want that friend or stranger to feel awkward too.The social charm of an ENFJ will always stay there, so don't worry. However, if you really want to turn your social life around, you have to first accept who you are. Then take little steps outside your comfort zone. Don't aim for your past social life, that isn't you anymore, it will just stress you out. Pick one or two friends and tell them the truth about what you feel. Promise you, it will feel so much better getting this out. Then ask that friend to hang out with you every now and then. Pick a place where you will feel comfortable- a movie night at home, drinking some lattes in a quiet coffee shop. Then once you feel comfortable enough, increase the difficulty. Try going to somewhere new and a bit less comfy. Don't push yourself, you have limits and should embrace that, so take this slowly. Make a schedule for this little "trips" and stick to it! Aim to do this at least once a week.Finally, keep a journal! Write how you feel. This will totally help you, I promise. The format that I use is this:Date:Location:Degree of Anxiety: (Rate it: 1 is lowest, 10 is highest)What are you doing?Are you alone? If not, with whom?Thoughts before this situation:During situation:After situation: (usually I cheer myself up that Ive survived the situation)What would you suggest to yourself for improvement?Every time you are feeling uncomfortable again, just read this journal. Reminding yourself that you have accomplished similar social situations will make you feel more confident that you can and you will. :)Super sorry for this long reply but I hope I have helped you! Please tell me your progress if you can! :) I'm also just training myself to go out and be with other people, so I know your pain. Hehe, and I promise it gets better!  [info] None [info] 1498715233
SicarioNox [info] Uh, hello! I'm nineteen and I was diagnosed with anxiety more than two years ago. It's not very bad, but surely is causing some problems and discomfort. I think my main problems are constant overthinking and some sort of mild social anxiety, seeing as I tend to overthink most situations making them like a hundred times worse in my head and then putting myself into other people's boots in that situation and I'm kind of awkward with people (mostly constant fear of them judging me and such). I don't really take any kind of serious medication because I don't think I need it, seeing as my problems don't cause huge interference in my life. I basically only take vitamin B supplements that my psychologist suggested me to take when I feel it's starting to make me feel worse than usual. So that's it I guess. :D As for the question of the week, I'm recently been hooked up on Superhot and been replaying Mirror's Edge. :D [info] None [info] 1464522184
-thebritishempire- [info] Yes, I am diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1426532675
mauvemoth [info] You may want to consider talking to a therapist or psychiatrist. You sound a lot like me before I was diagnosed with anxiety. I remember feeling so guilty and upset that I couldn't fall asleep, sometimes hurting myself, and sometimes crying. Going to therapy and taking medication has helped me so much. I haven't had a bad night like that in a while. You really need to be taking care of your mental health at your age. [info] None [info] 1506217208
midget9 [info] Thanks for the reply1) Just had an MRI, waiting on results2) Each one varies slightly, but I'll walk you through the worst one I can remember.  I was driving when I felt it coming on, so I pulled off to a state park to go for a run and try to relax.  After running for about 10 or 20 minutes, I stop and am overlooking some water with my phone in my hand trying to take a picture.  Then I snapped my phone in half, threw it in the water, ran to my car, and drove till I was in the next state over.  My memory of it is spotty, but I do remember coming out of it about 4 hours away from home, and I turn around and a second wave hit me as I was driving back.  The only thoughts I had were "I want this to stop" and I ended up driving to my mother's house in hopes of her being able to talk me down, but as always no luck, so I drove to a hospital, checked myself in, and they put me in a room where I sat on the ground shaking for about 2 hours until the doctor comes in and diagnoses me with anxiety, injects me with something they say is stronger than xanax(I do now know what it is), and send me on my way. I guess the closest thing I could relate one of these at the peak of its severity is the incredible Hulk, as frustration/anger can bring it on, and I can't really stop it when it's going and sometimes I am filled with pure rage.  I remember having many thoughts and strong pulls to drive my car into oncoming, to stab myself, and pretty much any other opportunity I saw to end my life, which is not characteristic of me at all outside of these episodes.  I do have enough sense in these to resist these urges, however, as I am smart enough to realize that it will pass.  I apologize for the disorganized story, I'm not the best at formatting.3) I have not. The one I am in now has been spent in bed.4) I have been diagnosed with anxiety, mayo clinic diagnosed me with constipation, one therapist considered a weird form of schitzophrenia, other doctors have attempted to diagnose me with ADD, ADHD, Bipolar Disorder,  and currently epilepsy.  5) I usually smoked whatever strain I could get my hands on, but the best I remember was called Blue Dream. Others included Black Widow, Pineapple, and Purple Diesel.  Again, thank you for taking the time to read/reply to my post. [info] None [info] 1417557247
IThinkThingsThrough [info] Ugh, this is always my dilemma. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I know that catastrophic thinking is a symptom of it. That makes it really hard to distinguish between "Anxiety-driven hypochondria" and "important alarm bell I'm ignoring."  [info] None [info] 1552179705
janet_snakehole01 [info] Thank you! I have been diagnosed with anxiety and acid reflux issues, and am being treated for those. But it just doesn’t seem to help. I think I need a meal plan and to make myself stick to it. Best of luck to you!  [info] None [info] 1547487428
Osixotin1 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety at 5 so it’s definitely not new to me. I’m thinking it is time for a med check. I am on meds but I’m on the lowest dosage so it may be time to up them a little. I’ve been given breathing exercises but I have had a hard time realizing I need to do them when in a situation like that. I was trying to breathe while in the store today and I had my “worry rock” (a slick rock that I use as a sensory toy) but it didn’t seem to make things much better. Hopefully I can just get better at them. Thanks for the advice! It is greatly appreciated [info] None [info] 1545604030
HappyLlamaSadLlamaa [info] I’m not OP, but I do this with my eyebrows only. My mom has a habit of running her hands through her hair obsessively. I am diagnosed with anxiety and I know she would be too if she saw a doctor for it. I’m guessing that’s why the family does it, they all use this as a nervous habit.  [info] None [info] 1553977846
Shadehz [info] Hi Andrea. I'm Nicole. I don't know if you remember me, but I opened for you at Ivywild in Colorado Springs.I just want to say that earlier this year, I was diagnosed with anxiety. It was around that time that I heard your poem Panic Button Collector for the first time. I'd always looked up to you as an artist and poet, and it meant so much to know that if you could break through that fear again and again, maybe I could too. I want to say I really appreciate everything you do, the way that you enrich the world with your words and make it a better place every time you perform. That's what poetry is for, and you embody that purpose so completely. Here are my questions. 1. What got you started with writing poetry? 2. And more importantly, what along the way encouraged you to keep moving forward? 3. What do you think is harder - getting the words out there, or editing them?  [info] None [info] 1407705449
allygory [info] * I have two, I was diagnosed with both anxiety and laryngitis for several years before getting a proper diagnosis of hypothyroidism because the doctor(s) I saw thought i was just angling for weight loss drugs* I was diagnosed with anxiety and IBS for, no exaggeration, 35 years before getting diagnosed correctly with Celiac  [info] None [info] 1383583887
missisabelle_ [info] Thanks so much! So I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 12 and since then I’ve been on and off medication and seen multiple psychologists. If I think back to it, it’s definitely always been a people issue for me. I’ve searched this morning for local companies that don’t have such a busy influx of patients so fingers crossed. Thank you again. [info] None [info] 1557192423
ILoveNarwhals [info] ;___; You're my other half! I've been diagnosed with anxiety, been on Prozac for yeaaars and this exact same thing happens to me. Especially talking to people who have authority over me. Man, I don't know what to tell you besides you're not alone because if I knew the answer I wouldn't be in the same boat.  [info] None [info] 1272942843
CornOnTheKobGuy [info] Dude you aren't alone in that looping. The second time I smoked I hit it hard, didn't realize I had anxiety and then I lost touch with reality only to come back to it which was, in a sense, even more terrifying because I knew that it was actually happening. Since then I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Turns out my mom suffers from it too. I don't really smoke any more.  [info] None [info] 1371277396
buggaz [info] Right. I kind of fathomed that.I did have my condition worsen during several months so I can relate to 'not getting how conditions are changing' making it so much the worse the longer it takes. I do not envy people with such problems. I can only imagine.I was diagnosed with anxiety and resulting mild case of psychosis. The rapid cycling/mixed state (you say?) was during the most intensive part after few months of buildup through paranoia and then the hallucinations broke loose. The cycling part lasted only a few days (3) although the hallucinations continued still after six months but with decreasing intervals (or are they? :).So, as much as my experience provided insight, it's definitely only a guess of a metaphor at best to what it must be like to be a Bi-polar.I wonder if in some time in the future there will be a ranking system like in the military for various mental illnesses? "You've been through paranoia and have an excellent record of a 5 year duty in Bi-polar. Here's your silver medal and a purple heart, Major!" [info] None [info] 1262624879
missjulia928 [info] It wasn't really a tantrum. I'd just cry uncontrollably and try to run away from the situation. When you are 6 and have an anxiety attack, you have zero idea how to cope with it. It's scary enough for an adult most of the time. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 10 and finally started to learn coping methods through therapy.  [info] None [info] 1426478174
LAthrowaway519940 [info] Not yet, but if I don’t get any traction I’ll go for one next year. Or maybe a non US school. Not really anything I’d talk about in an interview, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and didn’t get my correct med dosage till last year so my abysmal freshman year GPA carried over :(Thanks so much! It’s my one shot lol [info] None [info] 1539536070
reooke12 [info] I've always had anxiety to some degree, but I didn't realise just how bad it was until my doctor sent me to a therapist due to the fact I had a mental breakdown because I had a slight wheeze. I was diagnosed with anxiety pretty soon after that.  [info] None [info] 1505660969
mynameisblisters [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was six, started having panic attacks when I was twelve, and barely survived postpartum anxiety/panic disorder at twenty-four. I've tried it all and I feel different techniques have helped me at different times. It's important to have as many options in your arsenal to fight your anxiety with as you can gather. Breathing exorcises, grounding exorcises, meditation, visualization, distraction, physical exorcise, whatever helps is golden and mixing it up is powerful. Don't be ashamed to take medication either. Celexa literally saved my life. There's nothing wrong with needing a little extra help. Having someone close to you in your personal life who you can talk to also makes a world of difference. Even if they don't know what it's like to live with anxiety, just having someone with a patient ear who wants to try and understand is so incredibly comforting. It's also crucial to learn to talk yourself down. It's hard to convince yourself that there's nothing to be afraid of when your brain and body are shooting off everything they've got to tell you something is wrong, but you have to at least try. It's an endless battle and there will never be a cure. That's something you just have to accept. It is possible to learn to cope, though, and sometimes that has to be your main goal in life. Just remember those times will pass and you will live. You'll rejoice in having survived. [info] None [info] 1440729622
dpefi [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and went through continuous treatment for two years, for that, before I finally found a therapist who asked about/saw my trauma. Being in therapy for anxiety was mildly helpful and gave me some helpful coping mechanisms, but it always felt like dealing with the surface-level of my problems. [info] None [info] 1543424507
Rahila_indigo [info] Seriously just found the word "misophonia" on the internet a few days ago.  Always been googling noise anxiety instead....so yeah.I have been seeing a counselor for about a year now and I was diagnosed with anxiety and went on medications and crap (which kinda work, but made me feel like the walking dead). My noise triggers are;-sniffing (the absolute worst)-coughing-throat clearing-pants dragging on the ground-muffled sounds in my apartment from my neighbors-heavy breathing-high pitch girly talk-chewing/smackingCan't remember when it started, but it makes going to my college classes a living hell. I leave in the middle of class if people are making too many noises. Left during movies, dinner at restaurants, etc. Anytime I hear these noises I get crazy heart palpitations and think about wanting to hurt that person so bad.Today, I was sitting in a class of about 25 students and one or two sniffed/coughed every five seconds and I nearly burst out into tears three times. IMMEDIATELY went to the university's counseling center to get an appointment. And of course, they are booked for three weeks so today I have had two emotional breakdowns from a few noises. Sure yall can relate!!!!!!Trying to figure out what to do now...   :/ [info] None [info] 1329802710
goldenruppers [info] This is going to be a long story as i am still undergoing this in my family and I am unsure whether to count this as having abusive or toxic parents so any advice is greatly appreciated. To give some background, i am a jc student in a pretty "elite" sch in sg. My parents (mainly my mum) is obssessed about my studies and i have been studying under her very strict supervision for the past 17 years of my life. She feels that i am unable to study by myself as she doesnt trust me, constantly belittles and degrades me by hurling vulgarities, or simply rant at me for not being able to catch up with the fast pace of teaching simply because i am stupid. As i have been hearing this kind of insulting comments ever since young, it has definitely taken a hit on my mental health as i am diagnosed with anxiety when i was in sec 2 (the year was the worst for me) and i feel that i can be quite socially awkward and i really beat myself up over it as i really want to make more friends and have a wider social circle, but really cant seem to due to the "serious"vibes i give off.To give an extent of how much she interferes with my life and studies, as i am in a sports cca she is extremely paranoid about me reaching home beyond 7.30pm, as afterwards if i am not back home (which often happens) she would start spamming my phone to shout at me to get back. There was once when i was not keeping track of time and only answered her al at 8.15pm, whereby she really went berserk on the phone; and sounded as though she was going to break down and threatening to call my cca teacher to withdraw me from my cca all the time or remind me how many tests i have upcoming and scolding me on how i have the audacity to stay in sch until this late. The worst part is that she just keeps telling me to quit school nowadays to save her from the stress of teaching and coaching me. Honestly i can tell that her strict supervision has affected both of our mental health but i really cant do anything about it as she really refuses to let me study alone. As a result of all these trauma, i have become extremely insecure and unhappy over the years as i seldom go outside to even have a break nowadays as well. Over the weekends i would just be cramped up at home while i see all my other schoolmates enjoying good food and having fun just makes me want to cry sometimes as my mum feels that there is already barely enough time to study. I am getting really tired of my life of eating the same food, ( i apologise if i sound spoiled here but every weekend i am just kinda forced to eat the same food bought frm the nearby coffee shop which is really sickening but i cant do anything abt it).I honestly dont know how i am going to be able to put up with all these until a levels. I already have a fear of exams due to all the pressure of not wanting to waste the efforts i have put into studying that has caused me to blank out several times, and my mediocre grades dont really help either. I scored 1B, 1C, 2E, and 1D for the recent block tests and my percentile is around 40-60. I want to improve but i am just kind of in a slump (just the same situation i have been in for the past 7 years of my life). Thank you for reading thus farr, i really needed some listening ear to this . [info] None [info] 1566401449
hdaigre47 [info] Thanks for the suggestion, but I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was 6 and have seen a psychiatrist and therapists ever since. Received a few other diagnoses along the way as well. It’s been fun. [info] LSU Tigers / Team Chaos [info] 1515607218
sookisucks [info] Yea I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I saw a therapist for about 9 months and sometimes feel I should find a new one in this state. I just simply decided to own it. Some shit really messes with me. I was once driving about 4.5 hours with just one of my gfs friends. I knew her but wasn’t all that close. Night driving in the highway really fucks with me so I just told her up front what was going on. I’m not shy about saying that issue because it really helps and most people will understand. [info] None [info] 1522019256
lostineverythin [info] I literally came on here just now to make a similar post, you are not alone.I've never written the MCAT yet, but thought I could self study and work full time this summer and be ready for August 20th. Boy was I wrong. I felt burnt out and tired by July. I also have immense pressure from my parents, so I can relate to the circumstances. It sucks, but I think I have accepted that I probably won't be able to apply this year. It also didn't help that I was diagnosed with anxiety halfway through the summer and my doctor and I are still trying to figure out my doses. I sometimes just want to lay in bed all day and do nothing, I don't want to go out, or see people or have responsibilities. It all fucking sucks.But this is not the end for you or me. Many people apply in their 30's even. We will have long (hopefully) and healthy lives, and if we really want it, we will get there at some point. Focus on you and do what you need to do. And don't put too much pressure on yourself, it's not healthy, we are not perfect.Just want to tell you that you aren't alone and that everything will work out in the end.edit: I will probably have to take a gap year too, because I am going into fourth year. [info] None [info] 1471141571
Uneeda_Biscuit [info] What an idiot. "I was diagnosed with anxiety, and prescribed medical Marijuana. I didn't want the diagnosis to hurt my career." [info] None [info] 1508049970
Che789 [info] This is really insightful, I think many people can relate. I've been diagnosed with anxiety since i was a kid, but I've never really understood how it manifests itself in my life. This might explain my issues with school too, with the fear of accountability for my failure. Thank you for commenting [info] 5'8'' | CW: 110 | GW: 105 | -6 | F [info] 1508314068
BloodcityWa [info] I like the maybe comment so basically you have no idea?  I was diagnosed with anxiety and then checked to find out my brain wasen’t making any serotonin I am an introvert and at many stages before social events I would feel physically sick and  tired beforeI even got to those events uncomfortable quiet and irritable when at the events because I did not wish to be there and the moment I got home instantly relived and happy again , there’s more going on then just being an introvert here which is why I believe they should go see there gp and discuss what they are feeling and how it’s affecting them may very well have other issues then just being an introvert  [info] ♂ [info] 1547429675
Offthepoint [info] Have they ruled out hyperthyroid on you? I was diagnosed with anxiety and it was treated as such, but found out years later that it was thyroid trouble all along. You really need to have that eliminated as a possibility. Get a full panel done, not just TSH. [info] None [info] 1439304279
FloBee82 [info] I certainly do! I started suffering from them in my mid-20's. I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder and since then I've been able to control it through behavior and meds. I can appreciate the show and T's perspective completely. Panic attacks are awful. I have never passed out but have been on the verge. I literally feel like I'm dying and they would come out of nowhere-just boom! [info] None [info] 1571941717
girlwiththebeetattoo [info] I'm not sure how this would hurt your app? Schools won't have access to your medical records. I was diagnosed with anxiety and it was a non-issue because I didn't have to disclose it anywhere. If its really something you're struggling with, you should seek out a diagnosis and help, because its better to treat things like this early than to wait for it to get worse.  [info] MS1 [info] 1536799756
chelbren [info] Yes, yes, yes. I always thought I was just a massive bitch, but then I was diagnosed with anxiety and it made so much sense. It's honestly the most frustrating part of anxiety for me. I wish I could just brush small stuff off, but it's not that easy. [info] None [info] 1519134527
brokenjasper [info] I'm used to staying up to 5 or 6 am. Also I happen to feel tired but I have an appointment at 10:30am and it is stressing me out how the time I have left to sleep is ticking away and is getting less and less. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders. Already tried laying in bed. About to try again, but I'll probably not be able to sleep. It is common for me to either get no sleep or very little sleep when I have to be up in the morning. I'd probably sleep with no trouble if the appointment was somehow cancled. [info] None [info] 1566548544
brearose [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety 14 years ago and with ADHD last week. I was put on citalopram last friday. I've had no problems so far, but it also hasn't helped yet (it takes a couple weeks to start working). My doctor said that ADHD medications can actually make anxiety worse, so it's common to take meds for ADHD and anxiety. I'm not on ADHD medication yet, because my doctor wants me to wait until the citalopram starts working first, but I will be taking citalopram and an ADHD med, so it is safe. [info] None [info] 1521078835
megatron412 [info] I was just diagnosed with anxiety and I went to cardiologist for the same thing... everything keeps coming back fine. It’s great that we don’t have a physical problem, now it’s how the fuck do we get out of our own heads? [info] None [info] 1565370420
onawall [info] I do encourage him to stand up for himself, and he does tell them to stop, but they dont. And before Jake had said that to me, I thought of him very highly. We had gone to a fair and he had been teasing us because we were fresh in the relationship and were anxious. When we were going home, in the car, Jake had said something about us holding hands. And so we did. After that we stopped being anxious and that led to the next level of our relationship. I thought he was really cool until he said that about me. And I'm not insecure, I'm diagnosed with anxiety and when I hear people are saying things about me it triggers my anxiety. I just want to be on the down low. [info] None [info] 1555358973
lanasy [info] Funny, I mentioned I was diagnosed with anxiety to a nurse during her basic questioning and she said "Oh you just need to work our more". Uh... yeah right, let me remove my abdomen so I can move again, k thx. [info] None [info] 1562950716
Txeas [info] Well,  I was diagnosed with anxiety recently so since then I have been stressed with the subsequent health issues I've experienced.  (I'm not entirely convinced it actually is anxiety). Thanks for that info. . Very interesting that stress could be the cause.   [info] None [info] 1452651977
WardenessoftheNorth2 [info] This lady who claimed to be a psychic &amp; I believe she truly was. She has since passed away but she just knew everything about me. It was scary even though she was really friendly. She told me my life would change when I turned 24. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder that year, my guy proposed to me &amp; I got my first short story published.  [info] None [info] 1521911233
EKaffine [info] Try to keep this long post short.  Do you guys just get nauseous? Or do you also get that tight feeling in the back of your throat that you get right before you throw up?  I get the throat thing, been happening since I was 12, I'm 20 now.  It happens every single time that I eat, but its worse when eating in public, especially sit down restaurants.  I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD.  I went without eating for about a month when I was 12 when it started because I had no clue how to handle it.  The anxiety makes me afraid of getting sick in front of people, the OCD makes it happen every time I eat.  The more stressed I am, the more severe it is, and when I'm in anxious situations (such as my boyfriend coming back from Afghanistan) I just can't eat.   [info] None [info] 1324851566
letthewolvesrun [info] Fuck. I was diagnosed with anxiety last year, and am in university now. I was always an overachiever in high school, so transitioning was difficult. I'm doing well now, but it's still a struggle when you go to a competitive university.  [info] None [info] 1452865585
annieyayarawr [info] I have dealt with this for ages. Ever since I was 8. The thought of me existing has freaked me out. The thought of me eventually coming to pass and being unable to think gives me the worst anxiety. I have been diagnosed with anxiety for about 4 years now but nothing has been done about this, or about my phobia.  [info] None [info] 1481384561
foxmom2 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety for years and only this year did I get a diagnosis of PVCs.  Not anything worrisome, unless you're in the midst of an episode in which case you become convinced this is the end. ;) [info] None [info] 1544399989
brittaleonard [info] Yes! I had what I thought was acid reflux for almost three years which caused me serious nausea and frequent vomiting. I tried avoiding foods &amp; drinks that caused it, exercising and weight loss.. anything I could do but nothing worked. I was prescribed every acid reflux pill up the chain and it wasn’t until I was on the top shelf $350 a month prescription called Dexilant that my GI doctor suggested I seek therapy, stating that if I truly had acid reflux Dexilant would work. In therapy I was diagnosed with anxiety and prescribed Sertraline (Zoloft) by my primary care doctor. This about immediately stopped my acid reflux/nausea and constant vomiting so it turns out it was anxiety after all. I don’t have alexithymia but I don’t know the two are related. I remained on Sertraline for about six months and I’ve recently gone off of it and my acid reflux symptoms have definitely reappeared to a much smaller degree but now knowing it is anxiety I am able to stop it from getting to the point in which I throw up. I hope that helps! [info] None [info] 1561404536
TanLovesMakup [info] Haha I'm 25 I watched her for years then eventually stopped but kept up with the 'drama' every time I see her come up on recommendations I cringe! Everything she does is just WRONG! I think she's actually a really bad influence on younger girls she's so bad with body image and so desperate for subscribers and views. The mental health stuff she goes on about.. girl doesn't know what anxiety is! I am diagnosed with anxiety and social anxiety and panic attack disorder and it would be my worst nightmare getting on a flight myself or moving country or even speaking at an event she's so unappreciative of everything and I understand why she's lost so much subscribers and friends in the Beauty community. I dunno she's just that one 'Guru' who really irritates me. Yeah I think Talia is so talented with makeup and her music but that tutorial really annoyed me. Apparently if you can only afford primark makeup your not good enough? It annoyed me when she said 'oh my god, I actually have to answer the door looking like this' there was nothing wrong with her makeup I feel she could have went about the entire video in a better manner.  [info] None [info] 1505427033
djmor [info] Great post, thank you very much for your explanation.What about "fun" things? When you're doing something you find enjoyable, are you able to focus? When I went to college in Biotech, I absolutely loved it. I loved being in the lab, I always memorized every step of everything I needed to do. However, when it came time to writing down lab reports, english papers, math, it would take hours to get a few pages done, even if I did nothing but sit in front of the work. I'd start thinking and writing, and then my imagination would just slip in and start singing music, or slideshows of what I did in the lab, or play situations over and over in my mind and before I realize it ten minutes passed by and I'm only a sentence further. I've been diagnosed with anxiety issues, and I hear that those are often symptoms. Unfortunately, my anxiety meds that would quiet the voices would also cause me to become incredibly lethargic, enough that my creativity was stifled and I was unable to write anything other than short robotic sentences.I find it quite insulting that people would claim you had "an easy button" for work. But that's the nature of humans, they don't normally understand something without living it themselves. Mental disorders are horrible and complex things, and being "lucky" enough to have to take ritalin, or in my case valium, is a common thought for people who have no qualms abusing prescription drugs. In a way, it's also unfortunate that the drugs are so good at what they do that those that don't need it feel they want it. [info] None [info] 1402318091
summer1171 [info] I have gp. Have you ever had an endoscopy? Honestly anxiety shows it’s self in many ways. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 7. My main symptoms were nausea and vomiting. But because it came with lots of crying it was thrown off as anxiety. Not until age 22 was I given an endoscopy and then a gastric emptying scan ultimately diagnosing me with gp. So I in no way want to tell you it could just be anxiety. But what I will say is that there are many other gi illnesses than gp. It seems to be the new thing everyone comes up with! Your symptoms definitely mimick some symptoms but it could be a number of things. Research the gp diet and follow that while you wait for an appt with a gi doctor. I’m keeping my fingers crossed for you that it’s not gp. Just know if it is there’s a separate group on here as well as Facebook devoted to gp :)  [info] None [info] 1539316816
BrownAndyeh [info] For me, I am glad I figured out my triggers.  I did not mention that I have been diagnosed with anxiety, which presents when I am angry or unreasonable during arguments.  Turns out this is how I dealt with insecurities related to health issues I had growing up..my mind was blown when I learned this.  You are trying to get this figured out, that is the first step.  Hold yourself accountable and let people in your circle know you are trying..be vulnerable.   Those closest to you will understand and support you. [info] None [info] 1566603065
Hotde [info] I recognise some aspergers in there. When you have true anxiety it's racing thoughts in your head that lead to some kind of panic attack. You describe the anxious feelings as more of a meltdown approach. Eye contact, pre-meltdown symptoms at crowds, no empathy, all sounds familiar!See, I had this whole like year of my life where I was convinced I was having anxiety and panic attacks and the mental health professionals agreed with me and diagnosed me that way while somehow ignoring all the aspergers I was describing... until I was seeking an ADHD diagnosis and the psychiatrist noticed aspergers. They can seem so similar. My "panic attacks" were actually meltdowns.No one here can diagnose you, only a doctor/psych/specialist who considers you their patient can make this kind of diagnosis. If you feel that your mental health problems are causing an impact on your life, it's time to see a doctor. If you do, make sure to describe your experiences exactly as YOU experience them, not as how you read them to be online. I think this may be why I was diagnosed with anxiety for so long, I made that mistake.I get sarcasm just fine too. I do remember having it explained to me and it took a while for me to get but then it became part of my normal vocabulary and I ended up using it a lot through my whole life so it's second nature. It's a spectrum disorder so you get a mixed bag of symptoms. Some not all! [info] None [info] 1485563434
Fiva1609 [info] This might be long so please ignore any grammatical Errors thx. When I was 9 one day before my then the birthday I got Bell’s palsy. So half of my face became useless it couldn’t move and my eye could not blink half of my mouth would not open and I could not taste of one half of my mouth. One more story when I was twelve in one week my dad got in an accident I could not walk for weeks and needed life altering surgery my grandma got cancer again and my mom found out my brother collage money was gambled away like wtf I also had like 20 panic attacks that week ( I have been diagnosed with anxiety since I was like 3 due to the many surgery’s I’ve had and stuff like that I still think that I have my problems like I have sociopathic tendencies ( I used to make up problems to make my mom and dad to make problems like my dad yelled at me and tell my mom even if he did not so my mom would be mad.  But that was when no was younger today my grandma is healthy my brother is better and I love my mom and dad guess how old I am. Am 13 🤫 [info] None [info] 1562726370
DisneyBelle87 [info] Are there services where he can take exams alone? I was diagnosed with anxiety and I'm allowed testing in a separate room and time and a half. I had a doc diagnosis though so I'm not sure how your school would go around that. But by federal law he's entitled to accommodations if they can be shown by a doctor. Good luck!   [info] None [info] 1468206223
needinganescape [info] Literally had yellow bowel movements for 2 weeks losing my mind finally back to normal. Kept re reading the same online articles and forcing myself to believe the worst. I was diagnosed with anxiety at the beginning of this year. Woke up having a panic attack and now it's on my mind 24/7 [info] None [info] 1560139235
Mr_Belch [info] I used to get this a few years ago before I was diagnosed with anxiety. Never put two and two together now that it was probably caused by the anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1541344064
rootgrog [info] Hey, about a year ago I had the EXACT symptoms you are describing. I had no history of anxiety at the time so had no idea what was going on. I went to all kinds of doctors before I was diagnosed with anxiety. It was extremely scary as I didn't know what was wrong. This fed into my worries and made the dizziness and tingly hands worse. Once I realized that the symptoms were simply anxiety, I was able to control them. It took quite a while for it to stop though (probably six months on low levels of medication). What helped me most though was the peace of mind from knowing that there was nothing physically wrong with me. A year later and it doesn't happen at all anymore. Get your doctors to confirm, but if you're struggling with the same thing that I was, it's certainly a treatable problem. Feel better soon. :) [info] None [info] 1377381263
grittex [info] You can condition yourself out of that too. I was diagnosed with anxiety a while ago and decided, essentially, this is bullshit, I can see patterns of things that cause me to have these reactions and I can also see that the worst thing about every such situation is my reaction, not anything external (unlike your shock example). I embarked on a concerted course of doing things that I found terrifying and that evoked such a reaction, concentrated on minimising the reaction (because I *knew* that the situations themselves weren't so bad), and eventually retrained my brain not to freak out nearly as much. Having realised this I'm now working on other irrational fears like spiders. (And guess what? It takes time, but it's possible!)It's helped everything. I don't find much terrifying now, and even if I do, I cangenerally power through it. I don't think there's much it isn't possible to work through with enough willpower when it comes to anxiety. It's awkward talking to people who say they have anxiety problems because while I'm sympathetic to the feeling, I'm not very sympathetic to the lack of desire to work through it.  [info] None [info] 1460584118
EepressoDepresso [info] Panic attacks and anxiety attacks are two different things, I have both.Panic: chest tightness, hyperventilating, dizziness from hyperventilating, feeling likes you're dying, lasts from a minute to an hour or soAnxiety: stressed, easily annoyed, nitpicking, etc I was diagnosed with anxiety and Panic disorder about a year ago [info] None [info] 1571350359
Inpalethis21 [info] Speaking from personal experience, I knew I liked the feeling of being high but I never knew why it made me feel the way I did. A couple of months later I was diagnosed with anxiety and the doctor explained that it is normal for people with anxiety to experience a feeling of impending doom, which is exactly what I felt when I haven't smoked in about 3 days.For people who don't know they have a disorder which can be treated with marijuana, it is easy to say they are addicted but don't have the knowledge as to why it is addicting.People like to call it addiction, I like to call it medicine because it relaxes my nerves from jumping around and calms my heart race down.  [info] None [info] 1447252565
cahleeeen [info] I want to know what it's like to live without worry of falling into hole or flying into the sky. I would kill to know what it's like to not have anxiety over everything. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorders since I was 14. Ten years has been enough, then BP came into the mix two years ago and finally diagnosed in April. I want to live a quiet mind life where you can focus and not worry and completely free yourself from the grasp of chemicals in your brain without taking nine pills a day [info] None [info] 1437139698
Raiz3r74 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past and take a beta blocker for that and a mitral valve prolapse that I have. I don't smoke or drink. But I'm over weight. Eat like shit and dont exercise. And I'm 44 yrs old. Sigh... 6ft 245lbs. Like to get down to 180.  [info] None [info] 1548381063
Fauxdite [info] Knitting. I'm not even a little bit kidding. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago, probably related to the fact that I was laid up with a chronic illness at the time and feeling penned in. I took up knitting, which is a way for me to redirect my nervous energy. It calms me down so much. I carry a small project in my purse and if I'm starting to feel it escalating, I can knit just about anywhere. On the bus, in a waiting room, in a restaurant while sipping a coffee, it's great. I did some cognitive behavioural therapy as well, which has taught me to recognize my anxiety and head it off at the pass before it escalates to the point where I have a panic attack.  [info] None [info] 1446471870
Kehndy12 [info] I've rolled only a few times and I've had edibles only a few times, mostly at music festivals. So I'm not an extremely experienced user, but I've read this subreddit a ton and I've done quite a bit of reading about MDMA.With that said, I don't think that you should think rolling will be like smoking weed. I'm diagnosed with anxiety, and edibles make me REALLY anxious and make my mind race. It seems I have to combine edibles with alcohol to get rid of the anxiety. (Note: Do not mix heavy drinking with MDMA or you risk blacking out.)Rolling, however, is completely different for me. Rolling puts users in a positive mindset. It makes people euphoric and happy. Rolling has inbuilt happiness that I do not find in edibles. There is not much anxiety except for the come up, and if you take a small dose, the come up will be minor.I mentioned to my friends how I thought it was bizarre that edibles give me anxiety but MDMA does not. They anecdotally told me that edibles are harder to handle.Some people will shit on the idea and say it's not worth it, but there can be value in taking a small dose. For example, [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/MDMA/comments/8dv04x/prepping_for_my_wifes_first_roll_tonight_wish_us/dxs3bgc/) a user told us about how his wife took only 75 mg of MDMA and "enjoyed every minute of it." (Note that she weighs 60 kg = 132 lb.)If you try it out, make sure to test your stuff with a reagent. If you don't have a reagent, order it soon to make sure you have it before edc. If you're not ready to try MDMA, or if you never will be ready, that's cool too. Only do it if you really want to. [info] None [info] 1524701629
queensnow725 [info] I think I avoided a lot of socializing in my mid childhood through teens. I have anxiety, especially in regards to social situations, and once I was diagnosed with anxiety I looked back on a lot of stuff with a new lens. I still struggle with social situations, but at least I have a great group of friends who understand and are really patient with me. [info] None [info] 1541001548
whoopsimdreaming [info] I was born into a Christian family, but I considered myself an athiest anyways until I was diagnosed with anxiety. I tried many different coping mechanism and praying + turning to spirituality was THE most effective of any I tried. Few monthes later, my therapist told me my anxiety disorder went from severe to very mild!  [info] None [info] 1551662485
train_ship_explorer [info] Honestly, I kinda feel like I am myself for the first time. I just sometimes miss the crazy adventures my mania took me on. I was diagnosed with anxiety long before I started taking lamictal. My mania just let me sorta ignore till it got so bad I couldn't breathe. [info] Bipolar 1 [info] 1568341145
hellonew [info] Yea, if I'm diagnosed with anxiety they can simply link that with the sweating. I don't have anxiety though... [info] None [info] 1303581416
ivapeNyQuil [info] Interesting, I was diagnosed with anxiety and didn’t fall into the “poster child” levels of ADHD but was close. Called it anxiety and told me to read a book and see somebody. It’s been about a year now and I feel like it’s time to revisit that diag:/ thank you for sharing :) [info] None [info] 1528402915
cookiesk [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and my therapist thought me how to meditate. It has changed my life. Now, I very rarely get anxiety attacks. So, yes I would say that it can help you. :) [info] None [info] 1374939095
petsk [info] Hi I didn't realize I had a LD until I got into medical school.I had a formal $2000.00 assessment done  by a  neuropsychologist after a miserable first semester. It turned out I have a very high IQ but poor working memory and processing speed.  I tried studying faster and smarter but was never quite prepared during exam time. Along with that I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder (go figure!)Like you I was always the last to finish tests. couldn't keep up with all the memorizing in such a short space of time. In undergrad I always took 2 to 3 classes per semester. I always took I hard class with 2 light classes. For example I'm my situation, I would take Organic Chemistry, with say freshman comp. and a biology Lab.My school really didn't care in which order you took your classes.This is what help me in undergrad:Study/homework  groups Flash cardsI recorded my voice reading aloud my notes and listened to it when I rode the bus/ train to schoolMake use of your school counselor Transcribe important dates on your syllabus into your  daily plannerStudy in 25 minute blocks without distractions.Make sure you get @ least 5-6 hrs of sleepDo take vitamin supplement B complex, phenylalanine, COQ10. SAMAE (expensive) . Take a look in your local SPROUT store there is a whole shelve of supplements.ExcerciseReduce soda intake (fructose corn syrup)It been a year since I was dismissed from med school. All of this is all new to me. However I wish I knew this about myself before getting in. I am currently in the process of readjusting my life. I can't tell you quite yet that I'm an overcomer. Until such time toodles! [info] None [info] 1483051081
throwaway782323 [info] Yes! Before I was diagnosed with anxiety I thought panic attacks were not real. Apparently, I've had anxiety and panic my whole life and it seemed normal to me. In my 30's I used to have so much anxiety, I would get up at 2 am and walk outside for miles for 1-2 hours by myself. I was totally oblivious because mental health wasn't talked much back then.Every morning I wake up with a racing heart, sense of dread, fear, and panic about having to get through another day feeling like this. It has not been a good life, but I'm trying my best. I also put on a front so no one knows my pain except my SO. I've recently started telling me family. I wish there wasn't still stigma about it. [info] None [info] 1538509958
-partlycloudy- [info] And if you absolutely have to check if that weird feeling in a particular body part is really just caused by anxiety, include the literal word “anxiety” in your search. Eg “lump in throat anxiety”. 99.99% of the time, that weird symptom will be down to anxiety. This helped me during my google rampages when I was just diagnosed with anxiety and having wild panic attacks! [info] None [info] 1546777401
SafManWan310 [info] 18 year old South Indian dude here. I badly want someone who's not clingy, but will always be there for me. I'd also like to share my everything with them while knowing everything about them. I said this because I have super strict Indian parents, though they're not physically abusive, they don't know anything about me, not even my hobbies.While they won't give a shit to my concerns, they're super clingy and won't even let me talk to girls. I know, and I am totally aware that none of these problems are as difficult as the ones suffered by many people my age but having no one to share yourself just sucks. I had one good friend but ever since I moved to college, I couldn't find a good friend, that's because everyone here's super competitive. I asked out three girls for a date and all of them rejected me.At times, I get super emotional looking at my old pictures with my good old friend. I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD earlier this year and took fiuoxetine for two good months and I eventually stopped it after an advice from our family physician.Yeah I stopped it, and so far I've been good thanks to my new calisthenics routine, it makes me feel good at times. But, I'm alone most of the times, I eat alone, watch my favourite shows alone, learn alone and even workout alone. So, life's been pretty sad and monotonous for me and I hope it will get better soon. And for the hug, just hug me already, I've never been hugged in years. I'd never say no to a hug. I love warm, cuddly, tight hugs. [info] None [info] 1569161788
Amykazaam [info] Hey! I’m also a third semester BSN student. I highly recommend therapy if you are noticing exacerbations regarding your trichotillomania.Not only can therapy assist with preventing bald spots, it can help address the cause— stress. Stress is interesting because (as you might already know) it can be broken down in two general subdivisions— distress and eustress. It sounds to me that’s you’re currently enduring distress.This is important because sustained levels of stress have been correlated with an overall decrease in your ability to actively and efficiently learn and retain information the first time you are exposed to it. In turn, you end up needing to spend more time to studying, partially due to the reduction in active classroom learning. So seek out therapy, yes it will take time, and yes I understand how little time you have. However, it can actually end up saving you time in the long run! It can also help foster better nurse-patient relationships and decrease the likeliness of you experiencing nurse burnout! Also, what works for me (I am diagnosed with anxiety) the app Headspace. It has free little mindfulness therapy exercises and you can choose how much (or how little) time you want to put aside for mindfulness, which can be as short as 5 minutes. There’s such a need at my school, they provide free therapy for nursing students. You are not alone with this and there’s nothing wrong with seeking help.I’m really glad that you do already practice self-care. That’s huge, a lot of people don’t engage in proper self-care, and I’m really proud of you for doing so. Here are some links you might find interesting: https://www.headspace.com/blog/2017/05/31/a-day-with-trichotillomania/(Headspace article about mindfulness and trichotillomania— it’s totally subjective, but I thought you might be able to relate to it)https://www.americannursetoday.com/mindful-nurse/(Article from the ANA about mindfulness and nursing) https://www.nature.com/articles/npjscilearn201611(Research article that demonstrates the impact of stress on learning and memory, centered around educational and academic environment and exposure) http://www.apa.org/helpcenter/stress-kinds.aspx(American Psychological Association article regarding different types of stress, it might be a good read if you aren’t already familiar with the different categories of stress!) [info] None [info] 1536216726
anonomie [info] I definitely do not lack empathy. And you're wrong. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. You're flipping this onto ME, when this is about YOU. This shows an extreme lack of maturity.  [info] None [info] 1479056480
BigG80 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and used to suffer from the same situation - I used to dread bed time because the though intrusion was unbearable. I now take a low-dose SSRI and I have no issues sleeping as my mind is 'quiet' at night now. [info] None [info] 1498923281
UKGriff [info] It's hard to decide for me. Career wise I'm a winner, I'm 22 and a software engineer for a very good company (at least I think so). However when you look at my social/relationship part of life I seem to fail in every aspect, therefore I'm a loser in that area. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder but I don't like to claim that's the reason, because if it was then my career would suffer as well, but it hasn't so I just think it's me. I just suck and it eats away at me everyday.  [info] None [info] 1545971540
Caffeinated_DaVinic [info] Yeah same. I have access to it legally for real cheap though only temporarily. Asking everywhere I can for any info on it. I've had my fair share of bad trips and immediately thought to use it as a backup Benzo since my doctor won't prescribe me Xanax anymore after I told him I smoke. I mean I've been diagnosed with anxiety and sleep disorders since I was 9 but now the only med I've been prescribed my entire life that works is taken away just because I care about drug interactions... Gave me something else for anxiety but leaves me with HUGE memory gaps, like hours I just can't recall at all. [info] None [info] 1513901221
HollowTpzXtendedClpz [info] Not really.  I can go days without it just fine. Amd I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders amd had many rx benzos in the past [info] None [info] 1552026324
prone_to_laughter [info] Same. I was diagnosed with anxiety at a pretty young age. Medication helps a lot, but it never stops. Life is good and worth it, but I wish I could slow my mind down sometimes.  [info] None [info] 1538017722
redskins98ac [info] Wow that’s very inspiring and also very true! My being a black male in my school,  I get a lot of racist comments and stuff said. While I don’t have autism, I am diagnosed with anxiety and ocd so I definitely feel you on that. And I feel like Target is very accepting of who I am. And I’m glad you also found a place that makes you feel welcomed😊 [info] None [info] 1550210034
sunshinecunt [info] I lost about 45 lbs when I went through my worst period of anxiety. I also had to force myself to eat. I noticed that much of my anxiety’s physical symptoms include stomach pain / cramps so I think that had something to do with it. But the food tasting bland is still something I struggle with. I also struggle with bulimia that was never diagnosed until after I was diagnosed with anxiety as well. [info] None [info] 1557510157
CautiousMiddle [info] Personally, I feel like I’ve gotten a better grip on my mental health after my first trip. I was diagnosed with anxiety last year and struggled with it a lot before being diagnosed. But my biggest advice would be to make sure you have a strong grip on your mental health before you really consider tripping. Leading to my trip I had already learned to cope with my anxiety to an extent, and felt comfortable enough to take shrooms. I now feel like I have a lot more control over it, and it’s almost suppressed now. [info] None [info] 1529677903
FromTheBetween [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and insomnia and was given klonopin for anxiety and ambien for the sleeping. You can take them together and I've found the klonopin works 6/7 times a week and then just use the ambien as needed. Been great so far! [info] Anxiety / Insomnia [info] 1484878162
indistars [info] Thank you so much for this. I’m definitely going to try joining a club maybe. I did try therapy (I was diagnosed with anxiety) and I got super comfortable with my therapist but she moved away and I haven’t been able to find one that I can just start over with. I am going to be moving away to a whole new country but I’m worried I’ll be too anxious the whole time.  [info] None [info] 1551713388
ravenwarriorgoddess [info] I have dermotillomania now. I started pulling my hair in grad school. I have stopped pulling my hair now that I have finished grad school, but I keep pulling scabs off my scalp. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I saw a psychiatrist who thought I had OCD. I recently stopped going to my therapist and my psychiatrist and stopped taking antidepressants because a) my psychiatrist was too far away and I couldn't get to her office and b) I felt like I lost all my motivation when I was on antidepressants. I am thinking about getting back to therapy/psychiatry but I am really embarrassed that I just didn't show for my appointments. My academic and work career are related to trich which is very tricky for me (haha did you catch my terrible pun? lol). I really want to find a cure. It's a frustrating situation to be in. Its one of those "I really empathize with people who suffer from this condition because I do too so I want to learn more about it so I can help them/us."  [info] None [info] 1483852476
winnie_bago [info] I work in a similar role and also have anxiety, for which I take 2 medications.  Do you take any meds or have you ever considered it?  They have been my saving grace since I had debilitating panic attacks a few years ago before I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD.  I don't have the same type of feelings you have about your job, and perhaps that is because of the environment and the people.  Rarely do I have to assist a disgruntled or unpleasant person.  Most people coming to my workplace are professionals.  What kind of company do you work for?  Maybe doing reception in a different industry would change your outlook. [info] None [info] 1440957954
mentilnutz [info] I was called lazy as a kid and teen even though I was a competitive martial artists and softball player. It was very confusing for me bc I tried really hard in school but my grades were abysmal. About 3 years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety and a hidden learning disability and since going to therapy, I’ve been doing much better. I learned a lot of coping techniques and got accommodations at school. I’m not saying your kid has a learning disability or mental illness but it would be worth talking to a counselor about. In fact, for all you know, Your kid might even be very gifted and bored with current activities.  [info] None [info] 1533682292
AbsentMindedArtist [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety but none of those. However, my mind is constantly going and I often have to redirect. I also remember as a kid if I did something to one side of my body, I had to make things even and do it fo the other. However I never thought much of it and slowly phased it out. This is interesting though because during the last two intense episodes, my body began turning in a circle, repeatedly waving a hand gesture in each direction (NESW). I don’t know much about OCD. Is this a combination of an OCD ritual and my ts?  [info] None [info] 1543113960
kirbysdreampotato [info] That's crazy. I've had minor versions of that my whole life; seeing bugs that don't exist, seeing something stationary "move", mistaking objects, always far away or out the corner of my vision.I was diagnosed with anxiety last year and I've always been easily stressed, which builds up when everything stresses you out. I always thought seeing small things like that was normal. Never thought it could be connected. [info] None [info] 1547935471
davidh219 [info] I smoke weed pretty much every day. I also took prescription benzos off and on for a year after I was diagnosed with anxiety. I'm too afraid of having a bad trip to try some of the harder stuff, tbh. Like I love the idea of LSD in theory, but I'll never have the balls to do it. Even weed gives me panic attacks sometimes if I smoke too much, but at least I'm used to weed and can very easily bring myself down from a weed induced panic attack. I feel like a panic attack induced by any other drug would be just like going back in time to before I knew I had anxiety and thought I was actually dying every time I had a panic attack and I never want to be in that place again. Nowadays panic attacks are pretty much just involuntary physical sensations I have to endure and let run their course but they don't actually scare me anymore.  [info] None [info] 1513763289
Leobeard [info] Yes! This fucking sucks so hard. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and Pure O OCD  a few months ago. My life is terrible. And I hate it when people act like they have 'anxiety' or OCD. I'm currently writing this on the bus and I'm always scared when somebody will snap and start killing people.  [info] None [info] 1432190326
pjbacelar [info] Actually I'm diagnosed with anxiety and had a moment where I developed panic syndrome (messy shit happening in my life those days). Treated that for a while, took some medication. When the panic attacks stopped happening, I was released from medical treatment and did not do any therapy since (been 6 years now).I never managed to be open and sincere with my therapist, always told her I was okay even though I was in a dark place. I have a hard time talking to strangers about my inner issues (doing that for the first time here). [info] None [info] 1553601243
ariesbabeye [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety also. So that might be the reason for my weird experiences just like your experiences.  [info] None [info] 1550686247
Shareenmarie [info] Thanks.I just ordered the life extension brand you mentioned, jojoba oil to increase growth, and some bitter nail polish for good measure. Hopefully it will help remind me when I go to put my fingers in my mouth mindlessly. I’m constantly chewing without even noticing, and when I do or someone points it out I just can’t stop. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but I think it has more to do with my mind constantly racing. I’m fairly young so everything I go to a doctor for is usually dismissed, but that’s a whole different issue. I read that inositol can also help with PCOS, so I’m hoping it’ll be a double whammy to help me calm down and get the cysts a little relief or treatment somehow? Thanks for your post, I’m glad I stumbled upon it. I’ve never even heard about inositol and I’m really glad it helped you. Nail biting is by far my worst “habit” and I look forward to recovery. I look forward to any of the many benefits I see in reviews! [info] None [info] 1542140112
shiveringmeerkat [info] Gaskin's book made my anxiety worse. I'm diagnosed with anxiety so my doc and therapist have given me coping methods to work with. I feel that I'm coming into acceptance that what will happen will happen and that's ok. I just need to let go of control and allow things to take their course. Compared to some women I know I think I'm doing ok.  [info] None [info] 1388961817
Ballistic87 [info] It's pretty much on my record so any doctor I go to will see that I've been diagnosed with anxiety. But it's really wierd and affecting my day, for some reason it's worse when I keep a regular sleep scedule.  [info] None [info] 1478028210
Snapley [info] Can I ask a question about your panic attacks? I used to experience both panic attacks and anxiety attacks (I think they are different but they could be the same) Please ignore the rest of the comment if you don’t want to answer or you think it’s too sensitive a question.It felt like two different things to me, and I am diagnosed with anxiety by a professional, but it hasn’t been a big issue for a while. One type of attack felt like worries were in my head and I would get all the emotional and physical symptoms.But the other type of attack didn’t seem to be triggered by any anxious thought, it would come out of nowhere and literally be the scariest thing. It’s been ages since I had one but from what I remember it felt like my heart was beating out of my chest and my body would shake and I would get the worst tingling in my stomach. This one would come on randomly, like when riding a bike with a friend or walking home.Which one sounds more like a panic attack to you?  [info] None [info] 1534488980
kapone3047 [info] I avoided getting my license for years because of anxiety, and even after getting it continued to find excuses to have my wife do the driving (this is back before I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder).The trick to improving this situation was two fold:* Do as much driving as possible in situations where I would be more comfortable (quiet country drives, driving on Sundays, short drives going only a few blocks)* Give yourself some more challenging drives, but have another person in the car who can take over if it becomes too much. By putting yourself in a situation that is confronting, you're also going to prove to yourself that you can do this. Over time this will increase your confidence.To be honest, nine years of driving later, and I still freak out at the thought of driving in busy traffic and will avoid it, however I can now take drives that would in the past have brought on severe anxiety, and can even find some drives to be enjoyable and relaxing.Full disclosure - I moved to the country two years ago and as a result have been forced to spend considerable amounts of time driving, however on extremely quite roads. This has helped me immensely. [info] GAD &amp; Depression [info] 1416671281
Gianni317 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was young but this has never happened before.  [info] None [info] 1510630969
lovemesomezombie [info] Exactly! I will make this long story as short as possible. I was at a very large work related awards banquet. I found myself crying in the bathroom because I felt like I didn't have anyone there that liked me or wanted me to sit with them. A couple girls asked me to sit with them and tried to make me feel comfortable. I was very emotional as this was a feeling I carried all the time. It didn't matter if I had friends, I always felt like I wasn't really liked. There was never a reason from the outside but this is how I felt internally. That night I won the "Rookie of the Year" award out of 200 people and got a standing ovation so somebody liked me. Not long after that, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. Your advice to OP of therapy is a really good one. It helped me tremendously.  [info] None [info] 1550700874
itsonlydrizzling [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I agree with what you say 100%. Sometimes, even in an out of body situation, a clear voice in the back of my head realizes it will all be okay in the end. And then it is okay. [info] None [info] 1471313959
3catnight [info] On my phone so have to be short. This is so much like what I've gone through. Memory, concentration, learning, all kept getting steadily worse. I was diagnosed with anxiety but nothing helped that. Years of talk therapy, nada. Changed AED meds, no improvement. Recently went to a psychiatrist instead of the therapist route, got listened to &amp; was diagnosed with ADHD, the inattentive type. Concerta is now helping, noticeably. So is using a physical planner instead of an electronic one. Writing things down instead of typing them in helps.  [info] 200mg Lamotrigine XR [info] 1479747938
Ryuutorak [info] I take the same medication I took when I was diagnosed with anxiety, even though that diagnosis has been overturned and replaced with ASD and ADHD.It doesn't matter that they misdiagnosed my sensory agitation as anxiety-- the sensations and issues were still decreased by taking Effexor, regardless of what they were labeled. [info] None [info] 1471141355
Treeseconds [info] That description seems like me but I have been diagnosed with anxiety and social anxiety?  [info] None [info] 1531321324
lovesadventures32 [info] Hi sorry for not clarifying.... yeah I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I just wondered if this was part of it [info] None [info] 1575132195
qieran29 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety.since 2015..or rather health anxiety...jus 3days ago i had a Severe full blown Panic Attack..wout what so ever reason...thus perhaps my body was constantly stressing dat i have chest pain..pass few weeks...however during dat full blown panic attack occured 3days ago...i was calm..n yet it still happened...my left rib was painin as hell...dat v moment i thought it was a heart attack...went 2 ER..i tol them.pain is bad..thy injected me som morphin 2 ease me down...took my blood samples...ECG twice all were fine ezcept i had som bronkitis...which may have worsen the pain..I knw its hard 2 divert ur attention when ur body feels numb aching or painin...i do watch TREY JONEs on u tube...his videos are good perhps u try chck it out Take care  [info] None [info] 1552762652
blue_lillies [info] I don't know how much of a communicator you are with your wife, but her amount of contact isn't wrong per se, it may just be not what you're expecting from her or what you/her need right now. I thought I'd provide two examples of opposite ends of the communication spectrum. My partner used to work what is called FIFO here (fly in fly out) which is working away for periods of time regularly (he did 8 days at work then 6 days home mostly, but also did 2-3 weeks away with a week-ish home sometimes). We would talk once a day in the evening when I was home from work and he'd had dinner/exercise/drinks, usually for about 10 minutes, occasionally up to an hour. Our housemates (another couple) on the otherhand, are the complete opposite. When she works away (same kind of work as my partner, but not all the time), they talk every night for 2-4 hours via phone and Skype, and they text all day. When she is working in the office, she and I email back and forth, usually amounting to about 5-6 emails over a day. I shared the above to show that vastly different communication amounts and methods are all 'right', but you may want/need a certain amount of communication that may not being met right now. I also shared to give you a few ideas on methods of keeping in touch rather than just by phonecalls.One other thing I wanted to suggest was that if you're not working right now, could you go spend a more extended period of time with your wife. If you don't have any other regular commitments, I would suggest a week or a few weeks with her. Yes, you'll have to pay rent even though you won't be there, but you would have had to pay that anyway regardless. You can use it to re-evaluate your relationship if you'd like, or simply use it as a time to relax, re-connect and reinvent yourself. My partner is currently home since he's not working anymore, and I'm also home a lot due to an injury, and even though I'm not looking forward to when he starts working away again, this time has been really nice to just spend time with him and hang out casually more. I hope things pick up for you soon. I would second the other suggestions in this thread like finding a therapist (community centre, or even a help call line? I was able to get a reduction in therapist costs because I was diagnosed with anxiety - maybe see if your health providers or doctors can offer anything similar?), finding some new/reviving some old hobbies and activities, getting out and spending time with friends and other people. I would also suggest some exercise - it can have very positive impacts on your physical and mental health and wellbeing. I know a lot of this may sound like generic advice, but it can all work, you just need to find what helps you. I'll be thinking of you. Good luck! [info] None [info] 1396776730
roleoco [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety order by a doctor (i have to specify since many tell people they have anxiety lately when they don’t know what it is really like)So yeah.. probably a reason why i feel like this [info] None [info] 1561057836
pigglesbaby [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd. My doctor prescribed me .5mg of Xanax. I honestly don’t feel anything after taking it. I have to take 2 or 3 to actually calm down. I have general anxiety but I also have major panic attacks. I’m blowing through this prescription. [info] None [info] 1519571930
kiwiiwik [info] Do you suffer from anxiety? This reminds me of me when I was younger, before I was diagnosed with anxiety [info] None [info] 1390032102
sativasurfer [info] I feel that marijuana legality has a big part to play in it. Here we are as a society raised to think of marijuana as a bad thing and harmful. They say it makes you lazy, unintelligent, and boring. I think that is total bullshit. It all reflects around the person. I may get some slack on this, but I think Joe Rogan said it best. If you go to rehab for marijuana...it's not the marijuana...it's you! I used to get nervous thinking I was addicted to marijuana at times. Then I went to the doctor for my trouble I was having in school. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADD. It all made sense now. I never really knew about anxiety until I started researching it. I like to get high like any other person does. It passes the time by, makes things more enjoyable, and improves my well being. There were times though where getting high was something different for me. It would calm me down and get that tightness out of my chest. I don't become very anxious often, but when I do...marijuana clears it up. It was at that moment that I realized that marijuana is a medicine. I had been getting high before just to have fun and use it recreationally, but after my diagnosis, it all made sense. They tried to prescribe me Xanax, but I declined. I would much prefer vaporizing marijuana than taking a prescription medicine such as that. I think you can get addicted, but if you do I think there is an underlying problem mentally. [info] None [info] 1386872978
FHRITP69er [info] I was just diagnosed with anxiety. I had no idea what it was like before. I just thought people were nervous like a test. At least for me that just mild. It's more like if I'm going to live the next day because something must be wrong with me. It doesn't make sense that I can just sit innocently on my couch, watching a movie, eating dinner, and all of a sudden I look at my girlfriend and tell her I think i'm going to die.I sustained a leg injury from a back injury (sciatica maybe) and it just got so bad. Slept for maybe 1-2 hours total for 2 weeks when my leg issue started. Then randomly, I remember just talking to my physio therapist to help my sciatica and just before we even started, I remember a huge ringing in my ear, and then my head got super cloudy and almost felt dense. I just felt like life was leaving my body and told her I think my heart stopped. She laid me down seconds away from passing out. That was the first time. The second time, on the couch, and my heart was minimum 100bpm for no reason. And I remember panicking as fuck. Telling her not to let me die. Telling her to call my mom. What do I do. Do I call 911? I called my mom. Voice was shaking uncontrollably, trying to be as calm as possible. Fiancé instructing me to breathe as she rubs my back. I can't stop telling her I love her. Mom says go to the hospital now. I say I can't make it. I get off the phone. Call 911. Ambulance is at my house in 4 minutes. I'm laying on the couch now. I'm hooked up to their EKG, and they were insanely calm. Told me I'm going to be okay and I'm not having a heart attack. I'm not going to die. They administered my prescribed/Rx Lorazepam and swallowed. Heart rate went down... They said they don't need to take me to the hospital because it's not life threatening, so I signed my waiver and took their word for it.Since then, I caved and made a large post on social media for anyone on my friends list. I barely use Facebook but I creep alot just to stay up to date. This was a 3:30 in the morning because I couldn't sleep. Any time I try to sleep is my nightmare because that's when my walls come down. Idle hands and mind are the devils playground. So all day, all night I just wonder if I'm gonna make it. So so so many people reached out to me, and told me that I'm okay. And that they too have never told anyone they have been dealing with it for years. They thought they were alone. I thought I was alone. I cried for the first time in maybe 5 years. I cried hard. I just want to live. I'm crying as I type this.It made me so humble. I held my fiancé closer. I just celebrated my 5 year anniversary together with her and she's my rock. I think i'm going to be okay. Every day is a struggle. I'm going to be okay.I just love everything and anyone.Thank you for listening. This is extremely unlike me. [info] None [info] 1561582603
alpaponycat [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety I read Susan Jeffers "Feel the fear and do it anyway". I wouldn't say it was life-changing or that it solved all my problems but it was a good starting point [info] None [info] 1568184156
logictoinsanity [info] Not really, I mean I have been diagnosed with anxiety so it's probably just a part of that. I probably should mention it to my therapist though [info] None [info] 1489204081
GORGATRON2012 [info] It could be. But if you constantly feel that everything is way too much to deal with, all the time, and that you never get a break... you may want to take some time and talk to a psychologist. I felt that way in the middle of $8K of debt, preparing to move out, working full time and driving to see my GF 30 miles away... until I was diagnosed with anxiety issues. I'm on medication and currently seeking other treatment. My problems haven't gone away, but they've become a *billion* times easier to deal with. not saying it's 100% the solution for you, but just wanted to retell my experience. Good luck, fellow redditor [info] None [info] 1463749183
unique_name000 [info] &gt;But I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD because of my abusive childhood, and Facebook can be a major trigger.Ok, so I have CPTSD myself, also from childhood trauma and Facebook is absolutely a trigger UNLESS you learn to filter what you see.  Block every news source.  Don't follow people who post about stuff you don't want to see (I unfollowed EVERYONE that talked about politics in any way during elections, I unfollow everyone that posts sad animals or crazy news stories).  It CAN be done, it just takes filtering through the stuff you don't want to see.  Right now, I'm down to bird pages, Harry Potter and a few friends.  That's it.Good luck!!!! [info] None [info] 1500990928
Hey_Im_Probably_Okay [info] Did this, I was diagnosed with anxiety last spring. [info] None [info] 1547049822
theneen [info] 1) a blood test won't tell you everything, especially when it comes to bowel disorders.2) There are meds you can take if your tummy acts up.  Levsin is a great one.  Just knowing that you have access to these meds at all times will help calm your anxiety. 3) There really is only so much you can expect your husband to put up with.  He's only human.  He's allowed to be annoyed/frustrated.4) i know what i speak of.  I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was 6, i also have IBS.  Been there, done that, pooped in that creepy gas station bathroom. [info] None [info] 1410332299
Leopandas [info] As an adult, I've been diagnosed with ASD. Very mild. As a child I was diagnosed with anxiety disorders. Not to dismiss people on the ASD spectrum but having been in classes with children on the severe side of the spectrum.. as we were all grouped in the same class... what used to be called classic autism is nothing like the disabilities I had/have and they dealt with a lot more severe issues. That said, mild autism isn't a joy ride either as I still have meltdowns but sometimes I think classifying both as the same makes people not understand 'autism' has always been around and aspergers or mild autism isn't the worst thing that can happen to your child.  Know what is?  Death from measles, polio, the flu... [info] None [info] 1540233184
agent_philcoulson [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. 😕 [info] Bipolar NOS [info] 1497578318
reallyokfinewhatever [info] &gt; How can you tell if your struggles are due to an actual issue, or due to finally hitting a "challenging" level of work that is actually hard for you?In grade school up to 6th grade, school was shockingly easy for me. Laughably easy. I was told I was a bright kid. I was told I was naturally good at everything--sports, music, math, writing.In 7th grade I got my first A instead of an A+ (*shock!horror*). And I wondered if I wasn't smart anymore. In 8th grade I got my first B+ and I honestly thought I was completely failing, or had contracted a terminal brain diseases or something.In high school, I realized kids did this thing called "studying" and I didn't get how staring at a textbook made you smarter. My strategy was always to get really stressed out the day before a test and just wing it. I thought, if I didn't just know it then I must be inherently stupid and bad at learning.I spent SO much time trying to figure out how to study. I could stare at a textbook taking notes for hours and retain nothing. Meanwhile, I also found that turning my studying into games--like simultaneously teaching myself PHP in order to code myself a practice test for history class--made my information retention skyrocket.As I continued to go up in grade levels, college, etc. I came to find that I actually had NO sense of discipline, motivation, or focus. My entire four years in college were spent agonizing over how much I could not focus, feeling like a failure, and missing deadlines.I wished desperately for the years when I was little that everything just made sense to me because I thought that was how I was SUPPOSED to be--just inherently knowing everything without trying. When I had to truly focus and work hard to learn, I found my thoughts were actually completely scattered this whole time, and it made me increasingly agitated and incapable of functioning.For a long time I was diagnosed with anxiety (which, to be fair, I totally had/have). Like the typical high-functioning kid/young adult I was, every time I said something that revealed my low self-esteem, I was tagged as the typical perfectionist pretty girl with anxiety and an eating disorder. No one ever suspected ADHD until I did, and it wasn't until AFTER college when my symptoms finally became so extremely obvious, completely outside of an academic setting.All this to say maybe think about the non-academic symptoms you might be having--it became laughably obvious to me that ADHD was the driving factor my whole life once I came to identify all the symptoms I had that were not aggravated by school. [info] None [info] 1512315215
cilantrou [info] Hi OP! I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder and panic attacks. I was prescribed **Rivotril and Feliz S.**At first I was so afraid to take those two at first so I came back to my doctor then she told me that I should try it. After 2 weeks, I felt better. Less to NO PANIC ATTACKS. Same tayo, takot na akong lumabas ng bahay nun dahil sa takot na paka mangyari yung panic attacks pero ever since I took those meds, I became stable.Take note lang that **missing a dose** can give you side effects (headache and anxiety sakin).As of now, I missed around 2-3 doses for the past 2 weeks and currently suffering from anxiety ulit. I saw my doctor sa Friday and told him about it and said na hindi talaga maganda mag miss ng dose. If you plan on tapering, always seek guidance from your psychiatrist. May procedures kasi yan para iwas withdrawal symptoms.I tried tapering but I failed since anxiety has been running in me since I was around 8 years old and only got diagnosed last 2017 (19 years old).Although these medications worked for me, they can be different for some people.**Pros of Rivotril and Felis Z**\- Less anxiety\- Less to no panic attacks\- Less sad days (depressive episodes)\- Less overthinking. I swear I almost gave zero fucks on every thought ko noon, overthinking will not be a problem anymore.**Cons of Rivotril:**\- Mabilis maantok (for the first 4 weeks)\- Miss one dose and you can get a headache.This is based on my experience. I have been taking these meds since April 2017 and I hope this helps you. I was like you. My psych and my meds did wonders for me. If you need to talk about this more, you can send me a message and let's chat. :) [info] GAD [info] 1568048784
Hakunamatata98 [info] Yeah, just not sure if theres much motivation to get back, that's a tough hit to me. Especially since I am diagnosed with anxiety and literally this was killing me when he was trying to "fix" it. [info] https://steamcommunity.com/profiles/76561198069233065 [info] 1442816586
fl33twoodmacs3xpants [info] I've had many if these tendencies my entire life and never even thought about it. Then I was diagnosed with anxiety at 28 and realized how weird it was. [info] None [info] 1570112834
ishotthedeputy9 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD, so my mind requires ritalin in order to work without making me think about monster trucks and explosions all day. [info] None [info] 1411569093
Daniel-Tigers-Dad [info] I’m going to take a crack at answering this; not because our situations are necessarily analogous, but because my anxiety and self-doubt are on such an extreme side of the scale and TRT has helped in some ways.I am diagnosed with anxiety and Obsessive Compulsive Disorder, which itself is an extreme anxiety disorder. I got on TRT while recovering from a significant mental breakdown which lead to my OCD diagnosis and subsequent treatment.  They call OCD the doubters disorder because it manifests in extreme self-doubt making you question whether anything and everything you do is the right move. I had always been able to manage my OCD until my 30s when due to a variety of possibilities my T levels tanked and after some research I found there are correlations in studies between low T and OCD. Once I got tested my dr put me on T Cypionate and I have had mixed results; likely due to estrogen spikes.To answer your question my anxiety is less, but not inherently. I have the same amount of stress and anxiety, but what changed is my ability to say, “Fuck it. This is hard, but I have what it takes to push through and make shit work.” I was always able to do that before my T levels tanked and all the sudden I felt myself paralyzed and feeling like a victim instead of a warrior going to battle. Stressors come, but I kick into gear, refocus and go to war with life. Additionally I have found myself not doubting my training and knowledge which has helped me make quick, correct decisions at work. I have also found myself standing up to people more when appropriate as where before I would have stayed quiet. Not picking fights, but standing up for ideas that are important.Sorry for the novel of a response, but I felt the back story would make the explanation make more sense, especially having gone from normal T to low and back to normal. [info] None [info] 1531067243
haven8819 [info] Thank you so much! Yes it's really hard especially in my situation where I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic last June. This issue with my bf became an alarm clock that would constantly remind throughout the day and it worsens my anxiety. I'm still undergoing therapy and I'll be seeing my psychiatrist earlier than my original schedule, which is better.  [info] None [info] 1470182712
mind_fcked [info] Check out r/rOCD. I'm sure you'll find useful information there. I can relate to what you're going through. My boyfriend and I have been together for 7.5 years and last year I was diagnosed with anxiety. Four months ago, my boyfriend and I both were changing jobs and I felt myself becoming anxious over several days and then, out of nowhere, I began overanalyzing our relationship. So many questions would go through my head like, "are we meant to be together", "is he 'the one'", "am I supposed to be with someone else", "do I like someone else". It jumps to our compatibility, to his "flaws", and whatever else my brain can come up with. I was so happy before this started and we we're even starting to plan our wedding. I had no idea why I was questioning these things and honestly, I still don't know. I'm going to therapy weekly and we've changed my medication around to see if that helps. Some days are better than others but I won't give up on my relationship.I hope you find your way through this. [info] None [info] 1517806057
SociopathTendencies [info] Throwaway. I was diagnosed as a sociopath at the age of 12... two years before that, I was diagnosed with anxiety-induced Obsessive Compulsive Disorder at the age of 10.When I was little my parents told me that I would always obsess over small things; things ranging from dead animals to how clean my room was. At 6 I had a massive meltdown because my mother re-arranged my room while I was at school. I would also have little complsions that I had to preform before I left the house each day. I also had a very sick facination with death. When I was 7 I remember watching a bird that was hit by a truck die in the street. When I became a little older, my parents noticed that I started showing more positive signs of being a Sociopath. I had excellent lying skills- so good that I was beginning to believe that my lies were real. I didn't grasp the concept of human relationships- I hated being held or hugged. However, family members disregarded this because of my "charm", which was really superficial. By the time I was 12 I was fully engrossed into my disorder, and that's when my parents noticed. I was sent to therapy to help calm my urges to manipulate people, and it helped somewhat, but I still don't fully grasp the function of human connection. I have friends that know of my disorder... to my knowledge, it doesn't bother them. They call me out when I'm trying to spit out false claims or notice when I'm being manipulative. It's hard sometimes because all I can feel about is plunging a knife into their throat when they call me out, but its for the best. I know that killing them would be wrong, so I don't preform the action.  [info] None [info] 1379888068
OnshorePlaysYT [info] Like 2 or 3 years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. But I got rid of it. Now it’s back and I haven’t been to the doctor yet to see. I go every 3 months. Last time was like 1 or 2 months ago. [info] None [info] 1567736442
theoneeyedpete [info] After I was diagnosed with anxiety, I was very much like this.  I think that was the turning point of us going from constantly having sex to weekly-ish.  Now, I have the higher labido which is infuriating as I don’t feel we’d have lost that rhythm if it hadn’t been me ruining it in the first place!But, it’s good you’ve got others to satisfy you! [info] None [info] 1524179743
bitchnumber24 [info] I didn't think disliking small talk was indicative of introversion. I was under the impression introversion was more like disliking meaningless smalltalk with no lead into more meaningful conversation. and needing to recharge with alone time after interactions with others. I used to think I was just shy and introverted because I abhorred small talk and the prospect of chatting with strangers. I couldn't even order a fucking happy meal on my own when I was a kid. Im pretty sure it was anxiety that kind of leeched to be some kind of social anxiety. I've been diagnosed with anxiety so that's just what I think. I also believe that I *am* an introvert but not because I hate small talk - more because after mingling with people, I need a quiet space to just "be" and collect myself before facing people again. let me assuage you thought, being an introvert is NOT WRONG. you are not a worse or wrong person for being an introvert. disliking small talk is understandable. I hated it because it felt so unpredictable. (maybe you've heard this before but) it gets better with practice. I started by observing my friends and other random take part in small talk. Walked around my town to buy things and listened to what people talk about. I practiced with my friends (they didn't know, I was just trying out some small talk lines lol) and it got easier. Don't let what that guy said get to you. those words he used are offensive, but I bet he just didn't know how to understand so he got scared. People tend to be silly like that and reject what they can't understand. you're okay. Okay? :) [info] None [info] 1401033699
deplorablewhitey [info] No, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety and you just triggered it [info] None [info] 1563672572
Adreduc [info] I know that feel, I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 13, I'm 29 now and that shit stopped me from doing things, you just have to try to act faster than anxiety does, sometimes it doesn't work but sometimes does, and that's when you star having nice things and nice stories to tell [info] None [info] 1541956850
RedditCanBeAScumbag [info] I was just diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorders after suffering for at least fifteen years. And I've decided to lose some weight too. [info] None [info] 1419635382
LayersOfDysfunction [info] I'm on extended release ritalin, which is basically concerta. 80mg. Some days I'll have terrible anxiety. I get horribly tense. When my anxiety gets bad, I won't be able to focus or do anything. I also have days where I'll have no anxiety. I've taken doubly my dose on several occasions when I wasn't paying attention. Even on 160mg I didn't have much anxiety at all. I think the stimulants just exaggerate what's naturally there. If I sleep well, or take it after exercising, my change of getting anxiety is much lower. Though, I'm diagnosed with anxiety. The ritalin isn't the cause of my anxiety, though It might be a factor in making it worse if I get anxious. On the other side, If I took a sugar pill, believing it to be a stimulant, I wouldn't be surprised if that had the exact same effect on my anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1468540800
Jibblers [info] Wow, you sound exactly like me, what with the having no filter and overanalyzing things in hindsight. I was diagnosed with anxiety, panic disorder, and OCD (mostly of the obsessive thoughts). Before I finally got on medication and got used to it, I would always obsess over things I say to people, if I said the right thing, what they thought I had meant and everything. The one or two true friends I have really get me so I don't feel uncomfortable around them. I'm much better now, since I'm on Paxil CR, but it's still hard to push myself into social situations. Think about trying medication again if you ever feel discontent with not interacting with people. It helps you control those thoughts and maybe even not having to deal with them at all! [info] None [info] 1347593044
Pikkusika [info] I take propanolol for migraines, and it works really well for me. It also helps minimize the irregularity and heart palpitations that I have. I was diagnosed with anxiety several years ago, and the propanolol has helped me decrease the amount of Xanax I take daily, although I still take 0.5 mg Xanax at night. [info] None [info] 1418780747
Scaredistka [info] We are 20,and 19 we are together for 3 years .i have ROCD for 1 year almost and I am diagnosed with anxiety disroder and ocd [info] None [info] 1556489353
My_Beloved_Ice_Cream [info] In my opinion, you should just go talk to a psychiatrist and find out what it is and try to fix it without pills. Sometimes just talking is all you need. I have the same kind of word confusion as you do, and it is frustrating. I do feel like I must be rain damaged sometimes.. But I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD, that's all, and I made it better through a little meditation. Pot desensitizes you, so after you get clean and give your brain a chance to recover, it might start to get overactive. Think of it like a search engine running full speed. As you type in a phrase, the engine suggests all kinds of words for you. I don't believe in ADHD, and a lot of people disagree with me on that.. (Soap box) somehow i think it would be very difficult to keep some types of very smart people in a standard classroom. In kindergarten, all the kids are hard to handle, curious, noisy etc... they tried to diagnose me with ADHD and the doctor really swore to my mom that I needed to be on pills. They did that with a lot of kids, put them on meds that made them feel like zombies. when all they needed was more stimulating information. In my opinion, your brain is so hungry for information and emotion, that it is acting like a little kids sponge like brain, and it's just soaking everything up, trying to take in everything that you've been missing in the high school years. When I get stressed, I get like this, but I use it to my advantage. It allows me to cover a lot more information when I study, and I focus more when i want to. It sounds like you're really smart, you just need to focus your mental energy towards something useful. But again, talk to a psychiatrist.. (sometimes you can get a "Free trial" from the state but im not sure how to do that without acting out and getting in trouble)Try to stay off the meds though, unless you really really can't focus. There's nothing wrong with thinking a lot.. you just have to be functional [info] None [info] 1389932908
GCDD [info] I just turned 18 and I've noticed that I always enjoyed my alone time over going out with people one calls "friends". However, I must say that I did not do this because I was scared/afraid of them or of what may happen or whatnot, but because I lacked interest. Also, I didn't trust them. Anyways, this is also something I don't understand, and maybe you can help me define it better, but is anxiety having "fear" overall about something specific, or what is it? Quite surprisingly, I was diagnosed with anxiety, which I don't agree with because i do not fear society. One exception though is the fact that I experience panic symptoms during presentations. My voice breaks and I don't know why, no matter how hard I try. Maybe I unconsciously do have social anxiety. [info] None [info] 1512086597
AHNOLD86 [info] Wow, shit, I have been diagnosed with anxiety but I didn't know this was even a symptom. It mostly just happens when I'm excited though, and it's so annoying. Like if I'm really into what I'm talking about, my body will start to shake to the point where talking is hard because I can't control my jaw movements. Really does a number on my efforts to be cool and calm in my composure [info] None [info] 1499530109
lima_247 [info] I've had shower anxiety since I was a small child. I had very bad eyesight from a young age, and because i had to take off my glasses to shower, I would get anxious and think I saw things that weren't there. The loud noise also makes me feel vulnerable, because it's another sense of mine compromised. Washing my face is the worst, because it's when I'm the most vulnerable.Showering during the day, keeping showers short, and keeping to a routine in the shower all help. I also like music while I shower, and plenty of light. What you have 100% sounds like anxiety, though. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety I thought I might be schizophrenic, but I looked into it and the symptoms are really very different. I often thought about people sneaking up on me in my empty house, and dwelled on these thoughts and scenarios, which sounds like what you're doing. [info] None [info] 1421013965
that1girl01 [info] Also, goes without saying that I have been diagnosed with anxiety and obsessive thinking. [info] None [info] 1536613997
forgette [info] Years ago I started getting sick at my stomach all the time.  After exhausting all "physical" causes for my nausea, I was diagnosed with anxiety.  At first I didn't believe it and walked out on the doctor right then and there, but the more I thought about it, the more it made sense.  I eventually returned and sought help.  I was given a prescription.  That made things worse.  I was given another.  It also made me worse.  And then I was given one that worked.    Even though the pill helped, I still got sick sometimes.  And over time I started feeling the "normal" anxiety symptoms.  My doctor suggested exercise.  I did not want to go to a gym, so instead I called a friend to play tennis with me.  I hadn't played in five years or more.  Anyway, playing tennis did help immensely.  I felt so good that I started running in the mornings.  And that winter when I couldn't play tennis, I did join a gym.  I recommend trying exercise.  I think your doctor may want you to have the social experience.  He might think you need exposure to being around people, and maybe that doing so while you can focus on exercise might help.  Just a guess.  But that's two benefits.  The exercise is good for the body and it's good for the mind.  And of course exposure therapy is a real and widely accepted treatment for anxiety.  If I were you I'd give it a try.  It sounds to me like you live in the UK (you would never get four months off work in the USA and it's difficult to even see a doctor here on many people's insurance plans, much less a mental health professional).  Take advantage of what's available to you.  If it doesn't help or you feel worse go back to your doctor and explain that.   [info] None [info] 1393789107
miss_delaney [info] Do you think that is related to misophonia or that it's closer to anxiety? I'm interested because I can remember as a kid being VERY self-conscious in church while taking communion - chewing that damn cracker seemed like the loudest, rudest thing I could do! Of course I didn't understand then that my chewing sounded much louder in my own head. Now, as an adult, I have been diagnosed with anxiety &amp; while misophonia is anecdotally connected, I wonder where the separation of the two lies, if indeed it does at all.  [info] None [info] 1420833191
BekahBooBooBooBoo [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety by my psychiatrist. Its been quite a battle. I know the reasoning behind my actions and feelings, but somehow it never seems to help me change my actions. My life has be plagued with suicide attempts. Some days I am ok, some days I am not. My friend made my life a lot better because he would talk me through things, and he really seemed to know how I was feeling. I think that was what made this all so hard. I felt so close to him, bit once I had slept with him everything had changed and I felt like a dirty whore.  [info] None [info] 1503205684
mountainsprouts [info] I'm so glad you did that for her!When I told my friends I was diagnosed with anxiety they all said they thought I already knew I had it. Kinda funny now that I think about it. [info] None [info] 1482640041
hurtstobealive [info] I get the point of this post but I don’t think it’s right to downplay someone’s mental illness because you think you have it worse. It’s kind of like a spectrum, sure everyone has anxiety (as long as you have a nervous system) but everyone’s is different in terms of strength and in different situations. Social anxiety can also make a person rude or defensive because when ur anxious ur body is literally in defensive mode so I also disagree with your point there. I am diagnosed with anxiety but I knew I had anxiety way before I was ever diagnosed so I don’t think a diagnoses really matters. I mean it’s not like doctors really do anything special to diagnose you they just ask you like a few questions. Lots of mentally ill people can’t afford doctors or even know that they need help. [info] None [info] 1573748556
blueberry_deuce [info] OP basically said that because of reddit she has come to fear and distrust all men, even going so far as to question as to whether her male friends are REALLY her friends and assuming that her mistreatment by her male boss is a "normal" thing and something she would experience everywhere she goes. I was just explaining that reddit demographics definitely don't reflect real world demographics and that she shouldn't be fearful of men.Of course you aren't the intended target of this post. Your positive voice is valuable and helps turn the tide of negativity. I hope it didn't sound like I was bashing those with social anxiety - I am diagnosed with anxiety myself, so that would be rather silly. Sorry if any of my word choices came off that way. :( [info] None [info] 1427051157
fsuchin [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety earlier this year which is a big no no if i wanted to pursue a career in actuarial science. I have IBS too so that makes things even worse. The thing that’s helping me right now is trying out a whole practice exam in 3-hours and getting a good score. That usually boosts my self-esteem. I realize that I get more anxious when I know that I’m not making progress so I try to make “small victories”. I would take custom quizzes on ADAPT when I find myself in a rut before taking another practice exam. I suggest finding your “trigger”. I know now that when I see that the numbers on the screen are not what i want, I try to not let it get to me otherwise I get into a depressed state, and once I’m out of it, I realize I just wasted a bunch of time being sad, and anxiety comes bustin’ at my door. So instead of whining, I put the difficulty slightly lower and work my way up. I know this requires you having ADAPT but maybe try doing this for the SOA test bank. Set a goal like finish 10 questions in 50 minutes or less. If you don’t do it, don’t let it bum you out. Lighten the load and don’t forget to take a breather!  [info] None [info] 1533542998
3Dbabble [info] Same here. I was diagnosed with anxiety, ADD, and DepressionBut nothing explained the intrusive thoughts or my anger at things that shouldn't upset me or my constant need for someone to acknowledge what I have done no matter what it is.It affected and is affecting my relationships and I had no idea what could cause it. Come to find out none of the previous diagnoses had much merit and it was OCD the whole time.It's like a terrible Scooby Doo episode. [info] None [info] 1543547437
ThrowawayHorse0 [info] I don't know, I have plenty of reasons... my head just gets filled with thoughts and it's hard to articulate it all. Maybe you won't relate to this but I've been diagnosed with anxiety and my main issue is my anxiety for pain. It's also what set me off today, prompting me to make this post. I'm so scared of any kind of suffering but everyone tells me it's just a part of life. If I can't accept an unchangeable part of life, then wtf do I do?It's the worst one cause it gets triggered so easily. Every time I get a random twinge of pain I'm convinced I have some kind of illness and it's only downhill from there. Drinking anything but water and I'll get kidney stones, my contact lenses will make me blind, every mole is cancer, I'm only 20 but if I encounter stairs I fear for my knees, etc. The list doesn't end. Pain is inevitable, it's only a matter of *when* it comes. I can't handle it. Sorry for the wall of text [info] None [info] 1556491156
elrabb22 [info] Yes in the past definitely. It got pretty bad again a few weeks ago. I experimented with visualization to see what it looked like that was disturbing my morning. I settled on a heart meditation and could visually “see” all of these attacks and negative thoughts that were just below the surface. So each day I imagined calling it dish and tending to my invisible wounds. After one month I woke up without any stress or anxiety. It took quite a bit of work I don’t want to lie to you. Full disclosure I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past and used to suffer full blown panic attacks. I really hope this helps, feel free to dm me. [info] None [info] 1559158733
flying_bat [info] One thing to remember is that you aren't asking for drugs, you are asking for help, and s/he will determine what drugs you may need or whether to refer you to a specialist.As for how I would bring it up? Well I'd probably do something like this:During the appointment I assume that you will be noting or talking about previous conditions, current conditions, and family medical history. This would be the time to mention it. If you are afraid to look like you are requesting drugs, simply bring a list of things that you want to mention to the doctor and add anxiety to the list. So let's say that the doctor asks you for previous medical problems and you say something like "Let me grab my list... Well I have had asthma as a kid but that's better now. I was diagnosed with anxiety many years ago but I was never treated for it. Actually, how do I go about getting treatment for that? It's been getting worse." If the doctor doesn't ask for things like that, you can always have it on the list and at some point they may ask "Okay anything else?" and you can say "Let m check my list of concerns to bring up" then pull out your list and be like "Oh! I almost forgot, I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back, and while I didn't want treatment then, I was hoping to get some help with it now."On a side note, every single time I have mentioned my anxiety to a medical professional they become 100x more understanding and make me feel safer. It is also important to know that there are two types of anti-anxiety drugs: long lasting (anti depressants) and fast acting (benzos). The long lasting ones aren't anything that people would go "seeking drugs" for because you get no "high" from them. The second there is potential for abuse, but I've never had a problem in the past because the doctors simply ask for my symptoms and they determine whether or not the second type is what I need.Edit: Oh dear this ended up being much longer than I expected. Sorry about that, I'm used to explaining things like this in r/explainlikeimscared format. Well I hope some of it was useful at least. Good luck! [info] None [info] 1407868279
hedgehoggodoggo [info] An autonomic specialist that I saw suggested SSRIs when I was diagnosed with anxiety. They can help the anxiety for sure, but he says they can also help with POTS symptoms in some patients.  [info] None [info] 1546042114
NotEzrasWife [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety for years now, over ten. Today, I was diagnosed with agoraphobia and social phobias as well. For me, today was a bad day. It felt like I couldn't control anything. I felt lost, overwhelmed, miserable, ashamed that I am who I am and angry that I've ruined everything I. My life to end up at this point. I had 3 appts I HAD to go to. There was no avoiding them anymore. I've avoided them to the point of a full-day severe panic attack. I've avoided them to the point where I had payments cut completely for not attending (I'm on a single parent pension - Australia) and I've avoided phone calls to the point where I almost racked up a $4000 debt. Physically, it feels like my head is going to explode, like I can't breathe, my entire body aches (I found out today my chronic pain is caused by my anxiety). I feel strong, tight, cold-burning sensations in my chest and upper back. My heart races, and I feel extremely hot and sweaty. I shake uncontrollably and cry hysterically while hyperventilating, or go completely numb while also being hyperactive - sometimes both. I become hyper-aware of my surroundings. If somebody 10 seats over from me moves their head, I know. If someone crosses their legs, I know. If someone sighs, maybe I've somehow annoyed them. I swap between extreme paranoia and embarrassment of myself, to anger thinking people should be more aware and understanding of anxiety. I'm not crazy, I have a mental illness. I feel like I'm letting everyone in my life down, I can't understand why anyone likes me. Maybe they're just pretending. Maybe they just feel sorry for me. I can't be fun, or funny, or smart. I feel like I'm letting myself down. If only I tried harder, was a better student, sister, friend and mother. If only I was smarter. Studied harder. Stuck to my decisions. Stood up for myself more. For me, crowded places send me in to overdrive. Anywhere that isn't home, or somewhere EXTREMELY familiar and comfortable, is hell. My family is home, and I can deal with these places with them around most of the time, but even then it's not easy. I hate appointments. I hate phone calls. I hate people knocking on the door. Sometimes I even hate seeing my neighbours, who I'm extremely close with. Paying for things is excruciating. Maybe there won't be money on my card. Maybe the item is more expensive than it's marked and I don't have enough for it. Maybe my cash was robbed from my purse and I don't know yet? Thankfully, today, I made my appointments. I had my anti-anxiety meds increased and got a medical certificate so I can take some time to settle, be still and recover. Today was probably the hardest day of my life.  [info] None [info] 1481200132
lady_fire [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety long before fibro. The fibro symptoms started a couple years after the anxiety. I used therapy and meds to help with the anxiety and have been able to stop both successfully. Now I use yoga and walk to help manage both.  [info] None [info] 1517788554
Pinklotus22 [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety and a panic disorder. I pass out when in extreme emotional/physical pain. I thought this as well. I really related to Kendra in this episode.  [info] None [info] 1531093973
SaucySpazz [info] Ah perhaps so! I have been diagnosed with anxiety so perhaps this is a by product of that. Ill work on that first and see where it goes then. Thanks for the response! [info] None [info] 1538685237
mollysdollys [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety last year.It was all downhill from there. (Somewhat literally- I weighed a healthy 120 when I was diagnosed and now I’m 98 pounds) [info] None [info] 1526686515
RyanJKaz [info] I’ll start by saying that I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder/panic disorder about 4 1/2 years ago. I also was found to have a vitamin D deficiency about three years ago and my question is this: [info] None [info] 1576678024
tsar73 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety &amp; depressive disorder as a direct result of my migraines. It’s definitely a thing. Was on antidepressants for about 18 months, I guess they kinda helped but they sucked the life out of me all the same. I weaned off them about a year ago and picked up exercise. It’s definitely improved my morale in general but do understand that there is no universal solution to this problem, but I would think being healthier in general would help for sure. Take care! [info] None [info] 1505180456
Kmaun_Lee [info] Everything was insanely different. A minute felt like an hour. I was watching the clock and just waiting for the second hand to turn. My friend was cooking. One second he'd be in slow motion and the next he'd be going really fast. I was running around screaming. I could feel the sensation of the wind blowing and my feet touching the floor, but the room didn't even move. When it did, everything got big and I got small, and then vice versa. I could see the chair towering over me. I was looking for the potion that would bring me back to normal size like Alice in Wonderland. Time and space were far from me. I was in a different realm, but it was as if they were trying to take me by the feet and drag me down back to earth. I could hear voices whispering. I hit my head and noticed I was unable to feel pain. After that realization, I tried killing myself by hitting my head over and over. Thank god my boyfriend was there. He grabbed me and just held me, telling me everything would be okay. He layed me down and I just cried for hours. The trip lasted all day. For months after I had terrible paranoia (I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder as it is.)  [info] None [info] 1342977645
justhush1 [info] Hey, so I can’t respond to your original post, but i’m still trying to figure out if this was a personal attack or just an uneducated person trying to talk about mental health problems. I was diagnosed with anxiety from a super young age, and everyday it is going to be something that influences my life. For me instead of trying to find a way to “cure” or totally get rid of my anxiety, which is just not realistic, I instead focus on minimizing it. The missionaries told me often that the church would heal me. That’s just not how mental health works. I am successful in my life, and am truly happy. This is despite my mental health issues. So yes, I still have mental health problems, but everyday I see an improvement, and I’m pass a point in my life where they control me. [info] None [info] 1514570465
AnonNeedsDocHelp [info] NAD, but had personal experience with the same muscle tick when I was going through a stressful time. I was diagnosed with anxiety and prescribed clonazepam.  It helped me out. Good luck with finding out what works for you. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1564105773
dejvidBejlej [info] Nothing to worry about! And I've been diagnosed with anxiety 2 years ago so I know exactly how you feel. Pain usually isn't too bad but it's just very unsettling. Every once in a while it'll be actually bad.. Again, don't worry, your comment was helpful :) [info] None [info] 1544407133
Floor-sugar [info] Yes I agree. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders and I have been medicated for it in the past. I just got off of medication this time a few months ago. I'm not really interested in going back down that route at the moment though. I was just hoping there were others out there that deal with the same thing that maybe would have some advice. I feel like for the most part my anxiety is at a pretty manageable level right now. I don't even bring it up all the time with my girlfriend when I have these worries. I just hate that the thoughts are there. This relationship I'm in really couldn't be any more perfect and my stupid brain has to try to ruin my happiness.  [info] None [info] 1480904041
nyx1047 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I have quit my job due to it. I have tried to change careers by trying to study further but whenever I try I always end up in a constant anciety and panic state. After a few years of that I am trying to start a business. My question is, does my aversion to employment (extreme aversion to the accountant work as i graduated accountancy), and my reactìons to further studies, caused by my anxiety (which I think is the possible future stress that I think I cant handle) or is it because I don't like them at all the anxiety is just the way my body and mind reacts to remind me of it?How will I determine my own thoughts from thoughts generated because of anxiety? Thank you. [info] None [info] 1515726731
LogOutOfLife [info] Idk man, you can think what you want. I cant really stop you. You're right, I do have deeper problems. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and adhd. My therapist thinks I may have some ptsd as well. I was just describing a time when I did not have meds. It's not roleplaying, maybe it's just the mix of all these thing together that gives me those symptoms. Idk how to convince you. [info] None [info] 1544835000
NightOwlMordecai [info] I honestly just love this game. I got into D1 right between Crota and HoW, which happened to coincide with when I was diagnosed with anxiety. I'm a huge space nerd and games like Mass Effect always really chilled me out for some reason so I decided to check out the D1 demo for the 360, and bought it the next day. For some reason this game is like a meditation for me, I'm really able to relax and lose myself in it.  I actually convinced my entire crew (I was working at a Papa Murphy's at the time) to get into it and we would just spend most of our work days talking about Destiny and not getting anything done. I'm from Northern Colorado. Thanks! [info] None [info] 1561617834
maq0r [info] Former blue badge here: no I didn't. Worked in retail, on the tech side of things. It was a ruthless environment where only whites and Asians would thrive and create their fiefdoms and kingdoms to go for that L6, L7+. Further, frugality is fine when you need to be conscious about resources you use, is another thing when SLU is being rebuilt from the ground up with 40 story high buildings and not one gym for the employees or subsidized food. "There's plenty of options around town" said Bezos during an all hands, but what they don't say is that most of the gyms and restaurants around campus are owned by Amazon execs so of course they're not going to offer anything for free. It felt too mining town for me. Also, crying under the desk? Yep, checked here, 11 hr days, sev2s (like FIX IT NOW tickets) left and right. I did NOT have a good time. "oh but it depends on team" sure, but the gym/food story isn't team dependant. I left a year ago when I was diagnosed with anxiety due to work. Can't recommend.  [info] None [info] 1528870578
GoldenBirdSong [info] I've started meditating after my therapist suggested it to me. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD, and I suffer from panic attacks.It took a while, but it's helping to the point where if I feel myself getting agitated I'll meditate for a few minutes and get less anxious. I also don't get anxious as often.The trick is not to grab onto any of your thoughts, just let them float by. When my mind is wandering or relaxed, the reason I get anxious is because my mind is latching onto thoughts and it turns into a spiral of obsessive anxiety. TL;DR: Try it. It helped me and you won't know if it helps you without trying. [info] None [info] 1389325794
coolsnail [info] Yeah, mine was right in the sternum. WebMD told me I was having a heart attack and red pop-up told me to go to the ER. lol.Also I told the ER doctors that I was diagnosed with anxiety so they instantly said "oh yeah then it's just your anxiety doing this". One doctor said I'd probably live with it for another 30-40 years.Finally I got some proper tests and an ultrasound done and they realized my gallbladder needed to be removed.Also, my mum had hers removed a few years before I did. She felt it in her back (I think she described it feeling like golf balls stuck under her ribs or something) [info] None [info] 1446692813
daniellemx [info] Thank you, I've been diagnosed with anxiety which goes away and comes back. My life currently isn't very functioning. [info] None [info] 1417211164
Horny_Hipst3r [info] As far as my experience with leading groups comes from, I've been involved as the main organizer of some smaller\-scale political demonstrations. Also I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and keep having panic attacks time to time. I would like to say that being in any leadership position, you are not doing the most work, but you can delegate and rely on others to do it for you, while you just have to be sure how what they are doing  fits into the bigger picture, and sometimes you are expected to speak on their behalf when you are representing your group \(in your case, I'd imagine it would be you who'd end up writing articles about your club's activities to the student paper/blog/social media etc.\). Good way to negate your anxiety is to get to know people who you're about to get involved with \(other club members etc.\) \- try to find time to talk to them a little in person, such as joking around, making small talk etc. getting comfortable so you'll feel less anxious about your situation, and feel their support. Saying this because it absolutely sucks when you can't trust people you're working with, only adds to the stress and anxiety. You say you are passionate about french language and the minor you're studying, I think that's about all that you need right now. Remember, it's a student club at a university, you are not some high\-level executive at a corporation, so you are more expected to be enthusiastic and reasonably proactive, not to crunch numbers or fuss over business management models. Don't worry, you'll do an amazing job :\) [info] GAD/Panic Disorder [info] 1525759943
t4mmi [info] It’s different for everyone, and can manifest differently for individuals at different times so I can only tell you how I experience it. I am diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. I am a rational person and I know my “concerns” are nonsense but something in the back of my mind just overrides all sense. I fret about everything and overanalyse situations thinking of every possible thing that might go wrong. “But what if...” is my brain’s absolute favourite. I catastrophise. Minor things feel much worse than they are. This all causes me to take extreme and irrational precautions against unrealistic threats as well as to avoid ...  a lot.As far as panic attacks... For me, sometimes I feel like I need to hide (at times I literally have) for no good reason or escape. Sometimes I am paralysed with it and just freeze. I cry. Sometimes I have difficulty breathing, my heart races, I have excruciating pain in different parts of my body (usually my neck), pressure in my head, sometimes dizziness. Basically all the things you might imagine being an appropriate reaction to immediate extreme danger with either minimal or no stimulus to justify it. See a therapist, it helps. ETA see a therapist sooner rather than later, I know the money and time is an issue but it is really, really important. I wish I had addressed my anxiety sooner, not doing so led me to habits and thought patterns that made it much worse.  [info] None [info] 1543285006
cripple2493 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and agoraphobia and I find myself unable to leave the house due to anxiety and asking myself if I'm faking it - so yeah [info] Agoraphobia/panic disorder/emetophobia [info] 1539366138
Mmjnewengland [info] I was the same way in school when I hit the 6th grade. Kids growing up, becoming clicky, and puberty was awkward af. I'd have morning panic attacks and have crying fits over going to school, but my mother made me go. Later on in life, around the age of 16 [I'm 32 now) I was diagnosed with anxiety and overactive anxiety disorder. In my later years (now looking back) I showed the signes very early, but my parents only though I was nervous all the time, turned out to be a major untreated mental illness. Could you possibly get a doctors appointment to talk with a doctor about this? Therapy and medication has helped me out so much. I just don't want someone to have to figure this out 16 years down the road.  I wish you the best of luck. Listen to music and maybe use some breathing exercises to clam yourself, it helps a little. [info] None [info] 1479790103
nacreous [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety issues a while back. Anxiety is not a legitimate excuse to be mean to your SO, and you need to let her know that. She needs to take this up with her shrink (I assume she's being treated for her anxiety) and she needs to learn how to fight fair. [This link](http://www.wikihow.com/Fight-Fair-in-Relationships) is to a quick overview of how to fight fair in a relationship.Seriously, don't take this lying down. [info] None [info] 1290021999
kR4in [info] Maybe it isn't the ADHD, but perhaps anxiety? I have been diagnosed with anxiety-panic disorder, inattentive ADHD and massive depressive disorder....and I am not sure what bits and pieces of my life are affected by each one of those [info] None [info] 1567968136
neverwhere9 [info] That's pretty much how I did it...Didn't last long but it was a nice habit while it lasted. Sometimes it gave me bad anxiety. I'm diagnosed with anxiety as well so YMMV but I'd try breaking one in half to start at least. Good luck! [info] Bipolar 1 [info] 1543543831
floppyweewee [info] I thought misophonia was a quirk until I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and ADHD. Obsessiveness and extreme reactions could be a symptom for some of you. [info] None [info] 1513266023
MysticTacoDeer [info] I'm not sure how it started but I think it was because my father is a loud, continuous talker. He doesn't get the hint to stop talking and I've always seen him as the opposite of the person I want to be. Now I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I'm constantly afraid that I'll mess up and say something that I shouldn't and everyone will hate me. I also just suck at conversation but it's something you can't improve on unless you practise, but I avoid it so it's a vicious cycle. [info] None [info] 1559021892
Figgles86 [info] I had two panic attacks caused by chest pains after never having any anxiety before.  I was diagnosed with anxiety and I feel like my recurring chest/side pains are written off by my Doctor.After never having anxiety, I suddenly worry about my health and that I have some underlying condition will worsen until it kills me. In a way, I feel like being diagnosed with anxiety made it develop. [info] None [info] 1443902585
NudePenguin69 [info] Mine is more of a personal one rather than song meaning specific.Twice's Fancy came out the day after my first ever panic attack sent me to the emergency room for 14 hours.  I got home at 4am from the hospital and was physically and emotionally exhausted but I stayed awake because I knew the new Twice song was about to drop.  I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder shortly after that, and for a while, I couldnt listen to Fancy because it triggered memories and feelings from that night that flared up my anxiety. Recently however, now that my anxiety is well regulated by medication and I am half a year removed from the incident, Fancy has become a song that reminds me of what I overcame.  My struggles with anxiety earlier in the year were the scariest thing I have personally endured in my life, and Fancy reminds me the no matter how shitty things seem, life goes on and it will soon pass. [info] Jihyo | Juri | Lua | AleXa | Yoohyeon | Lisa | Ryujin | Hani [info] 1575071798
aspie65 [info] So have you ever talked to anyone about your anxiety?  I know its hard but it can really help and there are some good meds out there too.   I was diagnosed with anxiety and got treatment and it helped me loads.  Hope things get better soon. [info] None [info] 1436690434
crys279 [info] I get where you're coming from.  I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and for a while, I thought my Dr was wrong.  I refused to accept it because, like you, I felt like everyone was using it as a fashionable drama outlet.  It wasn't until the third time I tried to take myself of the medication the Dr prescribed and the heart palpitations returned yet again that it sank in that I really did have a problem, and it wasn't made up.  Then suddenly after hearing about my diagnosis and the resulting medications, several people close to me 'developed' the same issues.  ~sigh~ [info] None [info] 1470346918
youjustwaitandsee [info] November by Tyler the Creator. The song came out months before my mother passed away, in November the same year. 2 years prior, I was diagnosed with anxiety, also in November. I broke up with a beard that I really liked and was left quite heartbroken in November, the year Over the Garden wall released.  Not to mention my dad also died in November 2012. Flowerboy is my part of gaming soundtracks. It relaxes me. I had to make a new playlist and exclude the song from the album. [info] None [info] 1557364141
ziggydog [info] My daughter and I both have POTS. I think it's far more common than doctors believe. For years I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, turns out, it was caused by POTS (postural orthostatic tachycardia syndrome). I recommend anyone with anxiety to investigate this condition.  [info] None [info] 1422903873
Jokker_is_the_name [info] Ooh I feel like I can actually answer this one!I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and have had daily panic attacks for about a year (luckily they are less rare now)As far as I know, and please correct me if im wrong, it has to do with your primitive brain. There are people whos brain isnt always too sure whether they are in a real danger or not. The panic attack is often set off by an event or thought. For example someone says someting offensive, or maybe even a little weird. Then the brain gets confused, it thinks whatever a person said is dangerous for you.Most peoples brains know what is in fact actually dangerous, but some people dont. These people get panic attacks.After your brain starts to think you are in danger, you get the classic "fight-or-flight" situation. Adrenaline will be released. And your heart starts pumping faster.So, in short, you primitive brain thinks a tiger is going to attack you, while in actuality someone just said something about your shoes. You think you are in danger and either start to flight, or fight. [info] None [info] 1543140858
DarthDadaD20 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I know it's hard. The whole week up to playing I think if excuses to not play, I get angry and say "why do I even fucking play games".I do the same with other competitive games too. I'll drive to go play Pokemon or miniatures or magic and half way there turn the car around and go home.....make up an excuse to tell my wife why I didn't go.But here are a few things I hope helps you.There are "lfg" (looking for group) pages here on Reddit and other social media. post can help you find games in your area.there are also websites like meetup.com. my small town has a huge meet up page for Dungeons and Dragonsif you're ever at a store and see somebody pick up Lord the rings or Star Wars, magic cards or something else nerdy....they might know of or be interested in the game.As for actually playing, know that many, many players actually suffer with anxiety or other mental disabilities, or even just socially awkward so if you find a group you might not be alone.And I'll tell you. At first I hate myself and just want to go home, but while playing, after getting into it I really do forget all about it and have the most fun, then I feel good the next few days (and then unfortunately the whole cycle starts again) [info] DM [info] 1450397028
Calisayshey [info] MDMA. Changed my life. But on a more serious note, anxiety. People around me always talked about test taking anxiety, but never were serious about it. Not to long ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. Yes it sucks but I never thought it'd be this bad now that I have after going through rough times. Though it all it only made me a better person. I feel like I know how to communicate better and It made me want to pursue psychology. I know a lot of people bash it for having little to no employment opportunities but fuck it. I know where I wanna be and what it'll take to get, but till then I look forward to going to my classes and doing my own research. [7] [info] None [info] 1447147052
AMFYOLO [info] My story's similar to yours. I'm 24. I am diagnosed with anxiety and OCD (and, only recently, depersonalization disorder). Have had hallucinations, have been stuck in the same awful fucking fear loop. God I feel for you. Only recently have I begun to accept what doctors told me for years: I have severe anxiety, which goes into overdrive when I feel that my ego-construct is fundamentally threatened (e.g., by imaginary "psychosis"). All I can say is that I went to many specialists (by the way, keep going), had all the tests, and doubted them all nonetheless. I demanded to be put on antipsychotics (for no reason besides my extreme panic) and they were both unneeded and awful. Been on every med / diet / plan in existence. Your post certainly sounds to me like extreme anxiety; especially considering its coherent sentences / Aristotelian logic / and, your **textbook** disjunctive comparison between you and another, unrelated sufferer. It's true. Most people do not reach *this* level of anxiety; however, I have, and I reassure you, you will not go "crazy," "insane," or "lose it." That is not how psychotic breaks present. It took me a long time to accept that, myself.That is not to say that things won't get difficult. I have never felt a pain in my life like that when I felt *sure* that my inexplicably intense symptoms meant I was losing my mind / life.I implore you to be vigilant; reach out to your support network; and, to remember that you are *not* in danger of losing your mind. The hardest thing is the fear; in 2yrs., this nearly existential fear took me from young professional with a Master's to unemployed drug addict. It helps to surrender yourself to it, and deal with it as mindfully (not frantically) as possible. You are not totalized by your emergent thought patterns. I know it sounds like BS. I know all that. I'm fairly sure my protestations were similar to what yours will be. Nonetheless, try. At some point, this will improve. Also, don't let doctors give you long-term meds or limiting diagnoses without a second opinion. Oh, and, *please* **don't** try to 'figure this out for yourself.' It's not a problem that can be reasoned. I spent 2yrs plus stuck in a torturous thought loop ('oh does that technically constitute anxiety or paranoia?'...'what would the DSMV say?'...'oh is this prodromal schizophrenia?' etc. etc.) That fear generates the worst fucking feeling ever, though, man. I wouldn't wish it on anyone. **p.p.s** severe anxiety is incredibly underrated as a disorder. Besides affect, concentration, mood, etc. symptoms also affect sensory systems.**e**: sorry for the rambling / length, but just had to respond. (edits for clarity / good lord I was in a hurry) [info] None [info] 1450380224
Polaritical [info] People are medication reliant because its cheaper and more profitable than therapy. "Softness" isnt the issue and thats honeslty just offensive. Not being able to handle regular life IS LITERALLY THE FUCKING PROBLEM.  I have anxiety. When its bad, you're correct that I cant deal with normal everyday shit. That's how I was diagnosed with anxiety. Its the only way anybody is diagnosed with a disorder. What anxiety doesnt mean is that I'm soft, and that kind of approach not only doesnt help, it actively hurts recovery.I dont take anxiety medication. Tried them, theyre not for me. I'm LUCKY enough that my insurance will cover therapy. Not everyone is in that position.Don't call people soft for struggling with their disorders. People from the "man up, be hard" are just as fucked up as the rest of us. [info] None [info] 1572187319
happybooksummons [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety prior to being diagnosed with ADHD years later by my primary care physician. I have a strong relationship with her and many years of trust built up. So I went to my annual physical with a list I had worked on for awhile. This was many years ago now, so I don't quite remember what was on that list. I did work on it for several months though. She suggested I try a low dose of medicine and come back in a month. I know that some doctors are more cautious because there are drugseekers out there (especially our age). I think I had a good amount of credibility with my doctor from a long relationship.On the other hand, I really feel like I miss out on having a psychiatrist or therapist to help me develop coping skills. I think that if you are speaking with someone in that camp, maybe you should focus on where you need help developing strategies and coping skills. By virtue of having ADHD, discussing time management skills or learning how to think before speaking will not only help you but will also build a solid base for this person that you do have these symptoms. If your primary care doctor is the one who won't listen to you, finding a psychologist and asking for help in these areas will definitely bring a positive improvement to your life. [info] None [info] 1573622432
Legna23 [info] I don't know if I my advice will help, but I suggest music, just constantly listen to music. Um, if you want to form bonds with people try talking to the select few you can talk to, till your boands are stronger and you can rely on them when you start panicking. If you're panicking with no one around, exuse yourself to the restroom, go into the stalls and breath. Stay in there for as long as you want, don't worry about the teachers or classes. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I graduated highschool, I just had to find my cope and abuse it. Mine was music and busy things like writing essays, I still do it outside of highschool. Let me know what you think.I can relate, literally cuz everything you wrote about I felt to. So, I hope I can help. [info] None [info] 1542669617
ApprehensivePickle2 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety before I was diagnosed with ADHD. Had a Xanax scrip, the whole nine. My first psych doc thought it was odd that Wellbutrin made me less anxious, but we just went with it. Second psych doc (after first one moved away) diagnosed me with ADHD, put me on Adderall (still with Wellbutrin tho) and now I have no more anxiety pretty much. I mean, I get the occasional panic attack every six months or so, but that's only when something triggers it. My day-to-day dread and feeling of restlessness is gone now; I am a cool cucumber. Huzzah for the paradoxical reaction to amphetamines! [info] None [info] 1553372282
chipsahoyguru [info] I’m going through this right now and have one week to get my grade up before the class ends. It’s been so draining. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago and emailed my professor when my panic attack’s were impacting my grade. He responded by saying, “I’m sorry for your personal problem.” And offered virtually no support. I’m really hopeful that I will pass, but it’s not looking great. How did you cope with failing?  [info] None [info] 1551438750
beevibe [info] I scraped through high school, sleeping in every single class every day and maintained an B average. I got to college and holy shit, you cannot do that shit any more. I never used to study and now I have to and I’m struggling. I’m in the process of being diagnosed at the moment because I’ve never needed help until now and I just assumed I was lazy and stupid. I was diagnosed with anxiety in high school and my psychiatrist told me that I could have ADHD without me ever even mentioning it and at first I was like nah because I hadn’t ever considered it, but it definitely made me think and now I’m fairly confident I do. Also since my sister has it and my dad thinks he has it but doesn’t see the reason to get it medicated since he’s learned to cope without it. [info] ADHD [info] 1566178585
idontknowanymooooore [info] Magnesium! I was diagnosed with anxiety but, really, years later as things got worse it came to light that the blood circulation through my left shoulder was being constricted (thoracic outlet syndrome) due to repetitive stress injury. It caused vague nausea that progressed to anxiety "for no apparent reason." Magnesium did wonders! Massage fixed the rest.   [info] vegan newbie [info] 1437851135
MOproblems614 [info] I'm scared they won't be around when I'm old when I was 17 I was with a girl that was 23 she have a script of 120 hydros and 90 blue/purple Xanax I'm 27 now and have never got a constant supply of opioids with back and knee problems and I have been diagnosed with anxiety could not get better than a script of .5 Klonopin I had for 3 years then jerked off of them gave only 2 months to taper down so I'm scared by the time I'm 40 opioids might be a drug of the past [info] None [info] 1561063784
RonanIsRadioactive [info] Thank you very much! I am diagnosed with anxiety, so I definitely think you read that correctly lol. I will keep these priorities in mind.  [info] None [info] 1551756100
kateord417 [info] It’s so sad that we’re afraid to talk about having anxiety. If we’re diagnosed with diabetes and have to take insulin injections, we talk about it all day with zero shame. I was diagnosed with anxiety 15 years ago and was told to not tell anyone. Screw that!! The chemicals in my brain are off, just like the insulin levels in your pancreas are. We aren’t different and shouldn’t be made to feel like we are!!! [info] None [info] 1546007648
flperson [info] 6 months is not excessive time to try out a new treatment for anxiety.I have been diagnosed with anxiety by a few different Dr.s over the years and trying CBD oil is the only time I have self treated with something that is not a prescription.I've talked to many doctors, I cannot afford one currently.We are having this conversation because you don't know what you're talking about and hopefully my explanations and experiences can help someone..."Get some medicaid/Medicare... It's pretty much free if he's actually broke."  I hope this comment is just you being silly or sarcastic or something... Getting useful coverage through the gov't is not easy in any way. My wife and I and one child had a household income last year of $24,000 before taxes. This gets me "medically necessary" coverage through medicare which is only good for emergency services above a certain amount. (I believe this is $5000, but am not sure ). That's it. There are county/state programs and income based fee services, which I have tried in the past, but they are another story in itself. Right now CBD is something that a bunch of people are having great results with and I thought I would try it out since I don't need a prescription and the possible side effects are negligible. That's pretty much it... [info] None [info] 1549300829
myparadog [info] I had a kinda similar experience with the ADHD episode but I have to give some background first. So this will be a long post. You can skip this middle part it just kinda explains how I used to think.I was diagnosed with ADHD when I was 12. Meds were thrown at me without any real explanation so I fought back hard. I’m very stubborn and strong willed. Something I’ve apparently inherited from my dad. For better or worse. I’m very logical in my thinking though. I have to have evidence and proof and then I’ll make up my own mind about things. I wasn’t given that and was told I had to take these pills. So I fought to the point of hiding and throwing away pills until my mom gave up trying to fight me. Nothing was ever explained as to why I had to take them. It was just said that it will make it easier to concentrate. That wasn’t a good enough reason for me. Then at 13 right before 8th grade I was taken to a psychologist or something. I don’t really remember. My grades were all over the place from 6th and 7th grade and my mom was concerned I would end up failing 8th because they changed the grading scale. They had actually changed it in my favor come to find out but that didn’t save me from being dragged quite angrily to this appointment, where my mom, dad, and I were told the same thing from the previous year. They gave me the same prescription but a stronger dose and sent me on my way. I was livid. That proscription never made it to the pharmacy. Later that day I went in my mom’s purse where the prescription was sticking out, I took it out and shoved it under the tree rack thingy. My mom confronted a few days later when she remembered about needing to drop off the prescription. She asked me if I threw it away. Which I told her I didn’t. Which wasn’t technically lying. She eventually let it go because she didn’t want to keep fighting and I put up a good front on trying to “help” her find it. I can be devious when I need to be. I waited months before actually throwing the prescription away. I had more trouble with school that year but mostly because of my previous teachers just being horrible. The 2 previous years I had very vindictive science teachers. One even shut a door in my face and later yelled at me because of something a “friend” said about another “friend”. Middle school was horrible! Between feuding friends, teachers yelling at me for no reason, and slamming doors in my face is a miracle I ever did pass.Now I’m about to be 30 at the end of this month. All that was back in 2001-2003. I’ve been through a lot since then that has opened my mind to all kinds of things but it wasn’t until I heard the ADHD episode where I was kinda able to diagnose myself (knowing I had already been professionally diagnosed) but it was explained in greater detail and firsthand experience was given. That had never been explained to me like that before. It was pushed on me as a reason I was failing classes. When in reality I don’t think that was everything. In all honesty I really do love my ADHD tendencies it’s very freeing and I can be super creative, the meds stopped that. Which I told them I didn’t like but I was a kid and ignored. I never thought they did enough investigation into what I was really going through. They just wanted a quick fix and I wasn’t going to get the fast food treatment. December 31, 2018  after 2 weeks of anxiety attacks every other day I was diagnosed with anxiety. The day previous I nearly lost my job over an anxiety attack caused by my manager. I’m on Prozac now and I’ve never felt better. I honestly think the anxiety had more of an effect on me than anything else I faced. Even as a kid it was crippling back then at times. I missed a lot of school because I couldn’t face being around people some days. To know what’s truly going on and able to put a name to it, not a label or excuse, but to really know there’s a way to help... I’ve also taken quiz prior to all this that say I show 66% OCD tendencies and after listening to Stuff You Should Know’s episode on Dyslexia, I have some of those symptoms as well. It’s a good episode and goes into detail about it and it not what most think it is because those with it have a hard time explaining exactly what’s going on and it effects everyone differently.I’ve always been smart and can be taught anything... as long as it’s taught in a way I understand. I am notorious for hearing or reading a sentence and can’t understand it unless it’s explained in a different way. But even if I don’t it’s still something worth looking into because it could lead to understanding something else about myself.Sorry for such a long post I totally did mean to write all that but I kept thinking of things to add. I say all that though because I totally understand how empowering it can be to really understand yourself. [info] None [info] 1552441715
kazoodles [info] I'm not able to empathize entirely nor am I religious, but I can see why you would fear over blaspheming by consuming this kind of content. A lot of SMT concepts are based on real life beliefs and practices, such as the belief that YHVH isn't in fact the perfect creator god or demon summoning. I mention the former solely because it seems like a really common theme in any game that he's mentioned. Anyone on the chaos or neutral side of things hints towards the diversity of gods which in turn is a rejection of monotheism and more specifically, YHVH's rejection of lesser gods. --I experience similar feelings, albeit they're probably not relate-able. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and psychosis 2 years ago which I believe started as a result of me dabbling in the occult as well as already having a predisposition to anxiety and intrusive thoughts. Getting into SMT has helped me by exposing myself to material that would previously send me into panic attacks. I remember playing Persona 3 for the first time two decembers ago and slightly shaking throughout the experience because of the demon names. Now the intrusive thoughts aren't as common and recently I've been getting anxiety about it likely because I just switched medication. I used to think that I was being possessed or that god would punish me(at the moment of the panic attack), although I didn't in reality believe in either of those things. It's easy to develop fears or worries related to these games if you're religious regardless of whether you see it as just fiction. But I doubt any christian would feel entirely comfortable with wanting to punch god in the face, especially considering how close to detail he's portrayed thematically in most of the games. Even if it were blasphemous in some weird, convoluted way God loves you and knows you don't have malicious intentions.  [info]  [info] 1479787341
motherbitcher [info] Hey, so I'm not a doctor, but I have dealt with almost the exact same symptoms as you. I was diagnosed with anxiety, and put on a daily low dose regimen of buspar. It's a non-narcotic med for anxiety that is not habit forming or a sedative. Within a week of taking it, the chest pain eased up, palpitations went away, and I felt better overall. I'm not saying this is anxiety for sure, and at 300 pounds, I am a little concerned about your cardiac health, but you might see your regular doc and ask about anxiety. You don't have to feel anxious to have physical symptoms (and the pounding heart/rock in your gut feeling is really common in my experience).Good luck! [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1501981719
urbanwolf [info] Do you have a therapist or psychiatrist? It might help to have someone to talk to, and they can also help you figure out what is going on and whether you do have aspergers or possibly another condition. Figuring that out can be beneficial. If you do have Aspergers or possibly something like social phobia there are things you can do to work on your social skills which could help. A therapist/psychiatrist/etc can help with this. You don't have to struggle alone. I also think I might have Aspergers, or something else going on. I'm planning to bring this up to my new psychiatrist when I see her soon. I have been diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder and social phobia but I feel like there's something more going on. [info] None [info] 1483783878
mar736 [info] I don’t think it does, honestly. I am currently 28 weeks pregnant. I have worried since the day I find out. Before every ultrasound, every appointment. I kept telling myself that I wouldn’t be anxious anymore after x milestone (like reaching 12 weeks, or the anatomy scan, etc). However, I will say the anxiety has at least lessened. Now that I can feel my baby move a lot, I am at least reassured that he’s okay. Whereas before, there was just no way to know until my next appointment. I was diagnosed with anxiety before pregnancy, so definitely something that I was expecting to have to deal with. I think some of it is that and the other part is the expected being a worried mom. Therapy helps. What helped me a lot and still does is reminding myself that right now, at this moment in time, there is no reason to believe that my baby/pregnancy is not healthy. More likely than not it’ll stay that way. ALSO. Stay off of google. Google made me so much anxious than I already was. [info] None [info] 1569361583
anniemalplanet [info] Yep.  And to add, I think people who get anxiety diagnoses later in life struggle with that more.  My SIL was diagnosed last year and she's now "disabled" and pops benzos all day to supposedly deal with it, and just sleeps and neglects her kids.  Meanwhile, her brother and I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders since we were children and had to learn to actually manage our disorders in order to live productive lives.  It takes some time to learn how to manage and I feel like when it comes later, you're so set in habits that it's hard to want to learn how to manage the disorder. [info] Jenelle's old hair feathers [info] 1568997682
clarissagilmore [info] I agree with this so much! I was diagnosed with anxiety recently and one thing that made me feel so much better was googling and reading about all the famous people who have come out and talked about their anxiety. Seeing those people in the public eye, being successful and trying their best despite what they’re going through makes me feel like I can do it and survive my simple little life.  [info] None [info] 1553242482
tortillaslut [info] I did this too, could only sleep if I knew someone else was awake. {thankfully my step dad was always up super late watching TV} I was diagnosed with anxiety and once I turned 18 and moved out of that house I never really had that problem. &amp;#x200B;I guess it was because it was an older house, and I was constantly afraid of fires or something happening so I needed someone awake in case anything happened. [info] None [info] 1561400249
ChocChipCookiee [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, I have panic attacks often but they feel very different to what I described above. My panic attacks are often a result of my worrying, followed by increased heart rate and heavy breathing. I often begin crying and getting angry as well but my anxiety attacks feel very different to what I described previous. Also to answer your question, I am not on any medication beside a few herbal extracts to ease my symptoms - however I haven't been on them enough to say if they have any effects or not  [info] None [info] 1441539765
YControlHer [info] PA resident here also! I thought about getting my card after they added anxiety to the list, but with this Tom Wolfe stuff going on about recreational use, I'm not sure if it's worth it. Nor and I sure how I would go about that (I have been diagnosed with anxiety). If it's not too much to ask, how were you able to obtain your card? I live in North Eastern PA and am not really sure what kind of medical dispensaries are around. [info] None [info] 1571844783
Mynipsareonfire [info] Sure.  I was diagnosed with anxiety, and it turns out I have a disorder of the autonomic nervous system.  Is it because doctors see women and think "anxiety" or is it because women are actually more anxious? [info] None [info] 1502253093
kaykorvid [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety at 12, so I'm no stranger to it, but I control it really well nowadays. [info] None [info] 1558357984
ExcitingPanic [info] I'm not exactly sure why I am depressed. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago and it's definitely more under control than it used to be, I suppose maybe one reason could be I'm studying on a demanding course, but I still feel these emotions even during the summer holidays. Other than that, I have a very nice life, good family and friends, I should be more grateful for that [info] None [info] 1562515007
AncientPotential [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was a kid. I dont think my mom ever quite understood that I wasnt faking when I said I COULDNT go to school, and I'm not sure I ever explained to her what I was feeling. She even went as far as to tell me I should take a pregnancy test (at 13) when I would wake up every weekday morning dry heaving for an hour or 2. Years later, she tells me my step-father keeps thinking he is having a stroke or some other neurological issue (they had CAT scans done and everything) cause his face and hands keep going numb, and his heart will just start beating out of his chest. I told her to ask their doctor about anxiety and LO AND BEHOLD, thats exactly what he had. My mom felt really bad for all those mornings she yelled at me and made me go to class.Until you think your are legitimately dying because your body goes numb and you might ACTUALLY shit your pants, ya aint had the anxious. [info] None [info] 1559674899
kvng967 [info] this is very true. the difference between stress and anxiety is that stress is temporary (maybe it last for a week or two or until a specific situation that's stressing you out it resolved) and usually doesn't disrupt your life this much. I was diagnosed with anxiety when i was in middle school and these are also the symptoms I had. you should try to see a therapist or even the school counselor could greatly help [info] None [info] 1550758956
IAmASpy [info] Confirmed, before I was diagnosed with anxiety issues I'd use cigs every time I got really anxious. I started smoking a lot when I first started and whenever I got upset I'd at the very least stick my hand in my pocket and touch the filter of a cigarette. [info] None [info] 1302129114
allergic-to-life [info] From my grandfather "you know when I was diagnosed with anxiety at your age (17), I worked everyday that summer until I have enough to not be anxious." [info] None [info] 1566357650
mckski [info] 1.That I am always anxious. Yes I am diagnosed with anxiety but that doesn't mean I cant be confident and be able to talk to random people I can I just need to be in a good mindset2. That I hate soical interactions, I love meeting new people, talking to tourists, making new friends and talking I just so happen not to be very good at it [info] None [info] 1565048509
HowdoIreddittellme [info] It depends on a number of factors: age, comprehension of what they are being told, belief that such abnormalities make someone "weak" or "broken". In my personal life, I was diagnosed with ADHD and Anxiety at 9 and 13 respectively. When I was diagnosed with ADHD at 9, it didn't mean much to me, I was nine, I wanted to watch TV and play. However at 13, when I was diagnosed with anxiety, it was somewhat crushing. I thought it meant I couldn't cope with life, and that I needed help that other kids didn't, that I couldn't keep up.If someone who received the news that they had some kind of mental condition or abnormality was raised in a family that taught that mental illness wasn't to a thing to be ashamed of, that it was ok, they might react like they would if they were told they had a physical disease. However, if you were raised to believe that mental illness meant you were weak, it might be a death blow to self esteem. [info] None [info] 1497444580
buttpincher [info] Looks like you're running out of fucks to give but remember don't run out of fucks for yourself. Seriously though and I know it's cliche and it's said time and again... exercise and proper diet do wonders. I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder after being rushed to the hospital in September in a state of fear and panic. My heart rate was over 150bpm and before that happened I was very similar to what you have described yourself to be now. My doctor told me "look I can put you on Xanax or something similar but first I want you to try and lose weight and exercise"... I told him I would but initially I didn't. I had an anxiety attack almost 3x a week all of September until I finally had enough.I've been on a Keto diet for 1.5months, down 28lbs and have not had an anxiety attack since I started the diet. Yesterday was the first day I actually worked out after losing weight with just the diet... and it felt great. Hang in there you can get through this, you've made it this far.  [info] None [info] 1479186113
dna12453 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder last year. I’ve improved a lot, but initially i did have a lot of problems and before I knew it was anxiety i mostly j took a shot before or something. I saw a therapist for a few weeks and that helped. Pretty close to normal now. [info] None [info] 1545064737
AlexKTuesday [info] No, mine do not necessarily trump their conditions. I've been diagnosed with anxiety as well, and if I could pick to have one or the other, I'm not sure what I'd choose. They're both crippling in their own ways.However, there are been a lot of reputable studies showing the benefits of MM (specifically, strains high in CBD%) for epilepsy patients but the evidence isn't as concrete for the other conditions I mentioned. [info] None [info] 1457014888
fiver_gotacrucifix [info] Hi Everyone! So this is my first post for this group and I hope others consider joining and sharing their stories/thoughts. Currently also have a [small Facebook group](https://www.facebook.com/groups/1003848139806616/) that's part of a grass-roots organization of the same name as [this group](https://www.facebook.com/Caregiver-Compass-410827466148449/?modal=admin_todo_tour). Hoping people will like and visit both, but being Facebook and its privacy issues, totally understand hesitation. Anyway, came to Reddit because it seems like an easier place to share things. But onto my story. I'm a semi-informal caregiver.&amp;#x200B;I'm an older millennial, no children of my own but am...the most responsible of my siblings. My parents are senior citizens and are currently taking care of my niece because her parents are currently incapable (not ready to go into the whys of that situation). Anyway, it's been super hard and challenging. I live a few cities from them, so I try to visit on a weekly basis to give support and relief. My niece is young and super sweet, but because of her upbringing, there are challenges. Plus, she's young and my parents are seniors. It's hard to watch them try to muster the energy to do all the things one needs to when you have a child under 10 in your home. I am not married and not financially able to care for a child and truthfully, I've never felt stable enough in any capacity to be a mom. I was diagnosed with anxiety in my twenties, PTSD, and have been in recovery for an ED for several years- not that people like me can't be mothers, but I just don't feel with all my challenges I can guarantee a stable household for my niece which is why I didn't take her when the courts called.&amp;#x200B;When my parents took her, I begged them to strongly consider all the challenges they would face and wanted the entire family to discuss the best way to handle the situation. This didn't happen and as I've mentioned it's been a challenge. My parents are wonderful, but sometimes I don't think they can handle children. All of me and my siblings are half siblings. Growing up, it was usually just me and with the exception of myself, my parents have had to deal with being "full-time, having a kid in your face 24/7 parents." I was a very independent somewhat introverted child who kept to myself. They didn't need to help me with school projects or many "kid" things, so it's been a shock for them to now, in their golden years, be working on book projects and new math. I feel horrible for them, horrible for my niece who is a victim of the circumstances she was born into, and honestly, a little for myself because I feel forced into witnessing this horror show by just being involved as much as I am. Of course, I could just severe ties with my family, but I love/like my parents, adore my niece and it's neither of their fault this has happened. The courts have not been helpful in holding the responsibly parties in this mess accountable. When I think about the situation too long, I become physically ill. Mostly, I try to be pragmatic and have a positive attitude, visiting for movie dates, helping with homework and just being an ear for my mother, who is doing a lot of work, since my dad isn't retired yet. If anyone is going through something similar please feel free to share. When we hear the word caregiving, we often thinking of caring for someone older (and I do a lot for my parents, though they are still self reliant and, grace of God, in good health), but it's also really hard to care for a young person who is just getting their start with so many odds against them and the people who created them won't step up. 'sigh'. Thanks for listening to this really long, self pitying (sorry!) post. [info] None [info] 1555956449
digitallambs [info] The problem is I absolutely love and am super passionate about everything  I'm doing and I want to take more and more complex classes but my brain has recently just stopped cooperating and thats the most frustrating part of it all. I'll talk to my advisors and plan to figure it out over the summer. I'm just hoping it clears up like the crippling anxiety in the beginning (like taking 3-4 hrs to get the courage to drive 3 mins to the grocery store for bread bad) but to be fair I've been diagnosed with anxiety and thats why I was originally put on SSRIs bc my doc didn't believe I had migraines even though when I went to a neuro they were so severe she rushed me into an MRI to make sure it wasn't a tumor (don't know if thats common but it wasn't all in my head that's for sure) [info] None [info] 1492610996
CyanHalo [info] Yes, I've been diagnosed with anxiety/adhd for 15 years and was diagnosed ptsd from witnessing several overdoses and near deaths of my ex husband. My daughter is only 4 but she does display similar symptoms that I had when I was a child with both anxiety and adhd. I'm not jumping to conclusions with her and it hasn't gotten to the point in which I feel like she needs to be checked out for it. I'm lucky to be able to work from home the vast majority of the time so I would be there to make sure that the animals had exercise and training. I'd also like to have both of them trained to be service animals. I'm willing to invest in it financially for both to get them trained correctly. I'm picking out not "favorite" animals necessarily but I have had this planned since 2012 with the pig and was just waiting until both of my dogs had the end of life with no new animals being spoiled. I have wanted a pig due to the intelligence and longer life span. My daughter has wanted a husky since she first saw one. I hear what you guys are saying and I get it. I am sure that its an imposition to not only have me and my kid there but my animals there for them. Even if they don't have any responsibilities for them, its the principle I think you're really meaning that is the issue. In my brain, I'm all justifying it because I'll be there or bringing them to the office with me 100% of the time. I also justified it because my sheepdog was massive with even more hair and the most hyper dog that I've ever encountered until late in life. I understand by hearing your feedback that regardless of the justifications, its the principle and a respect thing. So, if I was to get 1. The pig would certainly be smaller than a husky and I'd be able to litter box train or adopt one that already is. In my head that means it would be the better option. However, I think the pig word for the parents is an unknown and that is more of a concern.What do you think is the best compromise for the time being? You are right and I should compromise. I'm picking out not "favorite" animals necessarily but I have had this planned since 2012 with the pig and was just waiting until both of my dogs had the end of life with no new animals being spoiled.  [info] None [info] 1523371230
sunnys1deups1dedown [info] If a woman smiles repeatedly, looks at you with interest, or strikes up a conversation, then you probably aren’t going to bother her but please don’t do a cold approach. I live in a big city and walk most places, so I end up being approached by men fairly often. I’ve been physically cornered, creepily leered at, and followed (among other unsettling experiences), so now I don’t want to talk to anyone on the street — like, ever. When someone approaches, my first instinct is “God, please no, leave me alone,” followed by “please ignore me, please ignore me, please ignore me.” Yes, I have been diagnosed with anxiety so maybe my reactions are more negative than others would have, but I don’t see why it’s necessary to insert yourself into someone else’s day just because you find them physically attractive. I always feel gross and objectified (and sometimes scared) when this happens, and I’ve never once enjoyed the experience or handed over my number. TL;DR: Only approach women who seem interested in you or who make contact first. Otherwise, just go about your day. [info] None [info] 1563770446
underdogkitten [info] "Well, don't feel [insert emotion here]." My nmom uses this anytime I try to voice a problem, particularly when I use I statements to voice how I feel about a situation. Such as "I feel that you going through my things makes me uncomfortable and it makes me feel anxious (I have been diagnosed with anxiety issues and she knows this)." This would prompt her to brush off what I'm saying with "Well, don't feel anxious. It's not a big deal." [info] None [info] 1421373020
StuffandThings91 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, but I think doctors over-diagnose it and over-prescribe Xanax. A lot of the time it's a normal human emotion and taking a pill to stop it is not right. [info] None [info] 1484920148
45MinutesOfRoadHead [info] Anxiety. When I was in college I would start driving to campus, get to campus, and wind up walking into the student center for coffee and stay there instead of going to class. I never understood why I would do this. I knew I should go to class, and when it came time to actually go I would divert and go somewhere else. I still can't pinpoint exactly what about going to class freaked me out so much, because I like people and I'm a very social person. I wound up withdrawing.It wasn't until I had a nervous breakdown that I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on zoloft. Zoloft helped, and while it kept me from freaking out, it kept me from getting excited at the same time. I eventually came off of it and now live unmedicated, but I still experience invasive thoughts of doom daily. I've decided I won't have more than one child because I don't think I could handle worrying that much. I'm always assuming my son is going to die from anything at any second, and I can't imagine what it'd be like if I had another.Also, I have ADHD. That goes like "The dishes need to be done, start dishes, but wait! There's something sticky on the counter, stop the dishes and wipe the counter. Did I lock the door? Gotta check. Hold up, do the cats have food in their bowl? Go check food, then put the laundry in the dryer. Hold on, you have to pee. The counter is cluttered. Start putting things away. Oh yeah! Dishes! Go finish dishes before you do this. But don't forget to dry your clothes!" [info] None [info] 1481902157
novusflorae [info] DO IT! DO IT! DO IT!Well, I have been wanting to do comedy for a very long time. But I always chalked it up to "oh, but I am just conversationally funny." Last year I met a girl who ended up being my other half - one of my closest pals. Her and I clown all the time, and it really opened up a can of worms. I started to go to more and more comedy shows, frequenting open mic nights, and really just enjoying watching people just give it a try. I was going to do a routine last summer time, but I always made up excuses of why not to. THEN three weeks ago I was diagnosed with anxiety/ADD - ADD I totally expected, but anxiety wasn't even on my radar. BOTH explained so much. I started to take Ritalin to help me focus, then all of a sudden I was able to actually do all the different creative stuff that I always felt overwhelmed by. Started to paint (first time in 2 years), sew, and write down comedy monologues.My friend was hosting an open mic this weekend, and I felt, "what the fuck, just go ahead and do it." So, I had a funny thought about how excited I am when I get my period even when I know for damn certain that I did not have sex in the past 28 days and I know I couldn't be pregnant - After seeing a drop of blood during a restroom break at work. I sat down at my computer right after and wrote down a stream of thought. Practiced it for three days, and it turned out to be set for the night.  As for the courage - I am not sure. Haha, I didn't feel that much anxiety going up to the mic when my name was called. I do not have problem with public speaking - I was a TA for undergrad/grad courses and a MS/HS class tutor for 4 years. I really don't care about getting laughs for my jokes, because really I just LOVE a captive audience. Its empowering to have someone have to pay attention to you because they're future depends on it. With my students it was their grades, and for the audience its if they're going to have a good time or not. I would joke around with my students, and their bonus question would be "What joke did Ms. Novus make when talking about mitochondria?"It wasn't that bad, and everyone was super encouraging. Even if I had bombed, that would have been great too. Because I know not everyone likes grapefruit, and that doesn't make the grapefruit any less of a grapefruit.  [info] None [info] 1531152394
shlorpwastaken [info] Thanks for the reply! I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder but the therapist I was seeing was a bad first experience unfortunately so I haven't tried getting help again. I am highly considering it now that it's becoming such a huge roadblock for me no pun intended. [info] None [info] 1565272678
cowdog2014 [info] As I was reading this it sounded more and more like myself- I was diagnosed with anxiety. I started showing symptoms when I was very young, panic attacks when I was 10, but wasn’t taken to a psychologist until I was 13. Speaking from personal experience, the sooner you get into therapy the earlier he can learn coping mechanisms. If it’s not addressed soon, I’m afraid it will just get worse and worse. Also, it sounds like he has an awesome childhood, and you care deeply about his wellbeing. Please don’t be afraid to take him to see a mental health specialist because of the stigma, and don’t blame yourself for this. I had a great childhood and have amazing parents who always questioned themselves as to how I got anxiety so young. It could just be in his genes, and does not mean you did anything wrong as a parent. Good luck!  [info] None [info] 1525952217
Good_day_sunshine [info] So after my first child was born, I started in this same anxiety cycle as you are now.  I was so worried about me dying and leaving my kid without a mother.   I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year later. Do you think maybe you are struggling with anxiety in some other area in your life, and projecting it into this?  That was the case for me. I still worry about death, but getting a better control in my anxiety overall has helped the negative thoughts.  [info] None [info] 1519355475
landsharkkidd [info] I have anxiety, and so two years ago during my final year of high school (when I was diagnosed with anxiety) whenever I'd get a panic attack at school I'd sit in the stairwell during class and breathe and think happy thoughts, or watch youtube videos and laugh at funny videos, or try to have a friend with me to talk to me about things. I never had intense anxiety that it'd stop me from learning, but I hope maybe that helps? Though I figure a lot of people do the same thing as me but I hope you get better, and it sucks that you're experiencing this much anxiety that it stops you from learning.  [info] None [info] 1424312636
InnerMattDemons [info] Contrast:I have been diagnosed with anxiety for around 11 years by now. I've been working on managing it for all those 11 years, with mixed effect.I know I'm "wrong" - in that I'm unable to do a lot of things that should be simple. I hate myself for this. Truly, deep down inside hate myself, for being unable to do so many basic things. I don't want to bother people, so when it's bad I have a really hard time reaching out. I just isolate myself and feel lonely, wishing I could get away from the constant bombardment of thoughts about how awful I am, and how many things I cannot do.So, I'm working on trying to accept myself more. Not hate myself for my flaws and limitations. Not hit myself in the head with all the simple things I cannot get myself to do.Stuff isn't always easy to fix. God knows I'd love to not feel this way; I go to weekly therapy, have listened to innumerable audiobooks, lectures, YouTube videos, ... about it.I'd love to be able to fix it that easily. I haven't managed in 11 years.So, I'm sorry for trying to embrace it and not hate myself for once. No one wants to feel this way, and it isn't always easy to fix.---More constructively: If you see someone who is clearly holding themself in a destructive or dysfunctional pattern, perhaps they don't know how to break it. Perhaps they just don't know how to do it in a better way. Perhaps they get overwhelmed by trying to change it. There can be a myriad of reasons.Rather than look down on them for not fixing it, you might consider talking to them about it. Perhaps even offer to help them with it. That way lies progress; not in judging someone for the things they have a hard time with. [info] None [info] 1556531824
pattywGon234 [info] Mental health.I need money to live on my own and start feeling better about myself. I need a job to get money. In order to get a job, I need to a) have some kind of career in mind and b) impress someone enough to hire me.I can't do either of those 2 things in my current state. I have been diagnosed with anxiety / panic disorder in the past, but I suspect I may be also dealing with ADD and/or OCD. I also have a gastrointestinal disorder that is most likely related to the anxiety - that bothers me from the moment I wake to the moment I fall asleep. So to be quite honest, life fucking sucks right now. I'm overwhelmed with all of the things that need to be addressed, and as I've deepened into this funk my social skills and confidence have fallen off completely. I overthink every single moment in life.  Almost every single one of my friends and peers had no problems getting job offers and knowing what they wanted to do. I feel like the only one who's completely fucking lost and it's so frustrating.  [info] None [info] 1535476367
happyandfree45 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD as well. Nearly killed myself before I went to the therapy. I've been put on a medication to help, the first two meds didn't pan out, but now I'm finally on one that works wonderfully. I'm so glad you have an amazing support group, that is therapy in itself. Every day will get better! [info] SoNP, NC since 6/2014 [info] 1428823844
MagicHobbes [info] I don't mean to hijack the top comment but I sort of need help myself. I know for a fact I don't have insomnia. I've been diagnosed with anxiety but my lack of sleep goes past that.I spend a lot of time in front of a screen. It's the just the way my life works at the moment with work, school, and free time. I enjoy it, I love computers and I like spending time doing things I enjoy but my lack of sleep is really bothering me more and more.The problem is I've tried different methods (like turning everything off early, taking melatonin, etc.) but nothing seems to work consistently or for long enough. /r/asmr does work sometimes but it's not nearly consistent enough to rely on.I feel like there's nothing I can do to fix my sleep patterns. I'm simply thinking about way too much if I'm just lying there and I get stressed out and NEED to watch a video or something to help me fall asleep. I don't spend all of my time on my computer by any means (and I absolutely love hanging out in the real world with people I care about) but it is both good work and a really important hobby to me so I can't just give up electronics completely.I just don't know what to call my problems and I don't know what I have. I guess I'm just wondering if you have any advice? Sorry for the super long comment.**TL;DR:** I just am thinking about too much if I'm simply lying in bed with nothing happening. It's like I NEED to distract my brain to trick it into sleep. /r/asmr has been the best method but I need a way to get consistent with my sleep schedule. [info] None [info] 1394522336
obladi- [info] To completely simplify the whole situation and get down to the basics: you should never be with someone who doesn’t want you to feel your absolute best at all times.I was diagnosed with anxiety long before I started dating my boyfriend. He doesn’t suffer from any mental health issues whatsoever and sometimes has difficulty in understanding how I’m feeling when I’m at my worst, but he is ALWAYS supportive and does anything he can to be present and sympathetic when I need him. Everybody deserves that. You deserve that, OP. If you’re struggling and there’s an option for you that could potentially improve your health and quality of life, fuck whoever wants to keep you from going down that path.  [info] None [info] 1533360579
Mollinator5 [info] I’ve been typed mostly INTJ, ISTJ and INTP.How old are you? What's your gender? Give us a general description of yourself.I am 17 years old and female. I am quiet and never talk to strangers unless online or they happen to have the same interests as me somehow or know of an assignment I missed. When I am with my friends, I am extremely obnoxious, loud, sometimes rude (like swearing and calling them ‘dumbass,’ but I don’t actually think they are...usually).Is there a medical diagnosis that may impact your mental stability somehow?I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. I possibly have excoriation disorder (literally go to a therapist for it).Describe your upbringing. Did it have any kind of religious or structured influence? How did you respond to it?I was raised barely Catholic (we only prayed on holidays). I responded by saying how Jesus can’t be born. Because the Holy Spirit doesn’t have semen and therefore can’t procreate with Mary. I am one for modernism in the Scoped Trials.What do you do as a job or as a career (if you have one)? Do you like it? Why or why not?I am unemployed as a high schooler. If I were to do a career, it would be something medical without massive blood (opposite of trauma surgery).If you had to spend an entire weekend by yourself, how would you feel? Would you feel lonely or refreshed?I would be kind of both. Like I would want to be refreshed in the morning and afternoon, but then during the evening I would like to chat a little. If I were given a single player game, I would not care if I was alone for a weekend if it meant I could play the game.What kinds of activities do you prefer? Do you like, and are you good at sports? Do you enjoy any other outdoor or indoor activities?I love video games (First Person Shooters, RPG, and strategy). I also draw and study anatomy or history for fun. I am not good at sports but made 2nd for my table tennis championship. It was teams, so I was carried. I hate the outdoors since I am allergic to bug bites and they will bite me anywhere...I mean anywhere. Probably TMI.How curious are you? Do you have more ideas then you can execute? What are your curiosities about? What are your ideas about - is it environmental or conceptual, and can you please elaborate?I am very curious about the future and kind of pessimistic. I honestly think the future will be like Wall-E where it is a trash planet in less than 10,000 years. Literally. But I like to think for fun about futuristic cars, technology and how it could work. And I have no clue if it is environmental or conceptual. I think conceptual? I don’t daydream much but when I do, if it isn’t about my science fiction character, it’s about how the world will end and hypothetical scenarios like zombies, epidemic, etc..Would you enjoy taking on a leadership position? Do you think you would be good at it? What would your leadership style be?Nope, nope, and nope. I would be meh. I would expect everyone to do the task I assigned them and if they don’t, well, I will be pissed as fuck. I will show it like Gordon Ramsey bashing dishes LOL. If it is acquaintances, probably would keep it to myself but be passive aggressive and ask them if they could do this part of what I assigned.Are you coordinated? Why do you feel as if you are or are not? Do you enjoy working with your hands in some form? Describe your activity?I have no clue what that question is asking. And I do, love clay and pottery. It’s satisfying, soothes my skin (sensitive skin, red and itchy when many materials touch it) and is fun to do.Are you artistic? If yes, describe your art? If you are not particular artistic but can appreciate art please likewise describe what forums of art you enjoy. Please explain your answer.I do draw time from time of humans. I still haven’t decided on a style. I like Marvel Comics art style though! Kind of cartoony but mainly realistic lineart.What's your opinion about the past, present, and future? How do you deal with them?I groan whenever I see political stuff like racism or sexism. It is bad but if I see it, I will just be angry, so I avoid it whenever I can, one reason I hate the past (yet like history class) and despise the present in terms of news. Although that black hole photo made me extremely excited for once! So cool. And the future I think will be crap, but at least I will be dead by the time it explodes, sun eats it, nuclear explosion occurs, etcHow do you act when others request your help to do something (anything)? If you would decide to help them, why would you do so?I will help them. I secretly want a reward but also want to look nice. Usually I don’t get a reward and I won’t be bothered.Do you need logical consistency in your life?Yes. No evidence, I won’t believe it. Also I hate saying 100% because most of the time that is literally impossible. It could be 99.9%. That’s why the personality tests make me a bit mad. They say definitely agree. Does that mean like 99.9% agree? I think nothing is definite, so I rarely answer the far left or right.How important is efficiency and productivity to you?Keep work consistent and I am fine. Efficiency is how everything is produced and cycled smoothly.Do you control others, even if indirectly? How and why do you do that?I don’t. I may criticize them for doing something, but not control.What are your hobbies? Why do you like them?Video games because I go at my pace and I get power and control. And I can do things that you can’t in real life like parkour, kill people with a motorcycle, hack appliances, etc..What is your learning style? What kind of learning environments do you struggle with most? Why do you like/struggle with these learning styles? Do you prefer classes involving memorization, logic, creativity, or your physical senses?I am both audio and visual. I struggle with stupidity. By that, I mean people who CONSTANTLY talk during class. They make me want to rip my hair out. And I do literally sometimes (I know it’s bad). Also people who lack common sense. I also hate pushover teachers. I prefer classes that aren’t math. My favorite class would probably be biology. I am taking Anatomy soon and bet that will be number one. It is memorization, but partially logic in knowing how human parts connect. I hate numbers.How good are you at strategizing? Do you easily break up projects into manageable tasks? Or do you have a tendency to wing projects and improvise as you go?I am okay. And yes, I think I can easily do that. I sometimes wing projects, but it is less compared to me planning ahead.What are your aspirations in life, professionally and personally?I want to have a job I like that pays okay, find a best friend who shares every single thing I would want, and I guess other clichés like romance.What are your fears? What makes you uncomfortable? What do you hate? Why?Those CGI bacteria animations scare the shit out of me. Spiders, lobsters, crabs, deep marine creatures like that toothless looking shark with a huge mouth and tardigrades scare me to hell. I hate clowns and also when someone is framed in a show and everyone doesn’t believe them.What do the "highs" in your life look like?Seeing huge discoveries on the news that are science related, being praised, winning a game, being with my dog and watching YouTube videos about video game companies being greedy or lazy.What do the "lows" in your life look like?Meltdowns, getting a B or lower on any assignment or test, my excessive skin and hair picking (literally my scalp hurts a lot because there are two large torn off scabs on my scalp), and my 17 surgeries were lows.How attached are you to reality? Do you daydream often, or do you pay attention to what's around you? If you do daydream, are you aware of your surroundings while you do so?I am pretty attached. I obsess over staring at live action actors or actresses to see how awkward them acting is and I am usually not engaged emotionally in shows or movies. The few that made me actually cry were Violet Evergarden (anime drama about love), A Silent Voice (some anime of a dead girl), and that one Shiba Inu or something that stayed at a station waiting for his master then at the end he dies, finally leaving the station. I daydream a quarter of the time. And I am aware usually.Imagine you are alone in a blank, empty room. There is nothing for you to do and no one to talk to. What do you think about?I am alone. Well, it depends. Why am I there? Captured? I would yell and then get tired and look for a way out. If for fun, I would think about our ending of humanity, video game news, my fictional character and then go to sleep to be let out of the room (time going quicker).How long do you take to make an important decision? And do you change your mind once you've made it?It takes forever if important. If like a food order, I’ll be a little shy but mainly because of my appearance. And I change my mind half of the time then back and fourth.How long do you take to process your emotions? How important are emotions in your life?Not long. If I am pissed, I am pissed. If I am sad, I will know. If I am elated, I will be just bouncing around literally yelling out loud.Do you ever catch yourself agreeing with others just to appease them and keep the conversation going? How often? Why?Nope. Fuck that. If you are stupid to me, lack common sense, just have an opinion about a flavor of ice cream or politics, I will disagree. Sometimes I even disagree even though I agree inside just so I can socialize for once (since not many do to me at school).Do you break rules often? Do you think authority should be challenged, or that they know better? If you do break rules, why?I don’t besides skipping mass at my school LMAO. And nah, they should know better. I don’t really mind them since they haven’t been a part of my life much.Ask me anything else you need to help type me. [info] None [info] 1555726235
theglassduchess [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in kindergarten and ADHD in 3rd grade. I COMPLETELY understand!! [info] None [info] 1558583985
aregularwaterbottle [info] Yeah, I have been diagnosed with anxiety too.  I've been to a couple therapy sessions but they weren't so helpful. I'm quite durable, so generally, I can maintain my anxiety quite well on my own. It's only in social situations that I start to feel really self-conscious and shitty about my anxiety. I've considered medication in the past, but there's still that stigma attached to it that I'm wary of. I don't know if they will actually help me in the way they ought too.  [info] None [info] 1525612478
nsngww [info] It's terrible to hear that your psychiatrist isn't taking you seriously. Before I was diagnosed with OCD I was diagnosed with anxiety, and major depressive disorder, when I finally got that diagnosis of OCD it finally felt like someone understood me and could put a name to how I was feeling. Hopefully you will be able to get your psychiatrist to believe you and you can feel the relief of a diagnosis. I'm really hoping for you! [info] None [info] 1554778228
multifoiled [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety for a couple of years but have been dealing with it since I was a very small child. Radiohead helps me codify it and examine it in a way almost no other band does.  [info] (No no no no no no no no) [info] 1464904355
NoMasGnomos [info] So true. I used to have anxiety back in high school. If I got nervous or stressed, my body would overreact and feel so tense until I got physically sick. Not knowing why this was happening only added to my stress, which made me more tense, and you can see how this spirals downhill.Until I was diagnosed with anxiety. Just knowing that, I was able to focus on mentally relaxing, telling myself it's gonna be okay, your body is just silly. No reason to fear, it'll pass. It helped tremendously. About ten years later, I mostly outgrew it. As they say, knowing is half the battle.Just prepare positive things to tell yourself, whether you believe them in the moment or not. Your future self will appreciate it. [info] None [info] 1509807325
CrocodileHearted [info] Hey if it helps by all means. I'm just personally afraid of them because of past traumas with relatives... even when I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and had to take meds for that I was afraid of it every time... they helped... but what do you think happens when someone who already lacks empathy cranks that lacking up to 11. I felt like a god damn drone. They also managed my anger which was a 'bonus' to those I lived with. Didn't like it.I've been off the meds for a long time now when I realized they became worthless and the anxieties came back. Developed a (healthy) coping mechanism, haven't had a panic attack for the longest time. My favourite emotion came back though. I too want to get better with whatever the hell I have. Lacking empathy, it really does leave some kind of void in you. It's like being thirsty but you just keep drinking seawater. I never turned to drugs to fill it because of my fear of them.. so I fill it with porn. And memes. Lots of porn and memes. It works. [info] And a dash of cold blood. [info] 1565333512
Ediface [info] Similar story here. Except for my wife, people see me as very slow and steady rock. It was necessary to build this up because I grew up in a setting that really sought out vulnerability for torture. And, nature or nurture, I was way too sensitive.The people who know me today wouldn't see me as such a still body of water if they could have seen me experiencing emotional lability (unstoppably laughing and crying at the same time). Or those horrible colds I got? I just couldn't get out of bed without wanting to crawl under it. The weekend before I was diagnosed with anxiety where I called and subtly made my peace with friends and family because I knew - *knew* I was dying after some surprise tachycardia. Years of therapy and medicine help me keep going.Much better now but I hit some good turbulence from time to time. [info] None [info] 1376978755
tehkaki [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and when I was still a lightweight I used to get really anxious sometimes when I smoked a lot. I rarely do anymore now that my tolerance has built up though. [info] None [info] 1325119683
Renee1369 [info] Thank you. I've been to the e.r and a dr and my lungs are functioning great. I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder. Taking buspar which I dont think helps. Haven't started my zoloft yet. Thanks for your info! [info] None [info] 1572478632
EziosBlades [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety earlier this year, but much before that at night I would hear footsteps around the hardwood floor downstairs in my house, especially late at night. One time I thought I heard someone knock on my door, would you say these hallucinations were caused by anxiety or the other way around?  [info] None [info] 1418154923
Mollyu [info] 1. I go to therapy twice a month for the anxiety but that's about it since that's all my insurance wants to cover.2. I was diagnosed with anxiety and social anxiety at ten and the other ones at 12 and I'm 14 1/2 now. [info] None [info] 1476284341
Sirendimensions [info] I happen to have been hit with a triple whammy due to geneticsAutism runs in my father's familyDepression runs in both my mother's and my father's familyBut my Mom's family specifically my Grandma's family ohhhh boyyy....... every female that has been born (so far and we don't know if gg has it because to be blunt she is a self centered bitch who won't be tested for anything mental. But it's impossible that she doesn't have something.) Has some form of anxiety and I'm a woman so... yeah I was diagnosed with anxiety at 6 yr' s oldI don't know what deity my female ancestors pissed off  XD So no just because someone has more than 1 mental illnesses doesn't mean they are lying to you [info] None [info] 1556240057
bigangryhobbit [info] I am no stranger to mental illness, and I know what its like to not be able to finish school because of it.  I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder with agoraphobia 20 years ago.  It was tough.  I went to college 3 times and never could keep it together becuase of classroom anxiety/panic.  I tried every medication imaginable during those 20 years.  I have been self employed for half of that time.  I could never work a physically demanding job unfortuantely.  Somehow, I continue to push on.  Its nice to have come into contact with you.  Its hard to find people that truly understand what living with a mental disability is like, and how much of an obstacle it is.  We aren't lunatics, we just have a health disorder like anybody else that may have something wrong with them.  Good luck to you!  Always have hope that things can change for the better, no matter how bleak it may seem.  I have been off of all medications for 4 years and live a better life than I ever have. I can't even remember when my last panic attack was.  Namaste [info] None [info] 1557256950
hiding-identity [info] That's how my parents learned of my anxiety. Every few nights I would come out of my room and sit with my dad and watch tv and explain I'm afraid of him or someone else dying. It happened for a few years (with a few different worries) and then anxiety attacks started and soon I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1513950813
forensikat [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I went to college, and I know I had some OCD tendacies as a child (could never step on a crack or tile line, had to finish walking up stairs with my right foot), but I grew out of those.I think this is an example of how religion compounded issues that were already there, not a statement on all Catholics! [info] Ex-Catholic [info] 1494297291
pile_of_hats [info] Hey... Not sure if this is the right place, but for the last several years I've had the lingering thought that I may have ADHD.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety, so I guess my question is:  do anxiety and ADHD have many symptoms that overlap?  For those who were diagnosed as adults, how did you approach the subject with your physician without sounding like a hypochondriac?  [info] None [info] 1355134997
KayRayK [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and high blood pressure within the last year and I have had to learn a lot about myself and how to improve myself mentally and physically.  [info] None [info] 1427338577
mechanon05 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was in middle school.  It's a struggle but you'll get better and better at dealing with it.  I highly recommend reading Growth Mindset by Carol Dweck.  It really reduced my anxiety levels in a host of different situations.  Good luck, man.  [info] None [info] 1403221251
RazorXXtreme [info] What do I do if I want to see a therapist but cant afford it? Also, what do I do if I "know" I have certain things based off the symptoms but havent gotten diagnosed? As of right now, I was diagnosed with anxiety and stress from my doctor, but I've realized that I've had all the symptoms of really bad OCD my whole life and I just brushed it off as anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1511135781
doctorwhom456 [info] I was thinking that too, but if my aunt picked up on it, she didn't tell me. Is it weird that I see a lot of myself in Rimmer? Not really 1 or 2 or 8 Rimmer, but once he started getting less annoying and his neuroses really came out I felt like I saw myself on screen. Considering I probably have OCD and wouldn't be surprised if I was diagnosed with anxiety, this isn't too far off... [info] None [info] 1533093332
EnclaveLeo [info] Just graduated with a BA in Comp Sci and wanted to add to the already great advice here - sophomore year in Comp Sci is definitely rough so don't get down on yourself. A 4.0 your first semester is amazing, and I understand how it feels to have a "slip" but it's okay to slip. Especially after transferring in, Clemson kicked my ass my first semester I transferred in. Don't feel bad about having to withdraw from a class and trying again next semester - most Comp Sci students I know took an extra semester to graduate (like me). I was diagnosed with anxiety my junior year and had to find ways to make my coursework manageable. I definitely know what you mean about needing a routine schedule and reminders, I'm the same way. Definitely get your professors to work with your accommodations.I really hope you feel better and please feel free to reach out to me if you have any questions or just want to chat!  [info] None [info] 1550105193
fidget4ever [info] Gotta tell ya from the perspective of a 50+ professional woman who wasn’t diagnosed and medicated until I was 40, I made it through and so can you.  Before ADHD diagnosis, I was diagnosed with anxiety.  I had to bustMy butt through college and early career. All I can tell you is be ready to show a doctor the facts. There are certain things doctors look for, the most important being that you have some proof that you have had Symptoms since childhood. They are sometimes different for girls than boys, but not always. If you have a Parent, sibling or teacher who can vouch for your symptoms as a child, that will also go a long way. [info] None [info] 1568684185
Alyssa1206 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD due to abuse and neglect that occurred when I was a child.  I also have some symptoms of body dysmorphic disorder, like I think I'm ugly and can't look at myself in the mirror, but I have never been diagnosed with it. I think it's great that you're going to see a professional - I hope they are able to help you. [info] None [info] 1565556497
oldpaintunderthenew [info] Oh YES. Perhaps not depressed until hitting puberty (at 9-10, thanks ovaries) but I was anxious literally since birth and I just thought this was how everyone is..? I was diagnosed with anxiety at 16 and laughed at it, me? Anxious? Nooo I am outwardly very calm and don't burden people with my worries so what is the psychiatrist on about? I looked up anxiety symptoms after that and *bam* - it was an embarrassingly high age for me to realize that everyone isn't horrified of everything all the time and doing anything isn't supposed to feel monumentally scary and other people won't obsess about the same little thing for hours a day, every day, for years. [info] None [info] 1530686394
TechnoFlame19 [info] I get terrified when I have to go into an elevator, it may sound very stupid but I did a bit of research and there’s a phobia agoraphobia which is a anxiety disorder in which you fear and avoid places or situations that might cause you to panic and make you feel trapped, helpless or embarrassed, this dose make sense to me since I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year ago [info] None [info] 1550327780
Hanekawa3 [info] Aah this really puts it into perspective for me! I was confused because I also get anxious when socializing but it's because I want to get back to my thoughts, not because I'm shy or any other avoidant traits. So that's why I was diagnosed with anxiety and SPD, but not AvPD.Thank you so much, this really nailed it for me!  [info] Diagnosed SPD + BPD [info] 1522177805
roselove122 [info] Initially I was diagnosed with anxiety, which she did help with. I felt a lot better when I went. I pretty much had a mental break down and could barely function. I was then diagnosed with ptsd, or cptsd. Which perhaps is not something she's able to help me with as the sessions kept getting worse and worse. I would come home and need to sleep for hours to relieve them. I also started getting more depressed and getting worse thoughts. I did bring it up with her, but in our last session I felt like she's turned it around on me saying that I didn't practise the coping skills enough which is why I'm unable to help myself. I honestly don't know if she's right or not. But my gut feeling just said no. Because of some events that happened to me when I was really young, I had really big issues with telling people how I feel. Sometimes I just shut down and nothing comes out. Like my response is just to freeze instead of flight or fight. That's one of the reasons why I'm feeling like I need a break from therapy as I've never really talked to anyone about most of the stuff from my childhood and bringing it up is making my adult life worse as I feel like I can't function.  [info] None [info] 1511236291
xisaloser [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder (not social anxiety, speaking more of depersonalization/derealization/paranoia) and make up helps me but in a different way. It's not about "I have make up on so I gotta get out of my shell," but more "I am dissociating so I am gonna try 5 different eye-looks to focus on something else and get out of my head." I find it works better than trying to focus on reading or watching when my minds tends to wonder and pictures in motion can sometimes make me feel dizzy. I basically lay out all my eyeshadows and try to come up with looks, it actually needs my focus and some creativity so instead of over-analyzing myself or my surroundings I am like "do these go well together? maybe I should try to mix two contrasting colors, that would be interesting? Maybe I'd find a new use for this shadow" etc. etc. and then the blending is really relaxing to me as well. Same with looking in the mirror, of course that's mostly therapy doing, but I am not afraid to face myself when I go through phase of depersonalization. Before I'd see myself in the mirror and think "is this me? am I looking at myself? this is uncomfortable I need to look away," and now I am like "yeah that's uncomfortable but hey I gotta ride this one out." I guess we all have different ways to cope with anxiety, but I just see this particular task as really good to cope cause my mind doesn't wander.  [info] None [info] 1495642810
MeganIsACat [info] I agree... kinda. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so I know what it is like. I think people without a diagnosis should not be using it as an excuse at all, therefore I agree with you about that. I do not however agree with your opinion if a person is diagnosed. If they are, I think the person has a right to be able to say that they can't get something done because of it. [info] None [info] 1538264502
BayTeeaLien [info] What state are you in? I am with you as well on all these. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, PTSD, Depression, ADHD and HBP. I used to take 8 different meds a day but as of 3 years ago stopped. I started using marijuana. The results have been amazing. The thing about those meds are the side effects... I hated them.  [info] None [info] 1475553860
cooliorama [info] Yeah I originally got addicted my junior year of high school when I was diagnosed with anxiety and I began self medicating a lot. Now I have medical marijuana for my anxiety! Got it prescribed like 2 weeks ago. Now I've been back in school and soon I'm moving to my own place again, I'm ready for it all.  [info] None [info] 1532712026
mako-jaeger [info] Hmm, it's hard to say. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder in February, and I'm still trying to figure it out myself. I think you have to make peace with who you are and who you where in the past, and then take the proper steps to becoming the person you want to be.It of course won't be easy. In February after I went through the darkest period in my life, I realized a lot of things about myself. I think I had to just let go of all the bad things that had been holding me back, and embrace the good. For too long I was tied down by worrying about all the negative things people thought about me, and not appreciating the positives.I'm not sure if being "chill" is exactly the goal. I think being forgiving is a much more applicable goal. Being chill is good, but we will all have times of anger, uncertainty, and sadness. Trying to force those things out will only increase anxiety in my opinion. Instead forgive yourself if your anger, uncertainty, or sadness causes you to do something stupid. And investigate into why you are angry, uncertain, or sad.Also don't confuse eustress with distress. Putting it simply, eustress is what makes you feel like you have to get out of bed to fight the stressor, and distress is what makes you feel like your bed is your only safe haven from the stressor. Make sure your doing things out of eustress. Let it push you up. And accept that you will be stressed. It is hard for me a lot to accept that I am stressed. I don't always like it, and sometimes I want to ignore it. But the bright side is there is always a cause for stress, whether internal or external. Find the cause, investigate it, decide on how to act on it, confront the stressor, and move on.And as a final piece of advice to bring it all together, accept the bad days, because you'll have them. That's life. This semester has punched me in the gut so many times, I'm surprised I'm graduating in such a good shape. I think the key was accepting what happens, forgiving yourself and others, and moving on. Remember you can't change the past, but you can change the future. I live by this phrase in a lot of things: "Late, but not too late." Meaning essentially that sometimes you'll be late to a realization or doing something you should have done a long time ago, but it's not too late to make things the way you want them to be. And when it is (because it will be), accept it, forgive, and move on. [info] None [info] 1524878990
RedBeard94 [info] Yeah. There could be something small that causes them, it could be something that you don't really notice. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was in second grade, so 7 or 8 years old, and had anxious thoughts routinely until around high school. Right as I returned to school for my sophomore year of college, my anxiety started up again. There was not much that changed between my freshman year and my sophomore year. It just started again.  [info] Our Anxiety Does Not Define Us [info] 1445202381
FamousBlueRaincoat37 [info] Hi, I was diagnosed with MS on Thursday after roughly 9 years of symptoms. I only went to a neurologist in October last year because I started falling over. From reading people's posts it seems I'm lucky that a diagnosis only took 5 months and most of that was waiting for various tests. I have many o bands in my csf, lesions in my c spine and too many lesions to count in my brain. My main symptom for the last 9 years has been tingling/pins and needles/numbness in my legs and torso. I also had the occasional episode of feacal and urinary incontinence. I just got used to the tingling feeling and buried my head in the sand, not wanting to face up to what was wrong. For years it stayed the same but last summer it ramped up. I couldn't walk without my legs feeling like they were buzzing or vibrating, my arms would buzz or tingle randomly and I had a few falls at work. Looking back, just before all the weird sensations started I got a really painful left eye. If I moved it (can't stop it moving) it caused such a sickening sharp pain. I also couldn't move it to the left and see at the same time. My vision seemed ok, maybe a bit blurry, except for when I closed my right eye and looked to the left I realised I couldn't see properly. I wasn't diagnosed with optic neuritis but I'm convinced it was a mild case of it. I was prescribed glasses with a 2x stronger lens on the left side. I couldn't wear them because they gave me a headache and made me feel sick. Subsequent appointments at the opticians have shown I don't need glasses at all, let alone a different strength for my left eye! The pain went after a couple of weeks and I thought my vision was back to normal. A few years later when learning to drive I realised I couldn't read the number plate in front of me properly, it was all blurry. Since then I've had intermittent   blurriness which is more noticeable at work. Sometimes I can read the patient board, sometimes I can't. Again I just buried my head in the sand and ignored it. So I guess I've been quite similar to you, pins and needles and blurry vision for years. I would ask for an MRI to get started on finding a cause. Its so easy to ignore things that are wrong with our bodies and we start to believe it's just normal or 'just how I am'.Oh, and like you, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and last week I had what my neuro said was a flare up. Numb face, tingling and numbness, burning in my arm, dizziness  and my GP told me it was anxiety! I've known since January that I have lesions in my c spine so I asked " is it nothing to do with my spinal cord then?" And he told me no, definitely not! I wasn't even anxious, just pissed off with waiting for results from the LP and brain MRI!Once you've been diagnosed with anxiety it magically become to cause of all your ailments!Good luck with finding out what's going on with you and push as hard as you can for investigations. [info] None [info] 1553925430
beesbeme [info] Hello! I am not a doctor, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety for most of my life now. What you are describing sounds like a panic attack. You don't necessarily need a specific trigger to have a panic attack. Sometimes it's just the expulsion of pent-up stress, or maybe you do have a trigger but you haven't noticed it. Panic attacks always happen for a reason, but sometimes that reason isn't very clear. Try to remember how you were feeling, what you were doing, and where you were before and during each panic attack. If there are any similarities between each situation then that might be the cause!In my experience, some of my panic attacks come from not breathing enough and having lots of tension, which is something that I've only realized very recently. When I'm stressed or concentrating very hard I tend to take slow and short breaths. The body goes 'woah, that's not enough oxygen,' so it makes you panic. So, whenever I feel a panic attack coming on, I force myself to take a step back from what I'm doing and breathe. A great and easy to remember breathing exercise is to breath in as much as you can, hold for a second, before breathing out slowly. It works 9/10, if I catch it fast enough. Of course, all of that is my personal experience and there's no telling if it will work for you. The best advice I cam give you is to talk to a psychiatrist. Seriously, they will help a lot, even if this is a rare thing. Panic attacks are scary enough without having a support structure. Good luck! [info] None [info] 1536995447
gullwinggirl [info] Yep, that's exactly what I was thinking, because I have issues with catastrophic thinking myself. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and it's a nasty aspect of mine. You get an idle thought in your head, like "what if we got pulled over right now?" Then you run through what might happen, except it's always, *always* the worst endings. In the pulled over example, it ended with me being arrested and put in jail. That example happened tonight, on the way to dinner. The difference between me and OP's FMIL is I *know* this is just my brain being goofy and I can shut it down. I don't think FMIL knows it.  [info] None [info] 1436671422
throwaway8329384 [info] This was some powerful advice. Thank you for that. Much better than my therapist could ever do haha.I had quite a few traumatic events that happened that caused people to push me away due to my new found bad reputation.In December, I was sexually harassed by my boyfriend and I's mutual friend's boyfriend (if that makes sense). I asked my boyfriend not to say anything about it since I didn't want to start unnecessary drama but he felt like he needed to say something to our friend's boyfriend about it since he found it disrespectful. Of course, it only came to backfire and all of our friends were coming up to me about it, insisting I talk about it or treating me like a victim. When I refused to talk about it, they assumed I was lying and stopped inviting me to things with them.I had an abortion back in January which caused me to distance myself from some friends since I didn't really feel comfortable talking about it at the time, especially before I had it. I felt kind of like an outsider knowing I was a pregnant college kid. My boyfriend and some friends from high school (who I only see a few times a year now) were the only ones that knew and were supportive of me. This still somewhat haunts me though.I also had a brain bleed in March (not from abuse or anything, I fell off the top bunk of a bed), which again, caused people to treat me like a victim or a terminally-ill patient. I was honestly fine, it was very minor, but the way people treated me upset me. They stopped treating me like an adult and started treating me like some kid they were babysitting. However, my boyfriend was by my side the entire time in the emergency room and ICU. It honestly wouldn't have felt like a traumatic experience if people hadn't treated it like one.Finally, the rest of my friends dropped off after I was arrested in April. It was a drunk in public, so a minor charge. People started not talking to me at all anymore after this. I mean, is a college kid getting a drunk in public really that unheard of? It caused me to lose my friends who I was supposed to live with, leaving me scrambling to find a place. I see how this caused people to push away but so many of them ended up in the hospital from being drunk, I don't see how going to jail for 8 hours was much worse. I even got one of my closest friends out of getting arrested, but she sort of dropped off once I refused to by weed for her anymore.After this, I was diagnosed with anxiety and lost about 15-20 pounds in the matter of a few months. Most of my so-called "friends" look at me like I'm crazy or something is wrong with me now when really I just had a series of bad events in one year. I'm afraid to open up to people and make new friends in fear that they find out all of this and walk out of my life. I somewhat understand where everyone was coming from, they didn't want to be associated with the girl who was a mess.Anyways, enough of my sob story about my traumatic year. I think maybe the reason it's so hard for me to leave my boyfriend is because he was the only one who didn't leave my side throughout this. Other than my family, I have no support system at all and they don't even know about half of these things. I think maybe I just got comfortable knowing I had someone to turn to no matter what happened. Part of me also fears for future relationships I may have. Like you said, I think it would take me a lot to heal the damage that's been done, if I ever can.Edit: One other thing I felt I should add, his friends paint me out to be the bad guy in our relationship. They go around telling people he needs to break up with me and are trying to set rules on how often I can go over to their apartment. They say I'm bad for him because he spends a lot of his time with me and we often party together. They really don't know about the cheating or anything, they just think I'm insecure about myself. Before all this happened, I was one of the most confident people there was. But all of this, along with his friend's comments, really brought my confidence from 100 to 0. [info] None [info] 1566181044
RockSmash7 [info] It's a bit like Marmite. I started socially then went into doing it full time after I was diagnosed with anxiety. It helps me when I feel under pressure to have a smoke and calm down a bit. I do realise this is a placebo effect as smoking actually increases your heart rate but if it works it works. [info] None [info] 1410111649
ferdous12345 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety by my general physician, but I was 14/15 and it was mostly about my stress level and my constant worrying. He said that I should look into non-medicinal relievers, like showering. Needless to say, it hasn't helped in the long run. I kinda just want to try medications. I know it sounds bad, because medication isn't magic or whatever, but I'd like to at least try to feel normal. Deep breathing doesn't always work. I can't leave class and take a shower. I can't stop in the middle of the road to meditate. I just want a chance to feel like a functional human who doesn't need to go through a list of techniques to alleviate 1/5 of my anxiety. But maybe it's selfish of me, and I know medication isn't a walk in the park. I know it can take months to find the right dosage. I know the side effects could be worse than the symptoms. But I want to say I tried, you know? [info] None [info] 1503630082
guppy89 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD after having a particularly toxic person in my chain of command. [info] None [info] 1555102969
astarr14 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety once but I don’t think that’s it.  I think I got panic attacks because I was too tired to handle stress. Maybe I should pursue that more though.  [info] None [info] 1553798824
-Noelle- [info] I relate to this so much. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was around 9-10 years old, and have been having it all my life since then (on and off but it's always dormant if that makes sense?) and I'm in my 20's now. I totally understand what you mean when you say it seems like everyone around you is "effortlessly happy", but I can promise you that isn't the case. Literally everyone is struggling with something, it's just that most of the time hardly anybody knows about it. Some of the people I've known who seem the happiest have some of the darkest life stories.My ability to cope with mine has never been great, but I'm much better at it now than I was when I was a teenager. I'll still have those really bad days but I try to distract myself as best as I can and (most) of the time I'll feel some relief over the next day or two.I'm sorry to hear you're going through alot right now. I hope you can find some comfort in the fact that so many people can understand and relate to how you're feeling &lt;3 [info] None [info] 1487162884
Thadwater [info] I'm feeling not the greatest. I have a loving wife who knows I am depressed, but I truly don't feel like talking about it at the moment, so I am just going to post here. It may help. I have everything I could ever need, yet feel sad, empty and dull. House, wife, pets, a great job, but I still feel like crap. This last week has sucked. I hope it gets better soon. I take antidepressants under the guise that they help with migraines and anxiety. I would go back and get officially diagnosed but that would just give me another 5 years of being denied extra life insurance. As I try to be a responsible adult, I try to get enough to cover my expenses in case of an accident or something. I've been denied 4 times to have an increase above the minimum my company allows. I think I will be eligible this year. You have to be 5 yrs removed from any new diagnosis and it was 5 years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. (What a backwards system...)So I'm a bit stuck in that department. Like I wrote above, just hoping this gets better soon. I am tired of being tired. Haha.  [info] None [info] 1521303014
iinfante14 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety by three different mental health professionals and i still don't believe them because just like you. I experience no physical symptoms  [info] None [info] 1496432242
orlandojesse [info] Late to this, but I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD. My therapist taught me a few in-the-moment techniques for when things become unbearable and I felt a seizure coming on:List five things you can see. Four things you can hear. Three things you can feel. Two things you can smell. Finally, if possible, one thing you can taste. Along with the sense-based technique, I carry a smooth pebble on my person. The cool sensation of the pebble and its smoothness allows me to detach from my anxiety. I also tend to have a bottle of water with me at all times - drinking the water really helps. In short term, (and could work for immediate), I make sure to regulate my breathing. Inhale for 5sec, hold for 4sec, breathe out for 3sec. Rinse and repeat. I can feel my body "unclench", if you will. In the long term, I practice mindful meditation. I accompany the breathing technique with some of the sense-based ones; for example, whilst pacing my breathing, I'll become aware of my surroundings, even fine details. I do this sometimes once I wake up, before bed - honestly, whenever I have a minute or two to spare. I've found myself to be far more level-headed from this meditation. I also make sure to do quick, basic exercises when I can. I haven't the time to go to the gym or anything nowadays, so if I have a bathroom break or something, I'll throw in a few jumping jacks or squats. That's something that I came up with personally that helps me. Honestly, if you're finding things really tough, speak to a professional. Keep pressing the matter if they are quick to dismiss you (which is what happened to me). I also take medication, which gave me that starting push to get my life on track. I hope this helps. Bless.  [info] None [info] 1487165606
joyke [info] I'm day 7 on quitting, I've had anxiety attacks just about every single night for the past 6 days. I've been diagnosed with anxiety last year, I grew up as an anxious child but 4 years of daily blazing made it way worse. Anxiety is definitely a side effect of t-breaks and quitting. But i can tell you that it gets better. It's been less and less. On the first three days, my face would twitch and I would have constant muscle spasms (heavy anxiety causes that usually). But on day 6, I stopped having as much spasms. I have crazy thoughts at night but it's been getting abit better. last night at 3AM i had a panic attack, I took a shot of whiskey and fell asleep within 5 minutes haha. good luck to you my friend, it will get better. [info] None [info] 1447784062
MommyDrinks [info] They have an obligation to accommodate you if you have something from your doctor in writing saying "butterandsage is under my care and requires a stool in order to properly and efficiently perform their job. butterandsage is currently being treated for XYZ and is capable of completing their job duties under these accommodations.  If you have any further questions please contact my office at..." and then make a shitload of copies. One for your boss, HR and yourself.I just quit my job today because of the awful and toxic behavior I've been subjected to. I was diagnosed with anxiety and my doctor wrote a note asking my workload be reduced until April 15th. HR gave me the run around. My boss demeaned me in a meeting on Friday. I'm aldo 7 months pregnant so I'm HORRIFIED about how the transition of my medical benefits to my husband's plan will be handled. Thankfully I have a family member that is a lawyer (and vicious one too) that is willing to speak for me.Anyway, I'd get a hold of my doctor and explain your boss is being a real asshole and you'd like something to that affect. [info] None [info] 1521508778
KannoProxy [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety problems. I was having dozens of mini-attacks every single day. After my doctor told me what it was, I had a really horrid panic attack. Now it's been a constant struggle ever since, just trying to manage it. Never thought I'd be someone to develop anxiety problems, but apparently it runs in my family, and I didn't know about it til I was diagnosed. It has a good grip on my mind and thought processes, so that definitely changed my entire outlook on everything. Probably forever. [info] None [info] 1447020347
Cperry6 [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and OCD, I worry about the tiniest things even now I worried just posting this and I can't even think about how dangerous being pregnant is, what would happen if the child had special needs or a fatal illness. On top of that I hate change, a tiny interruption  in my schedule and I start to freak... Yeah kids aren't for me.    [info] None [info] 1355229388
cryms0n [info] There is a lot of fear and worry about being addicted to these medications, and rightfully so. You cannot just stop taking a medication, you become dependent on it. But that is because it is supplying your body with what it's currently lacking - serotonin (in the case of SSRIs). I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder/panic disorder at the young age of 12, and was given 20mg Paxil. Sure, I could have not taken it, especially because at the time they had no idea what the hell the long-term effects were (and they still don't, really). But therapy wasn't helping, my anxiety was too severe. I could not leave the house, live a normal life. Is that really a way to live? Another redditor stated it very clearly - if you had diabetes, would you stop taking insulin? Anxiety D/Depression are all physiological problems. They can be managed mentally of course, but if you are unable to even function as a result, then that balance needs to be treated medically. Paxil worked for me amazingly for 14 years. Only recently has it not been enough to sustain my anxiety (I spent the last 4 or so years playing with doses, bringing myself to as low as 12.5 mg), and now I'm up to 30 mg, the highest I've ever been in my life. I tried everything I could before having to up the dose, but I finally decided that it's not worth living in constant fear of death and a negative future. The doctor told me that these pains won't go away overnight. I've put my body through hell for three months, and my body is telling me now it's not very happy. I have to be patient, and control my anxiety before my symptoms begin to dissipate. Ativan/Valium and other benzodiazepenes work in a different way, they simulate a depressant effect on you in a manner very similar to alcohol - you become numb, slightly disoriented, and don't give a f*** about anything. They are short-lasting and HIGHLY addictive, you develop tolerance to them quick - and lastly, they are not solving your problem, they are merely half-day crutches to take the edge of things. [info] Health Phobia | Panic D. [info] 1354992637
SearchHere [info] It is hard to explain.I was diagnosed with anxiety before I realized I had it.Have you ever been in a public place and someone was playing their music out loud? It’s kind of like that, but the music is much louder and drowning out anything you’re trying to do or think about.It can manifest physically. For me, nausea/vomiting allll the time, especially when going out was a red flag.  [info] None [info] 1538262454
Nimbleturtles [info] I didn't leave my city for a year when I was diagnosed with anxiety. Now I'll visit friend every month hours away because of medication. [info] None [info] 1502299389
MachineGum_throwaway [info] &gt; Thank you very much. Although I fear that I am BPD a lot, I know that being aware and actively fighting my issues is something to be relieved about in that aspect. I don't deny nor hide the fact that I have issues. If you have BPD, then you'd recognize something inside of you that is more than just the external symptoms.Your friendship issue is just one thing, but BPD is many other things. Do you feel like you constantly need to defend yourself because people say things that critisize you? Do you feel like people are disliking you? Does you sometimes have periods where you hate your husband because you feel he did something bad/wrong? If you found out you were broken, could you accept it?&gt; I read articles, I and I buy self help books, I've read a few, and I tend to get too analytical of myself, so maybe my husband needs to read them with me. Maybe try meditation. Meditation is not a treatment for a specific condition; it is the discovery of one's self.Successfully analyzing your symptoms requires you to go really deep in your mind, something that some of us can achieve simply by washing the dishes and mowing the lawn (mindless activities) while others need to work to be able to go deeper within themselves.For example, when I am in therapy, I will often give answers based on what's on the surface of my mind because I am interacting with someone, however the therapist's job is to ask further questions to go deeper. The therapist can't connect dots (the "whys"), but can help you find which dots to look for.When I am alone, I don't stop on the surface answer; the surface answer becomes my next question and I push for more until I start connecting so many dots until I have small moments of epiphany (The dots all lead back to 2-3 major external factors in my childhood).&gt; I know some people in our situations tend to be a little off in relationships. My relationship with my husband comforts me in that I am normal with him, and he tells me that I overthink how I act too much. (I have been diagnosed with anxiety.) If the feeling of comfort with your husband has been consistent for a long long time, then I wouldn't be worried about BPD what-so-ever.You most likely have something causing you anxiety and you can only feel safe with people who really know you.  [info] None [info] 1480525926
OW2000 [info] I went to CBT also when I was diagnosed with anxiety. It seemed like just having someone to talk to about things really helped a lot. I had basically hit rock bottom before I decided that something was wrong and I needed help. [info] None [info] 1573067238
Ghosttownhermit [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, that is the thing. I appreciate your advice. Thank you.  [info] None [info] 1544124099
Faithyxox [info] Yeah I have a diagnosis for Asperger’s, Anxiety, and ADD. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 14, and then Asperger’s and ADD at 17. I am living away from halls this year, meaning I choose who I live with. I’m with some random people I met on Facebook this year as my flatmates ditched me (I’m living with a couple which I didn’t know about at first which is gonna be GREAT /s) so it will be a bit quieter, but hopefully I make some better friends. [info] None [info] 1563851970
BelgianBoris [info] I started bodyweight fitness earlier this year. I was diagnosed with anxiety in November 2018, since then I've learnt loads about myself, through work on my body and on my mind. My anxiety would manifest itself as panic attacks about the smallest things (getting to work late, insignificant thoughts, anticipating distressing symptoms from another thing I have), at the worst of times I would straight be depressed and not wash or leave the house. At The best of times I always have constant worry. The only time I'm free from this monkey on my back is when I'm exercising. I play field hockey (currently 3-4 hours a week at least) and have done for about 20 years. Despite this I have always struggled with my weight and never been really happy with my flabby gut and noodle arms.I would obsess about finding the best ways to lose weight, forever pour over articles on what exercises to do in the gym, but I never actually took the plunge and used my meticulously crafted workout plans. why? fear of judgement, lack of confidence. Bare in mind the only sport thing I'm good at is hockey and I love it because I'm good at it, I've got a big ego but it's super fragile.Then I discover this sub. This incredible community, and one of the most rewarding physical things I have ever done.The first time I did the RR I was totally fucking hooked. The "crawl, walk, run" ethos is so satisfying and moving through the progressions is like crack. I love having control over how I can move my body; functional muscles, it feels primal. Some other person may have to prove their strength with a squat rack, but I'm in the outdoor gym doing shrimp squats, no equipment, usually alone, endorphins coursing.Everybody has noticed my weight loss, and how much bigger my arms and chest have become. I went from about 84kg last summer to 69kg a few months ago. Now I'm about 73kg, my hockey has improved massively, so has my control over my anxiety symptoms. I genuinely believe this is down to doing the RR 2-3 times a week, its so so rewarding (I can't stress this enough), and obviously eating better.This may get lost but I just wanted to take this opportunity to say thank you to everyone that has helped contribute to this sub from moderators to members answering questions in comment sections.Looking forward, I can't wait to find out what my body is capable of doing and how far I can push it. [info] None [info] 1558197706
incompletesentenc_ [info] Looking back at it, I had them since I was a very young kid. It wasn’t until 2 years ago (when I was 18) that I was diagnosed with anxiety and I identified them as panic attacks rather than my ~mental breakdowns~ as I called them.  [info] None [info] 1551963004
exponentiate [info] Some things I've tried, with varying degrees of success:* Brain dump - if you can't stop thinking about it, write it down and remind yourself you can look it up/think about it later. This doesn't work particularly well for me, but people who like bullet journaling seem to have success. * Mindfulness/meditation - can help you learn to be aware of your thoughts and practice putting them aside. In the moment, when you catch yourself being distracted, take a few moments to breathe, clear your head, and refocus on your work. Maybe a pomodoro-style structure could help you maximize your time, e.g. work for 45 minutes, break for 10 minutes, meditate/refocus for 5 minutes.* Get your anxiety under control - you may not consider it "anxiety," but you mentioned that "fear" is something you can't always stop thinking about. Your college most likely has mental health resources, so I strongly recommend that you have a few sessions with a counselor/therapist to learn some strategies for letting go of those fearful thoughts. I was diagnosed with anxiety about a decade before I was diagnosed with ADHD, and in my experience it's easier to work through the "I'm bored, I'm bored, I'm bored" of ADHD when you don't also have anxiety yelling "You'll never succeed, you'll never succeed, you'll never succeed".Lastly, to echo /u/dadeluxe, make sure to be kind and forgiving to yourself - you're doing great. :) [info] ADHD-PI [info] 1503861892
orangemoon93 [info] i have before,i'm diagnosed with anxiety and i was prescribed even stronger anxiety pills but i don't want to take them, i've been doing fine just dealing with anxiety on my own, i'm just going through rough times now, a really painful break up.this pill i took is not risky it's very mild and it can be given to anyone suffering with panic. [info] 220 days [info] 1471245204
toews-me [info] That's true. Very true. I will check that out. You know, I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but I've never done anything about it. I should probably see someone... if I had the money. :/ I will look at your blog though. That will probably help. Thank you. &lt;3 [info] None [info] 1396023728
Jenny-Thalia [info] I'm a bit late to this but... When I was younger, I was in blatantly abusive relationships. I mean, I knew they were. Sexual and physical abuse are obvious aren't they? Then I got help and got much better mentally and emotionally and had healthy relationships. Then he came along. This one was so much harder to see what he was doing. He was amazing for three years. In year four, things got weird. I found some suspicious texts (truly by accident, they popped up on his screen, I never ever checked his phone). It spiralled. He spent months telling me to stop seeking reassurance about us, while simultaneously cancelling our plans on the regular and just being straight up cold towards me. He stopped bringing me out but always had excuses like he was too tired. He stopped letting me see his friends or family, again "too tired," or "I don't see them much anymore." He'd drop out of contact for a night, telling me a relative was sick or his mom was needing help. He all of a sudden never had money anymore so I'd "lend" him money that he'd feel so so guilty about. But never paid me back. He never bought me a birthday present (not even  a card, I'd  be happy  with a card) and I had to pay for him to come for dinner for my birthday because he had "no money." The worst part was I'm diagnosed with anxiety and was always so honest about that. So anytime I questioned how things were, how he was treating me, if he was cheating, he'd tell me my anxiety was making me paranoid and to stop being crazy. It got so bad that I spoke to my doctor about going back on meds and to therapy. She actually told me I didn't need either but that therapy might help me because I was somehow perfectly happy and healthy in every other relationship or friendship in life. Guess she knew what was up. Turns out he was cheating. Even when I saw the proof, I was crazy and he loved me and I need to stop being so anxious. The effect being mentally abused has had on me has been profound. It was so slow, so sly and so unlike what I'd experienced before. It's only been a couple of months but I'm a different person. I don't even speak to male friends now, fearing ulterior motives. I hide all of my feelings and don't share my emotions with anyone in case they're ever used against me again. I'm very quiet and reserved now and keep to myself. Before I was bubbly and fun to be around. And it fucking sucks because despite what he did, I love him and although I'd never ever take him back, I can't just write off those three years where he treated me like royalty. And now I'm stuck wondering was it all a lie?  I thought I was stronger than this. And he doesn't care.  [info] None [info] 1542909810
EarlyEnglishSpeaker [info] ironically the fact that I've been diagnosed with anxiety [info] None [info] 1570302086
sahariana [info] As others have said, get a doc evaluation. I struggled with this for years just thinking I was lazy or unmotivated. I was diagnosed with anxiety and while it’s not perfect, the meds are helping me get back on my feet. You’ve been in this mindset for so long it’s become normal. [info] None [info] 1573073845
Uhhlaneuh [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD.  I’m on medication right now. I already take tons of meds (allergy meds, adderall, celexa, birth control, asthma) the last thing I want to do is get more meds. I was hoping for something therapeutic or a mental exercise I could do.Currently wedding planning and I obsess everyday about losing weight (although I’ve been like that for 15+ years) and gained 60lbs between 2014-2015.  I’ve never been this big. But as my plate gets fuller as I start accumulating more responsibilities, my brain just shuts off. All I want to do is sleep.  [info] None [info] 1507220869
Tazbio [info] Thank you for the kind words! I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I've started medication, I'm curious to see the difference. I will keep in mind the name of your medication, it sounds very relieving! Thanks again! [info] 7 Days [info] 1505751478
nja1998 [info] Holy shit I thought I was the only one who thought like that ! I always think my sickness is a punishment or repercussion of something wrong. I did I've always thought that my sickness was a way of God controlling me.  my IBS came about right around 8th grade but got real bad around 12th grade graduation. So by me missing so much school around 8th grade because of ibs . I couldn't join jrotc which I was fine with I guess. But then right around graduation it got real bad and my plan was to join the marines after graduation. But I was diagnosed with IBS and found out that it is a medically disqualifying illness and you can join any branch of the military with it as far as I know. So I chalked it up as god didn't want me to go and that was the way of him telling me .I have sense pretty much over came my IBS and I started to think about joining the military again . and now I've been diagnosed with anxiety so I'm taking it as a defiant no to a military career.  Now I'm trying to get into being a park ranger or wildlife conservation  [info] None [info] 1531448449
mythrowaway23231 [info] Before final grades are posted, my professor wants to talk to me about my lack of participation in class. I was diagnosed with anxiety, looking for advice whether I should mention this tomorrow. [info] None [info] 1450323758
ghghyrtrtr [info] Same here with the faking being sick. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, acid reflux (get my first endoscopy this year to determine the damage due to years of no treatment, it was so bad when I first had it diagnosed in my early 20s the doctor thought I had asthma because of the wheezing), anemia (woohoo for headaches caused by lack of blood), severely allgeric animals (grew up with constant hives to the point I of bruising and trouble breathing but never taken to a doctor, I really thought it was normal to pop benadryl  when your kneck and face were swelling up). I was always just being dramatic!! Oh and when I really needed medical treatment- why didn't I say something? They seriously didn't take me to the dentist until I refused to eat. I had told them when I chipped the tooth, gone through two tubes of numbing stuff that they bought because of tooth pain, had had a headache for two weeks that I told them about. Hmmm how is that not speaking up. Complaining about pain for a month. Then they made me feel guilty about having a $300 filling that was done with minimal novacaine because they refused to pay extra to take me to the pediatric dentist. The dentist was apologetic because he thought I really should have pain meds but he couldn't prescribe them. My tooth needed to be treated or I'd end up loosing it through surgery because it wasn't grown in all the way. He drilled all the way to the root, cleaned the root and filled. He said he didn't know if it would grow in and need a root canal or just need to be pulled out via surgery.  When my dentist I went to as an adult saw it he was horrified to hear that I wasn't on pain meds and only novicain when they did the work. When I was referred to a specialist for the root canal he was horrified too. This was after both had looked at the X-ray and assumed I had been put out for it. Nope white knuckled through the pain. Feeling guilty for costing so much money and knowing if I couldn't handle it I'd have to go get surgery to have the tooth pulled and my parents' didn't have the money. [info] None [info] 1533784822
jimlas2016 [info] Thanks for the info, I was diagnosed with anxiety actually. [info] None [info] 1460461347
daemonsrose [info] It sucks, doesn't it?  I've been diagnosed with anxiety (social and otherwise), and just started some counseling.  I'm hoping that will help me.   [info] None [info] 1469009102
CeeDiddy82 [info] You may possibly just be having anxiety/panic attacks.I have had experiences like this for a long time. Being atheist, I didn't have the spirit thing going for me. I actually thought aliens were going to abduct me. For a while, doctors attributed the symptoms to complications from being overweight (blood sugar spikes, high blood pressure, etc).I have dropped almost all the weight I needed to and became more active so I am actually tired at night and sleep. I also cut out carbs, as they are basically sugar and cause blood sugar spikes with me (/r/keto or /r/paleo can be helpful).Even though all of that has helped a lot, I still get anxiety attacks. Not sure what triggers them. I had one the other day at work I actually passed out and they called an ambulance and I went to the ER. After that I started getting panic attacks nightly, over nothing inparticular, usually I was just scared I would pass out again. My dreams I would have following waking up during a panic attack were scary. I dreamed I heard loud screaming, I dreamed I was in car wrecks and plane crashes. I dreamed some vortex was sucking me in. Just downright scary shit in that state between sleeping and awake.Finally, after "stone cold perfect" blood tests from the ER and from the follow up doctor visit, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.Doctor prescribed xanax and I have to go to a therapist who specializes in anxiety.I recommend getting healthier eating/exercise habits and telling a doctor about panic attacks at night. The xanax works wonders for me. I don't take it everyday, only when I start to feel anxiety. Kind of like aspirin to headaches, only take when needed. Xanax is a highly addictive chemical, so hopefully when I finish my therapy I won't ever need it. If you have an addictive personality you need to get into anxiety therapy ASAP.  [info] None [info] 1353570956
ghoulcinema [info] Drug abuse. I was 15 years old when I first started abusing prescription pills, 16 when I was diagnosed with anxiety induced psychosis. I tried to kill myself the day before Thanksgiving of that year, obviously failed, asked my dad to have me hospitalized because I knew I'd try again. I swore off anything harder than pot and thought my life was turning around; then mom got sick. I moved closer to her and haven't touched anything pharmaceutical (aside from allergy meds or ibuprofen) for years. What's worse, I followed in my stepdads footsteps, but we're both different people now. [info] None [info] 1530613241
luke4545 [info] Speaking from personal experience, weed both ruined and fixed my life. After having my first panic attack while smoking, I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder. That stuck around for about 7 months. Every day I'd have few panic attacks, and felt like dying. In those 7 months I accomplished more than I ever imagined. Started college, got my license and lost over 60 lbs. Basically distracted all the negative thoughts by being productive. I still toke from time to time, but the heavy chested, racing heart and paranoia feeling tends to come back. I really miss being able to enjoy the high without all these side effects.Anyway, sorry for the bad grammar it's late and I'm tired. Just felt like I had to share this. [info] None [info] 1345439090
misterbecca [info] Given I'm not as old as you are (I was just diagnosed at age 25), I never really considered that I could be on the spectrum until my most recent therapist suggested it. My brother was diagnosed in high school and I work with children with autism for my job, but they all seem so different from me that I didn't think I was also autistic. Similar to you, I was diagnosed with anxiety and always just assumed that I had social anxiety because I was awkward and that was that. I have sensory issues but always just told myself I was being too sensitive. I stim, but learned to primarily do it in "socially acceptable" ways like knee bouncing, and always told myself that was just my anxiety. I have other compulsive behaviors (I was also diagnosed with OCD on top of the ASD so who knows what the root of that is, but point is, it was all chalked up to general anxiety until recently). Basically, I blamed all of my "quirks" on my anxiety and didn't think I could be on the spectrum like the other autistic people I knew because it presented differently in all of them. I'm also struggling with taking the news in, and feel like I'm going back and analyzing every experience I've had and thinking about how it's been affected by my ASD. I also am paranoid now that other people see me as really awkward--up until now, I've felt like I've masked the awkwardness pretty well, and as awkward as I've felt, I've had some confidence that others can't see it. But now I don't know. I like to think I'm self-aware and decent at reading other people's emotions, but now that I've been diagnosed with ASD, I don't know if that's possible. It's hard not to keep internalizing the generalizations about ASD that I've heard about all of the other autistic people in my life. [info] Recently Diagnosed [info] 1555532809
CrazyToastedUnicorn [info] As someone who has anxiety and family members with and without it we've discussed it a lot. It's tough for people without anxious thoughts to properly grasp what it's like, their brain just doesn't think like that. You may be able to explain things to them that could help them understand what you're going through. For example my dad is prone to anxiety but my mom is not so she wasn't really of a certain mindset about it either way until I was diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd. Now she knows that yes I may be having irrational thoughts and I probably know that truly they're just that but in that moment my brain is convincing me that yes that bridge will collapse the moment our car starts across because fear is all too powerful especially to an anxiety prone mind. She knows that I will not be talked out of those thoughts and that I don't need to be told that I should just think of something else. I went to a therapist and it helped but it's still something I continuously deal with but my parents are there if I ever need them. Parents most often times are our biggest supporters and they like to know that sometimes we still need them, if you let them feel like they can help you in dealing with what you're going through even if it's just a shoulder to cry on or a hug or to talk to them to take your mind off things it could help them grasp a fraction of what you're dealing with. This is long, I'm sorry. Just know that you're not alone in your anxiety, there are tons of us around who get it. If you feel that you want to ever just talk without any judgement I'm willing to listen and that goes for anyone. I know what it's like to struggle and feel like the people around you couldn't possibly know what your dealing with. It can get easier.  [info] None [info] 1497521984
theSuperCyberCat [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety at the same time as adhd. I'm only on medication for my adhd but my anxiety has improved a lot just from the adhd meds. You might not be the same, but it's something to consider. I don't know how taking both anxiety and adhd meds works but if your adhd is properly managed you might have less anxiety and be able to not take a second medication. This is something that you will have to work out with your doctor/prescriber. Having a therapist who is knowledgable in both these areas would also be helpful. [info] ADHD-C [info] 1558146393
larafrompinkpony [info] &gt;You must not be in the US. They give adderall out like candy. I've been to 3 psychiatrists, none of them will give me adderall  :( instead I've been diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1400589696
xuchy [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was about 10 years old. Just like Bill, I wish I could have known about mindfulness and had access to other methods back then aside from medication. My attacks were just as crippling as they were numerous - at one point causing me to miss several weeks of school in my senior year. Almost two decades later, I finally feel as though I'm regaining control of myself through daily meditation, exercise, cognitive therapy, and a better dosage of my meds. If you're in the same boat as Bill, myself, and many others in this thread: keep moving forward and remember you are not alone. You are so much more than just your thoughts and reactions. The past is behind you and the future can't be seen - but you have so much power to tap into in this very moment. Anchor yourself to the "gift" of the present. Stay strong, friend. You will get through this! [info] None [info] 1567395145
TrashItAndGo [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety repeatedly from the fourth grade onward. Growing up, I was put into an extra-help/resource class so that I could focus on schoolwork and not be stressed out. I didn't know this, of course, because my parents didn't want me using my emotional disorder as a crutch later in life. SO being a student in a class for learning disabilities while simultaneously not knowing what disability I had really hurt my confidence. Mind you, I never assumed my classmates in the class lacked intelligence. Their disabilities were usually minor and only affected them in very specific ways (EX: dyslexia or a speech impediment). Now, I'm a very socially and emotionally damaged adult. I struggle talking to people because I assume that they'll think I'm stupid. I even started school at a prestigious university just to convince myself that I am, at the very least, bare-bones average in terms of my intelligence. It never helped. [info] None [info] 1551067127
Christ_on_a_Crakker [info] I have only taken it before I go to sleep so I wouldn’t know. I should try it for anxiety because I have been diagnosed with anxiety for a long time.  I have just learned to cope with it.   [info] None [info] 1545598109
Costume_fairy [info] I wouldn’t call it teenage angst since I was diagnosed with anxiety before I was a teen but okay. The rest of your point stands [info] None [info] 1559699771
mwtruro [info] That's your fight or flight response kicking in without a trigger. I have generalized anxiety and a panic disorder. The slow-mo is from the panic disorder when my fight or flight goes off without a trigger. It's happened to me doing laundry, walking in to a room, all kinds of mundane stuff that does not justify the response. The first time it happened, I was 10 and it was accompanied by some auditory hallucinations (an overwhelming buzzing noise). I didn't know it was anything not normal and always just thought it was something cool my brain could do. Wasn't until I was diagnosed with anxiety that we figured out what that was too. [info] None [info] 1566045075
AOEUIsaac [info] Bignoknow’s content is great (also his dad’s channel Dr. Paul Thomas). He’s also the one who made me convinced me that there is a strong connection between good mental health and healthy testosterone levels. I was diagnosed with anxiety before being diagnosed with low T. It was because of my anxiety that I went to my doctor to get my hormones check.  [info] None [info] 1545253881
susandeschain9 [info] I definitely think pelvic PT can help you retrain that clenching over time, I hope it works out for you with insurance this next year. For anxiety I’ve found help with Cognitive Behavior Therapy and Dialectical Behavior Therapy. I still clench my pelvic floor sometimes during times of high stress (&amp; I am diagnosed with anxiety as well), but I’m able to notice that it’s happening and try to implement skills and therapies to relax it again (and to also try to de-escalate the anxiety in general). Good luck  [info] None [info] 1543023713
Rose-Bubble [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 4, and my brother at the same time when he was 5. We've been given a LOT of coping tools. My mom knows how to deal with people who have anxiety, but my mom cannot be her therapist. She needs to go to a real therapist. And also possibly a psychologist. Unfortunately she has shown no interest in actually helping herself when we've talked to her about this. I also want to say that I think it's wonderful that you're managing your anxiety so well, and are so willing to talk about it. Thank you. [info] None [info] 1476761162
TaRo_PuNch [info] Hi there! This is my first post on reddit. :)The fact you posted here is telling me that you haven't given up hope yet even though you feel hopeless at this moment. You're still trying to reach out for help. I'm glad you did. And I want you to know that you're not alone in feeling the way you feel. You said "I pray I don't wake up tomorrow morning." I used to feel that way too almost everyday for months (I stayed in bed most of the time during that time). I felt lost and didnt know what to do with my future. I got better after getting into the university that I really liked. It sounds like you feel accomplished when u landed a job before u graudated and came out at the top of your class. I think you were happy sometime during that period. It can't be all bad. No emotion or feeling are permanent. They come and go (but our brain is wired to hold on to the negatives longer than the positives). Although I was stressed out and frustrated a lot during my college years, I'm grateful for the people that I have met and the things that I got to experience. After I left Uni the thought of not waking up is coming back to me. Because I also feel like I got no social life, no friends that I feel completely comfortable with being myself 100%. I felt alone. My parents don't understand neither. They got problems of their own. As for sex, it will come eventually when u meet the right person. I assume u don't want sex with just anybody right? As for trying new things. It's ok to feel too tired to try new stuff right now. You can always try new stuff later when you feel like it. They are not going anywhere. :)I've been struggling with this life of mine since age 11. Now I'm 25. I was diagnosed with anxiety at age 17 and mild deprsession at 22. I'm currently also struggling to adjust and build my life after college. So, you're not alone.A question that my college counselor asked me almost every therapy session was "what do you appreciate about yourself today?" It always helped me feel better about myself. So I want to ask you this, too. What do you appreciate about yourself so far?Holy cow! I literally wrote a five paragraph "essay." Thanks for reading my long post. :) [info] None [info] 1454644240
fgsixtynine [info] This happened to me. I didn't eat for the first month of a 3 month internship because I just didn't have the appetite. I was diagnosed with anxiety induced gastritis when I got home and saw my doctor. Apparently the longer you let it go, the worse it gets. I was able to not starve by drinking a lot of my calories. Smoothies, chocolate milk, milkshakes, etc. Probably not the most nutritious but it helped me hold on! [info] None [info] 1500089897
jigenbabe [info] My SO and I have lived together for 7 years, and he's known me since I was 13. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 12 and severe anxiety disorder at 15. He's never had any anxiety, quite the opposite, and I cannot seem to communicate with him that coping techniques and medication doesn't stop ALL panic attacks. I don't know if I'm not articulating myself well or if he just doesn't get it. Also, he cannot seem to have a single conversation where he doesn't bring up his own emotions and when I ask him to focus on my feelings solely for a  single conversation he gets upset. I don't really know what to do and am in need of advice. We have a counselor but due to temporary financial situations we are currently unable to pay for a session. [info] None [info] 1524154540
b_port [info] I mean, before I was diagnosed with anxiety they ran a bunch of tests on me to make sure it wasn't something else. I had to pay a decent chunk of change for all those tests, but it was definitely worth it to find out that the only thing that's wrong with me is anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1534266429
bunni_momma [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and regularly see a therpist along with medication.  It works - some days it was hard to leave the house, always worried about my relationship and struggling with social activities.But today I just did a presentation in front of 10 people without shaking for the first time in my life!! [info] None [info] 1484931788
hatedheadspace [info] I don't mind posting here as opposed to in boxing you. I was diagnosed with anxiety and BPD back when I was a teenager. (I'm 30 now). I also suffer from chronic migraines. I started smoking because of the migraines after my doctor tried everything else for them and I would have adverse reactions from the meds. I lived in FL at the time and my doctor was like "if this was a medical state we'd try that route..." So I ended up trying out on my own with help from a friend. It helped with the migraines, I hadn't been expecting it to help with the anxiety, which was apparent almost immediately for me. I was able to wean myself off of the medications I was on ( my doctor knew I was doing as such). I don't smoke to get high (and until I pop out my kid and stop breastfeeding I'm not at all currently). But I when I did I would catch a small buzz and it's like getting on an even level for me. I don't tremble, stutter, feel like I'm going to go into panic attacks, and the world doesn't seem "fake" to me anymore. I become less reclusive and able to hold conversations without feeling like everything I say is going to be judged harshly. It helps me go with the flow of things and just be. Without the worry things will blowup in my face. It helps calm me when my other coping methods don't work.  [info] None [info] 1439832150
nuralina [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety last year and put on Zoloft. It’s helped me manage my anxiety really well. Since finding out I was pregnant, I lowered my dose and things are still ok. Zoloft is supposed to be one of the safer anti-depressants for pregnancy and I’m grateful as it’s helped me so much.  [info] None [info] 1550237484
To_a_Green_Thought [info] Thank you very much for posting this.I have a hard time going to the temple.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD, so I think that has something to do with it.  However, even before going to the temple got *really* hard for me (a few years ago), it was always tough.  It's a very stressful experience.  I mean, for crying out loud, I'm going to *God's house*.  That's pretty huge.  I think that, if more people really thought it through, more people would realize the magnitude of what they're doing (and, consequently, be stressed).  For many people, going to the temple is nothing more than going to the meetinghouse for church on Sunday....which is both bad and good.  On one hand, our church leaders have told us to contemplate the importance of the temple, to realize how special it is; based on their comments, it seems many members aren't doing that.  On the other hand, if our members get to the temple and do ordinances for their ancestors, whatever gets 'em there is good, I suppose.I'm rambling, I know.  The bottom line is this: I feel for you, because I feel the same way.  I may not have the exact same concerns as you, but it's hard for me, too.Let me share an experience I had in the temple that helped me.  This happened about a year ago, back when I was really making an effort to attend the temple more often.  (I have a toddler, which only adds to the difficulty of going, and I finally had a moment where I could get away.)  I chose to do initiatories, because it's better for me, I've found.  As I sat, waiting to start, I got a very strong impression that Heavenly Father wanted me in the temple, because it meant that I was closer to Him, and He simply wanted to be close to me.  I really felt how much He loved me.  Obviously, God can visit us whenever and wherever He wants to; I felt that He was telling me that it'd be easier for *me* to feel Him near in the temple.  It was a tender moment.I try to remember that.  It's still hard for me to attend the temple, but I try to remind myself that God just wants to be close to me, one of His children.  I reiterate this: *it's still very hard for me*.  I share this experience not to give you any sense of shame for not going, but simply to share what I've felt.  At the bottom of it all, God just wants to be closer to us, and that doesn't always mean doing an endowment session.  Just go (and, again, I'm telling myself this, as much as you) and be near God. [info] None [info] 1530468462
MentallyPsycho [info] I was too young to realize, my parents had to figure out that I was far more scared than most children. One visit to the psychiatrist later and I was diagnosed with anxiety. Alternatively, I didn't realize I was depressed till I admitted out loud to my mom that I wanted to kill myself. It finally clicked in my mind that I was suicidal because I was depressed. It's weird how something can be so obvious, but you just don't see the signs right away. [info] None [info] 1498364201
canihasnewbf [info] Definitely going to have to listen to that. I was diagnosed with anxiety first and take Zoloft. [info] None [info] 1545939075
plan_with_stan [info] I suffer from anxiety disorder and on some days I have the exact same symptoms... except for the difficulty swallowing... it was weird reading your post because I have gone through all the tests including my thyroids and they said all was fine. I also have had testing heart rate they went through the roof, lost 10KG in 2 months without trying was nauseas as heck and had difficulty focusing on any task.. this started at a very particularly stressful period of my life, so I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. I wonder now if this is all that it was....I still sometimes suffer from an elevated heart rate, especially when I try to fall asleep, and lately I do feel nauseous for no reason... I may want to visit my doctor again... [info] None [info] 1574906255
Anonymous3687 [info] Everyone gets anxious at one point, wether it’s graduation, getting on stage, presenting, etc. I am diagnosed with anxiety and I bite my nails a lot and I feel like I can’t breathe. I would talk to a therapist about looking into it. There’s a lot of free in home therapists, they help you a lot. Therapy is eh with society but it doesn’t mean you’re “special” it helps your social skills and is basically counseling. [info] None [info] 1560652182
friendswithknifes [info] She knows I get stressed easily ( I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 9/10) and I suppose I can see what you mean, but she certainly could have worded it better. I got so anxious and freaked out from what she said I nearly threw up, if that's any indication on how stressed these things make me. And she definitely should have. I'm not a mind reader. [info] None [info] 1566252317
capaldithenewblack [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and mild OCD that doesn’t feel mild when my fingers are bleeding around the nails. This stuff doesn’t always look like the textbook. A compulsion doesn’t have to mean a full blown Rain man freak out if it goes unsatisfied.  [info] None [info] 1529623588
JollyGreenDragon [info] Thanks. I'm diagnosed with anxiety already, and have only recently been diagnosed with ADHD as an adult, which creates a lot of problems when untreated for a long time (and is apparently a disorder related to Aspergers!) [info] None [info] 1475583296
ModernSocratis [info] I don’t know to be completely honest. I have never experienced ADHD until I was diagnosed with anxiety [info] None [info] 1569333114
kevinsideways [info] Identifying and naming my feelings always does the trick ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety/OCD. For instance, before my diagnosis, I would have recurring videos playing in my head of my little brother getting hit by a car or my girlfriend cheating on me. Now I can just say, "Oh, this is anxiety," and move to doing the next productive thing, knowing that the feeling is going to be in my head regardless but now I'm not stressed about finding what's causing the feeling. Another example: I get rejected by a girl -- what I say to myself: "Oh, this is what rejection feels like!" -- Move on.Of course this may not work for everyone but it's certainly helped me become more stoic and forward-minded! [info] None [info] 1493756478
boredwoman [info] Today I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. 5 minutes after I got out of the doctor, I discovered that I accidentally shared a man I'm currently crushing ons spotify playlist. I don't even follow him. Great day. [info] None [info] 1527267464
bathtubenvy [info] Hey, I've had this type of thinking a lot (my whole life!) until earlier this year when I was diagnosed with anxiety. I had a few short sessions with a counsellor and now, if I start having those thoughts, I just have to remind myself that it's the anxiety talking... It makes life a lot easier! [info] None [info] 1472045833
femalefaceless [info] yeah i feel so tired all the time. I was diagnosed with anxiety as well and while i try to manage it best i can i do feel tired...psychologically, emotionally and physically.  [info] None [info] 1538146371
sexualcatperson [info] I think I can help! If nothing else, I can let you know you are not alone. I was diagnosed with anxiety a couple of years ago and it mostly only shows itself when I am in some kind of social situation.I've seen things most of my life. Shadows mostly but it has progressed as I have aged. I know what I am "seeing" is not always there. Your mind plays tricks and sometimes shadows are a product of our brain trying to focus on something else.What I have noticed is when I see things that probably aren't there, I have been having anxiety issues that day or am stressed about something that is going to happen the next day. I also have some question of whether what I am seeing is really there or not. I have also found that when I am alone, I often hear footsteps or breathing and then think something is there. I will then see a shadow of something. That is anxiety.However, when I truly see things, there is NO question that something is there. I can sense and see it clearly. Others can sense it along with me. My cat gets upset or a million other things that can show you are not alone in this and it's not in your head.Either way, you should talk to your health care professional because it could be a side effect of whatever drug you may be on. I have found that most doctors are at least willing to humor you. Talking to my psychologist helped me determine that even if I am crazy, what I am seeing is not from my anxiety. [info] The truth is out there [info] 1421479954
just_1_more_thing [info] Yes! But it's because I'm diagnosed with anxiety. What kind of work do you do? [info] None [info] 1561295750
Texan1786 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and am medicated for it.  I haven't taken my medication in several days tho.  Could that be it? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1478653823
Rollins10 [info] Big feels out to you man, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder years ago and have been taking Zoloft for almost a decade now. I've learned (still learning) you just have to take life one day at a time. [info] All your base are belong to us [info] 1453298351
AshPaws [info] This type of behaviour during me growing up is what made me spite my mother. Nothing was enough, and enough was nothing to her. No wonder I was diagnosed with anxiety after my teen years shortly before moving out. Took me a while to realise that caring about petty things only gave a more negative impact than a positive one in regards of trying to be better (e.g "Oh finally you come out of your cave! HAHAHA") [info] None [info] 1561022552
megawalelord [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety as a kid, but through a lot of practice I have it pretty much 100% under control. I would say I am genuinely happy and content with my life around 80% of the time which I think is really good. It's all about balance. I pick an area of my life that I would like to work on and focus on that. This year I am focusing on extracurricular involvement and actually joining things that interest me or I am passionate about. I'm also really careful of not falling into the trap that I need to be constantly working on myself from the moment I wake up to the moment I fall asleep every day. You need time to do the things that make you happy, because those things are making you a more whole person too. It's pretty much about finding things that make you happy and balance them with things that help you grow as a person. [info] Female [info] 1474049329
sedatedzombie [info] Seeing a psychiatrist soon. I've been diagnosed with anxiety but never been tested for ADHD, do you think she might? [info] None [info] 1551104031
kefern [info] &gt;I'm open to the idea that this is "just" anxiety. Never really been an anxious person though.Same here, but I was diagnosed with anxiety way before I have experienced these weird symptoms that made me even more worried as it could be some other underlying issue like you said which could potentially be something serious. Have you tried seeing a neurologist? I'm probably going to do that soon.Also, how are your ears? Apparently most issues with balance disorders are due to some infection or issue in the ear. However, I'm not a doctor but I don't see how an ear infection could have such a profound impact or relation on the heart. Secondly most ear infections presumably also cause actual vertigo, spinning or some sort of dizziness, which both of us do not have. It's truly puzzling. [info] None [info] 1522155411
WitchoftheWasted [info] Hi all, I was diagnosed with anxiety about 8 years ago and I've had peaks and troughs with keeping it under wraps. I'm much better than I used to be. Sometimes I'm good for a few weeks (as in I only have minor panics about little things) and other times less so (major panics that result in private meltdowns). I'm here because the world is scaring me at the moment and whilst there are small things I can do, the anxiety nags at me saying, 'It won't make a difference really. You can't actually change anything. It'll all go to hell whatever you do.' The thought paralyses me so I don't do the things I probably should, which deepens the anxiety. I'm worried about potential world conflict, about global warming and the massive effects on the planet, I'm worried that I can do next to nothing for refugees because all aid requires money (I'm a charity worker - don't have much) or a house (I live in one of the most expensive cities in the world - no chance of that), that we're all going to wind up in some Margaret Atwood-type society and then I've got my family asking when I'm going to get married and have kids. Sounds ridiculous but that just heaps more fear on - as much as I'd love that to happen - I'm single so nowhere near married and even then how can I have kids when I can't guarantee the world will be safe for them? And that makes me so fucking sad because I'd love to be a parent but what kind of planet would they get? See? That's how it spirals...I live in a different country to my family and whilst I have a fantastic support network, I'm aware of how exhausting I must be for them sometimes so it would be next to have a separate place to vent and talk and just try to find quiet ways to cope. I've had a couple rounds of therapy/CBT over the years and I'm aware that my anxiety is impacted by things like my diet, tiredness etc. (which is probably why my habit of staying up late on weekends is bad - damnit!)  but I've found sharing helps a fair bit so I'm pleased to have a place to do that. I've always been prone to anxiety, it makes everything from career stuff to relationships to just existing sometimes really exhausting and upsetting. I work very hard to stay on an even keel but lately it's all been a bit much. Please tell me other people feel this because I feel like a whining special snowflake... [info] None [info] 1485650843
azumatora [info] I didn't realize that drug testing had been implemented.So (and this is me trying to think out loud) if I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder and changed doctors after getting out of the hospital, I would have to be drug tested before I could get an anxiety med? Wow. (Or rather "any future", since this would be after the mental hospital's prescription ran out.)***If your next response is, "Yes, if anxiety meds are controlled substances."Then I'll jump in with, "Most are. I know of one that isn't (buspar), but it made my heart pound." [info] Grand Ledge [info] 1526833008
madheadjosh [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety a long time ago when I was little as I had it quite bad. But Its never affected me when I got older (adult hood). I am 21 now and have never experienced a panic attack nor had anxiety attacks as far as I know.Edit: I also have heart palpitation if that makes any difference but my doctor has said it only just means that I am more aware of my heart beat. [info] None [info] 1566402274
randomuserIam [info] I always had troubles orgasming during sex unless I had toys or put a lot of attention to me, with my previous (vanilla) partner. I never had issues alone, though. But I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on medication, one of which is ssri and interferes with orgasm. I have a decent libido (or so I found out) and I have a lot of pleasure, but I can't for the life of me climax. My Dom fully understands, he still tries but after it's been hours of play it gets exhausting. I still manage to cum alone, with a lot of effort though, but much faster. So I think there's a part of me that's also stopping me because of the pressure to cum. I do know, however, that I can be forced to orgasm... Provided certain criteria is met. So, my next investment will actually be a wand, instead of what I currently own that is worse than a bullet...  [info] None [info] 1553533076
Raiden1156 [info] Started smoking weed at 14. I'm turning 24 in February. I just realized after seeing this post its almost been 10 years. Initially started due to constantly feeling like I was angry or panicked ( I've been diagnosed with anxiety issues since). I havent felt any affects as far as breathing, but i have noticed that my sense of smell seems to be weaker than others. But I still prefer to smoke a little every now and then, than take xanax a couple times a day and be a zombie all the time. [info] None [info] 1475766337
Hoodwink [info] That doesn't sound like Anxiety.  The extreme weakness is probably damage to tissue along your small intestine.  (Take a massive B-complex vitamin that you can find in any Walgreens, btw, it will probably help a ton if it was similar to what I had).I suggest going to a doctor (a different doctor) immediately and tell them you think you have a bacterial infection or something in your gastrointestinal system and you would like some antibiotics.  Don't tell them about sweating and losing sleep.  And you don't need a fever for infections in your gut.  My guess is that you have a bunch of bacteria causing vascular/epithelial damage by their growth and then death.  There are strains of bacteria that can live in your system that when they die, they release contents that may harm your body after death (or while living).  Certain strains of e. coli or staph are two of the most common.  Both can be gotten rid of by macrolide antibiotics (penicillin, amoxicillin/clauvanate) or Zmax often.  Although, it could be harder to get rid of and you might something that isn't resistant.If you can't get a course of antibiotics because doctors can be a pain with a previous diagnose of anxiety, try to get some online.It sounds related to what I had.  I don't actually have anxiety, but I was diagnosed with anxiety immediately when I presented with diarhea (and heaving, but only vomiting once a month) and a whole host of symptoms like twitching and abdominal pain/twitching, extreme weakness, and more.  [I think I was diagnosed because I had such a long list.  Keep it short - and try to concentrate on only certain points like your pain, weakness, and vomiting.  If you experienced twitching, don't tell them that because that was blood finding new routes to get through my body.]  And it would come and go and got worse over time - and then suddenly plateau, and then continue.  My body has scar tissue all over and my liver and kidneys have some damage because I was like you - just suffering through.  If you were diagnosed in April with anxiety when you went to the doctor, I suggest a new doctor.  Especially if a stomach or colon problems weren't ruled out.  Technically, it could also be IBD/Crohn's - but do that after the anti-biotics. [info] None [info] 1502927790
FalcoIgnis [info] I can agree with everyone here, except that my experience is actually a bit backward... I agree about this being a symptom of anxiety/low grade panic attack, but I actually never experienced it in my life until about 3 years ago, when I was 23, shortly before I was diagnosed with anxiety.   [info] None [info] 1538882581
doesntmatter2ndac [info] I think giving up what others think of me would be really hard. I think I have really bad social anxiety. I'm not saying that as an excuse but I'm just stating that I think that is going to be a really obstacle for me to overcome but I don't know for sure I would be able to. I think I've had anxiety for a really long time because I remember back in elementary school in 7th I looked at my grades online and saw a health tab and It said I was diagnosed with anxiety. I think its going to be hard to rework how I've been thinking for past 3 years, maybe more because I might've has anxiety in elementary school and I can't remember. [info] None [info] 1551557984
throwaway002288 [info] I have googled CPTSD which actually includes that you may suffer years of abuse that cannot be linked to one specific event, so I felt more that I may be suffering from this. I didn't realise that there is a CPTSD subreddit till I have posted this. I have episodes of crying and panicking due to my past where my boyfriend has to hold me, I was diagnosed with anxiety but not stress (the center diagnoses stress disorders too).  [info] None [info] 1551966981
bananabatm4n [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and adhd.  When i started taking my adhd pills i started eating a lot more and got much fatter.  Now i am really self conscious and i am always worrying about people view me.  Now obviously i don't suffer as bad as your gf but i really can't do anything that is remotely weird in public or else i will start to freak out.  I was gonna write more but i forgot and i hope your gf gets better with her interactions with people [info] None [info] 1560320503
Lady_borg [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and a few other things, but nothing huge in particular that happens in the mornings. yes I have a toddler but even when he isn't causing me any stress it still happens. I am thinking this wave of anxiety is very tightly connected to my anxiety in general but not sure how to combat this.  [info] ADHD and Parent [info] 1411991560
Happypumkin [info] yeah I was diagnosed with anxiety and am on the road to recovery atm but I'm doing a lot better thanks! [info] Louie [info] 1483470157
PenguinsGoMeow [info] I am such a hardcore nailbiter that I bite polish and fake nails off. :( I was diagnosed with anxiety at 5 times the clinical level though so I think I will bite my nails forever. I've tried to stop and it just never works. :( [info] http://smile.amazon.com/registry/wishlist/1UBORK18CHCK6  (Multi) [info] 1426510017
OwlfaceFrank [info] I went to my Dr. because of chest pain. I was afraid of pretty much what's described here. Instead I was diagnosed with anxiety. I take meds for that now and I feel much better. Tell your doctors everything.  That's what they are there for. [info] None [info] 1556086372
cudger [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety last summer and it was almost terrifying how easily the doctor prescribed me with pills instead of offering other solutions.  [info]  [info] 1400782978
Bingemyfeelings [info] Sometimes Sam gets angry that I even bring up the fact that his ADHD is affecting his motivation or the decisions he makes. Just simply states that its just the he way he is and I should just be ok with everything he does. For some reason he sees his condition as an accessory to his personality. But like you mentioned I started realizing how serious it was when telling myself “hes just stubborn/ a jerk” wasn’t a good enough explanation for how he was processing our arguments and overall relationship. I try my best to understand because I am diagnosed with anxiety/ptsd. I get that sometimes ill act a certain way that he might not fully get,  and sometimes i wont be acting fair. But I take full responsibility in explaining myself and apologizing for my actions.But youre right about making sacrifices. It has felt more work on my end than his and at this point I dont know how much more im willing to tolerate. Its been over 3 years of us together and im getting very impatient. Thank you for explaining the difference with willpower and feeling ashamed. Youre right. I don’t want him to feel like im carrying judgement towards him and will use different words to explain myself to Sam from now on.  [info] None [info] 1537021484
Inanotherlifetime [info] Well I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder a few years ago when I consulted with someone but had the same "symptoms" growing up. I don't have anxiety around everyone however. I'm actually a very social person and make conversation with people very easily. However, I have anxiety with my relatives since I was a little girl and didn't even know or understand why. I used to make excuses to not see them and still do. I haven't even met my baby cousin yet because I'm afraid to see them. It wasn't until I went to therapy that it was explained to me that I'm in fear of letting in people who I love the most. Because where there is love more, there is more pain. It's a working progress and I hope to overcome this. [info] None [info] 1397458640
TheRealMarkkkkk [info] Tell me about it. I'm told that I'm not ADHD and that I shouldn't need to go for a diagnosis because I concentrated during a assessment (IQ test and career guidance) and I do well in school and despite the fact I have no knowledge of time, inability to start basic tasks (showering and studying), terrible short term memory (compared to all other parts of the test), a habit of drifting off and losing focus (can't even get told where my dad is parked without losing interest and drifting off), no organization skills and constantly misplacing stuff and losing them. I forgot the rest thinking about the grammar of my previous point. Like they all just say 'You're brain thinks too much' and I was diagnosed with anxiety (which is an ADHD symptom). I don't want to take OPs thread I'm just kind of annoyed.  [info] None [info] 1473183337
trashylegend [info] I agree. Self love is important when it generates self improvement, a desire to be the best person that you can and knowing what you can and cannot change. I find the 'Self love' preached today is excessive, disgusting, and damaging to everyone. The idea that you should cut people out of your life if they are no longer beneficial to you is something I am seeing more and more of. Self love is not taught as becoming what you want in order to achieve, but it centers around the idea that you already deserve whatever it is you want. As far as the 'everyone gets a medal' mentality, I think that some things are harder or easier for certain people, but since we feel the need to treat everyone the same, we end up over-praising. If someone is incredibly anxious about something, they should be praised for doing it. Over-praising everyone's accomplishments, however, makes everyone feel like it's okay to not even try as long as you have an excuse. I was diagnosed with anxiety, but I never once have told myself "I can't do this because I have anxiety". There are people with more serious mental illnesses that actually are unable to do certain things, but there are also too many people who see it as a shortcut for praise. [info] None [info] 1559591059
arrowkeysmovetherat [info] Fair enough. I don't take meds but I've been diagnosed with anxiety (among other things), maybe there's a correlation. [info] None [info] 1292880988
MattTheProgrammer [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder but before I knew that's what it was, the first time I had a panic attack, I had my wife drive me to the emergency room at 2am because I thought I was going to go into cardiac arrest. It happens. [info] None [info] 1473941698
jennlody [info] I definitely do. I started getting sicker when I was 15, and no one believed me. I never threw up so they couldn't actually see any symptoms so they thought it was in my head. They thought I was being bullied or was scared to go to school so I was making up being sick so I didn't have to go. They bribed me with donuts ironically. I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on meds. After months of treatments not working, my mom asked to rule anything else out and they found the Celiac. Now over 6 years later I actually do have awful anxiety, especially when I go to see new doctors and when eating around other people. Luckily my family believes me now but they don't fully understand how stressed I get over these things. At least my parents apologized back then for being mad at me for skipping out on plans once they realized I really was sick at the time. [info] None [info] 1562727080
mydogscollegefund [info] Kinda sounds like both to me. I was diagnosed with anxiety after crohns and when I flare my anxiety about how my body will react jumps up and I find myself over worrying about every sensation and feeling. Make sure the people in your life understand your medical condition and that sometimes it takes you longer to get out of the house. I have had to stop getting ready entirely, text my boss or a friend and say “hey I’m sorry my body isn’t cooperating I’m running a bit late!” And nobody seems to be upset. [info] None [info] 1555770067
kickedoutofbyui [info] It's not diagnosed. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was wayyy younger than I am now and it was pretty bad. The feeling I get when talking in front of a crowd is just like the feeling I had when I was a kid though. Pretty sure it's not just nervousness [info] None [info] 1542237073
ThrewTheDrew [info] I am, or rather was, EXACTLY like you.Meditation helps. In a couple of weeks/months you should see the improvement.I also began practicing Stoicism, which also helps me with my anxiety.I would also suggest that you see a therapist. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and a therapist might be of great help if you have any such disorders. [info] None [info] 1566195150
A_Panda_ [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and it can be seen in my interactions. But so many people throw around the terms without knowing what is happening. [info] None [info] 1560048470
pink_mango [info] Before I was diagnosed with anxiety, I used to go to the dr quite often for issues. Back aches, stomach aches, random pains. I would get stomach pains every single night before sleep. Aside from an actual back issue I had, everything else came back normal. And typically as soon as I went to get it checked out, I would feel better. This sure made me feel sane...Then I had an anxiety attack due to a very stressful job (quit shortly after), and went to my dr. He gave me this form to fill out to evaluate my anxiety, and looked at it after like "you've been dealing with this and didn't tell me?". Well I didn't know what it was, it just slowly got worse and worse over time and it felt normal to me. I went on medication, and within a few weeks I was feeling SO MUCH better, both mentally and physically. No more random pains, no more stomach pains, sleeping was so much easier.  [info] None [info] 1495812202
Madame_Kitsune98 [info] I can have conversations, but sometimes I do draw a blank. It’s a little difficult at times.At the concussion clinic I was finally referred to? It was explained to me that if you had issues with things like anxiety, OCD, or ADHD before the concussion, they’re going to be somewhat worse afterwards. Well. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. My family practitioner, who is an APRN, and I sat down and filled out a questionnaire, and I likely have ADHD, but we never could get me in to see the psychiatrist to do testing for ADHD. So, I have four thousand browser tabs open in my brain, but jumping between them, there’s lag.I’m easily irritated. I used to have the anxiety dialed in, and between medication and good coping skills, I didn’t have an issue letting small things roll off me. I struggle to do that now. [info] None [info] 1563113641
painfanatic [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety before discovering and being diagnosed with ADHD. The major difference between people with anxiety disorders (especially OCD) and people with just regular anxiety (all people who are not psyocopaths experience some anxiety!) is long-term irrational fears. Like being incredibly afraid the door is unlocked, even though you have already checked it is locked three times. If you have the Netflix there is a show called Obsessed that will give you tons of insight into people with chronic anxiety disorders and OCD. This will help you know if you have it or not (very possible to have ADHD and an anxiety disorder).That being said, people with ADHD are prone to having more anxiety than others. This is because our ADHD causes us to make many mistakes or failures in life. We are constantly worrying about the consequences or repeating the mistakes. We are also worse in social situations which can lead us to be anxious as parties, in group settings, etc (making such symptoms worse). However, I have found focusing on my ADHD and coping with life from an ADHD perspective a million times more effective than trying to treat an anxiety disorder was. Now I don't think I had an anxiety disorder at all ( though I used to often have panic attacks, nightmares, insomnia, etc). This is because my anxiety was/is justified (not irrational). My anxiety symptoms of have improved drastically since I started medicating and learning how to cope with ADHD, even though I really haven't done anything to treat anxiety since I was diagnosed with ADHD.If you feel like your talking therapist is not really listening and understanding your point of view , dump them and try someone else. It's one thing to disagree, it's another to not listen. That's pretty much 80% of their job! [info] None [info] 1429314388
heatherilene [info] I take xanax as needed as well. For me, I start taking a very small dose (1/4 of a pill) each day about a week before exams, then I take a half pill before the exam itself. (I was diagnosed with anxiety in undergrad and taking it before a test allows me to calm down enough to successfully take a test. I went from Cs and Ds in high school to mostly As in college).Also, look to see if your law school offers counseling services. They may offer X number of sessions at a discounted rate. You should definitely sign up. I found it helped me tremendously my first year.Use the tools you need to get through school and don't be ashamed. You may not be taking this medication forever. It might just be helping you through a tough time and that is OK. Law school disrupts everything. You need as much support as you can get.Oh, and you shouldn't worry about job interviews until November/December, so cut yourself some slack :) [info] None [info] 1400292727
redditor-for-2-hours [info] Army or navy or whatever recruiter called me right after graduation, too.  Me: Hello  Recruiter: Hi blah bla from blah *insert military branch here* blah  Me: ...Hello.  Recruiter: Do you know what you're going to do after high school?    Me: College.  Recruiter: Do you have plans for college already?  Me: Already accepted to the community college. They accept everybody.  Recruiter: What about after that?  Me: Transfer to a university.  Recruiter: After that?  Me: Get a good career.  Recruiter: Well, have you ever considered joining the *insert US military service here*?  Me: No, I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorders, and if you're diagnosed with anxiety disorders you can't join the military.  Recruiter: ...Well...uh...um...well...I...um...it sounds like you've done your research. *click*  No other recruiters ever called. My brother had recruiters calling for him for about a year after he graduated before they finally gave up on him, I only had that one call. [info] None [info] 1329273905
Mugglemarin [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety days before I started this round of keto (after being way off the wagon for 3 years). I was told I could take two adavan' a day (low dossge). Month later, I've taken 4. This is not a scientific answer of course, I'm not a doc, and your mileage may vary. I'm a little curious, what is your total daily caloric goal? If I did 1200 calls of fat, I wouldn't have much left, but I'm at a large (yet comfortable) deficit. [info] [GM/39/6'4] [NSD:2/22/16 | SW:358 | CW:306 | FGW: 250 | NGW:200] [info] 1459122778
pandaruffles [info] Silence. It developed during highschool "silent reading period". Half hour of pure silence. I don't know why, but usually if I'm STUCK in a silent place I get a horrible panic attack. Eventually, i developed agoraphobia because I didn't want to be put in a situation like that ever again. I was diagnosed with anxiety, and the meds help with the silence but I still feel agoraphobic. However after a while I get cabin fever. [info] None [info] 1416097076
thetruthisoutthere [info] So true. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder a year ago and I was so embarrassed when people at work asked me why I was off work for so long (about 3 weeks). People with bad backs or whatever don't feel the shame. [info] None [info] 1249581381
brokensocialscene [info] I was just diagnosed with anxiety this summer. It mostly manifests as health-type anxiety (was absolutely convinced a had a brain tumor for about three weeks in August), but I'll sometimes get a general "something bad is going to happen" feeling. It's never specific, but it's an incredibly hard feeling to get rid of. It's the worst. But I'm on meds now and they seem to be helping so that's good. It makes me feel good to see someone else is doing well :) [info] None [info] 1381025414
complexsimplicity90 [info] Those things might in fact make you a great psychologist.While you do need to relate in order to build a rapport with your clients, you don’t want to be overly concerned to the point where you are an empath and bringing it home with youPersonally, while finishing my Masters in counseling, I was diagnosed with anxiety. I thought that disqualified me but in all actuality it made me better. 1) because i know from personal experience about anxiety so i can diagnose, recognize the signs and relate and 2) i go to therapy (when needed). I am better able to understand myself and triggers BUT also use what i learn in therapy in my therapy sessions with othersAs a therapist it is HIGHLY suggested that you have a therapist yourself anyway so you should be good  [info] None [info] 1519866240
es127 [info] Hi everyone, I am 24/F, I was diagnosed with anxiety about 4 years ago. I started having severe heartburn and throwing up regularly and was then diagnosed with reflux disease and the cause of that was my anxiety, I apparently carry my stress in my stomach! I used things like yoga, cooking, music to cope and it worked well but within the last year or two I've noticed things getting different and worse. This year I had an ldr break up because he was unsure if this is what he wanted and was stressed with school, dealt with a few panic attacks, insomnia for about a month and pushing people who are closest to me away. I've come to a point now where I don't know how to cope anymore and make myself feel better. It feels like a daily struggle and check in to see how I'm feeling and if I'm off or not. Although i struggle with this can anybody relate when I say although this is something I struggle with so many people have it harder so I don't feel like my symptoms are "severe" enough to get help? And I shouldn't be wasting therapists time because "I'll get over it" right?  [info] None [info] 1452319805
thelidhathappeal [info] I don't know how I feel about this. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and it took me about a year to be able to enjoy smoking. I have had panic attacks so bad they've knocked me unconscious (some when I wasn't smoking and some when I was), I think it might be more of a natural brain chemistry thing that people experience, not so much thoughts. It took time for my body to simply get used to it, I don't feel that it was any change in perception that did it. Regardless of how I got over it though, I am happy I did ;) [info] None [info] 1345433413
Lil-Ackbar [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety yeah that wouldnt surprise me but I actually sort of enjoyed it this time other than the few moments of losing a grip. [info] None [info] 1569111697
Violettemei [info] I've been on two different antidepressants (Prozac and Zoloft) as well as Abilify. I was going through a lot of shit during middle school - high school and I was sent to a therapist that had no idea how to identify and diagnose any sort of mental illness (she said I was developing schizophrenia, I've been diagnosed with anxiety from a better therapist) I was put on Zoloft first, and it didn't help at all, so I was taken off that and put on Prozac. Same thing. The only thing that ever came of the time on those medications was that I started having nosebleeds almost daily. I was a regular in the school nurse's office, all of my teachers learned to just let me leave if I got up and went to the door during class. It's a pretty rare side effect, I think, but somehow I was one of the few that gets it. [info] None [info] 1393373021
masscool [info] I'm on medication. I've been diagnosed with anxiety for 9 years now, it just acts up worse sometimes [info] None [info] 1385238347
rcbarr94 [info] It’s possible that you have anxiety. I’m constantly obsessing over whether people actually like me or if they just pretend and then say rude/mean things behind my back. I was diagnosed with anxiety and started seeing a therapist and I’ve been working on it. It’s hard to let it go but you have to learn to let yourself be okay with people not liking you because not every person in the world is going to get along and that’s okay. There are people that I don’t like but that doesn’t necessarily mean that they’re bad people. So I try to think of the reverse. There are people who won’t like me but that doesn’t mean that I’m a bad person or that there’s anything wrong with me. Also some people ARE just mean spirited and it says more about them than it does about the people they’re being mean to/about.  [info] None [info] 1527474147
jamagut [info] I used to smoke a shit ton of medicinal weed (20-24% THC), like full joints to myself with no tobacco in them, definitely too much looking at it now lolI figured I might not be able to enjoy weed the way I used to, but I was diagnosed with anxiety as I became a hypochondriac at the peak of my anxiety, I’m back to the way I was now but it was briefly pretty bad. I think I may have given myself a form of PTSD with that experience, is that a possibility?  [info] None [info] 1532158317
SBNP95 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety an panic disorder, I know literally all about it. These are not anxiety attacks. These episodes are literally caused by Joy an excitement, I'm not saying that maybe I am wrong, an you're actually right. I just know that even with a family history of anxiety an panic disorder, the early onset of it was brought on by me overdosing at age 16, before that I had never felt anxiety or any of the sorts, but these episodes I'm describing have been happening since I can remember. [info] None [info] 1556240416
Quietgirl89 [info] I'm really new to Reddit, but I have wanted to join for a long time. I am in my first year of university and live in the UK I was diagnosed with anxiety almost a year ago and I haven't really spoken about it to anyone. Although I have struggled with my anxiety for many years prior to being diagnosed. I started feeling extremely low and depressed in high school and I had a big mental breakdown in my last year of college. Through having cognitive behavioural therapy I know that people and social situations can trigger my anxiety (it's very difficult for me to open up to new people, and don't really want friends) I have also had counselling because I wanted to know why I have anxiety and this is due to growing up and living in a toxic family which I am trying to break away from. Has anyone experienced having a toxic parent or living in a toxic home? I am feeling better but I have to take each day at a time and sometimes I have bad days and sometimes I have good days, I just hope that by joining this Reddit I'll be able to open up more and try and challenge some of my anxiety triggers (posting on social media sites is a big one because I'm scared of being judged and criticised) I'm just glad to be a part and join a supportive network of people who understand.  [info] None [info] 1490395101
nokalica [info] From my perspective, HRT is essential medical care that I should have been receiving from a pretty young age. I didn't know I was trans then, because it just wasn't something I had a concept of. But I was diagnosed with anxiety and a long list of other things, and I was given I don't know how many drugs, even if it really should've been clear that I was likely trans and needing help. When I finally took estrogen, it was really the first time that I felt better of some level of dysphoric anxiety and just feel "normal." For me, I consider an aspect of my trans identity to relate to issues with my hormonal system. The state of medical knowledge and care in trans medicine is still appalling bad, particularly given how many people are trans overall. I want doctors to do better, and I think we are owed more research just so better care can be provided. What happened in my youth was malpractice and forced on me, and the medical system is only causing harm and wasting money when it isn't trans aware and affirmative.My identity is mine through self-identification alone, and I don't need a medically proven category to fall into to be real.  No one does. I don't want to see doctors telling kids they are trans because of brain scan, but now there are gender-specialist child therapists are just helping kids figure themselves out, and there should be more of them. If medicine can better answer why someone is trans, it might mean better tuned HRT, quicker and younger referrals to good doctors, and just on and on.We are pretty well medically proven to be real already, and that understanding will just keep getting better, but there are still going to be invalidating assholes. If it is just about the hormonal care, it is still positive. [info] None [info] 1562905359
BraveChipmunk3005 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, so not so good ig [info] None [info] 1564175952
Maraude8r [info] Got 13 points, but I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder too. Honestly I feel most of these questions are really difficult to relate to. The schizoid answer to most of them is probably "I avoid getting into a situation like that to begin with, but if I have to I guess I'll do it" and then the anxious ones among us will be concerned with the results just because theyre anxious in general, not because of the emotional rejection. [info] None [info] 1520209401
thatwaffleskid [info] I'm exactly the same. I'm 27 as well, diagnosed in the 6th grade, which is also when I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. Even though I have a job and a family I still feel as though im being dragged slowly by a rope through life instead of using that rope to lead my life where I want it to go. I'm also in a constant state of panic that I'm not doing well at my job even though I haven't had many issues there.It's a good thing the stakes are high though. That's what keeps me going and gets me through it. Use that to your advantage. It's ok to be freaked out when things change, but don't let it take over.  [info] None [info] 1467697119
Ownfir [info] Up until I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago I honestly thought that all people thought the same way I did, with this much worry. (I'm a guy.) My mind is similar to this but with more future concerns and less present concerns. To think that someone just has like a blank empty mind is almost impossible for me to comprehend because my mind is *always* thinking.  [info] None [info] 1454214832
SpankmasterS [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety as well. Its one of the reasons I am insistent on getting physical activity. In this sense the exercise will ease the symptoms. Otherwise general health is pretty simple. I'd suggest two things. 1. Have a specified goal (lose weight = not good, lose 50lbs by Sept 11 = good)2. Make a detailed plan with benchmarks (i.e to lose 100lbs I need to lose 2lbs a week for the year so I need a calorie deficit of 1000 cals per day - I'll lose 4lbs a week till xx/oo then 3lbs a week till xx/oo then 2lbs a week till xx/oo then 1lb per week till end). Then you fill in how you will do it. Given your stats you wont have to do much to see a big change. Just:1. Get some exercise daily. Walking is perfectly fine. 2. Control your calorie intake.I'd check with a doc before starting this. Find foods you like. Find a physical activity you like. Your healthier lifestyle will have these two as the foundation. With just these two you can drop 100lbs this year. It  might not win you a ms. fitness universe award, but you'll be healthier (physically and mentally). Also, anxiety can be well managed by nutrition. Sugar and coffee in large quantities are not your friend. In theory its simple. There are quite a few details and your gonna have to educate yourself. But a basic one:If you can just walk for an hour a day and eat 1700 cals your weight will plummet. If you have goals that are more challenging then roadmap how to get there.Good Luck. Keep us informed.  [info] Inactive [info] 1264744416
BlueInkSz [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety issues at first. The foundations of my paranoia/"paranoia" are things that are completely possible, even though I have been unable to fathom a true reason behind them. An old therapist of mine said it was anxiety related. Fast forward a few years and I was diagnosed with schizophrenia by someone who had far less information. Of course, I fully realize I've gone off the rails with paranoia at times, which really sucks, because there are certain things in my life that actually happened that no one takes seriously anymore. Long story short, schizophrenia is the convenient excuse and some people are manipulative scum.Of course, since I know people with schizophrenia who believe such things are a dime a dozen, I don't expect to be believed. But yeah, at first it was all anxiety issues. I had some bizarre thoughts that came and went, but for the most part it was believable stuff. C'est la vie. [info] None [info] 1569896304
mollyrhi [info] To me this does sound like anxiety but probably not as a side effect of drinking. Did you have anxiety before drinking? I was diagnosed with anxiety at a young age and OCD later on in my teenage years and my psychiatrist said they often go hand in hand.  [info] None [info] 1501442714
brelizabeth [info] This made me feel great. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few days ago and it was nice to see people being supportive to David. I also really like that David genuinely does seem to be overcoming his anxiety, at least a little bit. When he is talking to Ken about losing the reward and how he craves pizza, he puts his head in his hands and you can see him working to change his thoughts. Then he looks up and smiles and makes an optimistic comment. Production can be heavy-handed with this stuff but, for me, the representation is nice.I changed my flair to David after the episode :) [info] David [info] 1480047613
Lionflower13 [info] Me.But, it's getting better since I have started taking ADD meds. I was diagnosed with anxiety first and given medication to help with it. I was still getting overwhelmed because I couldn't tell when I was taking on too many things in my life (inability to regulate).And, transitions kicked my ass. Always. I could go to the gym for six solid weeks, get sick for 5 days, and never go back to the gym because my groove was thrown off. And, forget going from writing instructions to suddenly being interrupted for an emergency meeting. All that did was put me in a foul mood because I liked my hyperfocusing.After being diagnosed with ADD and placed on the appropriate meds, I am better able to adapt to transitions and uncomfortable environment, but it's taking longer than I thought to get to a point where I no longer need the anxiety meds. It has been 6 months, and I keep making progress, but it's baby steps. [info] ADHD and Parent [info] 1366666500
taft-attack [info] I spent years paying psychologists, psychiatrists, and therapists to tell me I was troubled and give me advice and prescriptions. I was diagnosed with anxiety, OCD, and panic disorder. I totally depended on these people to justify my feelings, positive or negative... It's a really unhealthy thing to do to your mind, in my opinion. If you think you can work through it on your own, please try. Doctors and therapists will give you diagnoses and prescriptions, but if you help yourself or depend on friends (feel free to PM me if you want) you'll end up much healthier, more confident, and self-sufficient. I was a super hypochondriac and it landed me in the ER for a panic attack that I was convinced was really an episode of diabetic shock. (I don't even have diabetes, or anyone in my family for that matter) After that I realized the diagnoses and meds were just band-aids to a problem only I could fix. Sorry to ramble but i feel like you may be in a similar situation and I'd like to help you avoid doing what I did.  [info] None [info] 1461422053
Smitty89 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I currently take various herbal supplements for it, but is a prescription something I should look into? [info] None [info] 1383775442
bakedgoodslover [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and agoraphobia years ago. I'm doing much better now but still have some places I avoid going. The worst one was restaurant, I didn't eat outside for almost three years, the few times I tried I left the place before I finished my food, sometimes right after giving the order. Thankfully I overcame it, now the worst one is traffic on a busy day. Just last week I almost threw up in a taxi and got dizzy when we got stuck in traffic on a highroad. [info] None [info] 1450189889
AggravatingCupcake0 [info] I've definitely experienced some of the same issues as your wife. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and my PCP and I suspect I may have ADD although my psychiatrist refused to formally diagnose me with it for stupid reasons. What happens is, you have a task or two to do. Then one day you don't get anything done because you went on a trip into the city, or had a day out with friends, etc. Then the task or two has doubled and now you suddenly have four tasks. Ok, so you try to tackle the four tasks in a day, but you only manage to get one done. The next day comes, now you have five tasks. And very quickly, it reaches a point where you have so much to do that it's overwhelming and through flawed logic you figure it's better to do nothing at all than try to plow your way through this mountain of tasks that lie before you because you'll never finish them anyway. I suspect that maybe your wife is going through this as well? So, on to solutions: I went to a therapist for a while, and while I don't do this all the time it does help when I do - he told me to schedule out my days in advance. As in, make an hour-by-hour list of things to do, and give a finite amount of time to each task. For example, your wife can say "Ok, tomorrow I'm going to pack my Etsy sales for two hours. At the end of two hours, that's it. I move on to the next task that I have scheduled." This way, she gets stuff done - it may not be as much as she hoped, but it's something, and makes things more manageable and less daunting than going "Ok, I have to get ALL these Etsy items packed TODAY" and feeling exhausted and defeated after four hours of packing and having gotten nothing else done. It also puts pressure on her to finish her tasks in a timely manner. Perhaps you guys can work out a schedule for her like this? I know that when I employ this method I'm like "Oh shit, I got five things done in two hours instead of the one thing I would have normally gotten done."  [info] None [info] 1543320419
CardioPumps [info] Not sure if they count as antidepressants but I have been taking SSRI pills since 2-3 weeks and they work fine. I am the same me, only a bit more relaxed and my mind is on ease. Nothing BIG happened though, it is not a magical pill obviously.My psychologist prescribed them since I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1448221417
edmazing [info] I've been lurking a little. Is it just me who starts to blush and feel a little anxiety reading the posts in this sub. I mean I totally relate to so many of these things. I've been diagnosed with anxiety so it is a thing for me but I consider it kinda weird just reading things would make me kinda cringe and feel sympathy pains.  Ordering a pizza and they end the call with "Enjoy" and you just reply "You too." And you end up thinking about it for the rest of the night and every time you see the pizza box. One love triangle and it ended in disaster of no one ever being friends again, it still haunts me... why's life so scary sometimes?   [info] None [info] 1464220474
Redhaired103 [info] OP, I have to tell a story. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder but still had it undiagnosed, I went from in my safe zone to working as a waitress at a 5 star hotel's ever-crowded restaurant. The first two weeks were challenging in every way. Both physically and mentally. Physical exhaustion only made my anxiety worse. But, it was one of the best things that happened over time. I got use to the environment. I liked my co-workers and that place started to become another safe space for me. Even with the customers that were problematic, I didn't really care because it was still *my* safe space, with some fun co-workers I liked. I tell this story because while your 'bad scenario' is an option, my experience and alike are also definitely on the table.But let's say things didn't work out at this job. I think of the things us with anxiety disorder sometimes don't totally accept is that this wouldn't be the end of the world. There are zillions of jobs out there with different work environment, different work duties, different co-workers. Yes, you might not make enough money for the life standard you would like to have at all of them, but "paying the bills"... the chances are you can find a job like that. And please please please don't forget, you are not *stuck* at any job. Another common thing I see is that we feel like whatever situation we are in, sometimes we feel that will always be our situation. It's not. If you don't like the job, if you want to leave, you can do it anytime you want. One of my best friends is an employer. She did have employees over the years who quit after a week, didn't show up at work, etc Some had good reasons (anxiety is a valid reason), some were just irresponsible like they went on a date instead. She never thought badly about the people who couldn't continue to work over health reasons, including mental health. Her employees actually don't know this but she suffers from anxiety disorder herself and gets panic attacks, sometimes at work. The moral of the story: more people are familiar with anxiety disorder than you think. They won't even think badly about you, nor they expect you to have an incredible performance in the beginning, regardless of if you have anxiety or not.Give it a try. If things work out, great. If things don't work out, not the end of the world. [info] None [info] 1532264370
Overyonderway [info] I don't mean to sound insulting if you have already done this, but have you told your mental health provider your concern in plain language? I've always had good luck plainly explaining my problems to the doctor. Like "I know I am diagnosed with anxiety but I also have xxxx going on. Is that related or new?" [info] None [info] 1458772429
ChadleyDooRight [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 13. Originally it was just major life changing events like my parents divorce that induced it. Then graduating high school. Then starting college. It’s not the job itself, but the things going on within my own life and I’d like to focus on bettering my anxiety coping skills  and slowly ease into testing them and not start at a disadvantage. I love the job, super friendly people (employees and customers) and I can talk all day about computers.  [info] Computer Sales Associate [info] 1544228840
godsanddevils [info] I used to get horrible hangnails. Then when I was 15 I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. [info] None [info] 1476076991
kateesaurus [info] Honestly that sounds a lot like what happened to me in high school. Teachers called me lazy because I’d miss chunks of class and not know about assignments due to seizures. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD and guess what? I don’t actually have either of those or get medicated for them now. Feel free to pm me if you want to talk further but I don’t want to take up your whole post. [info] None [info] 1549033341
PatronymicPenguin [info] It's too easy to give up after the first medication or two doesn't work well. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder as a child and it took several months to find a medication which worked and didn't have unbearable side effects, but it was worth it. My life improved greatly and has continued to get better into adulthood. It can take time, but never give up. The right medicine, combined with therapy, can change your life. [info] None [info] 1485530761
PoppaDR3W [info] It is scary. I definitely had/have a bit of it. For awhile, before I was diagnosed with anxiety, I didn't know what was going on. So every pain was a heart attack or a stroke or cancer. It was weird, because other people's stories made me anxious and get those feelings.Like someone I know had a benign brain tumor. I never had headaches, but after I was told that I had them within days. I had intense head pressure. :/  The easiest way to get over it, in my opinion, is to see a doctor and get a checkup. Being reaffirmed by a professional definitely helps. Take care of yourself - exercise and diet. :) [info] None [info] 1420838757
InkblotDoggo [info] My service dog. I was diagnosed with anxiety pretty early on, and in High School, I was assigned a service dog. His name was Baxter, and he was a German Shepherd. I was legally allowed to bring him to every class, though I remember I got weird looks from every teacher and staff member for the first few weeks that I had Baxter. Most of the upper staff, like the Principal and Superintendent, knew about my service animal and had cleared it, but I'll never forget my history teacher's expression the first time I brought Baxter into their class. [info] None [info] 1555688750
babykittiesyay [info] So I'm coming into this from maybe a different background, I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder and "severe major depressive disorder" (yes, that's actually what's on my charts, lol). I'm also a FTM.The anxiety has been way worse than I've experienced before. Partly, I think it's that my emotions are turned up to 11 from all the hormones, which might continue for the whole pregnancy but definitely not past that. This is probably the first thing to remind yourself of, this is temporary. It's also good to remind yourself of all the people you know of who are parents. Are they all perfect? Humans have been making it through all this for millennia. Make sure to check in with yourself about the effects these worries are having on you. Are they keeping you from getting things done, taking up a lot of time, messing with your breathing or heart rate significantly? If yes, it's time to chat with your doctor. It's very normal to be nervous, it's also pretty common to develop anxiety disorders in pregnancy, between the hormones, the information overload, and the huge responsibility. Getting care sooner will hep prevent any temporary issue from becoming long-term. We can do this! [info] None [info] 1546283184
coverwatch [info] What you describe are panic attack symptoms. I am talking about anxiety symptoms. I've never had a panic attack in my life but I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder without any heart symptoms. [info] None [info] 1554289305
ItIs430Am [info] I would say go to the DAV, yes. If someone wants to chime in and correct me, by all means, but the DAV is literally there for helping veterans with disability claims. In all facets. At first I was worried about making the switch, but they've made it so much easier. My first representative was the American Legion and my first claim went through pretty fast, but since I moved and was told about the DAV, I have done everything through them. Got my appointments set up and everything has been easy. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD and the psychologist who did my evaluation basically confirmed it. With PTSD, I'm sure you will get the correct diagnosis. They wont look at you and think "oh they're lying." Itll be taken very seriously. On that note, and remember this, the evaluation does not mean you will be treated. For disability, you are getting evaluated to confirm your condition. You need to either get referred to or see the VA psychiatrist/therapist (I see the VA ones). They will work with you to determine how often you need to go and what you need to do to be successful down the road.  [info] None [info] 1523117839
merpytaco [info] Hey there, I wish I could tell you there's a magical cure for your dad but there isn't. I grew up in a situation very similar to yours, heck, I'm still living in it. I was diagnosed with anxiety last year when I finally dragged myself to a psychologist. I was jumpy, hyper vigilant, always too aware of my surroundings and people's actions. The therapist described it as having ptsd as a result of growing up in a domestic violence situation. The problem isn't you. You were never an awful kid. Your father likely has anger issues due to his own unresolved traumas. But, that is no excuse for him to act this way and to harm you or your family.I hope, hope, hope you seek some counseling. If you can please get your mother to see a therapist as well. And if your dad can see one, even better. If not, please talk to and confine in friends. Don't live in fear for your life. Protect yourself first. I know it's not the best advise, but from one gal with an emotionally unstable dad to the other, I know you love him, but he's **not** allowed to hurt you. And you have to make yourself believe that because it is *true.* [info] None [info] 1501485866
theloneranger2012 [info] I agree with microwave333, I have been diagnosed with anxiety, body pains are a frequent difficulty for me. Even now typing this has tuned me in to the fact that I have twinges where I don't want them. [info] Sertraline [info] 1325672829
Prestiegefull [info] I get this alot as well. However, I was diagnosed with anxiety. As long as im avoiding triggers and keeping busy in life, I do fine. The thing that matters most is friends, hobbies, etc. It doesnt help to sit and loathe. Whenever I just sit around with nothing to do, I think too much. This makes me very sad and sometimes I get suicidal thoughts, and I self harm. But recently I've been trying to fix that, and I hope you can find out whats wrong and help yourself, good luck. [info] None [info] 1389104452
chelseacd7 [info] Yea I'm like this too. I'm 23 and hadn't gone to the doc since my parents made me when I was in highschool. Until last year. About last August I freaked out and I could feel pressure in my chest and could tell my heart was racing and I thought I was having a freaking heart attack. I was so torn because the idea of going to the doctor made me sick and I thought I might be overreacting  but I kept worrying something might really be wrong. After a night of laying awake thinking I might die I forced myself to go and after an ekg, chest x-rays, &amp; lab work I was diagnosed with anxiety. Go figure. I do think it has improved a small amount though because I've had a few follow up appointments since all that happened and I feel like they were a little easier to handle. That could just be because of the doctor though, she's great and I feel more comfortable with her. I would suggest maybe asking around to people you know to get suggestions for a good doc. I think finding someone that makes you feel more comfortable, even if it's just slightly, could help. [info] None [info] 1519795012
aboy461 [info] I know exactly how you feel . I've been diagnosed with anxiety for 2 years and I'm only 21 . The worst part is that in a calm simple situation I know I should be calm but my body tells me otherwise and is stimulating some sort of fight or flight situation. It's like you know you need to be calm but can't do anything about it  [info] None [info] 1411572135
nomasmustache [info] Every Sunday! I'm diagnosed with anxiety though and I absolutely hate my job. [info] None [info] 1561302058
applepiecheetah [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety (generalized anxiety disorder) for a lot longer than I've been smoking. I'm not sure about certain strains or anything specific like that but overall I don't feel more, or less, anxious. Personally my anxiety doesn't get better or worse when I smoke. [info] None [info] 1500455975
Throw_Up_Away [info] Good question. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder, for which I am medicated, and various therapists have referred to this as a phobia. I suppose I am not officially, medically documented as "Emetophobic", but honestly, if I wanted that diagnosis, I am positive I could get it. It is an irrational fear that effects my daily life and is painfully hard to control, and this accurately matches the definition of a phobia. [info] None [info] 1323368172
lipstickchic [info] I had anxiety my entire life since childhood and had no idea it was called anxiety I just thought what I felt was how everyone felt part of the human experience till I was diagnosed with anxiety and all the feelings I had along with it. It’s crazy I used to bite my nails as a kid and that was an anxious behavior. I even told my mother like why didn’t you take me to a therapist or why didn’t my pediatrician never said anything. I’m now 27 F and wish I had more time or more tools growing up dealing with it. I feel now it’s worse though. Lol  [info] None [info] 1547677838
Lavender_macaron [info] Definitely go see a professional. Mental illness still has a terrible stigma so if you even suggest it to an Asian parent, they will probably just scream, "No you're not depressed! You're just lazy!" It's like they think that if you ignore it and deny it exists, it'll go away on it's own. When I was diagnosed with anxiety and given antidepressants my mom's first words were "Don't kill yourself okay?" Gee...thanks for the support. [info] None [info] 1455744290
LippyLibrarian [info] Hi, friend! Honestly, once I'm in a flare up, the only thing to do is take it easy until it's gone. Your path sounds identical to mine. When I was diagnosed, I gave myself a year to find a natural way to manage it- supplements, herbs, acupuncture, diet, exercise, etc. That was an immense help, especially for the daily pain, but it just wan't enough. I got on the lowest dose of Lyrica and noticed an even bigger result pretty fast. About a year ago, I was diagnosed with anxiety and started taking Paxil for that... Maybe it's a coincidence, but I noticed an even LOWER number of painful days after that kicked in. Anyway... take care of yourself when you feel good, and it should at least reduce your flare ups. This sounds vague, but it's all about knowing your limits. My go to for self care during a flare is a hot bath and lots of laying in bed with a book. I hope this helps!  [info] None [info] 1471631976
AnnaMolly1007 [info] I'm still prescribed it, I only take it when my back is unbearable. And no I don't get high off of klonopin. That's the exact reason I had to stop Xanax because I was so sensitive to Xanax and I hate feeling high. And yes it's a hard core drug haha. I've read about the people that have been on it years as presribed and how they HAVE to ween down or risk seizing and/or dying. If that's not a hard core drug I don't know what is. All benzos are hardcore up there with pain killers on risk of physical dependency and withdrawing. Everything I read, people still get bad withdraw symptoms even when weening as ordered. But unless the mri I'm getting says otherwise, it helps because I have extreme muscle tension. Because I was diagnosed with anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1479664067
HypnoticPeaches [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety. That has nothing to do with this thread; please don't just shit on anxiety-havers by calling us pussies when that's not even what this thread was about./You said get a diagnosis. This thread was specifically about people like myself for whom medical advice isn't an option.  [info] None [info] 1416991883
BoxSapling [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, not OCD, but I have a lot of the same thoughts as you. I’ve felt the need to reassess my sexuality over and over again since even before I came out (even though I knew I was gay). I don’t think you’re unlovable, and I wish you luck in school and in life. I’m glad to hear that you are getting better. [info] None [info] 1533486440
HondaGirlMN [info] I have agoraphobia. I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder about 5 years ago. Since then I've been taking Zoloft. It helps take the edge off a little bit, but by no means has cured it. I tried going to a psychologist but I panicked too much and would just not show up to my appointments. Now, years later, my anxiety is the worst it's ever been. I discovered the books by Dr. Claire weekes and holy shit, this lady knows what she is talking about. One of the best books I've ever read..seriously. I've been following the steps in her book and pushing myself. It's hard. Really hard. But totally worth it. [info] http://smile.amazon.com/registry/wishlist/15YFVGGE3DLZH  [info] 1412282623
srxtparty [info] That I'm rude because I don't talk much. I understand why people would think I'm rude, but I've been diagnosed with anxiety, plus I was pretty badly bullied when I was younger because of the way I speak. [info] None [info] 1519319268
Brindy11 [info] I've been tested for autism it came up negative I was under in each category of the least and from what I'm told it was just under for the school requirements to get help. But I am diagnosed with anxiety [info] None [info] 1544370376
bcxx143 [info] I was treated for PTSD, Depression, Bipolar disorder as a teenager and I've been off meds for like 6 years. Now I'm diagnosed with anxiety and it's really bad, so back to therapy and medication I go. So, yes. [info] None [info] 1473809377
toosassyferyou [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety for a while, and I have these episodes as well. I guess I just always thought it was something that happened with GAD - and from what I've read, I think it's safe to say that a lot of GAD people struggle with intrusive thoughts like that, and it drives them wild.The best solution I've come up with is to avert my attention immediately after an occurrence. I know there's no way I'm able to talk myself out of fear (and usually dwelling on them only makes it worse).I just tell myself it's not worth my time. The intrusive thoughts aren't reality, and they haven't happened, and so there's no use thinking about them.It's a battle, but I've seen progress. [info] GAD &amp; Panic Disorder [info] 1405397307
jamessayshowdy [info] Honestly I really thought for the longest time it was normal to worry about everything and always be stressed out. When I was diagnosed with anxiety I was like "wait wut".  [info] None [info] 1554241591
Lcarre02 [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety. Thank you [info] None [info] 1558952306
NYCParis7 [info] Hi I've been through the same. Just a quick intro, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, agoraphobia and obsessive compulsive disorder when I was 16. I stayed home a lot, had 0 friends and felt unhappy and low all the time. And yes I totally understand how you are feeling now. First off, try considering medication for your anxiety. Because for me, my doctor told me that I have too much receptor cell in one of the parts of my brain, so I get super anxious over even the small stuff. So yea, the medication can calm you down and help u in your work and daily life.Next, your living situation. It seems to bother u a lot. So, start to work on it. Try to post more ads online on local forums, Craigslist, uni forum, etc. Maybe work extra hours or get an extra job. Further to that, start saving up. Yes I know u barely have enough to live by now, but just make sacrifices and save up a little every month. Why? For college/ emergency. It's already a good start that you want to go to college. 😃👍🏻 I know people say that degree is not the only way, but in many times, degree is the easier and safer way. Next, your job. But first let me tell you about my fear which caused my OCD, anxiety and agoraphobia. I was afraid of using the public bathroom. I fear people will judge me for doing number 2. I fear people will think that I'm abnormal and dirty. My main problem was MY FEAR OF HOW PEOPLE WILL THINK OF ME. In short, I gave too much sh** (lol nice pun). So yea bak to ur workplace, don't care so much. People do not think of u as much as u think they do, for real! Like kuroky said 'don't give a f**k!' If u really dislike ur existing job, it's time to look for a new one. Stay up, play less dota, and start looking for jobs. Try to attend as many interview as u can. You never know which job has the best opportunities for u until u get to compare them. Finally, I'm not sure if u have been through this. But for me, I do a lot of self-pity. I looked at my situation and started comparing myself against my friends who are doing better, then I start to feel very down and feel pitiful for myself. That same cycle happens so often, I didn't get to my problem and solve it, instead I was just there gloating and getting all sad about my problem. BUT I HAVE GOTTEN THROUGH AND OVER ALL THESE NOW. 7 years later, which is now, I'm 24, graduated, have a full time job, have a gf (which helped me alot in my shitty 😂 Problem). As my father always tells me, 'son, you just need a breakthrough, and things will change'. And it did! You can do it my friend, I wish u all the best. Nothing comes free in life. Treasure ur family members and friends. Help while you can, because u never know when u need the same. All the best, looking forward to seeing you overcome all these and make a post of your victorious breakthrough on DOTA 2 REDDIT. Best regards,Samuel.  [info]  [info] 1537316884
JW-1998 [info] No help, I have had medical help and I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I refuse to touch medication due to negative experiences in the past. Indeed, it is indescribably distressing, I believe I have health anxiety. Constantly beleaguered by crippling migraines, panic attacks, feelings of trepidation and impending doom, awful head sensations, and thinking I am on the verge of death. I have had this since the turn of the year with no respite. I won’t be surprised if I end my life, it is certainly heading in that direction. Thanks for your support. I miss having people that give a damn about me. [info] None [info] 1564106280
Potaterkiller [info] It is embarrassing but I had to sleep in my parents room until I was around 13 as well. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 17. My thought processes were all screwed up, I was having trouble interacting with my friends, I generally hid out and felt awful most of the time (the anxious adrenaline feeling). I would really suggest reading some Buddhist texts and some Dao books (preferably by chuangtsu) to help you calm down a bit. With me, I just one day clicked with my parents and was done with all of that. However recovering from my anxiety attacks and learning to control my heart rate took many years and I had to accidentally discover college courses of religion through core requirements. I hope you can find reassurance in  your life and begin to look up from here on out! [info] None [info] 1360228393
sircoxalot [info] I get this too and I've been diagnosed with anxiety. It mostly happens shortly after I've gotten really stressed out, which tends to happen when you spot an ex. [info] None [info] 1358814875
dragonscantfly [info] I've always had anxiety. Kind adults reframed it by telling me I was just "too smart for my own good." I remember being little and standing in a McDonalds Playplace, refusing to climb up too high, because I didn't trust that the structure would be stable enough to hold so many moving children. One of my earliest memories is from when I was about 3, watching my mom stand on a step stool to hang a plant from a hook on the ceiling. I had a "vision" of her falling off the little stool, cracking her head open on the wall, and dying. I was really freaked out by it and kept asking her to "be vay, vay cay-full, mommy." I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 8 or 9. It'd been a part of my life for a long time before that.  [info] None [info] 1428466931
sissyanxiityy [info] Weird cause I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder as a kid I just dont see how that could create this and how anxiety could potentially change ur sexual orientation [info] None [info] 1533159021
positive-stuff [info] Good for you for working to get better :) Just a couple months ago I was diagnosed with anxiety and it's much better now. If I can do it, you can too. [info] None [info] 1483316628
joooh [info] Could it be anxiety? I was diagnosed with anxiety but I don't know why I would be very anxious about a TV show. [info] None [info] 1511287255
LeviosaLeviosah [info] Hi everyone, I'm a 23 y/o F kinda new to Reddit, just looking to find a community and get support. I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2013 and have had a recent bout of health anxiety. I've been doing okay this week, and have had a few breakthroughs and faced 2 of my fears. although old time fears of mine still hang in the background. I play a lot of video games but lately mostly maintaining my world of warcraft character, and recently gotten into this game called stardew valley. Really gretful for subreddits like this :] [info] None [info] 1468642352
deeathbeforedeecaf [info] Okay so I can fully relate. I'm diagnosed with anxiety but I fucking love scary movies and serial killer podcasts. Also love paranormal shit. It definitely became a research hobby of mine and I became obsessed. Turns out super negative scary shit can really mess you up. I've went from having my anxiety under control to having full blown panic attacks because I heard a noise. The best advice is to have him cut it all off for an extended amount of time. And when he's ready slowly reintroduce it, if this is truly something he likes. And if the anxiety comes back just cut it out completely. The panic attacks and anxiety are not worth the spooky shit. Try to get him to explore other hobbies of his. Or get him to try new ones. This could simply be an outlet for him and doesn't really realize the toll it's taking on him.  [info] None [info] 1475234125
imnotpants [info] I’m interesting in applying for the air force but I just found out that when I went to therapy a few years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. Now I went back to therapy and I was diagnosed with multiple other mental disorders. Do these factors keep me from being eligible for the Air Force? What have you experienced with mental health confidentiality when joining the Air Force? Am I allowed to keep these things a secret? Thanks for any answers! [info] None [info] 1540422404
shortkid113 [info] No, that's very helpful. I was diagnosed with anxiety years ago, but brushed it under the rug and wish I hadn't.  [info] None [info] 1550029507
Lambeau_Analytica [info] Came here to say this. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ~~dissociation~~ derealization. I recall in my H.S. years being in a perpetual state of ~~dissociation~~ derealization for around 7 or 8 months. I'd wake up: *Am I cool? I'm cool. Wait, why would I ask that, I must not be cool, that's why I'm asking, 'cuz I'm still fucked aren't I, or maybe this is how reality used to be, or is it?, oh fuck oh fuck* BAM and it's like everything becomes a dream.        The best way I could describe it to my parents and doctors is, imagine looking at the world threw a backwards pair of binoculars. Everything seems so far away, you feel distant from everything in all directions. Even sensations like touch can take a second to register. You feel like a passenger in your own body. Familiar places look completely foreign.        For instance, I was having an episode so I walked around my apartment complex's parking lots. On my way back I had trouble finding my place because nothing looked familiar. It's the worst fear I've ever had in my life. It's literally a civil war inside your brain.          Lucky for me I figured out ways on how to never have this happen again. And it hasn't for about 10 years now? Now I can openly talk about all my experiences with it, but back then just hearing the word would instantly throw me back into the dream reality.         I could see where it'd be a fun experience if you're taking a drug. You know why it's happening and how long it'll last, but when it happens for reasons unknown to you, you lose all hope that you'll be able to live in that old reality again.  [info] None [info] 1540232486
justademonindisguise [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety (specified, unspecified) because of the fact that a lot of it stems from my schizophrenia. I was told it's very common in people on the schizo spectrum. I was prescribed anti-anxiety meds for it but I try to do other stuff to ease my anxiety before I take them. I find that the more anxious I am the more psychotic I am which leads to more anxiety and it's a never ending cycle so it's good to get it treated if you can.  [info] None [info] 1502762800
Thunderfin [info] This is me right now (though I am going to the weight room, I haven't been as productive work-wise).  I've been diagnosed with anxiety and use procrastination to ease my worries -- maybe you have something similar.The truth is, that voice won't go away.  Even for the most disciplined guys in the world, there's a voice inside their heads as they get out of bed at 5 am to workout, telling them to go back to sleep.Some things that have helped me are:-Have a to-do / goal list.  What do you want to accomplish immediately and/or in the next week.  What about the next month?  Type or write this out and make sure it's visible.  Another way to think about it: what are your goals?  Set yourself some deadlines.  Eg. I want to impress ____ or reach ____, and I have until ____ to reach it.  Obviously you ultimately should be doing things for yourself and not for external validation, but it's better to do this than nothing at all.-Have a rough schedule.  Make one the night before for the next day.  Include enough break time at the start, because it's very difficult to go from 0 to 100 just like that.-I haven't tried this, but get someone to hold you accountable.  Family member, friend, even someone random on this sub.  They'll message you every day at ____ telling you to get off your ass and start working.All the best man! [info] None [info] 1533181387
reggspregg [info] I completely understand this, but I have to disagree. People who are actually diagnosed with anxiety disorder usually go to therapy, take medication, or both. Me on meds versus me off of medication are two completely different people. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder a few years ago, and no one that I have met in recent years could tell that I have anxiety. The people who are outgoing and claim they have anxiety usually are ones that have been treated for a while or are complete liars and attention seekers.I understand that a lot of people fake mental disorders, but don't assume that every outgoing person who claims they have anxiety is lying. [info] None [info] 1539883294
FXWare [info] You just described my situation. The feeeling that everyone is judging me, stopping myself form saying what i'd like to be able to say, second guessing every possible move. It's like life is passing by and i'am too afraid to get in it. I've been diagnosed with anxiety troubles a few years ago, medication helps but I still haven't figured out how to change my own self, how to be the person i used to as a kid.I know you may be afraid to go see a professionnal, but seeing a doctor is the best advice i can give you [info] None [info] 1432523341
mattbernss [info] Yes, I've also been going through this for the past 9 months. Always nauseous in the mornings, I don't eat breakfast, maybe only something that goes down very easily like watermelon. Missed a lot of school, got blood tests, an MRI and endoscopy, and nothing. Noticed that the only times that I got nauseous was at school and around SO. I was diagnosed with anxiety 2 and a half weeks ago, and I've been taking 50mgs of Zoloft prescribed by my psychologist.It's comforting to know that I'm not the only one having this. [info] None [info] 1530770226
SlugHeart [info] Wow this is eerie, I'm going through pretty much the exact same thing. Although I've been diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder in the past and am currently trying to figure out if what I'm actually going through is more neurological/medical or if it's just my mental illness going out of wack. My Deja Vu/Derealisation just won't stop on some days though, it's been on/off for the better part of this year. Today is one of my "bad days". :( I recently had a CAT Scan, which came back normal, I still need to schedule an EEG. Just wanted to say you're not alone in these symptoms, hopefully we can both find some answers.  [info] Neurontin 200mg/day [info] 1407944026
illliveon [info] Sure! My fiance and I first started dating when I was 18 and he was 20. We are now 24, and 26. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 16. I depend on him a lot. Right now he is the only one working, and I sympathize with the fact you can't figure out why he is with you. It's too good to be true because I don't feel like I deserve it. I also have those moments of panic where I think he is cheating on me with someone, or planning to leave me. After we moved states and lived with my parents for a year or so, he had a breakdown. I had done the same as you and put my anxiety on his shoulders, i would have panic attacks if he left and everything. He said he couldn't handle it. I just listened and let him talk, because it's difficult for him to express his emotions. Then I told him I appreciate all of that, he doesn't have to stay, it terrifies me, but I wouldn't want him to be here unless he wanted. I then started working on my anxiety a little more alone. We also set up therapy time, which was just some time out of the week we both could talk about serious stuff. Before that I constantly talked about those things everyday, and he never talked about it. Relationships are really difficult when you are also healing from mental illness. It's so hard to not just vent to him, because he is so good at making me feel better. I sometimes wish he would talk a little more. I don't know I have come to realize our brains work differently, and more and more now we are starting to understand each other. I'm still working on healing the anxiety. It actually got worse the last year and I am now full blown agoraphobic. Somehow he loves me even more than ever before, and I'm still hopefull I will work through the anxiety stuff. It's a difficult process, and it's really hard to get professional help without money. I don't know if you have to deal with that. Besides that for my anxiety I find its super important I eat well and exercise, consistantly. I meditate, and looked up breathing get techniques that help get me through panic attacks. I tell him how he can help. Before I would just whine, and he would feel helpless. So I tried to change that, and try to find little ways he can help. Like getting me a glass a water when he notices I'm anxious, or little things like that.  [info] None [info] 1458589208
CPledger [info] I have this problem a lot. Convinced myself for a decade that it was just expedient to be faster before all the symptoms piled up and I was diagnosed with anxiety. Funny how we can convince ourselves to gloss over things and justify them as normal. Odd thing is walking slow now makes me anxious. [info] None [info] 1515303530
jcruz512 [info] Well the dog lives with me and is registered to me. I also have medical records where I was diagnosed with anxiety, which was very severe. I'm not someone who just claims I have anxiety because I get nervous sometimes. I throw up, can't breath, overall I get really ill. I went to a mental hospital a few times, was seen by multiple psychiatrist and therapist, and was on medication from ages 16 to 19 before insurance ran out so I stopped, but I still have bad anxiety. So how is that fraudulent? Because my wife filled those forms out and I considered my dog just a dog instead of something that helps me calm down? Seriously asking [info] None [info] 1551355060
berttney [info] Just an anecdone, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD, and there's a tendency for adhd stimulant meds to increase my anxiety, so the best treatment for me has been finding the right strain/dose of kratom, which also happened to help with pain. I used a green strain at lower doses (3g for me). Keep an eye on the ban, and what we can do for kratom to help others. [info] None [info] 1475278180
jma1024 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 16 I'll be turning 26 this year and yes that can be caused by anxiety. The reason I went to the hospital when I was 16 was because I was having chest tightness and my heart was racing and felt like I couldn't catch a breath they found nothing they said I was having a panic attack and diagnosed me with anxiety. I went through a series of test some that you've been through to make sure it wasn't my heart or something life threatening and all came back normal.I wasn't feeling a worry or depressed before my first panic attack it just came on all of the sudden. I still remember just watching TV and my heart started racing and I couldn't catch my breath chest was tight and burning thought it was a heart attack. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1471050021
rocco_xL [info] been there, even before I was diagnosed with anxiety I bit my nails.thankfully I stopped that, but like you I developed that exact same bad habit of digging my nails into my skin and it gives me some sort of strange relief I can downright crave at times when I'm very anxious. I've honestly never thought much about it as I chalked it up to a nervous habit (much like someone bouncing a leg) and I have no ambition to cut/hurt myself or do anything of that sort.pretty interesting that we both were nail biters who suffer from anxiety and now get the same kind of relief from digging our nails into our skin.anxiety is weird, isn't it? can anyone else chime in here? I'm honestly lost on what specifically is causing this [info] None [info] 1427306491
SheepHarem [info] Yeah, go ask your GP about it, they should refer you to the local mental health services. If they do a phone interview, be careful what you say. I was diagnosed with anxiety because they decided to do my phone interview the day before my exam :)))) Didn't even get to see a psychologist.Also, if anyone knows how to get a second opinion about mental health stuff that'd be real nice. [info] None [info] 1499407548
koeingtony [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety while in the navy. Afterwards I saw some articles online that really clicked for me and my inability to care for myself like a normal adult, and they were all about adhd! So once I was out of the navy I went to an adhd doc who specializes in adult diagnosis. He gave me a sheet and had me and my mom fill it out, and then interviewed me. He agreed that my symptoms indicated a combo of adhd and anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1527627043
SayoSC2 [info] Former Starcraft 2 player, I used to and I still have issues playing ranked.  One of the biggest issues as to why I have problems is the lack of confidence in personal skill to get better or be at the level I'm supposed to play at.  Like SC2 pre-LotV, I recently this year made a new account to smurf and play to fuck around and not give too much shit on ranked.  Needless to say, it still didn't help out at the same time.What I find with ranked anxiety is really to just being confident with yourself.  There has been many times when I feel like I can or can't win, but it also depends on the mindset if you want to try to win or just give up and move on.  With the former, you're investing a lot into tryharding, which can be either a satisfying, or morale-crushing feeling to experience.  The latter is where you just don't give a shit and just keep playing so you don't care about the small shit pissing you off.I think last issue is really the person/player him/herself.  A while ago, I was diagnosed with anxiety so it makes me stress from a lot of external things, whether it was league or social matters.  It's kind of been weird especially since playing has caused my jaw to just tense up significantly (I once actually had my jaw pop, which was painful ;_;).tl;dr - just don't stress too much, work on things that makes you have fun, and just be confident.  and most importantly, fight hard. [info] Gold IV [info] 1476675326
clearglassofwater [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety NOS or GAD with OCD features years ago and it waxes and wanes, going from totally manageable to pretty bad. I'm sorry to hear about your form of anxiety, that sounds awful. I've tried risperdal and it made my brain basically go on vacation and just be numb :/ mindfulness could help me a lot I think. I think a benzo with a shorter half life like Xanax would be helpful but I'm afraid of asking my psych because I know people sell it and it will sound like I'm doctor shopping. [info] None [info] 1499074833
Jack-da-crack [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 12 and now just recently developed panic attacks in my early 20s. Panic attacks are so awful, it's the feeling of impending doom and the sudden need to vomit.  I end up getting hives on my face and do end up vomiting if the panic attack is bad enough. I dread the next time I have another one. They can have my anxiety/ panic attacks, I hate people who proclaim it like its a badge of honor to show how your life sucks ass.  [info] None [info] 1553500328
holding_on_to_you [info] While in elementary school as we walked down the halls in lines, if we passed another line of kids, I'd take a look at each one and try and figure out if I could picture them with a gun. Now that I've been diagnosed with anxiety...it makes more sense. Who knew this weird habbit is probably something more kids do now than back in the day.  [info] None [info] 1551417467
jamwiches_jamwiches [info] I’m so sorry for what you’ve gone through. I was diagnosed with anxiety and dissociative identity when I was 17 but I just want you to know that you are not defined by that and are not defined by your past. You sound like a very sweet thoughtful person you will find other people like yourself and they will become your new family. I’m sure that must have distorted your idea of love but please know that there are lots of people in the world capable of loving you like you deserve.Edit: thank you for the silver, that’s the first reddit award I’ve ever gotten! [info] None [info] 1573361197
Merchanting [info] I've tried it, and wouldn't recommend it. I've been diagnosed with anxiety in the past, and had tried 1mg k-pins and propranolol prescribed for me. The only one that really helped me during high anxiety times was the k-pins, so I pursued other benzos when my doctor got stingy on the prescriptions.I bought 80x 4mg bars because they were cheap af, less than 150 for all. My intentions were 1mg a few times a week, for some chilling and some high anxiety situations. I lost that regimine basically the day I got them. Day one I took a quarter before school. It was nice for my anxiety, and didn't have me fiending for more. Still, when I got home I wanted another quarter for relaxing and sleeping. When I woke up the next day, I was still a bit unrestrained and decided to take another quarter before school again. This cycle of lowering inhibitions and taking even more kept happening. Within a week I was taking halves and skipping class. This ended in me sleeping in late one day, only about a week after buying the bars. I walked in half way through class, and it was a fucking test I had forgot about. Sat outside and filled with social/school anxiety and so I took more bar. I got really depressed and no longer had control of my drug use because I was too emotional. I took a cocktail of drugs/alcohol and ended up getting sent to the drunk tank when I refused an ambulance. This doesn't happen to everyone, but it's not super uncommon either. Xanax is too much too fast for most people. It worked for anxiety, but it's easier than you think to get addicted. Almost a year later and my anxiety is a lot better. Not sure what clicked, but it wasn't from continued benzo use.  [info] None [info] 1541101472
megangigilyn [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety around five or so and have been on it or a similar antidepressant since.What is atopy? Is there treatment? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1422478722
AntiChr1st [info] That being said having something to do can be helpful.I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 17, the more i work the less I feel it. Back when I was full time army and working 12 to 17 hour days it was basically gone. [info] I couldn't think of anything funny to have here [info] 1563353707
booksblanketsandtea [info] Every year when I was a kid my family and my god parents and their kids would go on holiday together. We usually went up to Nelson or Picton area (top of the South Island, NZ) and stayed at this holiday home we rented for a few years running. This one year (which was to be our last year at this home we rented) we ended up going to a beach a few bays around from where we were staying. I must have been about nine or ten at the time. Anyway, so we get to this beach and I have to say, it was the worst fucking place we could have chosen. The car was up a hill and you had to walk down a track in the bush to get to the beach. The beach itself was right against the flowering native plant life, so there were wasps fucking Everywhere - and I'm terrified of the little wankers (I like bees, though am still scared of them). Normally this would be fine, I'd just go swimming and wouldn't be bothered by them - but nope. Jellyfish. Jellyfish everywhere. So, I'm sitting on the beach hunched up trying not to cry from fear - my Mum and Dad think I'm being a whiney little brat and are ignoring me. My sister, brother and god-sisters are all frolicking around having a great time. I am Miserable and on the verge of a panic attack (I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago and this is the earliest panic attack I can remember having) - so I try and do what anyone would do in that situation: I try to get out. I tell Mum that I want to go sit in the car (not wanting to ruin everyone else's fun). She says no. Every few minutes I ask when we're leaving, flinching as bees and wasps fly around me, keeping a good distance from the ocean and the blue bottles swimming there.Eventually a wasp gets caught in my (then, waist length) hair and I decide 'fuck it, I'm not dealing with this shit anymore' - so I just get up and walk up to the car on my own. It's locked of course, but the window is open so i spend the next few minutes with arm in the car trying to unlock it- and suddenly I hear a noise and turn to see my Mum stalking towards me. This was my 'oh shit' moment. Never in my life have I been more scared - the jellyfish, the wasps and now my own mother is bearing down on me with a look on her face that says she is ready to Kill. She grabs me by the arm (still in the window) and drags me away from the car and starts giving me a hiding - I've already been crying from the fear and because no one had taken me seriously when I expressed that fear (which was honestly probably the worst part about it all) - now I'm crying because Mums giving me a few good wacks round the arse for (in my mind) simply being scared. I was grounded like you wouldn't believe - had to stay in my room, wasn't allowed to see my friend (the daughter of the people we rented the holiday home from) and we only ever saw each other once a year - and as I said, this was our last year renting that place. I wasn't allowed to play my gameboy or even read my books. I basically stayed in bed for the last four days of our trip and had to think about what I had done. It still makes me furious and scared to this day - I still have the odd nightmare of feeling trapped on a beach. I never really told my parents that I was worried or scared again after that, because it just felt like they didn't care.  [info] None [info] 1417138845
saareadaar [info] Experiencing mental illness. Don't get me wrong, it's absolutely horrible and it's not really something I wish on anyone, but it wasn't until I was diagnosed with anxiety that I realised just how hard doing even basic things can be when you have a mental illness, even though I previously thought that I understood. And I think it would make people just a little more empathetic towards people with mental illnesses rather than viewing them as lazy/crazy/dangerous/etc. Also I am so sick of the triggered jokes. People who joke about it have no idea how horrible being genuinely triggered in the clinical sense of the word actually is. [info] None [info] 1498877886
hopeless_artist [info] Never written anything on reddit before, but your post made me want to reply. I am working on the self love thing right now. I am a 22 f starting my senior year of college. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 12 and oh my gosh the places I have barfed over the years. Not to mention the situations I have gotten myself into because I can’t say no. I am a people pleaser to the extreme, basing the entirety of my self worth not only on how other people view me, but on how I think they view me. I like to mind f myself like that. Anyways, I could relate to a lot of what you said. Wishing us both happy futures. ✌️ [info] None [info] 1567445935
bosfton [info] Yeah, I definitely see where you’re coming from. I guess I feel like my friends don’t even offer help maybe that means my friendship isn’t worth much to them. I am very shy and hate public speaking too but I would do it for a friend.  I asked a bridesmaid if she could do the speech instead and she immediately said yes like “If you mean like gush about our friendship and what it means to me to be there then I can totally do that, I’ll write it up tonight”. That was more what I thought a normal friend would be like.   My MOH and I have been best friends for over 20 years, I am diagnosed with anxiety and take medication for it as well I get that, but for me I’d view it as “well this is really scary and intimidating but this is my best friend we are talking about and it would make her happy so I’ll just say something brief”.  Hell I feel that way about the wedding ceremony and the first dance— I am shy and bad at dancing but my fiancé thought that a first dance would be sweet and they are commonly done at weddings so I sucked it the fuck up and learned even though I’m terrified. Part of life is forcing yourself outside of your comfort zone sometimes. I realize it’s not my place so that’s why I won’t force her to talk but it hurts she doesn’t wanna make any effort when I would have for her. Also I think she forgot about the speech because she said “I thought there wasn’t going to be toasts” and when I dug out the old chat log of her agreeing to give a toast she said “yeah I thought I could do it back when it was something in the future” and started saying stuff like “well a MOH speech isn’t required so it’s okay”.  It feels like she decided in her mind she wasn’t going to give a speech and then just never told me. [info] None [info] 1562286619
bk513 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was about 14. I’m sure I do have anxiety, but it took until my senior year of high school for a doctor to say i might have ADHD. I’ve had trouble with time management and focusing since I was 6 years old, but I was always led to believe I was just a “slow worker.” I’ve never had problems with hyperactivity and I had good grades, so I guess that made it harder to see. Most of my anxiety stems from issues that have been caused by ADHD this whole time. Sometimes I wonder if I would have anxiety at all if I was diagnosed with ADHD as a kid. [info] None [info] 1548874515
fenixVerde [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety issues and high functioning Autism last month. Yesterday my mother called to discuss her maybe being Autistic. I knew it was only a matter of time.  [info] None [info] 1491633127
rahbunny [info] You are describing my disposition before I was diagnosed with anxiety, that may not be the case for you, but I would highly recommend talking to your GP about how you feel. [info] None [info] 1442230961
Alphurna [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in elementary school and then autism in middle school. I’ve been given a 504 plan for school (a list of accommodations) and multiple therapists for different things over the years. I find that surrounding myself with things that make me feel comfortable is a great way to cope. For example, blankets are a godsend for me. I’m actually pursuing a service dog as well. [info] None [info] 1554258612
quietanatomygirl [info] "you have nothing to worry about." - exact words from my mom when I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1404855457
veinpain [info] Yes! I've finally been officially diagnosed and am being treated. I first saw a terrible psychiatrist who tried to pin my pain on a past sexual trauma and then attempted to pawn me off on a psychotherapist (with no anxiety treatment). I didn't buy that because of years of imaging and diagnostics from specialists that clearly show a physiological basis for my pain. I wanted help for the severe anxiety I felt as a result of my pain. After that frustrating experience, I had a procedure using conscious sedation. The medication didn't work and I had a full blown panic attack during the procedure. It was horrible and humiliating. Thankfully I was scheduled to see a new psychiatrist right after that who was more willing to listen to me. I was diagnosed with anxiety and given medication to help on a daily basis and one for if I felt an episode of panic coming on (mostly social situations where I fear pain coming on). Just knowing I have it helps. I rarely use it now. I'm just glad someone took me seriously and listens. But, yes, pain and worrying about your pain and its effects can truly cause anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1501860291
ranspazzo [info] Great question!  I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was in college so this played a HUGE role in my mental state when dealing with the leukemia.  I was having panic attacks pretty often when I was in the hospital which was frustrating.  I found walking the hallways helped.  I got much worse when I went through the isolation after the transplant.  I don't like being cooped up especially in a small hospital room.  I started getting serious panic attacks and anxiety near the end because I really wanted to go home.  Strange thing was that when I got home, the anxiety continued because now I had my daughter to take care of while I was recuperating.  I got a lot of help so I made it through it.  I do suffer from post traumatic stress disorder which is weird.  Certain sounds and smells trigger anxiety.  Other than that I am mentally back to normal.  I do look at everyday life differently after this experience.   [info] None [info] 1386805635
MainStreetGal [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety 10 years ago (whew it feels weird to say that was so long ago lol), and I was having attacks like you were - therapy was a lifesaver for me. As someone who was in your shoes, it sounds like you would benefit from it. It was so helpful to vent about feelings which helped decrease episodes. Plus they taught me breathing techniques which still help to this day - I am in much healthier place at the moment, thanks to them.For the past year I've been experiencing anticipatory grief myself, and I plan to return to therapy once I get health insurance again. [info] None [info] 1557110746
maydsilee [info] I've noticed in many situations where I thought I was following my dog's instinct, I realized in hindsight that my gut was already telling me a situation was bad, if that makes sense? Like, I probably realized subconsciously that something wasn't right or someone was making me uncomfortable, and then my dog picked up on my own body language (me tensing, for example). Since he can show it better than me (his hackles rising, or shifting uneasily next to me, or not wanting to walk past someone, etc.), I listened to him and would change direction or avoid that person. A lot of people don't get just how much their body language rubs off on their dogs, who notice you're uneasy, so then they're uneasy. It's why trainers stress to clients often that their own feelings rubs off on their dogs.Of course, it's also not absolute :P I'm diagnosed with anxiety, so a *lot* of things make me uneasy, and my dog notices that, so...it's definitely not clear-cut lol! [info] None [info] 1573678035
raccooncityangel [info] I think neurosis is more of one specific thing or grouping of things. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so that makes me a bit weird, and i see and experience the world differently than most people i know.  [info] None [info] 1353049406
jakalarf [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety not to long ago, I didn't even know that there was anything wrong with me, I don't even know how long I've had it. So i guess it doesn't effect me in any way i notice. [info] None [info] 1435552892
DrJonathanCrow [info] I have to stop listening to metal for awhile. A couple months ago, I was diagnosed with anxiety, and recently I figured out that when I'm under high stress, metal is a trigger [info] None [info] 1487849899
MemeGoddessAsteria [info] Oef 2 is the lie I have two cats ones named Apollo ones named Salem for 1 I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder at age 10 and for 3 once a astrology hoe always a astrology hoe [info] :S3Hange: [info] 1564958750
leahnopants [info] I mean like most universities, if there is something that you are challenged by or something specific that was out of the ordinary that prevented you from reaching your full potential, they'll listen to you. Ex. "I  have had anxiety for 10 years"..Well maybe by then you should be trying to manage it / making a difference vs "I was diagnosed with anxiety in my 2nd year and as you can see by my transcript I've been improving my management of it". If you think its extenuating...might as well toss it in there. I'm sure lots of people try and bs their way through it. [info] None [info] 1568760441
alphagogo_52 [info] I'm the opposite of this...I used to overthink all the time too, day and night. Then I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and I had to stop most of these thoughts coming through, as the negativity was triggering my anxiety. I think I kinda shifted my overthinking process into the cigar session. [info] None [info] 1569171867
manicsuppressor [info] Looking back I always wonder that myself. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorders now, so maybe I had it before and the weed brought out my symptoms ten-fold. I think it used to alleviate my symptoms initially, and I suffered rebound anxiety whenever I went more than like 6 hours without smoking, so I had to constantly be high or I would start feeling this super horrifying feeling where I felt nauseous and extremely depressed, anxious, uncomfortable, and just terrible all around. I felt like my brain was "damaged" and scattered. I jonesed for it like a heroin addict. At the time I thought I had just built a strong dependance to it or something, and I was always confused why I was the only one that felt that way, and figured I had a unique brain chemistry or something. All my friends just thought I was a pussy.Anyway, I personally would strongly agree with your decision to just stop it completely and never look back at it again. And even without the panic/anxiety problems, there are so many other reasons you're better off without it too. I think the anxiety was the only thing though that could have ever motivated me enough to quit, so sometimes I think it was a blessing in disguise.EDIT: I should also add that although it took me 2 months to fully "recover", I was like 90% better after the first month, but it took another month for the anxiety to completely go back to normal. [info] None [info] 1347809749
DaintyGhost747 [info] I used to get that a lot. And I made sure I didn't miss anything, I'd do everything, with every friend, club, group, and family. It didn't go so well, and I went to the hospital extreme exhaustion. That's day I was diagnosed with anxiety [info] None [info] 1553334893
Cutteone18 [info] Yea, I was diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd-d at 19. Didn’t get my fibro diagnosis until it was so bad I couldn’t work at 25. It seems to me that the more under control you get your mental health issues the better your pain will get. Just in my experience. [info] None [info] 1517795112
Ginger29 [info] Yeah, I'm sure it's different.  It's always made me uncomfortable, too, way before I was diagnosed with anxiety, but I really didn't socialize with other kids and didn't learn how to behave "properly."  So now I'm trying to learn how to do all that stuff everyone knows how to do and it makes my anxiety insane.  But yeah, I'm basically uncomfortable with eye contact, which my loved ones know and allow, or I'm staring at strangers like a crazy robot.  It's awesome. [info] None [info] 1544423382
drpond [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I definitely notice it is MUCH worse during PMS. I have medications which get bumped up for 1 or 2 days to help control the surge of hormones and I've found it to be quite helpful and successful! So talk with your doctor about things to do specifically during PMS. [info] None [info] 1352696728
Im_Tripping_Balls [info] &gt; when you know you need to do something but can't remember what it isHoly hell, that feeling. I know it. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I remember getting this for no apparent reason (and it terrified the crap out of me) back from when I was about 10 years old. [info] None [info] 1381295377
zitjohnson [info] Same. I drove myself to the ER when I was 20 because I felt palpitations and have a history of heart disease in my family. While 20 is super young, I had never felt that before and the worry only exacerbated the rapid heart rate. Turns out my ECG was fine for the most part, only one abnormal wave but the doctors said that happens to most people time to time. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder by a professional and while I rarely talk about it, the times I feel like an attack is coming on, the people around me dismiss it as general paranoia/attention seeking. Tbh, before I experienced real panic and anxiety attacks I may have thought the same way, so I don't take it to heart, but I try to inform them it's not as simple as feeling nervous. I don't even need the person around me to do anything, simply a presence is enough to get me through. [info] None [info] 1534734849
seven_swell [info] EM. I originally signed on to be Nuke but they DQ'd me after bootcamp because they found out I was diagnosed with anxiety. I'm not too torn up about that though. [info] None [info] 1442180713
alexaplaydespacito2 [info] frock no. 6th grade year I got A’s in almost all subjects except for math. I understood the math but I just got all C’s and the rare B. It made some really angry because I knew I couldn’t pass if I kept this up. My teacher pulled me over and gave me an oral test which I got 100% on. I was diagnosed with anxiety that year. Now there are people who are just stupid and don’t study, and that’s different  [info] hating kankens is a popular opinion [info] 1544030185
BrentBlend [info] Items for sale.Gold PAX 3Newvape pusher/lid comboNewvape screenInterplanetary Super Weapon II + new screens x5 (+1 barely used in the swII, 6 total)ID Pollen PressID baggiesID silicone 2ml containers x4I used the swII maybe two times, the PAX once. I was diagnosed with anxiety, thinking this may help with medicating. It still gives me anxiety so I have no use for any of it. Everything is in like new condition. [info] None [info] 1505356437
AnArgumentativeBox [info] Nice choice!Out of curiosity is one of those meds clonidine? I was diagnosed with anxiety/high stress and high blood pressure this past year and now mine has me on a couple of things. Im 36 and feel the same way but on the other hand, I do prefer feeling calmer...  That being said, were you a pretty calm person prior to having the surgery and diagnosis? [info] Verified Cardboard Box® [info] 1569842097
pastelbacon [info] Not a lot of point in responding this late, but I'm a bit emotional to see how many people share the experience of relying on Hitchhikers to get them through bad times. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and panic attacks (the humour isn't lost on me there) when I was 17. I had loved the books before then and read them several times, and happened to have the audiobooks on hand too, the versions read by Douglas Adams himself. During the worst period of my anxiety, I found that if I put the audiobook on then the familiar words combined with Adams' voice would calm me down. It could dissipate panic attacks and help me through insomnia. As treatment began to work for me, I needed them less and less, but to this day if I start to panic I repeat the first lines back to myself and it centres my brain. My life has been helped for the better by one man telling me, Don't Panic. I hope your struggles end soon, and it sees you through too.  [info] None [info] 1470374725
unknowncm [info] Thanks for the reply, a long time ago I was diagnosed with anxiety but since then I’ve learned how to cope with it and I wouldn’t say I’m an anxious person In fact I’m confident most of the time. Thanks for the advice and reply I will try what you’ve said. [info] None [info] 1573597294
Sekoshiba [info] Sleep, water, food, are all really important. Unfortunately I never figured out what caused my migraines, I just sort of "grew out of them". Stress could be a factor though, I suppose, as I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and migraines at the same time. [info] None [info] 1474236142
KarebearMom [info] My SS had a different tic when he was younger (maybe 9 or 10) he would blink and twitch his eye. His doctor told BM to just ignore it and he would grow out of it it. He did.Now, take this with a grain of salt because I'm diagnosed with anxiety. But I would ask DH to take him to the doctor, or if BM is always the one who takes SS to the doctor ask DH to have BM take him, just to be sure. As long as your copay is reasonable it's worth it to me to get a medical opinion. [info] SS 17, SS 15, DS 7, DS 5 [info] 1541301066
sloveene [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder early this year and was prescribed lexapro for my panic attacks. I'm off of it now since I've been better. Taking B complex and switched on a vegan diet. Which other supplement I could take for long term use? [info] None [info] 1508286376
hashtaggaysfortrump [info] How is that “transphobic” exactly? He removed an executive order made by Obama that let people who never were mentally fit to serve into our millitary. I’m gay and support trans people but if I got denied because I was diagnosed with anxiety why should they qualify when they have a mental disorder and a 40% attempted suicide rate?  [info] None [info] 1511161313
BurntPaper [info] It's definitely not, but it's the generation that has pushed the most for other people to change their habits, lifestyles, etc, in order to make them less uncomfortable. I've been diagnosed with anxiety issues. I've struggled with it since I was in my early teens, and I'm in my early 30's now. It sucks, but I'm not going to try to make others change to make my life easier. I suck it up, or I avoid situations that trigger my anxiety too much. It's like the ability to just fucking deal with shit has been lost.  [info] None [info] 1539989865
theelvenguard [info] man, I was diagnosed with anxiety at 19. if anyone had said that after telling me that's what it was, I can't even imagine what I wouldve done..  [info] None [info] 1549423526
